Economic Manuscripts: Capital: Volume Two

Karl Marx's

[capital volume 2]



CAPITAL A CRITIQUE OF POLITICAL ECONOMY


Book Two: The Process of Circulation of Capital

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: by Marx 1863 - 1878 and edited for publication by Engels in
1885;
Published: this revised second edition in 1893;
Source: Progress Publishers, Moscow 1956, translated by I. Lasker;
Transcribed for the Internet: by proletarian revolutionaries in the
Philippines;
HTML mark-up: in 1997 for MEIA by Doug Hockin;
Proofread: and corrected by Chris Clayton 2007
eBook prepared by J Eduardo Brissos (2011).

PDF Version of whole book.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents

1885 Preface (Frederick Engels)

1893 Preface to the Second Edition (Frederick Engels)

Part One:
The Metamorphoses of Capital and their Circuits

Part Two:
The Turnover of Capital

Part Three:
The Reproduction and Circulation of the Aggregate Social Capital


------------------------------------------------------------------------


PREFACES


[CAPITAL volume 2]


Preface to the First Edition

It was no easy task to put the second book of _Capital_ in shape for
publication, and do it in a way that on the one hand would make it a
connected and as far as possible complete work, and on the other would
represent exclusively the work of its author, not of its editor. The
great number of available, mostly fragmentary, texts worked on added to
the difficulties of this task. At best one single manuscript (No. IV)
had been revised throughout and made ready for press. But the greater
part had become obsolete through subsequent revision. The bulk of the
material was not finally polished, in point of language, although in
substance it was for the greater part fully worked out. The language was
that in which Marx used to make his extracts: careless style full of
colloquialisms, often containing coarsely humorous expressions and
phrases interspersed with English and French technical terms or with
whole sentences and even pages of English. Thoughts were jotted down as
they developed in the brain of the author. Some parts of the argument
would be fully treated, others of equal importance only indicated.
Factual material for illustration would be collected, but barely
arranged, much less worked out. At conclusions of chapters, in the
author’s anxiety to get to the next, there would often be only a few
disjointed sentences to mark the further development here left
incomplete. And finally there was the well-known handwriting which the
author himself was sometimes unable to decipher.

I have contented myself with reproducing these manuscripts as literally
as possible, changing the style only in places where Marx would have
changed it himself and interpolating explanatory sentences or connecting
statements only where this was absolutely necessary, and where, besides,
the meaning was clear beyond any doubt. Sentences whose interpretation
was susceptible of the slightest doubt were preferably copied word for
word. The passages which I have remodelled or interpolated cover barely
ten pages in print and concern only matters of form.

The mere enumeration of the manuscript material left by Marx for Book II
proves the unparalleled conscientiousness and strict self-criticism with
which he endeavoured to elaborate his great economic discoveries to the
point of utmost completion before he published them. This self-criticism
rarely permitted him to adapt his presentation of the subject, in
content as well as in form, to his ever widening horizon, the result of
incessant study. The above material consists of the following:

First, a manuscript entitled _Zur Kritik der politischen Oekonomie_,
containing 1,472 quarto pages in 23 notebooks, written in August 1861 to
June 1863. It is the continuation of a work of the same title, the first
part of which appeared in Berlin, in 1859. It treats, on pages 1-220
(Notebooks I-V) and again on pages 1,159-1,472 (Notebooks XIX-XXIII), of
the subjects examined in Book I of _Capital_, from the transformation of
money into capital to the end, and is the first extant draft there of.
Pages 973-1,158 (Notebooks XVI-XVIII) deal with capital and profit, rate
of profit, merchant’s capital and money-capital, that is to say with
subjects which later were developed in the manuscript for Book III. The
themes treated in Book II and very many of those which are treated
later, in Book III, are not yet arranged separately. They are treated in
passing, to be specific, in the section which makes up the main body of
the manuscript, viz., pages 220-972 (Notebooks VI-XV), entitled
“Theories of Surplus-Value.” This section contains a detailed critical
history of the pith and marrow of Political Economy, the theory of
surplus-value and develops parallel with it, in polemics against
predecessors, most of the points later investigated separately and in
their logical connection in the manuscript for Books II and III. After
eliminating the numerous passages covered by Books II and III, I intend
to publish the critical part of this manuscript as _Capital_, Book IV.
This manuscript, valuable though it is, could be used only very little
in the present edition of Book II.

The manuscript chronologically following next is that of Book III. It
was written, at least the greater part of it, in 1864 and 1865. Only
after this manuscript had been completed in its essential parts did Marx
undertake the elaboration of Book I which was published in 1867. I am
now getting this manuscript of Book III in shape for press.

The following period — after the publication of Book I — is represented
by a collection of four folio manuscripts for Book II, numbered I-IV by
Marx himself. Manuscript I (150 pages), presumably written in 1865 or
1867, is the first separate, but more or less fragmentary, elaboration
of Book II as now arranged. Here too nothing could be used. Manuscript
III is partly a compilation of quotations and references to the
notebooks containing Marx’s extracts, most of them relating to Part I of
Book II, partly elaborations of particular points, especially a critique
of Adam Smith’s propositions on fixed and circulating capital and the
source of profit; furthermore an exposition of the relation of the rate
of surplus-value to the rate of profit, which belongs in Book III.
Little that was new could be garnered from the references, while the
elaborations for volumes II and III were superseded by subsequent
revisions and had also to be discarded for the greater part.

Manuscript IV is an elaboration, ready for press, of Part I and the
first chapters of Part II of Book II, and has been used where suitable.
Although it was found that this manuscript had been written earlier than
Manuscript II, yet, being far more finished in form, it could be used
with advantage for the corresponding part of this book. All that was
needed was a few addenda from Manuscript II. The latter is the only
somewhat complete elaboration of Book II and dates from the year 1870.
The notes for the final editing, which I shall mention immediately, say
explicitly: “The second elaboration must be used as the basis.”

There was another intermission after 1870, due mainly to Marx’s ill
health. Marx employed this time in his customary way, by studying
agronomics, rural relations in America and, especially, Russia, the
money-market and banking, and finally natural sciences such as geology
and physiology. Independent mathematical studies also figure prominently
in the numerous extract notebooks of this period. In the beginning of
1877 he had recovered sufficiently to resume his main work. Dating back
to the end of March 1877 there are references and notes from the
above-named four manuscripts intended as the basis of a new elaboration
of Book II, the beginning of which is represented by Manuscript V (56
folio pages). It comprises the first four chapters and is still little
worked out. Essential points are treated in footnotes. The material is
rather collected than sifted, but it is the last complete presentation
of this, the most important section of Part I.

A first attempt to prepare from it a manuscript ready for press was made
in Manuscript VI (_after_ October 1877 and before July 1878), embracing
only 17 quarto pages, the greater part of the first chapter. A second
and last attempt was made in Manuscript VII, “July 2, 1878,” only 7
folio pages.

About this time Marx seems to have realised that be would never be able
to finish the elaboration of the second and third books in a manner
satisfactory to himself unless a complete revolution in his health took
place. Indeed, manuscripts V-VIII show far too frequent traces of an
intense struggle against depressing ill health. The most difficult bit
of Part I had been worked over in Manuscript V. The remainder of Part I
and all of Part II, with the exception of Chapter XVII, presented no
great theoretical difficulties. But Part III, dealing with the
reproduction and circulation of social capital, seemed to him to be very
much in need of revision; for Manuscript II had first treated
reproduction without taking into consideration money-circulation, which
is instrumental in effecting it, and then gone over the same question
again, but with money-circulation taken into account. This was to be
eliminated and the whole part to be reconstructed in such a way as to
conform to the author’s enlarged horizon. Thus Manuscript VIII came into
existence, a notebook containing only 70 quarto pages. But the vast
amount of matter Marx was able to compress into this space is clearly
demonstrated on comparing that manuscript with Part III, in print, after
leaving out the pieces inserted from Manuscript II.

This manuscript is likewise merely a preliminary treatment of the
subject, its main object having been to ascertain and develop the points
of view newly acquired in comparison with Manuscript II, with those
points ignored about which there was nothing new to say. An essential
portion of Chapter XVII, Part II, which anyhow is more or less relevant
to Part III, was once more reworked and expanded. The logical sequence
is frequently interrupted, the treatment of the subject gappy in places
and very fragmentary, especially the conclusion. But what Marx intended
to say on the subject is said there, somehow or other.

This is the material for Book II, out of which I was supposed “to make
something,” as Marx remarked to his daughter Eleanor shortly before his
death. I have construed this task in its narrowest meaning. So far as
this was at all possible, I have confined my work to the mere selection
of a text from the available variants. I always based my work on the
last available edited manuscript, comparing this with the preceding
ones. Only the first and third parts offered any real difficulties,
i.e., of more than a mere technical nature, and these were indeed
considerable. I have endeavoured to solve them exclusively in the spirit
of the author.

I have translated quotations in the text whenever they are cited in
confirmation of facts or when, as in passages from Adam Smith, the
original is available to everyone who wants to go thoroughly into the
matter. This was impossible only in Chapter X, because there it is
precisely the English text that is criticised. The quotations from Book
I are paged according to its second edition, the last one to appear in
Marx’s lifetime.

For Book III, only the following materials are available, apart from the
first elaboration in manuscript form of _Zur Kritik_, from the
above-mentioned parts of Manuscript III, and from a few occasional short
notes scattered through various extract notebooks: The folio manuscript
of 1864-65, referred to previously, which is about as fully worked out
as Manuscript II of Book II; furthermore, a notebook dated 1875: The
Relation of the Rate of Surplus-Value to the Rate of Profit, which
treats the subject mathematically (in equations). The preparation of
this Book for publication is proceeding rapidly. So far as I am able to
judge up to now, it will present mainly technical difficulties, with the
exception of a few but very important sections.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

I consider this an opportune place to refute a certain charge which has
been raised against Marx, first in only whispers, sporadically, but more
recently, after his death, proclaimed an established fact by German
Socialists of the Chair and of the State and by their hangers-on. It is
claimed that Marx plagiarised the work of Rodbertus. I have already
stated elsewhere ^([1]) what was most urgent in this regard, but not
until now have I been able to adduce conclusive proof.

As far as I know this charge was made for the first time in R. Meyer’s
_Emancipationskampf des vierten Standes_, p. 43:

“It can be proved that Marx has gathered the greater part of his
critique from these publications” — meaning the works of Rodbertus
dating back to the last half of the thirties.

I may well assume, until further evidence is produced, that the “whole
proof” of this assertion consists in Rodbertus having assured Herr Meyer
that this was so.

In 1879 Rodbertus himself appears on the scene and writes the following
to J. Zeller (_Zeitschrift für die gesammte Staatswissenschaft_,
Tübingen, 1879, p. 219), with reference to his work _Zur Erkenntniss
unsrer staatswirtschaftlichen Zustände_, 1842:

“You will find that this” (the line of thought developed in it) “has
been very nicely used ... by Marx, without, however, giving me credit
for it.”

The posthumous publisher of Rodbertus’s works, Th. Kozak, repeats his
insinuation without further ceremony. (_Das Kapital_ von Rodbertus.
Berlin, 1884, Introduction, p. XV.)

Finally in the _Briefe und Sozialpolitische Aufsätze von Dr.
Rodbertus-Jagetzow_, published by R. Meyer in 1881, Rodbertus says
point-blank:

“To-day I find I have been _robbed_ by Schäffle and Marx without having
my name mentioned.” (Letter No. 60, p..134.)

And in another place, Rodbertus’s claim assumes a more definite form:

“In my third social letter I have shown _virtually in the same way_ as
Marx, only more briefly and clearly, what the _source_ of the
_surplus-value_ of the capitalist is.” (Letter No. 48, p. 111.)

Marx had never heard anything about any of these charges of plagiarism.
In his copy of the _Emancipationskampf_ only that part had been cut open
which related to the International. The remaining pages were not opened
until I cut them myself after his death. He never looked at the Tübingen
_Zeitschrift_. The _Briefe_, etc., to R. Meyer likewise remained unknown
to him, and I did not learn of the passage referring to the “robbery”
until Dr. Meyer himself was good enough to call my attention to it in
1884. However, Marx was familiar with letter No. 48. Dr. Meyer had been
so kind as to present the original to the youngest daughter of Marx.
When some of the mysterious whispering about the secret source of his
criticism having to be sought in Rodbertus reached the ear of Marx, he
showed me that letter with the remark that here he had at last authentic
information as to what Rodbertus himself claimed; if that was all
Rodbertus asserted he, Marx, had no objection, and he could well afford
to let Rodbertus enjoy the pleasure of considering his own version the
briefer and clearer one. In fact, Marx considered the matter settled by
this letter of Rodbertus.

He could so all the more since I know for certain that he was not in the
least acquainted with the literary activity of Rodbertus until about
1859, when his own critique of Political Economy had been completed, not
only in its fundamental outlines, but also in its more important
details. Marx began his economic studies in Paris, in 1843, starting
with the great Englishmen and Frenchmen. Of German economists he knew
only Rau and List, and he did not want any more of them. Neither Marx
nor I heard a word of Rodbertus’s existence until we had to criticise,
in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_, 1848, the speeches he made as Berlin
Deputy and his actions as Minister. We were both so ignorant that we had
to ask the Rhenish deputies who this Rodbertus was that had become a
Minister so suddenly. But these deputies too could not tell us anything
about the economic writings of Rodbertus. That on the other hand Marx
had known very well already at that time, without the help of Rodbertus,
not only whence but also _how_ “the surplus-value of the capitalist”
came into existence is proved by his _Poverty of Philosophy_, 1847, and
by his lectures on wage-labour and capital, delivered in Brussels the
same year and published in Nos. 264-69 of the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_,
in 1849. It was only in 1859, through Lassalle, that Marx learned of the
existence of a certain economist named Rodbertus and thereupon Marx
looked up the “third social letter” in the British Museum.

These were the actual circumstances. And now let us see what there is to
the content, of which Marx is charged with “robbing” Rodbertus. Says
Rodbertus:

“In my third social letter I have shown in the same way as Marx, only
more briefly and clearly, what the source of the surplus-value of the
capitalist is.”

This, then, is the crux of the matter: The theory of surplus-value. And
indeed, it would be difficult to say what else there is in Marx that
Rodbertus might claim as his property. Thus Rodbertus declares here he
is the real originator of the theory of surplus-value and that Marx
robbed him of it.

And what has the third social letter to say in regard to the origin of
surplus-value? Simply this: That “rent,” his term which lumps together
ground-rent and profit, does not arise from an “addition of value” to
the value of a commodity, but

“from a deduction of value from wages; in other words, because wages
represent only a part of the value of a product,”

and if labour is sufficiently productive

“wages need not be equal to the natural exchange-value of the product of
labour in order to leave enough of this value for the replacing of
capital (!) and for rent.”

We are not informed however what sort of a “natural exchange-value” of a
product it is that leaves nothing for the “replacing of capital,”
consequently, for the replacement of raw material and the wear and tear
of tools.

It is our good fortune to be able to state what impression was produced
on Marx by this stupendous discovery of Rodbertus. In the manuscript
_Zur Kritik_, notebook X, pp. 445 et seqq. we find a “Digression. Herr
Rodbertus. A New Ground-Rent Theory.” This is the only point of view
from which Marx there looks upon the third social letter. The Rodbertian
theory of surplus-value in general is dismissed with the ironical
remark: “Mr. Rodbertus first analyses the slate of affairs in a country
where property in land and property in capital are not separated and
then arrives at the _important_ conclusion that rent (by which he means
the entire surplus-value) is only equal to the unpaid labour or to the
quantity of products in which this labour is expressed.”

Capitalistic man has been producing surplus-value for several hundred
years and has gradually arrived at the point of pondering over its
origin. The view first propounded grew directly out of commercial
practice: surplus-value arises out of an addition to the value of the
product. This idea was current among the mercantilists. But James
Steuart already realised that in that case the one would necessarily
lose what the other would gain. Nevertheless, this view persisted for a
long time afterwards, especially among the Socialists. But it was thrust
out of classical science by Adam Smith.

He says in the _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. I, Ch. VI:

“As soon as stock has accumulated in the hands of particular persons,
some of them will naturally employ it in setting to work industrious
people, whom they will supply with materials and subsistence, in order
to make a _profit_ by the sale of their work, or by _what their labour
adds to the value of the materials_.... The value which the workmen _add
to the materials_, therefore, resolves itself in this case into _two
parts_, of which the one pays _their wages_, the other the _profits of
their employer_ upon the whole stock of materials and wages which he
advanced.”

And a little further on he says:

“As soon as the land of ally country has all become private property,
the landlords, like all other men, love to reap where they never sowed,
and demand a rent even for its natural produce....” The labourer
“...must _give up_ to the landlord _a portion_ of what his _labour_
either collects or produces. This portion, or, what comes to the same
thing, the price of this portion, constitutes the _rent of land_.”

Marx comments on this passage in the above-named manuscript _Zur
Kritik_, etc., p. 253: “Thus Adam Smith conceives _surplus-value_ — that
is, surplus-labour, the excess of labour performed and realised in the
commodity over and above the paid labour, the labour which has received
its equivalent in the wages — as the _general category_, of which profit
in the strict sense and rent of land are merely branches.”

Adam Smith says furthermore (Vol. I, Ch. VIII):

“As soon as land becomes private property, the landlord demands a share
of almost all the produce which the labourer can either raise or collect
from it. His rent makes the _first deduction_ from the _produce of the
labour which is employed upon land_. It seldom happens that the person
who tills the ground has the wherewithal to maintain himself till he
reaps the harvest. His maintenance is generally advanced to him from the
stock of a master, the farmer who employs him, and who would have no
interest to employ him, unless he was to _share in the produce of his
labour_, or unless his stock was to be replaced to him with a profit.
This profit makes a _second deduction_ from the produce of the labour
which is employed upon land. The produce of almost all other labour is
liable to the like deduction of profit. In all arts and manufactures the
greater part of the workmen stand in need of a master to advance them
the materials of their work, and their wages and maintenance till it be
completed. He _shares_ in the _produce of their labour_, or in the value
which it adds to the materials upon which it is bestowed; and in this
share consists his profit.”

Marx’s comment (Manuscript, p. 256): “Here therefore Adam Smith in plain
terms describes rent and profit on capital as mere _deductions_ from the
workman’s product or the value of his product, which is equal to the
quantity of labour added by him to the material. This deduction however,
as Adam Smith has himself previously explained, can only consist of that
part of the labour which the workman adds to the materials, over and
above the quantity of labour which only pays his wages, or which only
provides an equivalent for his wages; that is, the surplus-labour, the
unpaid part of his labour.”

Thus even Adam Smith knew “the source of the surplus-value of the
capitalist,” and furthermore also of that of the landlord. Marx
acknowledged this as early as 1861, while Rodbertus and the swarming
mass of his admirers, who grew like mushrooms under the warm summer
showers of state socialism, seem to have forgotten all about that.

“Nevertheless,” Marx continues, “he [Adam Smith] does not distinguish
surplus-value as such as a category on its own, distinct from the
specific forms it assumes in profit and rent. This is the source of much
error and inadequacy in his inquiry, and of even more in the work of
Ricardo.”

This statement fits Rodbertus to a T. His “rent” is simply the sum of
ground-rent and profit. He builds up an entirely erroneous theory of
ground-rent, and he accepts profit without any examination of it, just
as he finds it among his predecessors.

Marx’s surplus-value, on the contrary, represents the _general form_ of
the sum of values appropriated without any equivalent by the owners of
the means of production, and this form splits into the distinct,
_converted_ forms of profit and ground-rent in accordance with very
peculiar laws which Marx was the first to discover. These laws will be
expounded in Book III. We shall see there that many intermediate links
are required to arrive from an understanding of surplus-value in general
at an understanding of its transformation into profit and ground-rent;
in other words at an understanding of the laws of the distribution of
surplus-value within the capitalist class.

Ricardo goes considerably further than Adam Smith. He bases his
conception of surplus-value on a new theory of value contained in embryo
in Adam Smith, but generally forgotten when it comes to applying it.
This theory of value became the starting-point of all subsequent
economic science. From the determination of the value of commodities by
the quantity of labour embodied in them he derives the distribution,
between the labourers and capitalists, of the quantity of value added by
labour to the raw materials, and the division of this value into wages
and profit (i.e., here surplus-value). He shows that the value of the
commodities remains the same no matter what may be the proportion of
these two parts, a law which he holds has but few exceptions. He even
establishes a few fundamental laws, although couched in too general
terms, on the mutual relations of wages and surplus-value (taken in the
form of profit) (Marx, _Das Kapital_, Buch I, Kap. XV, A), and shows
that ground-rent is a surplus over and above profit, which under certain
circumstances does not accrue.

In none of these points did Rodbertus go beyond Ricardo. He either
remained wholly unfamiliar with the internal contradictions of the
Ricardian theory which caused the downfall of that school, or they only
misled him into raising utopian demands (his _Zur Erkenntnis_, etc., p.
130) instead of inducing him to find economic solutions.

But the Ricardian theory of value and surplus-value did not have to wait
for Rodbertus’s _Zur Erkenntnis_ in order to be utilised for socialist
purposes. On page 609 of the first volume (_Das Kapital_, 2nd ed.) we
find the following quotation, “THE POSSESSORS OF SURPLUS-PRODUCE OR
CAPITAL,” taken from a pamphlet entitled _The Source and Remedy of the
National Difficulties. A Letter to Lord John Russell_, London, 1821. In
this pamphlet of 40 pages, the importance of which should have been
noted if only on account of the one expression “SURPLUS-PRODUCE OR
CAPITAL,” and which Marx saved from falling into oblivion, we read the
following statements:

“...whatever may be due to the capitalist” (from the standpoint of the
capitalist) “he can only receive the SURPLUS-LABOUR of the labourer; for
the labourer must live” (p. 23).

But _how_ the labourer lives and hence how much the surplus-labour
appropriated by the capitalist can amount to are very relative things.

“... if capital does not decrease in value as it increases in amount,
the capitalists will exact from the labourers the produce of every
hour’s labour beyond what it is possible for the labourer to subsist on
the capitalist may ... eventually say to the labourer, ‘You shan’t eat
bread ... because it is possible to subsist on beet root and potatoes.’
And to this point have we come!” (Pp. 23-24.) “Why, if the labourer can
be brought to feed on potatoes instead of bread, it is indisputably true
that more can be exacted from his labour; that is to say, if when he fed
on bread, he was obliged _to retain_ for the maintenance of himself and
family _the labour of Monday and Tuesday_, he will, on potatoes, require
only the _half of Monday_; and the remaining _half of Monday_ and the
whole of Tuesday are _available_ either for the service of the state or
_the capitalist_.” (p. 26.) “IT IS ADMITTED that the interest paid to
the capitalists, whether in the nature of rents, interests on money, or
profits of trade, is paid out of the labour of others.” (p. 23.)

Here we have exactly the same idea of “rent” as Rodbertus has, except
that “interest” is used instead of “rent.”

Marx makes the following comment (manuscript _Zur Kritik_, p. 852):
“This little known pamphlet — published at a time when the ‘incredible
cobbler’ MacCulloch began to be talked about — represents an essential
advance over Ricardo. It directly designates surplus-value, or ‘profit’
in the language of Ricardo (often also SURPLUS-PRODUCE), or INTEREST, as
the author of this pamphlet calls it, as SURPLUS-LABOUR, the labour
which the labourer performs gratuitously, which he performs in excess of
that quantity of labour by which the value of his labour-power is
replaced, i.e., an equivalent of his wages is produced. It was no more
important to reduce _value_ to _labour_ than to reduce SURPLUS-VALUE,
represented by a _SURPLUS-PRODUCE_, to _SURPLUS-LABOUR._ This has
_already been stated by Adam Smith and forms a main factor in Ricardo’s
analysis_. But they did not say so nor fix it anywhere in _absolute
form_.” We read furthermore, on page 859 of the manuscript: “Moreover,
the author is a prisoner of the economic categories as they have come
down to him. Just as the confounding of surplus-value and profit
misleads Ricardo into unpleasant contradictions, so this author fares no
better by baptising surplus-value with the name of ‘interest of
capital.’ True, he advances beyond Ricardo by having been the first to
reduce all surplus-value to surplus-labour. Furthermore, while calling
surplus-value ‘interest of capital,’ he emphasises at the same time that
by this term he means the general form of surplus-labour as
distinguished from its special forms: rent, interest on money, and
profit of enterprise. And yet he picks the name of one of these special
forms, INTEREST, for the general form. And this sufficed to cause his
relapse into economic slang.”

This last passage fits Rodbertus like a glove. He, too, is a prisoner of
the economic categories as they have come down to him. He, too, applies
to surplus-value the name of one of its converted sub-forms, rent, and
makes it quite indefinite at that. The result of these two mistakes is
that he relapses into economic slang, that he does not follow up his
advance over Ricardo critically, and that instead he is misled into
using his unfinished theory, even before it got rid of its egg-shell, as
the basis for a utopia with which, as always, he comes too late. The
pamphlet appeared in 1821 and anticipated completely Rodbertus’s “rent”
of 1842.

Our pamphlet is but the farthest outpost of an entire literature which
in the twenties turned the Ricardian theory of value and surplus-value
against capitalist production in the interest of the proletariat, fought
the bourgeoisie with its own weapons. The entire communism of Owen, so
far as it engages in polemics on economic questions, is based on
Ricardo. Apart from him, there are still numerous other writers, some of
whom Marx quoted as early as 1847 against Proudhon (_Misère de la
Philosophie_, p. 49), such as Edmonds, Thompson, Hodgskin, etc., etc.,
“and four more pages of etceteras.” I select the following at random
from among this multitude of writings: _An Inquiry into the Principles
of the Distribution of Wealth, Most Conducive to Human Happiness_, BY
William Thompson; A NEW EDITION, London, 1850. This work, written in
1822, first appeared in 1824. Here likewise the wealth appropriated by
the non-producing classes is described everywhere as a deduction from
the product of the labourer and rather strong words are used. The author
says:

“The constant effort of what has been called society, has been to
deceive and induce, to terrify and compel, the productive labourer to
work for the smallest possible portion of the produce of his own labour”
(P. 28). “Why not give him the whole absolute produce of his labour?”
(P. 32.) “This amount of compensation, exacted by capitalists from the
productive labourers, under the name of rent or profits, is claimed for
the use of land or other articles... For all the physical materials on
which, or by means of which, his productive powers can be made
available, being in the hands of others with interests opposed to his,
and their consent being a necessary preliminary to any exertion on his
part, is he not, and must he not always remain, at the mercy of these
capitalists for whatever _portion of the fruits of his own labour_ they
may think proper to leave at his disposal in compensation for his
toils?” (p. 125.) “... in proportion to the amount of _products
withheld_, whether called profits, or taxes, or theft” (p. 126), etc.

I must admit that I do not write these lines without a certain
mortification. I will not make so much of the fact that the
anti-capitalist literature of England of the twenties and thirties is so
totally unknown in Germany, in spite of Marx’s direct references to it
even in his _Poverty of Philosophy_, and his repeated quotations from
it, as for instance the pamphlet of 1821, Ravenstone, Hodgskin, etc., in
Volume I of _Capital_. But it is proof of the grave deterioration of
official Political Economy that not only the _Literatus vulgaris_, who
clings desperately to the coattails of Rodbertus and “really has not
learned anything,” but also the officially and ceremoniously installed
professor, who “boasts of his erudition,” has forgotten his classical
Political Economy to such an extent that he seriously charges Marx with
having purloined things from Rodbertus which may be found even in Adam
Smith and Ricardo.

But what is there new in Marx’s utterances on surplus-value? How is it
that Marx’s theory of surplus-value struck home like a thunderbolt out
of a clear sky, and that in all civilised countries, while the theories
of all his socialist predecessors, Rodbertus included, vanished without
having produced any effect?

The history of chemistry offers an illustration which explains this.

We know that late in the past century the phlogistic theory still
prevailed. It assumed that combustion consisted essentially in this:
that a certain hypothetical substance, an absolute combustible named
phlogiston, separated from the burning body. This theory sufficed to
explain most of the chemical phenomena then known, although it had to be
considerably strained in some cases. But in 1774 Priestley produced a
certain kind of air

“which he found to be so pure, or so free from phlogiston, that common
air seemed adulterated in comparison with it.”

He called it “dephlogisticated air.” Shortly after him Scheele obtained
the same kind of air in Sweden and demonstrated its existence in the
atmosphere. He also found that this kind of air disappeared whenever
some body was burned in it or in ordinary air and therefore he called it
“fire-air.”

“From these facts he drew the conclusion that the combination arising
from the union of phlogiston with one of the components of the
atmosphere” (that is to say, from combustion) “was nothing but fire or
heat which escaped through the glass.” ^([2])

Priestley and Scheele had produced oxygen without knowing what they had
laid their hands on. They “remained prisoners of the” phlogistic
“categories as they came down to them.” The element which was destined
to upset all phlogistic views and to revolutionise chemistry remained
barren in their hands. But Priestley had immediately communicated his
discovery to Lavoisier in Paris, and Lavoisier, by means of this
discovery, now analysed the entire phlogistic chemistry and came to the
conclusion that this new kind of air was a new chemical element, and
that combustion was not a case of the mysterious phlogiston _departing_
from the burning body, but of this new element _combining_ with that
body. Thus he was the first to place all chemistry, which in its
phlogistic form had stood on its head, squarely on its feet. And
although he did not produce oxygen simultaneously and independently of
the other two, as he claimed later on, he nevertheless is the real
_discoverer_ of oxygen vis-à-vis the others who had only _produced_ it
without knowing _what_ they had produced.

Marx stands in the same relation to his predecessors in the theory of
surplus-value as Lavoisier stood to Priestley and Scheele. The
_existence_ of that part of the value of products which we now call
surplus-value had been ascertained long before Marx. It had also been
stated with more or less precision what it consisted of, namely, of the
product of the labour for which its appropriator had not given any
equivalent. But one did not get any further. Some — the classical
bourgeois economists — investigated at most the proportion in which the
product of labour was divided between the labourer and the owner of the
means of production. Others — the Socialists — found that this division
was unjust and looked for utopian means of abolishing this injustice.
They all remained prisoners of the economic categories as they had come
down to them.

Now Marx appeared upon the scene. And he took a view directly opposite
to that of all his predecessors. What they had regarded as a _solution,_
he considered but a _problem._ He saw that he had to deal neither with
dephlogisticated air nor with fire-air, but with oxygen — that here it
was not simply a matter of stating an economic fact or of pointing out
the conflict between this fact and eternal justice and true morality,
but of explaining a fact which was destined to revolutionise all
economics, and which offered to him who knew how to use it the key to an
understanding of all capitalist production. With this fact as his
starting-point he examined all the economic categories which he found at
hand, just as Lavoisier proceeding from oxygen had examined the
categories of phlogistic chemistry which he found at hand. In order to
understand what surplus-value was, Marx had to find out what value was.
He had to criticise above all the Ricardian theory of value. Hence he
analysed labour’s value-producing property and was the first to
ascertain _what_ labour it was that produced value, and why and how it
did so. He found that value was nothing but congealed labour of _this_
kind, and this is a point which Rodbertus never grasped to his dying
day. Marx then investigated the relation of commodities to money and
demonstrated how and why, thanks to the property of value immanent in
commodities, commodities and commodity-exchange must engender the
opposition of commodity and money. His theory of money, founded on this
basis, is the first exhaustive one and has been tacitly accepted
everywhere. He analysed the transformation of money into capital and
demonstrated that this transformation is based on the purchase and sale
of labour-power. By substituting labour-power, the value-producing
property, for labour he solved with one stroke one of the difficulties
which brought about the downfall of the Ricardian school, viz., the
impossibility of harmonising the mutual exchange of capital and labour
with the Ricardian law that value is determined by labour. By
establishing the distinction of capital into constant and variable he
was enabled to trace the real course of the process of the formation of
surplus-value in its minutest details and thus to explain it, a feat
which none of his predecessors had accomplished. Consequently he
established a distinction inside of capital itself with which neither
Rodbertus nor the bourgeois economists knew in the least what to do, but
which furnishes the key for the solution of the most complicated
economic problems, as is strikingly proved again by Book II and will be
proved still more by Book III. He analysed surplus-value further and
found its two forms, absolute and relative surplus-value. And he showed
that they had played a different, and each time a decisive role, in the
historical development of capitalist production. On the basis of this
surplus-value he developed the first rational theory of wages we have,
and for the first time drew up an outline of the history of capitalist
accumulation and an exposition of its historical tendency.

And Rodbertus? After he has read all that, he — like the tendentious
economist he always is — regards it as “an assault on society,” finds
that he himself has said much more briefly and clearly what
surplus-value evolves from, and finally declares that all this does
indeed apply to “the present form of capital,” that is to say to capital
as it exists historically, but not to the “conception of capital,”
namely the utopian idea which Herr Rodbertus has of capital. Just like
old Priestly, who swore by phlogiston to the end of his days and refused
to have anything to do with oxygen. The only thing is that Priestly had
actually produced oxygen first, while Rodbertus had merely rediscovered
a commonplace in his surplus-value, or rather his “rent,” and that Marx,
unlike Lavoisier, disdained to claim that he was the first to discover
the _fact_ of the existence of surplus-value.

The other economic feats performed by Rodbertus are on about the same
plane. His elaboration of surplus-value into a utopia has already been
unintentionally criticised by Marx in his _Poverty of Philosophy._ What
else may be said about it I have said in my preface to the German
edition of that work. Rodbertus’s explanation of commercial crises as
outgrowths of the underconsumption of the working-class may already be
found in Sismondi’s _Nouveaux Principes de l’Économie Politique_, Book
IV, Ch. IV. ^([3]) However, Sismondi always had the world-market in
mind, while Rodbertus’s horizon does not extend beyond the Prussian
border. His speculations as to whether wages are derived from capital or
income belong to the domain of scholasticism and are definitely settled
in Part III of this second book of _Capital_. His theory of rent has
remained his exclusive property and may rest in peace until the
manuscript of Marx criticising it is published. Finally his suggestions
for the emancipation of the old Prussian landed property from the
oppression of capital are also entirely utopian; for they evade the only
practical question raised in this connection, viz.: How can the old
Prussian landed junker have a yearly income of, say, 20,000 marks and a
yearly expenditure of, say, 30,000 marks, without running into debt?

The Ricardian school suffered shipwreck about the year 1830 on the rock
of surplus-value. And what this school could not solve remained still
more insoluble for its successor, Vulgar Economy. The two points which
caused its failure were these:

1. Labour is the measure of value. However, living labour in its
exchange with capital has a lower value than materialised labour for
which it is exchanged. Wages, the value of a definite quantity of living
labour, are always less than the value of the product begotten by this
same quantity of living labour or in which this quantity is embodied.
The question is indeed insoluble, if put in this form. It has been
correctly formulated by Marx and thereby been answered. It is not labour
which has a value. As an activity which creates values it can no more
have any special value than gravity can have any special weight, heat
any special temperature, electricity any special strength of current. It
is not labour which is bought and sold as a commodity, but
labour-_power_. As soon as labour-power becomes a commodity, its value
is determined by the labour embodied in this commodity as a social
product. This value is equal to the labour socially necessary for the
production and reproduction of this commodity. Hence the purchase and
sale of labour-power on the basis of its value thus defined does not at
all contradict the economic law of value.

2. According to the Ricardian law of value, two capitals employing equal
quantities of equally paid living labour all other conditions being
equal, produce commodities of equal value and likewise surplus-value, or
profit, of equal quantity in equal periods of time. But if they employ
unequal quantities of living labour, they cannot produce equal
surplus-values, or, as the Ricardians say, equal profits. Now in reality
the opposite takes place. In actual fact, equal capitals, regardless of
how much or how little living labour is employed by them, produce equal
average profits in equal times. Here there is therefore a contradiction
of the law of value which had been noticed by Ricardo himself, but which
his school also was unable to reconcile. Rodbertus likewise could not
but note this contradiction. But instead of resolving it, he made it one
of the starting-points of his utopia. (_Zur Erkenntnis_, p. 131.) Marx
had resolved this contradiction already in the manuscript of his _Zur
Kritik_. According to the plan of _Capital_, this solution will be
provided in Book III. Months will pass before that will be published.
Hence those economists who claim to have discovered in Rodbertus the
secret source and a superior predecessor of Marx have now an opportunity
to demonstrate what the economics of a Rodbertus can accomplish. If they
can show in which way an equal average rate of profit can and must come
about, not only without a violation of the law of value, but on the very
basis of it, I am willing to discuss the matter further with them. In
the meantime they had better make haste. The brilliant investigations of
the present Book II and their entirely new results in fields hitherto
almost untrod are merely introductory to the contents of Book III, which
develops the final conclusions of Marx’s analysis of the process of
social reproduction on a capitalist basis. When this Book III appears,
little mention will be made of the economist called Rodbertus.

The second and third books of _Capital_ were to be dedicated as Marx had
stated repeatedly, to his wife.

Frederick Engels
London, on Marx’s birthday, May 5, 1885


Preface to the Second Edition

The present second edition is, in the main, a faithful reprint of the
first. Typographical errors have been corrected, a few stylistic
blemishes eliminated, and a few short paragraphs that contain only
repetitions struck out.

The third book, which presented quite unforeseen difficulties, is now
also nearly ready in manuscript. If my health holds out it will be ready
for press this autumn.

F. Engels
London, 15 July 1893

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------


Notes

1. In the Preface to Marx’s The Poverty of Philosophy, translated by E.
Bernstein and K. Kautsky, Stuttgart, 1885.

2. Roscoe and Schorlemmer, _Ausführiches Lehrbuch der Chemie_,
Braunschweig, 1877, I, pp. 13, 18.

3. “Thus the home market becomes ever more constricted by the
concentration of riches in the hands of a small number of proprietors,
and industry is forced more and more to seek its outlets in foreign
markets, where still greater revolutions await it” (i.e. the crisis of
1817, which Sismondi goes on to describe). 1819 edition, I, p. 336.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Chapter 1 | Table of Contents



PART I: THE METAMORPHOSES OF CAPITAL AND THEIR CIRCUITS


Chapter 1: The Circuit of Money Capital

The circular movement ^([1]) of capital takes place in three stages,
which, according to the presentation in Volume I, form the following
series:

_First stage_: The capitalist appears as a buyer on the commodity- and
the labour-market; his money is transformed into commodities, or it goes
through the circulation act M — C.

_Second Stage_: Productive consumption of the purchased commodities by
the capitalist. He acts as a capitalist producer of commodities; his
capital passes through the process of production. The result is a
commodity of more value than that of the elements entering into its
production.

_Third Stage_: The capitalist returns to the market as a seller; his
commodities are turned into money; or they pass through the circulation
act C — M.

Hence the formula for the circuit of money-capital is: M — C ... P ...
C' — M', the dots indicating that the process of circulation is
interrupted, and C' and M' designating C and M increased by
surplus-value.

The first and third stages were discussed in Book I only in so far as
this was necessary for the understanding of the second stage, the
process of production of capital. For this reason, the various forms
which capital takes on in its different stages, and which now assumes
and now strips off in the repetition of its circuit, were not
considered. These forms are now the direct object of our study.

In order to conceive these forms in their pure state, one must first of
all discard all factors which have nothing to do with the changing or
building of forms as such. It is therefore taken for granted here not
only that the commodities are sold at their values but also that this
takes place under the same conditions throughout. Likewise disregarded
therefore are any changes of value which might occur during the movement
in circuits.

I. First Stage. M — C ^([2])

M — C represents the conversion of a sum of money into a sum of
commodities; the purchaser transforms his money into commodities, the
sellers transform their commodities into money. What renders this act of
the general circulation of commodities simultaneously a functionally
definite section in independent circuit of some individual capital is
primarily not the form of the act but its material content, the specific
use-character of the commodities which change places with the money.
These commodities are on the one hand means of production, on the other
labour-power, material and personal factors in the production of
commodities whose specific nature must of course correspond to the
special kind of articles to be manufactured. If we call labour-power L,
and the means of production MP, then the sum of commodities to be
bought, C, is equal to L + MP, or more briefly C[lmp] M — C, considered
as to its substance is therefore represented by M — C[lmp] that is to
say M — C is composed of M — L and M — MP. The sum of money M is
separated into two parts, one of which buys labour-power, the other
means of production. These two series of purchases belong to entirely
different markets, the one to the commodity-market proper, the other to
the labour-market.

Aside from this qualitative division of the sum of commodities into
which M is transformed, the formula M — C[lmp] also represents a most
characteristic quantitative relation.

We know that the value, or price, of labour-power is paid to its owner,
who offers it for sale as a commodity, in the form of wages, that is to
say as the price of a sum of labour containing surplus-labour. For
instance if the daily value of labour-power is equal to the product of
five hours labour valued at three shillings, this sum figures in the
contract between the buyer and seller as the price, or wages, for, say,
ten hours of labour. If such a contract is made for instance with 50
labourers, they are supposed to work altogether 500 hours per day for
the purchaser, and one half of this time, or 250 hours equal to 25 days
of labour of 10 hours each, represents nothing but surplus labour. The
quantity and the volume of the means of production to be purchased must
be sufficient for the utilisation of this mass of labour.

M — C[lmp], then, does not merely express the qualitative relation
indicating that a certain sum of money, say £422, is exchanged for a
corresponding sum of means of production and labour-power, but also a
quantitative relation between L, the part of the money spent for
labour-power, and MP, the part spent for means of production. This
relation is determined at the outset by the quantity of excess labour,
of surplus-labour to be expended by a certain number of labourers.

If for instance in a spinning-mill the weekly wage of its 50 labourers
amounts to £50, £372 must be spent for means of production, if this is
the value of the means of production which a weekly labour of 3,000
hours, 1,500 of which are surplus-labour, transforms into yarn.

It is immaterial here how much additional value in the form of means of
production is required in the various lines of industry by the
utilisation of additional labour. The point merely is that the part of
the money spent for means of production — the means of production bought
in M — MP — must absolutely suffice, i.e., must at the outset be
calculated accordingly, must be procured in corresponding proportion. To
put it another way, the quantity of means of production must suffice to
absorb the amount of labour, to be transformed by it into products. If
the means of production at hand were insufficient, the excess labour at
the disposal of the purchaser could not be utilised; his right to
dispose of it is futile. If there were more means of production than
available labour, they would not be saturated with labour, would not be
transformed into products.

As soon as M — C[lmp] is completed, the purchaser has at his disposal
more than simply the means of production and labour-power required for
the production of some useful article. He disposes of a greater capacity
to render labour-power fluent, or a greater quantity of labour than is
necessary for the replacement of the value of this labour-power, and he
has at the same time the means of production requisite for the
realisation or materialisation of this quantity of labour. In other
words, he has at his disposal the factors making for the production of
articles of a greater value than that of the elements of production —
the factors of production of a mass of commodities containing
surplus-value. The value advanced by him in money-form has now assumed a
bodily form in which it can be incarnated as a value generating
surplus-value (in the shape of commodities). In brief, value exists here
in the condition or form of _productive capital_, which has the factor
of creating value and surplus-value. Let us call capital in this form P.

Now the value of P is equal to that of L + MP, it is equal to M
exchanged for L and MP. M is the same capital-value as P, only it has a
different mode of existence, it is capital-value in the state or form of
money — _money-capital_.

M — C[lmp], or its general form M — C, a sum of purchases of
commodities, an act of the general circulation of commodities, is
therefore at the same time — as a stage in the independent circuit of
capital — a transformation of capital-value from its money-form into its
productive form. More briefly, it is the transformation of
_money-capital_ into _productive capital_. In the diagram of the circuit
which we are here discussing, money appears as the first depository of
capital-value, and money-capital therefore represents the form in which
capital is advanced.

Capital in the form of money-capital is in a state in which it can
perform the functions of money, in the present case the functions of a
universal means of purchase and universal means of payment. (The
last-named inasmuch as labour-power though first bought is not paid for
until it has been put into operation. To the extent that the means of
production are not found ready on the market but have to be ordered
first, money in M — MP likewise serves as a means of payment.) This
capacity is not due to the fact that money-capital is capital but that
it is money.

On the other hand capital-value in the form of money cannot perform any
other functions but those of money. What turns the money-functions into
functions of capital is the definite role they play in the movement of
capital, and therefore also the interrelation of the stage in which
these functions are performed with the other stages of the circuit of
capital. Take, for instance, the case with which we are here dealing.
Money is here converted into commodities the combination of which
represents the bodily form of productive capital, and this form already
contains latently, potentially, the result of the process of capitalist
production.

A part of the money performing the function of money-capital in M —
C[lmp] assumes, by consummating the act of circulation, a function in
which it loses its capital character but preserves its money-character.
The circulation of money-capital M is divided into M — MP and M — L,
into the purchase of means of production and the purchase of
labour-power. Let us consider the last-named process by itself. M — L is
the purchase of labour-power by the capitalist. It is also the sale of
labour-power — we may here say of labour, since the form of wages is
assumed — by the laborer who owns it. What is M — C ( = M — L) for the
buyer is here, as in every other purchase, L — M ( = C — M) for the
seller (the laborer). It is the sale of his labour-power. This is the
first stage of circulation, or the first metamorphosis, of the commodity
(Buch I, Kap. III, 2a).[English edition: Ch. III, 2a — _Ed_.] It is for
the seller of labour a transformation of his commodity into the
money-form. The laborer spends the money so obtained gradually for a
number of commodities required for the satisfaction of his needs, for
articles of consumption. The complete circulation of his commodity
therefore appears as L — M — C, that is to say first as L — M ( = C — M)
and secondly as M — C; hence in the general form of the simple
circulation of commodities, C — M — C. Money is in this case merely a
passing means of circulation, a mere medium in the exchange of one
commodity for another.

M — L is the characteristic moment in the transformation of
money-capital into productive capital, because it is the essential
condition for the real transformation of value advanced in the form of
money into capital, into a value producing surplus-value. M — MP is
necessary only for the purpose of realising the quantity of labour
bought in the process M — L, which was discussed from this point of view
in Book I, Part II, under the head of “The Transformation of Money into
Capital.” We shall have to consider the matter at this point also from
another angle, relating especially to money-capital the form in which
capital manifests itself.

Generally M — L is regarded as characteristic of the capitalist mode of
production. However not at all for the reason given above, that the
purchase of labour-power represents a contract of purchase which
stipulates for the delivery of a quantity of labour in excess of that
needed to replace the price of the labour-power, the wages; hence
delivery of surplus-labour, the fundamental condition for the
capitalisation of the value advanced, or for the production of
surplus-value, which is the same thing. On the contrary, it is so
regarded because of its form, since money in the form of wages buys
labour, and this is the characteristic mark of the money system.

Nor is it the irrationality of the form which is taken as
characteristic. On the contrary, one overlooks the irrational. The
irrationality consists in the fact that labour itself as a
value-creating element cannot have any value, nor can therefore any
definite amount of labour have any value expressed in its price, in its
equivalence to a definite quantity of money. But we know that wages are
but a disguised form, a form in which for instance the price of one
day’s labour-power presents itself as the price of the labour rendered
fluent by this labour-power in one day. The value produced by this
labour-power in, say, six hours of labour is thus expressed as the value
of twelve hours’ functioning or operation of the labour-power.

M — L is regarded as the characteristic feature, the hallmark of the
so-called money system, because labour there appears as the commodity of
its owner, and money therefore as the buyer — hence on account of the
money-relation (i.e., the sale and purchase of human activity). Money
however appears very early as a buyer of so-called services, without the
transformation of M into money-capital, and without any change in the
general character of the economic system.

It makes no difference to money into what sort of commodities it is
transformed. It is the universal equivalent of all commodities which
show, if only by their prices, that ideally they represent a certain sum
of money, anticipate their transformation into money, and do not acquire
the form in which they may be converted into use-values for their owners
until they change places with money. Once labour-power has come into the
market as the commodity of its owner and its sale takes the form of
payment for labour, assumes the shape of wages, its purchase and sale is
no more startling than the purchase and sale of any other commodity. The
characteristic thing is not that the commodity labour-power is
purchasable but that labour-power appears as a commodity.

By means of M — C[lmp], the transformation of money-capital into
productive capital, the capitalist effects the combination of the
objective and personal factors of production so far as they consist of
commodities. If money is transformed into productive capital for the
first time or if it performs for the first time the function of
money-capital for its owner, he must begin by buying means of
production, such as buildings, machinery, etc., before he buys any
labour-power. For as soon as he compels labour-power to act in obedience
to his sway, he must have means of production to which he can apply it
as labour-power.

This is the capitalist’s presentation of the case.

The labourer’s case is as follows: The productive application of his
labour-power is not possible until it is sold and brought into
connection with means of production. Before its sale, labour-power
exists therefore separately from the means of production, from the
material conditions of its application. In this state of separation it
cannot be used either directly for the production of use-values for its
owner or for the production of commodities, by the sale of which he
could live. But from the moment that as a result of its sale it is
brought into connection with means of production, it forms part of the
productive capital of its purchaser, the same as the means of
production.

True, in the act M — L the owner of money and the owner of labour-power
enter only into the relation of buyer and seller, confront one another
only as money-owner and commodity-owner. In this respect they enter
merely into a money-relation. Yet at the same time the buyer appears
also from the outset in the capacity of an owner of means of production,
which are the material conditions for the productive expenditure of
labour-power by its owner. In other words, these means of production are
in opposition to the owner of the labour-power, being property of
another. On the other hand the seller of labour faces its buyer as
labour-power of another which must be made to do his bidding, must be
integrated into his capital, in order that it may really become
productive capital. The class relation between capitalist and
wage-laborer therefore exists, is presupposed from the moment the two
face each other in the act M — L (L — M on the part of the laborer). It
is a purchase and sale, a money-relation, but a purchase and sale in
which the buyer is assumed to be a capitalist and the seller a
wage-laborer. And this relation arises out of the fact that the
conditions required for the realisation of labour-power, viz., means of
subsistence and means of production, are separated from the owner of
labour-power, being the property of another.

We are not concerned here with the origin of this separation. It exists
as soon as M — L goes on. The thing which interests us here is this: If
M — L appears here as a function of money-capital or money as the form
of existence of capital, the sole reason that money here assumes the
role of a means of paying for a useful human activity or service; hence
by no means in consequence of the function of money as a means of
payment. Money can be expended in this form only because labour-power
finds itself in a state of separation from its means of production
(including the means of subsistence as means of production of the
labour-power itself), and because this separation can be overcome only
by the sale of the labour-power to the owner of the means of production;
because therefore the functioning of labour-power, which is not at all
limited to the quantity of labour required for the reproduction of its
own price, is likewise the concern of its buyer. The capital-relation
during the process of production arises only because it is inherent in
the act of circulation, in the different fundamental economic conditions
in which buyer and seller confront each other, in their class relation.
It is not money which by its nature creates this relation; it is rather
the existence of this relation which permits of the transformation of a
mere money-function into a capital-function.

In the conception of money-capital (for the time being we deal with the
latter only within the confines of the special function in which it
faces us here) two errors run parallel to each other or cross each
other. In the first place the functions performed by capital-value in
its capacity as money-capital, which it can perform precisely owing to
its money-form, are erroneously derived from its character as capital,
whereas they are due only to the money-form of capital-value, to its
form of appearance as money. In the second place, on the contrary, the
specific content of the money-function, which renders it simultaneously
a capital-function, is traced to the nature of money (money being here
confused with capital), while the money function premises social
conditions, such as are here indicated by the act M — L, which do not at
all exist in the mere circulation of commodities and the corresponding
circulation of money.

The purchase and sale of slaves is formally also a purchase and sale of
commodities. But money cannot perform this function without the
existence of slavery. If slavery exists, then money can be invested in
the purchase of slaves. On the other hand the mere possession of money
cannot make slavery possible.

In order that the sale of one’s own labour-power (in the form of the
sale of one’s own labour or in the form of wages) may constitute not an
isolated phenomenon but a socially decisive premise for the production
of commodities, in order that money-capital may therefore perform, on a
social scale , the above-discussed function M — C[lmp], historical
processes are assumed by which the original connection of the means of
production with labour-power was dissolved — processes in consequence of
which the mass of the people, the labourers, have, as non-owners, come
face to face with non-labourers as the owners of these means of
production. It makes no difference in this case whether the connection
before its dissolution was such in form that the laborer, being himself
a means of production, belonged to the other means of production or
whether he was their owner.

What lies back of M — C[lmp] is distribution; not distribution in the
ordinary meaning of a distribution of articles of consumption, but the
distribution of the elements of production itself, the material factors
of which are concentrated on one side, and labour-power, isolated, on
the other.

The means of production, the material part of productive capital, must
therefore face the laborer as such, as capital, before the act M — L can
become a universal, social one.

We have seen on previous occasions [English edition: Karl Marx,
_Capital_, Vol. I, Part VII, Moscow, 1954. — _Ed._] that in its further
development capitalist production, once it is established, not only
reproduces this separation but extends its scope further and further
until it becomes the prevailing condition. However, there is still
another side to this question. In order that capital may be able to
arise and take control of production, a definite stage in the
development of trade is assumed. This applies therefore also to the
circulation of commodities, and hence to the production of commodities;
for no articles can enter circulation as commodities unless they are
produced for sale, hence as commodities. But the production of
commodities does not become the normal, dominant type of production
until capitalist production serves as its basis.

The Russian landowners, who as a result of the so-called emancipation of
the peasants are now compelled to carry on agriculture with the help of
wage-labourers instead of the forced labour of serfs, complain about two
things: First, about the lack of money-capital. They say for instance
that comparatively large sums must be paid to wage-labourers before the
crops are sold, and just then there is a dearth of ready cash, the prime
condition. Capital in the form of money must always be available,
particularly for the payment of wages, before production can be carried
on capitalistically. But the landowners may take hope. Everything comes
to those who wait, and in due time the industrial capitalist will have
at his disposal not alone his own money but also that of others.

The second complaint is more characteristic. It is to the effect that
even if one has money, not enough labourers are to be had at any time.
The reason is that the Russian farm-laborer, owing to the common
ownership of land in the village community, has not yet been fully
separated from his means of production and hence is not yet a “free
wage-laborer” in the full sense of the word. But the existence of the
latter on a social scale is a sine qua non for M — C, the conversion of
money into commodities, to be able to represent the transformation of
money-capital into productive capital.

It is therefore quite clear that the formula for the circuit of
money-capital, M — C ... C' — M', is the matter-of-course form of the
circuit of capital only on the basis of already developed capitalist
production, because it presupposes the existence of a class of
wage-labourers on a social scale. We have seen that capitalist
production does not only create commodities and surplus-value, but also
reproduces to an ever increasing extent the class of wage-labourers,
into whom it transforms the vast majority of direct producers. Since the
first condition for its realisation is the permanent existence of a
class of wage-labourers, M — C ... P ... C' — M' presupposes a capital
in the form of productive capital, and hence the form of the circuit of
productive capital.

II. Second Stage. Function of Productive Capital

The circuit of capital, which we have here considered, begins with the
act of circulation M — C, the transmutation of money into commodities —
purchase. Circulation must therefore be complemented by the antithetical
metamorphosis C — M, the transformation of commodities into money —
sale. But the direct result of M — C[lmp] is the interruption of the
circulation of the capital-value advanced in the form of money. By the
transformation of money-capital into productive capital the
capital-value has acquired a bodily form in which it cannot continue to
circulate but must enter into consumption, viz., into productive
consumption. The use of labour-power, labour, can be materialised only
in the labour-process. The capitalist cannot resell the laborer as a
commodity because he is not his chattel slave and the capitalist has not
bought anything except the right to use his labour-power for a certain
time. On the other hand the capitalist cannot use this labour-power in
any other way than by utilising means of production to create
commodities with its help. The result of the first stage is therefore
entrance into the second, the productive stage of capital.

This movement is represented by M — C[lmp] ... P, in which the dots
indicate that the circulation of capital is interrupted, while its
circular movement continues, since it passes from the sphere of
circulation of commodities into that of production. The first stage, the
transformation of money-capital into productive capital, is therefore
merely the harbinger and introductory phase of the second stage, the
functioning of productive capital.

M — C[lmp] presupposes that the individual performing this act not only
has at his disposal values in any use-form, but also that he has them in
the form of money, that he is the owner of money. But as the act
consists precisely in giving away money, the individual can remain the
owner of money only in so far as the act of giving away implies a return
of money. But money can return to him only through the sale of
commodities. Hence the above act assumes him to be a producer of
commodities.

M — L. The wage-laborer lives only by the sale of his labour-power. Its
preservation — his preservation — requires daily consumption. Hence
payment for it must be continuously repeated at rather short intervals
in order that he may be able to repeat acts L — M — C or C — M — C,
repeat the purchases needed for his self-preservation. For this reason
the capitalist must always meet the wage-laborer in the capacity of a
money-capitalist, and his capital as money-capital. On the other hand if
the wage-labourers, the mass of direct producers, are to perform the act
L — M — C, they must constantly be faced with the necessary means of
subsistence in purchasable form, i.e., in the form of commodities. This
state of affairs necessitates a high degree of development of the
circulation of products in the form of commodities, hence also of the
volume of commodities produced. When production by means of wage-labour
becomes universal, commodity production is bound to be the general form
of production. This mode of production, once it is assumed to be
general, carries in its wake an ever increasing division of social
labour, that is to say an ever growing differentiation of the articles
which are produced in the form of commodities by a definite capitalist,
ever greater division of complementary processes of production into
independent processes. M — MP therefore develops to the same extent as M
— L does, that is to say the production of means of production is
divorced to that extent from the production of commodities whose means
of production they are. And the latter then stand opposed to every
producer of commodities which he does not produce but buys for his
particular process of production. They come from branches of production
which, operated independently, are entirely divorced from his own, enter
into his own branch as commodities, and must therefore be bought. The
material conditions of commodity production face him more and more as
products of other commodity producers, as commodities. And to the same
extent the capitalist must assume the role of money-capitalist, in other
words there is an increase in the scale on which his capital must assume
the functions of money-capital.

On the other hand, the same conditions which give rise to the basic
condition of capitalist production, the existence of a class of
wage-workers, facilitate the transition of all commodity production to
capitalist commodity production. As capitalist production develops, it
has a disintegrating, resolvent effect on all older forms of production,
which, designed mostly to meet the direct needs of the producer,
transform only the excess produced into commodities. Capitalist
production makes the sale of products the main interest, at first
apparently without affecting the mode of production itself. Such was for
instance the first effect of capitalist world commerce on such nations
as the Chinese, Indians, Arabs, etc. But, secondly, wherever it takes
root capitalist production destroys all forms of commodity production
which are based either on the self-employment of the producers, or
merely on the sale of the excess product as commodities. Capitalist
production first makes the production of commodities general and then,
by degrees, transforms all commodity production into capitalist
commodity production. ^([3])

Whatever the social form of production, labourers and means of
production always remain factors of it. But in a state of separation
from each other either of these factors can be such only potentially.
For production to go on at all they must unite. The specific manner in
which this union is accomplished distinguishes the different economic
epochs of the structure of society from one another. In the present
case, the separation of the free worker from his means of production is
the starting-point given, and we have seen how and under what conditions
these two elements are united in the hands of the capitalist, namely, as
the productive mode of existence of his capital. The actual process
which the personal and material creators of commodities enter upon when
thus brought together, the process of production, becomes therefore
itself a function of capital, the capitalist process of production, the
nature of which has been fully analysed in the first book of this work.
Every enterprise engaged in commodity production becomes at the same
time an enterprise exploiting labour-power. But only the capitalist
production of commodities has become an epoch-making mode of
exploitation, which, in the course of its historical development,
revolutionises, through the organisation of the labour-process and the
enormous improvement of technique, the entire structure of society in a
manner eclipsing all former epochs.

The means of production and labour-power, in so far as they are forms of
existence of advanced capital-value, are distinguished by the different
roles assumed by them during the process of production in the creation
of value, hence also of surplus-value, into constant and variable
capital. Being different components of productive capital they are
furthermore distinguished by the fact that the means of production in
the possession of the capitalist remain his capital even outside of the
process of production, while labour-power becomes the form of existence
of an individual capital only within this process. Whereas labour-power
is a commodity only in the hands of its seller, the wage-labourer, it
becomes capital only in the hands of its buyer, the capitalist who
acquires the temporary use of it. The means of production do not become
the material forms of productive capital, or productive capital, until
labour-power, the personal form of existence of productive capital, is
capable of being embodied in them. Human labour-power is by nature no
more capital than by means of production. They acquire this specific
social character only under definite, historically developed conditions,
just as only under such conditions the character of money is stamped
upon precious metals, or that of money-capital upon money.

Productive capital, in performing its functions, consumes its own
component parts for the purpose of transforming them into a mass of
products of a higher value. Since labour-power acts merely as one of its
organs, the excess of the product’s value engendered by its
surplus-labour over and above the value of productive capital’s
constituent elements is also the fruit of capital. The surplus-labour of
labour-power is the gratuitous labour performed for capital and thus
forms surplus-value for the capitalist, a value which costs him no
equivalent return. The product is therefore not only a commodity, but a
commodity pregnant with surplus-value. Its value is equal to P + s, that
is to say equal to the value of the productive capital P consumed in the
production of the commodity plus the surplus values created by it. Let
us assume that this commodity consists of 10,000 lbs. of yarn, and that
means of production worth £372 and labour power worth £50 were consumed
in the fabrication of this quantity of yarn. During the process of
spinning, the spinners transmitted to the yarn the value of the means of
production consumed by their labour, amounting to £372, and at the same
time they created, in proportion with the labour-power expended by them,
new value to the amount of, say, £128. The 10,000 lbs. of yarn therefore
represent a value of £500.

III. Third Stage. C' — M'

Commodities become _commodity-capital_ as a functional form of existence
— stemming directly from the process of production itself — of
capital-value which has already produced surplus-value. If the
production of commodities were carried on capitalistically throughout
society, all commodities would be elements of commodity-capital from the
outset, whether they were crude iron, Brussels lace, sulphuric acid or
cigars. The problem of what kinds of commodities, is one of the
self-created lovely ills of scholastic political economy.

Capital in the form of commodities has to perform the function of
commodities. The articles of which capital is composed are produced
especially for the market and must be sold, transformed into money,
hence go through the process C — M.

Suppose the commodity of the capitalist to consist of 10,000 lbs. of
cotton yarn. If £372 represent the value of the means of production
consumed in the spinning process, and new value to the amount of £128
has been created, the yarn has a value of £500, which is expressed in
its price of the same amount. Suppose further that this price is
realised by the sale C — M. What is it that makes of this simple act of
all commodity circulation at the same time a capital-function? No change
that takes place inside of it, neither in the use-character of the
commodity — for it passes into the hands of the buyer as an object of
use — nor in its value, for this value has not experienced any change of
magnitude, but only of form. It first existed in the form of yarn, while
now it exists in the form of money. Thus a substantial distinction is
evident between the first stage M — C and the last stage C — M. There
the advanced money functions as money-capital, because it is transformed
by means of the circulation into commodities of a specific use-value.
Here the commodities can serve as capital only to the extent that they
bring this character with them in ready shape from the process of
production before their circulation begins. During the spinning process,
the spinners create yarn value to the amount of £128. Of this sum, say
£50 represent to the capitalist merely an equivalent for his outlay for
labour-power, while £78 — when the degree of exploitation of
labour-power is 156 per cent — form surplus-value. The value of the
10,000 lbs. of yarn therefore embodies first the value of the consumed
productive capital P, the constant part of which amounts to £372 and the
variable to £50, their sum being £422, equal to 8,440 lbs. of yarn. Now
the value of the productive capital P is equal to C, the value of its
constituent elements, which in the stage M — C confronted the capitalist
as commodities in the hands of their sellers.

In the second place, however, the value of the yarn contains a
surplus-value of £78, equal to 1,560 lbs. of yarn. C as an expression of
the value of the 10,000 lbs. of yarn is therefore equal to C plus DC, or
C plus an increment of C (equal to £78), which we shall call c, since it
exists in the same commodity-form as now the original value C. The value
of the 10,000 lbs. of yarn, equal to £500, is therefore represented by C
+ c = C'. What turns C, the expression of the value of 10,000 lbs. of
yarn, into C' is not the absolute magnitude of its value (£500), for
that is determined, as in the case of any other C standing for the
expression of the value of some other sum of commodities, by the
quantity of labour embodied in it. It is its relative value-magnitude,
its value-magnitude as compared with that of capital P consumed in its
production. This value is contained in it plus the surplus-value
supplied by the productive capital. Its value is greater, exceeds that
of the capital-value by this surplus-value c. The 10,000 lbs. of yarn
are the bearers of the capital-value expanded, enriched by this
surplus-value, and they are so by virtue of being the product of the
capitalist process of production. C' expresses a value-relation, the
relation of the value of the commodities produced to that of the capital
spent on their production, in other words, expresses the fact that its
value is composed of capital-value and surplus-value. The 10,000 lbs. of
yarn represent commodity capital, C', only because they are a converted
form of the productive capital P, hence in a connection which exists
originally only in the circuit of this individual capital, or only for
the capitalist who produced the yarn with the help of his capital. It
is, so to say, only an internal, not an external relation that turns the
10,000 lbs. of yarn in their capacity of vehicles of value into a
commodity-capital. They exhibit their capitalist birthmark not in the
absolute magnitude of their value but in its relative magnitude, in the
magnitude of their value as compared with that possessed by the
productive capital embodied in them before it was transformed into
commodities. If, then, these 10,000 lbs. of yarn are sold at their value
of £500, this act of circulation, considered by itself, is identical
with C — M, a mere transformation of an unchanging value from the form
of a commodity into that of money. But as a special stage in the circuit
of an individual capital, the same act is a realisation of the
capital-value embodied in the commodity to the amount of £422 plus the
surplus-value, likewise embodied in it, of £78. That is to say it
represents C' — M', the transformation of the commodity-capital from its
commodity-form into the money form. ^([4])

The function of C' is now that of all commodities, viz.: to transform
itself into money, to be sold, to go through the circulation stage C —
M. So long as the capital, now expanded, remains in the form of
commodity-capital, lies immovable in the market, the process of
production is at rest. The commodity-capital acts neither as a creator
of products nor as a creator of value. A given capital-value will serve,
in widely different degrees, as a creator of products and value, and the
scale of reproduction will be extended or reduced commensurate with the
particular speed with which that capital throws off its commodity-form
and assumes that of money, or with the rapidity of the sale. It was
shown in Book I that the degree of efficiency of any given capital is
conditional on the potentialities of the productive process, which to a
certain extent are independent of the magnitude of its own value.
[English edition: Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, pp. 602-08. — _Ed._]
Here it appears that the process of circulation sets in motion new
forces independent of the capital’s magnitude of value and determining
its degree of efficiency, its expansion and contraction.

The mass of commodities C', being the depository of the expanded
capital, must furthermore pass in its entirety through the metamorphosis
C' — M'. The quantity sold is here a main determinant. The individual
commodity figures only as an integral part of the total mass. The £500
worth of value exists in the 10,000 lbs. of yarn. If the capitalist
succeeds in selling only 7,440 lbs. at their value of £372, he has
replaced only the value of his constant capital, the value of the
expanded means of production. If he sells 8,440 lbs. he recovers only
the value of the total capital advanced. He must sell more in order to
realise some surplus-value, and he must sell the entire 10,000 lbs. in
order to realise the surplus-value of £78 (1,560 lbs. of yarn). In £500
in money he receives merely an equivalent for the commodity sold. His
transaction within the circulation is simply C — M. If he had paid his
labourers £64 in wages instead of £50 his surplus-value would only be
£64 instead of £78, and the degree of exploitation would have been only
100 per cent instead of 156. But the value of the yarn would not change;
only the relation between its component parts would be different. The
circulation act C — M would still represent the sale of 10,000 lbs. of
yarn for £500, their value.

C' is equal to C + c (or £422 at £78). C equals the value of P, the
productive capital, and this equals the value of M, the money advanced
in M — C, the purchase of the elements of production, amounting to £422
in our example. If the mass of commodities is sold at its value, then C
equals £422 and c equals £78, the value of the surplus-product of 1,560
lbs. of yarn. If we call c, expressed in money, m, then C' — M' = (C +
c) - (M + m), and the circuit M — C ... P ... C' — M', in its expanded
form, is therefore represented by M — C[lmp] ... P ... (C + c) - (M +
m).

In the first stage the capitalist takes articles of consumption out of
the commodity-market proper and the labour-market. In the third stage he
throws commodities back, but only into one market, the commodity-market
proper. However the fact that he extracts from the market, by means of
his commodities, a greater value than he threw upon it originally is due
only to the circumstance that he throws more commodity-value back upon
it than he first drew out of it. He threw value M upon it and drew out
of it the equivalent C; he throws C + c back upon it, and draws out of
it the equivalent M + m.

M was in our example equal to the value of 8,440 lbs. of yarn. But he
throws 10,000 lbs. of yarn on the market, consequently he returns a
greater value than he took from it. On the other hand he threw this
increased value on the market only because through the exploitation of
labour-power in the process of production he had created surplus-value
(as an aliquot part of the product expressed in surplus-product). It is
only by virtue of being the product of this process that the mass of
commodities becomes commodity-capital, the bearer of the expanded
capital-value. By performing C' — M' the advanced capital-value as well
as the surplus-value are realised. The realisation of both takes place
simultaneously in a series of sales or in a lump sale of the entire mass
of commodities which is expressed by C' — M'. But the same circulation
act C' — M' is different for capital-value and surplus-value, as it
expresses for each of them a different stage of their circulation, a
different section of the series of metamorphoses through which they must
pass in the sphere of circulation. The surplus-value c came into the
world only during the process of production. It appeared for the first
time in the commodity-market, in the form of commodities. This is its
first form of circulation, hence the act c — m is its first circulation
act, or its first metamorphosis, which remains to be supplemented by the
antithetical act of circulation, or the reverse metamorphosis, m — c.
^([5])

It is different with the circulation which the capital-value C performs
in the same circulation act C' — M', and which constitutes for the
circulation act C — M, in which C is equal to P, equal to the M
originally advanced. Capital-value has opened its first circulation act
in the form of M, money-capital, and returns through the act C — M to
the same form. It has therefore passed through the two antithetical
stages of circulation, first M — C, second C — M, and finds itself once
more in the form in which it can begin its circular movement anew. What
for surplus-value constitutes the first transformation of the
commodity-form into that of money, constitutes for capital-value in
return, or retransformation, into its original money-form.

By means of M — C[lmp] money capital is transformed into an equivalent
mass of commodities, L and MP. These commodities no longer perform the
function of commodities, of articles for sale. Their value is now in the
hands of the capitalist who bought them; they represent the value of his
productive capital P. And in the function of P, productive consumption,
they are transformed into a kind of commodity differing materially from
the means of production, into yarn, in which their value is not only
preserved but increased, from £422 to £500. By means of this real
metamorphosis, the commodities taken from the market in the first stage,
M — C, are replaced by commodities of different substance and value,
which now must perform the function of commodities, must be transformed
into money and sold. The process of production therefore appears to be
only an interruption of the process of circulation of capital-value, of
which up to that point only the first phase, M — C, has been passed
through. It passes through the second and concluding phase, C — M, after
C has been altered in substance and value. But so far as capital-value,
considered by itself, is concerned, it has merely suffered an alteration
of its use-form in the process of production. It existed in the form of
£422 worth of L and MP, while now it exists in the form of £422 worth
of, or 8,440 lbs. of yarn. If we therefore consider merely the two
circulation phases of capital-value, apart from its surplus-value, we
find that it passes through 1) M — C and 2) C — M, in which the second C
has a different use-form but the same value as the first C. Hence it
passes through M — C — M, a form of circulation which, because the
commodity here changes place twice and in the opposite direction —
transformation from money into commodities and from commodities into
money — necessitates the return of the value advanced in the form of
money to its money-form — its reconversion into money.

The same circulation act C' — M' that constitutes the second and
concluding metamorphosis, a return to the money-form, for the
capital-value advanced in money, represents for the surplus-value —
borne along by the commodity-capital and simultaneously realised by its
change into the money-form — its first metamorphosis, its transformation
from the commodity- to the money-form, C — M, its first circulation
phase.

We have, then, two kinds of observations to make here. First, the
ultimate reconversion of capital-value into its original money-form is a
function of commodity-capital. Secondly, this function includes the
first transformation of surplus-value from its original commodity-form
to its money-form. The money-form, then, plays a double role here. On
the one hand it is the form to which a value originally advanced in
money returns, hence a return to the form of value which opened the
process. On the other hand it is the first converted form of a value
which originally enters the circulation in commodity-form. If the
commodities composing the commodity-capital are sold at their values, as
we assume, then C plus c is transformed into M plus m, its equivalent.
The realised commodity-capital now exists in the hands of the capitalist
in this form: M plus m (£422 plus £78 = £500). Capital-value and
surplus-value are now present in the form of money, the form of the
universal equivalent.

At the conclusion of the process capital-value has therefore resumed the
form in which it entered it, and as money-capital can now open and go
through a new process. Just because the initial and final forms of this
process are those of money-capital, M, we call this form of the
circulation process the circuit of money-capital. It is not the form but
merely the magnitude of the advanced value that is changed at the close.

M plus m is nothing but a sum of money of a definite magnitude, in this
case £500. But as a result of the circulation of capital, as realised
commodity-capital, this sum of money contains the capital-value and the
surplus-value. And these values are now no longer inseparably united as
they were in the yarn; they now lie side by side. Their sale has given
both of them an independent money-form; 211/250 of this money represent
the capital-value of £422 and 39/250 constitute the surplus-value of
£78. This separation, effected by the realisation of the
commodity-capital, has not only the formal content to which we shall
refer presently. It becomes important in the process of the reproduction
of capital, depending on whether m is entirely or partially or not at
all lumped together with M, i.e., depending on whether or not it
continues to function as a component part of the advanced capital-value.
Both m and M may pass through quite different processes of circulation.

In M' capital has returned to its original form M, to its money-form, a
form however in which it is materialised as capital.

There is in the first place a difference of quantity. It was M, £422. It
is now M', £500, and this difference is expressed by M ... M', the
quantitatively different extremes of the circuit, whose movement is
indicated only by the three dots. M' > M, and M' - M = s, the
surplus-value. But as a result of this circular movement M ... M' it is
only M' which exists now; it is the product in which its process of
formation has become extinct. M' now exists by itself, independently of
the movement which brought it into existence. That movement is gone; M'
is there in its place.

But M', being M plus m, £500, composed of £422 advanced capital plus an
increment of the same amounting to £78, represents at the same time a
qualitative relation, although this qualitative relation itself exists
only as a relation between the parts of one and the same sum, hence as a
quantitative relation. M, the advanced capital, which is now once more
present in its original form (£422), exists as realised capital. It has
not only preserved itself but also realised itself as capital by being
distinguished as such from m (£78), to which it stands in the same
relation as to an increase _of its own_, to a fruit _of its own_, to an
increment to which it has given birth itself. It has been realised as
capital because it has been realised as a value which has created value.
M' exists as a capital-relation. M no longer appears as mere money, but
expressly plays the part of money-capital, expressed as a self-expanded
value, hence possessing the property of self-expansion, of hatching a
higher value than it itself has. M became capital by virtue of its
relation to the other part of M', which it has brought about, which has
been effected by it as the cause, which is the consequence of it as the
ground. Thus M' appears as the sum of values differentiated within
itself, functionally (conceptually) distinguished within itself,
expressing the capital-relation.

But this is expressed only as a result, without the intervention of the
process of which it is the result.

Parts of value as such are not qualitatively different from one another,
except in so far as they appear as values of different articles, of
concrete things, hence in various use-forms and therefore as values of
different commodities — a difference which does not originate with them
themselves as mere parts of value. In money all differences between
commodities are extinguished, because it is the equivalent form common
to all of them. A sum of money in the amount of £500 consists solely of
uniform elements of £1 each. Since the intermediate links of its origin
are obliterated in the simple existence of this sum of money and every
trace has been lost of the specific difference between the different
component parts of capital in the process of production, there exists
now only the distinction between the conceptual form of a PRINCIPAL
equal to £422, the capital advanced, and an excess value of £78. Let M'
be equal to, say, £110, of which £100 may be equal to M, the principal,
and 10 equal to s, the surplus-value. There is an absolute homogeneity,
an absence of conceptual distinctions, between the two constituent parts
of the sum of £110. Any £10 of this sum always constitute 1/11 of the
total sum of £1/10, whether they are 1/10 of the advanced principal of
£100 or the excess of £10 above it. Principal and excess sum, capital
and surplus-sum, may therefore be expressed as fractional parts of the
total sum. In our illustration, 10/11 form the principal, or the
capital, and 1/11 the surplus sum. In its money-expression realised
capital appears therefore at the end of its process as an irrational
expression of the capital-relation.

True, this applies also to C' (C plus c). But there is this difference:
that C', of which C and c are only proportional value-parts of the same
homogeneous mass of commodities, indicates its origin P, whose immediate
product it is, while in M', a form derived directly from circulation,
the direct relation to P is obliterated.

The irrational distinction between the principal and the incremental
sum, which is contained in M', so far as that expresses the result of
the movement M ... M', disappears as soon as it once more functions
actively as money-capital and is therefore not fixed as a
money-expression of expanded industrial capital. The circuit of capital
can never begin with M' (although M' now performs the function of M). It
can begin only with M, that is to say it can never begin as an
expression of the capital-relation, but only as a form of advance of
capital-value. As soon as the £500 are once more advanced as capital, in
order again to produce s, they constitute a point of departure, not one
of return. Instead of a capital of £422, a capital of £500 is now
advanced. It is more money than before, more capital-value, but the
relation between its two constituent parts has disappeared. In fact a
sum of £500 instead of the £422 might originally have served as capital.

It is not an active function of money-capital to appear as M'; to appear
as M' is rather a function of C'. Even in the simple circulation of
commodities, first in C₁ — M, secondly in M — C₂, money M does not
figure actively until the second act, M — C₂. Its appearance in the form
of M is only the result of the first act, by virtue of which it only
then appears as a converted form of C₁. True, the capital-relation
contained in M', the relation of one of its parts as the capital-value
to the other as its value increment, acquires functional importance in
so far as, with the constantly repeated circuit M ... M', M' splits into
two circulations, one of them a circulation of capital, the other of
surplus-value. Consequently these two parts perform not only
quantitatively but also qualitatively different functions, M others than
m. But considered by itself, the form M ... M' does not include what the
capitalist consumes, but explicitly only the self-expansion and
accumulation, so far as the latter expresses itself above all as a
periodical augmentation of ever renewed advances of money-capital.

Although M', equal to M plus m, is the irrational form of capital, it is
at the same time only money-capital in its realised form, in the form of
money which has generated money. But this is different from the function
of money-capital in the first stage, M — C[lmp]. In the first stage, M
circulates as money. It assumes the functions of money-capital because
only in its money state can it perform a money-function, can it
transform itself into the elements of P, into L and MP, which stand
opposed to it as commodities. In this circulation act it functions only
as money. But as this act is the first stage of capital-value in
process, it is simultaneously a function of money-capital, by virtue of
the specific use-form of the commodities L and MP which are bought. M'
on the other hand, composed of M, the capital-value, and m, the
surplus-value begotten of M, stands for self-expanded capital-value —
the purpose and the outcome, the function of the total circuit of
capital. The fact that it expresses this outcome in the form of money,
as realised money-capital, does not derive from its being the money-form
of capital, _money-capital_, but on the contrary from its being
_money-capital_, capital in the form of money, from capital having
opened the process in this form, from its having been advanced in the
money-form. Its reconversion into the money-form is, as we have seen, a
function of commodity-capital C', not of money-capital. As for the
difference between M and M', it (m) is simply the money-form of c, the
increment of C. M' is composed of M plus m only because C' was composed
of C plus c. In C' therefore this difference and the relation of the
capital-value to the surplus-value generated by it is present and
expressed before both of them are transformed into M', into a sum of
money in which both parts of the value come face to face with each other
independently and may, therefore, be employed in separate and distinct
functions.

M' is only the result of the realisation of C'. Both M' and C' are
merely different forms of self-expanded capital-value, one of them the
commodity-form, the other the money-form. Both of them have this in
common: that they are self-expanded capital-value. Both of them are
materialised capital, because capital-value as such exists here together
with the surplus-value, the fruit obtained through it and differing from
it, although this relation is expressed only in the irrational form of
the relation between two parts of a sum of money or of a
commodity-value. But as expressions of capital in relation and
contradistinction to the surplus-value produced by it, hence as
expressions of self-expanded value, M' and C' are the same and express
the same thing, only in different forms. They do not differ as
money-capital and commodity-capital but as money and commodities. In so
far as they represent self-expanded value, capital acting as capital,
they only express the result of the functioning of productive capital,
the only function in which capital-value generates value. What they have
in common is that both of them, money-capital as well as
commodity-capital, are modes of existence of capital. The one is capital
in money-form, the other in commodity-form. The specific functions that
distinguish them cannot therefore be anything else but differences
between the functions of money and of commodities. Commodity-capital,
the direct product of the capitalist process of production, is
reminiscent of its origin and is therefore more rational and less
incomprehensible in form than money-capital, in which every trace of
this process has vanished, as in general all special use-forms of
commodities disappear in money. It is therefore only when M' itself
functions as commodity-capital, when it is the direct product of a
productive process instead of being the converted form of this product,
that it loses its bizarre form, that is to say, in the production of the
money material itself. In the production of gold for instance the
formula would be M — C[lmp] ... P ... M' (M plus m), where M' would
figure as a commodity product, because P furnishes more gold than was
advanced for the elements of production of the gold in the first M, the
money-capital. In this case the irrational nature of the expression M
... M' (M plus m) disappears. Here a part of a sum of money appears as
the mother of another part of the same sum of money.

IV. The Circuit as a Whole

We have seen that the process of circulation is interrupted at the end
of its first phase, M — C[lmp], by P, in which the commodities L and MP
bought in the market are consumed as the material and value components
of productive capital. The product of this consumption is a new
commodity, C', altered in respect of substance and value. The
interrupted process of circulation, M — C, must be completed by C — M.
But the bearer of this second and concluding phase of circulation is C',
a commodity different in substance and value from the original C. The
circulation series therefore appears as 1) M — C₁; 2) C'₂ — M', where in
the second phase of the first commodity, C₁, another commodity of
greater value and different use-form, C'₂, is substituted during the
interruption caused by the functioning of P, the production of C' from
the elements of C, the forms of existence of productive capital P.
However, the first form of appearance in which capital faced us (Buch.
I, Kap. IV, 1), [English edition: Ch. IV. — _Ed._] viz., M — C — M'
(extended: 1) M — C₁; 2) C₁ — M') shows the same commodity twice. Both
times it is the same commodity into which money is transformed in the
first phase and reconverted into more money in the second phase. In
spite of this essential difference, both circulations share this much:
that in their first phase money is transformed into commodities, and in
the second commodities into money, that the money spent in the first
phase returns in the second. On the one hand both have in common this
reflux of the money to its starting-point, on the other hand also the
excess of the returning money over the money advanced. To that extent
the formula M — C ... C' — M' is contained in the general formula M — C
— M'.

It follows furthermore that each time equally great quantities of
simultaneously existing values face and replace each other in the two
metamorphoses M — C and C' — M' belonging in circulation. The change in
value pertains exclusively to the metamorphosis P, the process of
production, which thus appears as a real metamorphosis of capital, as
compared with the merely metamorphosis of circulation.

Let us now consider the total movement, M — C ... P ... C' — M', or, M —
C[lmp] ... P ... C' (C + c) — M' (M + m), its more expanded form.
Capital here appears as a value which goes through a series of
interconnected, interdependent transformations, a series of
metamorphoses which form just as many phases, or stages, of the process
as a whole. Two of these phases belong in the sphere of circulation, one
of them in that of production. In each one of these phases capital-value
has a different form for which there is a correspondingly different,
special function. Within this movement the advanced value does not only
preserve itself but grows, increases in magnitude. Finally, in the
concluding stage, it returns to the same form which it had at the
beginning of the process as a whole. This process as a whole constitutes
therefore the process of moving in circuits.

The two forms assumed by capital-value at the various stages of its
circulation are those of _money-capital_ and _commodity-capital_. The
form pertaining to the stage of production is that of _productive
capital_. The capital which assumes these forms in the course of its
total circuit and then discards them and in each of them performs the
function corresponding to the particular form, is _industrial capital_,
industrial here in the sense it comprises every branch of industry run
on a capitalist basis.

Money-capital, commodity-capital and productive capital, do not
therefore designate independent kinds of capital whose functions form
the content of likewise independent branches of industry separated from
one another. They denote here only special functional forms of
industrial capital, which assumes all three of them one after the other.

Capital describes its circuit normally only so long as its various
phases pass uninterruptedly into one another. If capital stops short in
the first phase M — C, money-capital assumes the rigid form of a hoard;
if it stops in the phase of production, the means of production lie
without functioning on the one side, while labour-power remains
unemployed on the other; and if capital stops short in the last phase C'
— M', piles of unsold commodities accumulate and clog the flow of
circulation.

However, it is in the nature of things that the circuit itself
necessitates the fixation of capital for certain lengths of time in its
various phases. In each of its phases industrial capital is tied up with
a definite form: money-capital, productive capital, commodity-capital.
It does not acquire the form in which it may enter a new transformation
phase until it has performed the function corresponding to each
particular form. To make this plain, we have assumed in our illustration
that the capital-value of the quantity of commodities created at the
stage of production is equal to the total sum of the value originally
advanced in the form of money; or, in other words, that the entire
capital-value advanced in the form of money passes on in bulk from one
stage to the next. But we have seen (Buch I, Kap. VI) [English edition:
Ch. VIII. — _Ed._] that a part of constant capital, the labour
instruments proper (e.g., machinery), continually serve anew, with more
or less numerous repetitions of the same process of production, hence
transfer their values piecemeal to the products. It will be seen later
to what extent this circumstance modifies the circular movement of
capital. For the present the following suffices: In our illustration the
value of productive capital amounting to £422 contained only the average
wear and tear of factory buildings, machinery, etc., that is to say only
that part of value which they transferred to the yarn in the
transformation of 10,600 lbs. of cotton into 10,000 lbs. of yarn, which
represented the product of one week’s spinning of 60 hours. In the means
of production, into which the advanced constant capital of £372 was
transformed, the instruments of labour, buildings, machinery, etc.,
figured as if they had only been rented in the market at a weekly rate.
But this does not change the gist of the matter in any way. We have but
to multiply the quantity of yarn produced in one week, i.e., 10,000 lbs.
of yarn, by the number of weeks contained in a certain number of years,
in order to transfer to the yarn the entire value of the instruments of
labour bought and consumed during this period. It is then plain that the
advanced money-capital must first be transformed into these instruments,
hence must have gone through the first phase M — C before it can
function as productive capital P. And it is likewise plain in our
illustration that the capital value of £422, embodied in the yarn during
the process of production, cannot be part of the value of the 10,000
lbs. of yarn and enter the circulation phase C' — M' until it is ready.
It cannot be sold until it has been spun.

In the general formula the product P is regarded as a material thing
different from the elements of the productive capital, as an object
existing apart from the process of production and having a use-form
different from that of the elements of production. This is always the
case when the result of the productive process assumes the form of a
thing, even when a part of the product re-enters the resumed production
as one of its elements. Grain for instance serves as seed for its own
production, but the product consists only of grain and hence has a shape
different from those of related elements such as labour-power,
implements, fertiliser. But there are certain independent branches of
industry in which the product of the productive process is not a new
material product, is not a commodity. Among these only the
communications industry, whether engaged in transportation proper, of
goods and passengers, or in the mere transmission of communications,
letters, telegrams, etc., is economically important.

A. Chuprov ^([6]) says on this score:

“The manufacturer may first produce articles and then look for
consumers”

[his product, thrust out of the process of production when finished,
passes into circulation as a commodity separated from it].

“Production and consumption thus appear as two acts separated in space
and time. In the transportation industry, which does not create any new
products but merely transfer men and things, these two acts coincide;
its services” [change of place] “are consumed the moment they are
produced. For this reason the area within which railways can sell their
services extends at best 50 versts (53 kilometres) on either side of
their tracks.”

The result, whether men or goods are transported, is a change in their
whereabouts. Yarn, for instance, may now be in India instead of in
England, where it was produced.

However, what the transportation industry sells is change of location.
The useful effect is inseparably connected with the process of
transportation, i.e., the productive process of the transport industry.
Men and goods travel together with the means of transportation, and
their traveling, this locomotion, constitutes the process of production
effected by these means. The useful effect can be consumed only during
this process of production. It does not exist as a utility different
from this process, a use-thing which does not function as an article of
commerce, does not circulate as a commodity, until after it has been
produced. But the exchange-value of this useful effect is determined,
like that of any other commodity, by the value of the elements of
production (labour-power and means of production) consumed in it plus
the surplus-value created by the surplus-labour of the labourers
employed in transportation. This useful effect also entertains the very
same relations to consumption that other commodities do. If it is
consumed individually its value disappears during its consumption; if it
is consumed productively so as to constitute by itself a stage in the
production of the commodities being transported, its value is
transferred as an additional value to the commodity itself. The formula
for the transport industry would therefore be M — C[lmp] ... P — M',
since it is the process of production itself that is paid for and
consumed, not a product separate and distinct from it. Hence this
formula has almost the same form as that of the production of precious
metals, the only difference being that in this case M' represents the
converted form of the useful effect created during the process of
production, and not the bodily form of the gold or silver produced in
this process and extruded from it.

Industrial capital is the only mode of existence of capital in which not
only the appropriation of surplus-value, or surplus-product, but
simultaneously its creation is a function of capital. Therefore with it
the capitalist character of production is a necessity. Its existence
implies the class antagonism between capitalists and wage-labourers. To
the extent that it seizes control of social production, the technique
and social organisation of the labour-process are revolutionised and
with them the economico-historical type of society. The other kinds of
capital, which appeared before industrial capital amid conditions of
social production that have receded into the past or are now succumbing,
are not only subordinated to it and the mechanism of their functions
altered in conformity with it, but move solely with it as their basis,
hence live and die, stand and fall with this basis. Money-capital and
commodity-capital, so far as they function as vehicles of particular
branches of business, side by side with industrial capital, are nothing
but modes of existence of the different functional forms now assumed,
now discarded by industrial capital in the sphere of circulation — modes
which, due to social division of labour, have attained independent
existence and been developed one-sidedly.

The circuit M ... M' on the one hand intermingles with the general
circulation of commodities, proceeds from it and flows back into it, is
a part of it. On the other hand it forms an independent movement of the
capital-value for the individual capitalist, a movement of its own which
takes place partly within the general circulation of commodities, partly
outside of it, but which always preserves its independent character.
First, because its two phases that take place in the sphere of
circulation, M — C and C' — M', being phases of the movement of capital,
have functionally definite characters. In M — C, C is materially
determined as labour-power and means of production; in C' — M' the
capital-value is realised plus the surplus-value. Secondly, because P,
the process of production, embraces productive consumption. Thirdly,
because the return of the money to its starting-point makes of the
movement M ... M' a circuit complete in itself.

Every individual capital is therefore, on the one hand, in its two
circulation-halves M — C and C' — M', an agent of the general
circulation of commodities, in which it either functions or lies
concatenated as money or as a commodity, thus forming a link in the
general chain of metamorphoses taking place in the world of commodities.
On the other hand it describes within the general circulation its own
independent circuit in which the sphere of production forms a
transitional stage and in which this capital returns to its
starting-point in the same form in which it left that point. Within its
own circuit, which includes its real metamorphosis in the process of
production, it changes at the same time the magnitude of its value. It
returns not simply as money-value, but as augmented, increased
money-value.

Let us finally consider M — C ... P ... C' — M' as a special form of the
circular course of capital, alongside the other forms which we shall
analyse later. We shall find that it is distinguished by the following
features:

1. It appears as the circuit of money-capital, because industrial
capital in its _money-form_, as money-capital, forms the starting-point
and the point of return of its total process. The formula itself
expresses the fact that the money is not expended here as money but is
merely advanced, hence is merely the money-form of capital,
money-capital. It expresses furthermore that exchange-value, not
use-value, is the determining aim of this movement. Just because the
money-form of value is the independent, tangible form in which value
appears, the form of circulation M ... M', the initial and terminal
points of which are real money, expresses most graphically the
compelling motive of capitalist production — money-making. The process
of production appears merely as an unavoidable intermediate link, as a
necessary evil for the sake of money-making. All nations with a
capitalist mode of production are therefore seized periodically by a
feverish attempt to make money without the intervention of the process
of production.

2. The stage of production, the function of P, represents in this
circuit an interruption between the two phases of circulation M — C ...
C' — M', which in its turn represents only the intermediate link in the
simple circulation M — C — M'. The process of production appears in the
form of a circuit-describing process, formally and explicitly as that
which it is in the capitalist mode of production, as a mere means of
expanding the advanced value, hence enrichment as such as the purpose of
production.

3. Since the series of phases is opened by M — C, the second link of the
circulation is C' — M'. In other words, the starting-point is M, the
money-capital that is to be self-expanded; the terminal point is M', the
self-expanded money-capital M plus m, in which M figures as realised
capital along with its offspring m. This distinguishes the circuit of M
from that of the two other circuits P and C', and does so in two ways.
On the one hand by the money-form of the two extremes. And money is the
independent, tangible form of existence of value, the value of the
product in its independent value-form, in which every trace of the
use-value of the commodities has been extinguished. On the other hand
the form P ... P does not necessarily become P ... P' (P plus p), and in
the form C ... C' no difference whatever in value is visible between the
two extremes. It is therefore characteristic of the formula M — M' that
for one thing capital-value is its starting-point and expanded
capital-value its point of return, so that the advance of capital-value
appears as the means and expanded capital-value as the end of the entire
operation; and that for another thing this relation is expressed in
money-form, in the independent value-form, hence money-capital as money
begetting money. The generation of surplus-value by value is not only
expressed as the Alpha and Omega of the process, but explicitly in the
form of glittering money.

4. Since M', the money-capital realised as a result of C' — M', the
complementary and concluding phase of M — C, has absolutely the same
form as that in which it began its first circuit, it can, as soon as it
emerges from the latter, begin the same circuit over again as an
increased (accumulated) money-capital; M' = M + m. And at least it is
not expressed in the form M ... M' that, in the repetition of the
circuit, the circulation of m separates from that of M. Considered in
its one-time form, formally, the circuit of money-capital expresses
therefore simply the process of self-expansion and of accumulation.
Consumption is expressed in it only as productive consumption, by M —
C[lmp], and it is only this consumption that is included in this circuit
of individual capital. M — L is L — M or C — M on the part of the
labourer. It is therefore the first phase of circulation which brings
about his individual consumption, thus: L — M — C (means of
subsistence). The second phase M — C, no longer falls within the circuit
of individual capital, but is initiated and premised by it, since the
labourer must above all live, hence maintain himself by individual
consumption, in order to always be in the market as material that the
capitalist can exploit. But this consumption itself is here only assumed
as a condition for the productive consumption of labour-power by
capital, hence only to the extent that the worker maintains and
reproduces himself as labour-power by means of his individual
consumption. However the MP, the commodities proper which enter into the
circuit of capital, are nutriment for the productive consumption only.
The act L — M promotes the individual consumption of the labourer, the
transformation of the means of subsistence into his flesh and blood.
True, the capitalist must also be there, must also live and consume to
be able to perform the function of a capitalist. To this end, he has,
indeed, to consume only as much as the labourer, and that is all this
form of the circulation process presupposes. But even this is not
formally expressed, since the formula concludes with M', i.e., a result
which can at once resume its function as money-capital, now augmented.

C' — M' directly contains the sale of C'; but C' — M', a sale on the one
part, is M — C, a purchase, on the other part, and in the last analysis
a commodity is bought only for its use-value, in order to enter (leaving
intermediate sales out of consideration) the process of consumption,
whether this is individual or productive, according to the nature of the
article bought. But this consumption does not enter the circuit of
individual capital, the product of which is C'. This product is
eliminated from the circuit precisely because it is a commodity for
sale. C' is expressly designed for consumption by others than the
producer. Thus we find that certain exponents of the mercantile system
(which is based on the formula M — C ... P ... C' — M') deliver lengthy
sermons to the effect that the individual capitalist should consume only
as much as the labourer, that the nation of capitalists should leave the
consumption of their own commodities, and the consumption process in
general, to the other, less intelligent nations but that they themselves
should make productive consumption their life’s task. These sermons
frequently remind one in form and content of analogous ascetic
expostulations of the fathers of the church.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Capital’s movement in circuits is therefore the unity of circulation and
production; it includes both. Since the two phases M — C and C' — M' are
acts of circulation, the circulation of capital is a part of the general
circulation of commodities. But as functionally they are definite
sections, stages in capital’s circuit, which pertains not only to the
sphere of circulation but also to that of production, capital goes
through its own circuit in the general circulation of commodities. The
general circulation of commodities serves capital in the first stage as
a means of assuming that shape in which it can perform the function of
productive capital; in the second stage it serves to strip off the
commodity-function in which capital cannot renew its circuit; at the
same time it opens up to capital the possibility of separating its own
circuit from the circulation of the surplus-value that accrued to it.

The circuit made by money-capital is therefore the most one-sided, and
thus the most striking and typical form in which the circuit of
industrial capital appears, the capital whose aim and compelling motive
— the self-expansion of value, the making of money, and accumulation —
is thus conspicuously revealed (buying to sell dearer). Owing to the
fact that the first phase is M — C it is also revealed that the
constituents of productive capital originate in the commodity-market,
and in general that the capitalist process of production depends on
circulation, on commerce. The circuit of money-capital is not merely the
production of commodities; it is itself possible only through
circulation and presupposes it. This is plain, if only from the fact
that the form M belonging in circulation appears as the first and pure
form of advanced capital-value, which is not the case in the other two
circuit forms.

The money-capital circuit always remains the general expression of
industrial capital, because it always includes the self-expansion of the
advanced value. In P ... P, the money-expression of capital appears only
as the price of the elements of production, hence only as a value
expressed in money of account and is fixed in this form in book-keeping.

M ... M' becomes a special form of the industrial capital circuit when
newly active capital is first advanced in the form of money and then
withdrawn in the same form, either in passing from one branch of
industry to another or in retiring industrial capital from a business.
This includes the functioning as capital of the surplus-value first
advanced in the form of money, and becomes most evident when
surplus-value functions in some other business than the one in which it
originated. M ... M' may be the first circuit of a certain capital; it
may be the last; it may be regarded as the form of the total social
capital; it is the form of capital that is newly invested, either as
capital recently accumulated in the form of money, or as some old
capital which is entirely transformed into money for the purpose of
transfer from one branch of industry to another.

Being a form always contained in all circuits, money-capital performs
this circuit precisely for that part of capital which produces
surplus-value, viz., variable capital. The normal form of advancing
wages is payment in money; this process must be renewed in comparatively
short intervals, because the labourer lives from hand to mouth. The
capitalist must therefore always confront the labourer as
money-capitalist, and his capital as money-capital. There can be no
direct or indirect balancing of accounts in this case such as we find in
the purchase of means of production and in the sale of produced
commodities (so that the greater part of the money-capital actually
figures only in the form of commodities, money only in the form of money
of account and finally in cash only in the balancing of accounts). On
the other hand, a part of the surplus-value arising out of variable
capital is spent by the capitalist for his individual consumption, which
pertains to the retail trade and, however circuitous the route may be,
this part is always spent in cash, in the money-form of surplus-value.
Variable capital always appears anew as money-capital invested in wages
(M — L) and m as surplus-value to defray the cost of individual
consumption of the capitalist. Hence M, advanced variable capital-value,
and m, its increment, are necessarily held in the form of money to be
spent in this form.

The formula M — C ... P ... C' — M', with its result M' = M + m, is
deceptive in form, is illusory in character, owing to the existence of
the advanced and self-expanded value in its equivalent form, money. The
emphasis is not on the self-expansion of value but on the _money-form_
of this process, on the fact that more value in money-form is finally
drawn out of the circulation than was originally advanced to it; hence
on the multiplication of the mass of gold and silver belonging to the
capitalist. The so-called monetary system is merely an expression of the
irrational form M — C — M', a movement which takes place exclusively in
circulation and therefore can explain the two acts M — C and C — M' in
no other way than as a sale of C above its value in the second act and
therefore as C drawing more money out of the circulation than was put
into it by its purchase. On the other hand M — C ... P ... C' — M',
fixed as the exclusive form, constitutes the basis of the more highly
developed mercantile system, in which not only the circulation of
commodities but also their production appears as a necessary element.

The illusory character of M — C ... P ... C' — M' and the
correspondingly illusory interpretation exists whenever this form is
fixed as occurring once, not as fluent and ever renewed; hence whenever
this form is considered not as one of the forms of the circuit but as
its exclusive form. But it itself points toward other forms.

In the first place this entire circuit is premised on the capitalist
character of the process of production, and therefore considers this
process together with the specific social conditions brought about by it
as the basis. M — C = M — C[lmp]; but M — L assumes the existence of the
wage-labourer, and hence the means of production as part of productive
capital. It assumes therefore that the process of labour and
self-expansion, the process of production, is a function of capital.

In the second place, if M ... M' is repeated, the return to the
money-form appears just as evanescent as the money-form in the first
stage. M — C disappears to make room for P. The constantly recurrent
advance in the form of money and its constant return in the form of
money appear merely as fleeting moments in the circuit.

In the third place

[formula]

Beginning with the second repetition of the circuit, the circuit P ...
C' — M'. M — C ... P appears before the second circuit of M is
completed, and all subsequent circuits may thus be considered under the
form of P ... C' — M — C ... P, so that M — C, being the first phase of
the first circuit, is merely the passing preparation for the constantly
repeated circuit of the productive capital. And this indeed is so in the
case of industrial capital invested for the first time in the form of
money-capital.

On the other hand before the second circuit of P is completed, the first
circuit, that of commodity-capital, C' — M'.M — C ... P ... C' (abridged
C' ... C') has already been made. Thus the first form already contains
the other two, and the money-form thus disappears, so far as it is not
merely an expression of value but an expression of value in the
equivalent form, in money.

Finally, if we consider some newly invested individual capital
describing for the first time the circuit M — C ... P ... C' — M', then
M — C is the preparatory phase, the forerunner of the first process of
production gone through by this individual capital. This phase M — C is
consequently not presupposed but rather called for or necessitated by
the process of production. But this applies only to this individual
capital. The general form of the circuit of industrial capital is the
_circuit of money-capital_, whenever the capitalist mode of production
is taken for granted, hence in social conditions determined by
capitalist production. Therefore the capitalist process of production is
assumed as a pre-condition, if not in the first circuit of the
money-capital of a newly invested industrial capital, then outside of
it. The continuous existence of this process of production presupposes
the constantly renewed circuit P ... P. Even in the first stage, M —
C[lmp], this premise plays a part, for this assumes on the one hand the
existence of the class of wage-labourers; and then, on the other, that
which is M — C, the first stage, for the buyer of means of production,
is C' — M' for their seller; hence C' presupposes commodity-capital, and
thus the commodities themselves as a result of capitalist production,
and thereby the function of productive capital.

Notes

1. From Manuscript II. — _F.E._

2. Beginning of Manuscript VII, started July 1878.

3. End of Manuscript VII. Beginning of Manuscript VI. — _F.E._

4. End of Manuscript VI. Beginning of Manuscript V. — _F.E._

5. This is true no matter how we separate capital-value and
surplus-value. 10,000 lbs. of yarn contain 1,560 lbs., or £78 worth of
surplus-value; likewise, one lb., or one shilling’s worth of yarn,
contains 2.496 ounces, or 1.872 pence worth, of surplus-value.

6. A. Chuprov, _Railroading_, Moscow, 1875, pp. 69 and 70.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 2: The Circuit of Productive Capital

The circuit of productive capital has the general formula P ... C' — M'
— C ... P. It signifies the periodical renewal of the functioning of
productive capital, hence its reproduction, or its process of production
as a process of reproduction aiming at the self-expansion of value; not
only production but a periodical reproduction of surplus-value; the
function of industrial capital in its productive form, and this function
performed not once but periodically repeated, so that the renewal is
determined by the starting-point. A portion of C' may (in certain cases,
in various branches of industrial capital) re-enter directly as means of
production into the same labour-process out of which it came in the
shape of a commodity. This merely saves the transformation of the value
of this portion into real money or token-money or else the commodity
finds an independent expression only as money of account. This part of
value does not enter into the circulation. Thus values enter into the
process of production which do not enter into the process of
circulation. The same is true of that part of C' which is consumed by
the capitalist in kind as part of the surplus-product. But this is
insignificant for capitalist production. It deserves consideration, if
at all, only in agriculture.

Two things are at once strikingly apparent in this form.

For one thing, while in the first form, M ... M', the process of
production, the function of P, interrupts the circulation of
money-capital and acts only as a mediator between its two phases M — C
and C' — M', here the entire circulation process of industrial capital,
its entire movement within the phase of circulation, constitutes only an
interruption and consequently only the connecting link between the
productive capital, which as the first extreme opens the circuit, and
that which closes it as the other extreme in the same form, hence in the
form in which it starts again. Circulation proper appears but as an
instrument promoting the periodically renewed reproduction, rendered
continuous by the renewal.

For another thing, the entire circulation presents itself in a form
which is the opposite of that which it has in the circuit of
money-capital. There it was: M — C — M (M — C. C — M), apart from the
determination of value; here it is, again apart from the value
determination: C — M — C (C — M. M — C), i.e., the form of the simple
circulation of commodities.

I. Simple Reproduction

Let us first consider the process C' — M' — C, which takes place in the
sphere of circulation between the two extremes P ... P.

The starting-point of this circulation is commodity-capital; C' = C + c
= P + c. The function of commodity-capital C' — M' (the realisation of
the capital-value contained in it equals P, which now exists as the
constituent part C of C', as well as of the surplus-value contained in
it, which exists as a constituent part of the same quantity of
commodities and has the value c) was examined in the first form of the
circuit. But there this function formed the second phase of the
interrupted circulation and the concluding phase of the entire circuit.
Here it forms the second phase of the circuit but the first phase of the
circulation. The first circuit ends with M', and since M' as well as the
original M can again open the second circuit as money-capital, it was
not necessary at first to see whether M and m (surplus-value) contained
in M' continue in their course together or whether each of them pursues
its own course. This would only have become necessary if we had followed
up further the first circuit in its renewed course. But this point must
be decided in the circuit of the productive capital, because the
determination of its very first circuit depends on it and because C' —
M' appears in it as the first phase of the circulation, which has to be
complemented by M — C. It depends on this decision whether the formula
represents simple reproduction or reproduction on an extended scale. The
character of the circuit changes according to the decision made.

Let us, then, consider first the simple reproduction of productive
capital, assuming that, as in the first chapter, conditions remain
constant and that commodities are bought and sold at their values.

On this assumption the entire surplus-value enters into the individual
consumption of the capitalist. As soon as the transformation of the
commodity-capital C' into money has taken place, that part of the money
which represents the capital-value continues to circulate in the circuit
of industrial capital; the other part, which is surplus-value changed
into money, enters into the general circulation of commodities,
constitutes a circulation of money emanating from the capitalist but
taking place outside of the circulation of his individual capital.

In our illustration we had a commodity-capital C' of 10,000 lbs. of
yarn, valued at £500; £422 of this represent the value of the productive
capital and continue, as the money-form of 8,440 lbs. of yarn, the
capital circulation begun by C', while the surplus value of £78, the
money-form of 1,560 lbs. of yarn, the excess of the commodity-product,
leaves this circulation and describes a separate course within the
general circulation of commodities.

[formula]

m — c represents a series of purchases by means of money which the
capitalist spends either for commodities proper or for personal services
to his cherished self or family. These purchases are made piecemeal at
various times. The money therefore exists temporarily in the form of a
supply, or hoard, destined for current consumption, since money whose
circulation has been interrupted assumes the form of a hoard. Its
function as a medium of circulation, which includes its transient form
of a hoard, does not enter the circulation of capital in its money-form
M. This money is not advanced but spent.

We have assumed that the total advanced capital always passes wholly
from one of its phases to the other; and so here too we assume that the
commodities produced by P represent the total value of the productive
capital P, or £422 plus £78 of surplus-value created in the process of
production. In our illustration, which deals with a discrete commodity,
the surplus-value exists in the form of 1,560 lbs. of yarn; if computed
on the basis of one pound of yarn, it would exist in the form of 2.496
ounces of yarn. But if the commodity were for instance a machine valued
at £500 and having the same value-composition, one a part of the value
of this machine, £78, would be surplus-value, but these £78 would exist
only in the machine as a whole. This machine cannot be divided into
capital-value and surplus-value without breaking it to pieces and thus
destroying its value together with its use-value. For this reason the
two value-components can be represented only ideally as components of
the commodity, not as independent elements of the commodity C', like any
pound of yarn, which represents a separable independent element of the
10,000 lbs. of commodity. In the first case the aggregate commodity, the
commodity-capital, the machine, must be sold in its entirety before m
can enter upon its separate circulation. On the other hand when the
capitalist has sold 8,440 lbs., the sale of the remaining 1,560 lbs.
would represent a wholly separate circulation of the surplus-value in
the form of c (1,560 lbs. of yarn) — m (£78) — c (articles of
consumption). But the elements of value of each individual portion of
the 10,000 lbs. of yarn, the product, can be represented by parts of the
product as well as by the total product. Just as the latter, 10,000 lbs.
of yarn, the product, can be represented by parts of the product as well
as by the total product. Just as the latter, 10,000 lbs. of yarn, can be
divided into the value of the constant capital (c), 7,440 lbs. of yarn
worth £372, variable capital-value (v) of 1,000 lbs. of yarn worth £50,
and surplus-value (s) of 1,560 lbs. of yarn worth £78, so every pound of
yarn may be divided into c, equal to 11.904 ounces worth 8.928 d., v
equal to 1.600 ounces of yarn worth 1.200 d., and s equal to 2.496
ounces of yarn worth 1.872 d. The capitalist might also sell various
portions of the 10,000 lbs. of yarn successively and successively
consume successive portions of the surplus-value elements contained in
them, thus realising, also successively, the sum of c plus v. But in the
final analysis this operation likewise premises the sale of the entire
lot of 10,000 lbs., that therefore the value of c and v will be replaced
by the sale of 8,440 lbs. (Buch I, Kap. VII, 2.) [English edition: Ch.
IX, 2. — _Ed_.]

However that may be, by means of C' — M' both the capital-value and
surplus-value contained in C' acquire a separable existence, the
existence of different sums of money. In both cases M and m are really a
converted form of the value which originally in C' had only a peculiar,
an ideal expression as the price of the commodity.

c — m — c represents the simple circulation of commodities, the first
phase of which, c — m, is included in the circulation of
commodity-capital, C' — M', i.e., included in the circuit of capital;
its complementary phase m — c falls, on the contrary, outside of this
circuit, being a separate act in the general circulation of commodities.
The circulation of C and c, of capital-value and surplus-value, splits
after the transformation of C' into M'. Hence it follows:

First, while the commodity-capital is realised by C' — M' = C' — (M +
m), the movement of capital-value and surplus-value, which in C' — M' is
still united and carried on by the same quantity of commodities, becomes
separable, both of them henceforth possessing independent forms as
separate sums of money.

Secondly, if this separation takes place, m being spent as the revenue
of the capitalist, while M as a functional form of capital-value
continues its course determined by the circuit, the first act, C' — M',
in connection with the subsequent acts, M — C and m — c, may be
represented as two different circulations C — M — C and c — m — c; and
both of these series, so far as their general form is concerned, belong
in the usual circulation of commodities.

By the way, in the case of the continuous, indivisible commodities, it
is a matter of practice to isolate the value constituents ideally. For
instance in the London building-business, which is carried on mainly on
credit, the building contractor receives advances in accordance with the
stage of construction reached. None of these stages is a house, but only
a really existing constituent part of an inchoate future house; hence,
in spite of its reality, it is but an ideal fraction of the entire
house, but real enough to serve as security for an additional advance.
(See on this point Chapter XII below.) [See pp. 237-38 of this book. —
_Ed_.]

Thirdly, if the movement of capital-value and surplus-value, which still
proceeds unitedly in C and M, is separated only in part (a portion of
the surplus-value not being spent as revenue) or not at all, a change
takes place in the capital-value itself within its circuit, before it is
completed. In our illustration the value of the productive capital was
equal to £422. If that capital continues M — C, as, say, £480 or £500,
then it strides through the latter stages of its circuit with an
increase of £58 or £78 over its initial value. This may also go hand in
hand with a change in the composition of its value.

C' — M', the second stage of the circulation and the final stage of
circuit I (M ... M'), is the second stage in our circuit and the first
in the circulation of commodities. So far as the circulation is
concerned, it must be complemented by M' — C'. But not only has C' — M'
the process of self-expansion already behind it (in this case the
function of P, the first stage), but its result, the commodity C'; has
already been realised. The process of the self-expansion of capital and
the realisation of the commodities representing the expanded
capital-value are therefore completed in C' — M'.

And so we have premised simple reproduction, i.e., that m — c separates
entirely from M — C. Since both circulations, c — m — c as well as C — M
— C, belong in the circulation of commodities, so far as their general
form is concerned (and for this reason do not show only value
differences in their extremes), it is easy to conceive the process of
capitalist production, after the manner of vulgar economy, as a mere
production of commodities, of use-values designed for consumption of
some sort, which the capitalist produces for no other purpose than that
of getting in their place commodities with different use-values, or of
exchanging them for such, as vulgar economy erroneously states.

C' acts from the very outset as commodity-capital, and the purpose of
the entire process, enrichment (the production of surplus-value), does
not by any means exclude increasing consumption on the part of the
capitalist as his surplus-value (and hence his capital) increases; on
the contrary, it emphatically includes it.

Indeed, in the circulation of the revenue of the capitalist, the
produced commodity c (or the fraction of the produced commodity C'
ideally corresponding to it) serves only to transform it, first into
money, and from money into a number of other commodities serving private
consumption. But we must not, at this point, overlook the trifling
circumstance that c is commodity-value which did not cost the capitalist
anything, an incarnation of surplus-labour, for which reason it
originally stepped on the stage as a component part of commodity-capital
C'. This c is, by the very nature of its existence, bound to the circuit
of capital-value in process and if this circuit begins to stagnate or is
otherwise disturbed, not only the consumption of c restricted or
entirely arrested, but also the disposal of that series of commodities
which serve to replace c. The same is true when C' — M' ends in failure,
or only a part of C' can be sold.

We have seen that c — m — c, representing the circulation of the revenue
of the capitalist, enters into the circulation of capital only so long
as c is a part of the value of C', of capital in its functional form of
commodity-capital; but, as soon as it acquires independence from m — c,
hence throughout the form c — m — c, the circulation of that revenue
does not enter into the movement of the capital advanced by the
capitalist, although it stems from it. This circulation is connected
with the movement of advanced capital inasmuch as the existence of
capital presupposes the existence of the capitalist, and his existence
is conditioned on his consuming surplus-value.

Within the general circulation C', for example yarn, functions only as a
commodity; but as an element in the circulation of capital it performs
the function of _commodity-capital_, a form which capital-value
alternately assumes and discards. After the sale of the yarn to a
merchant, it is extruded out of the circular movement of capital whose
product it is, but nevertheless, as a commodity, it moves always in the
sphere of the general circulation. The circulation of one and the same
mass of commodities continues, in spite of the fact that it has ceased
to be a phase in the independent circuit of the spinner’s capital. Hence
the real definitive metamorphosis of the mass of commodities thrown into
circulation by the capitalist, C — M, their final exit into consumption
may be completely separated in time and space from that metamorphosis in
which this mass of commodities functions as his commodity-capital. The
same metamorphosis which has been accomplished in the circulation of
capital still remains to be accomplished in the sphere of the general
circulation.

This state of things is not changed a bit if this yarn enters the
circuit of some other industrial capital. The general circulation
comprises as much the intertwining of the circuits of the various
independent fractions of social capital, i.e., the totality of the
individual capitals, as the circulation of those values which are not
thrown on the market as capital but enter into individual consumption.

The relation between a circuit of capital forming part of a general
circulation and a circuit forming links in an independent circuit is
shown further on when we examine the circulation of M, which is equal to
M plus m. M as money-capital continues capital’s circuit; m, being spent
as revenue (m — c), enters into the general circulation, but comes
flying out of the circuit of capital. Only that part enters the latter
circuit which performs the function of additional money-capital. In c —
m — c money serves only as coin; the object of this circulation is the
individual consumption of the capitalist. It is typical of the idiocy of
vulgar economy that it gives out this circulation, which does not enter
into the circuit of capital — the circulation of that part of the value
produced which is consumed as revenue — as the characteristic circuit of
capital.

In the second phase M — C, the capital-value M, which is equal to P (the
value of the productive capital that at this point opens the circuit of
industrial capital), is again present, delivered of its surplus-value,
therefore having the same magnitude of value as it had in the first
stage of the circuit of money-capital M — C. In spite of the difference
in place the function of the money-capital into which the
commodity-capital has now been transformed is the same: its
transformation into MP and L, into means of production and labour-power.

In the functioning of commodity-capital C' — M', the capital-value,
simultaneously with c — m, has consequently gone through the phase C — M
and enters now into the complementary phase M — C[lmp]. Its complete
circulation is therefore C — M— C[lmp].

First: Money-capital M appeared in Form I (circuit M ... M') as the
original form in which capital-value is advanced; it appears here from
the outset as a part of that sum of money into which commodity-capital
transformed itself in the first circulation phase C' — M', therefore
from the outset as the transformation of P, the productive capital,
through the medium of the sale of commodities, into the money-form.
Money-capital exists here from the outset as that form of capital-value
which is neither its original nor its final one, since the phase M — C,
which concludes the phase C — M, can only be performed by again
discarding the money-form. Therefore that part of M — C which is at the
same time M — L appears now no longer as a mere advance of money by the
purchase of labour-power, but as an advance by means of which the same
1,000 lbs. of yarn, valued at £50, which form a part of the
commodity-value created by labour-power, are advanced to labour-power in
the form of money. The money advanced here to the labourer is only a
converted equivalent form of a part of the commodity-value produced by
himself. And for that reason if no other the act M — C, so far as it
means M — L, is by no means simply a replacement of a commodity in the
form of money by a commodity in the use-form, but it includes other
elements which are independent of the general commodity circulation as
such.

M' appears as a converted form of C', which is itself a product of a
previous function of P, the process of production. The entire sum of
money M' is therefore a money-expression of past labour. In our
illustration, 10,000 lbs. of yarn worth £500 are the product of the
spinning process. Of this quantity, 7,440 lbs. of yarn are equal to the
advanced constant capital c worth £372; 1,000 lbs. of yarn are equal to
the advanced variable capital v worth £50; and 1,560 lbs. of yarn
represent the surplus-value s worth £78. If of M' only the original
capital of £422 is again advanced, other conditions remaining the same,
then the labourer is advanced the following week, in M — L, only a part
of the 10,000 lbs. of yarn produced in the given week (the money-value
of 1,000 lbs. of yarn). As a result of C — M, money is always the
expression of past labour. If the complementary act M — C takes place at
once in the commodity-market, i.e., M is given in return for commodities
existing in the market, this is again a transformation of past labour,
from one form (money) into another form (commodities). But M — C differs
in the matter of time from C — M. They may exceptionally take place at
the same time, for instance when the capitalist who performs M — C and
the capitalist to whom this act means C — M ship their commodities to
each other at the same time and M is used only to square the balance.
The difference in time between the performance of M — C and C — M may be
more or less considerable. Although M, as the result of C — M,
represents past labour, it may, in the act M — C, represent the
converted form of commodities which are not as yet in the market, but
will be thrown upon it in the future, since M — C need not take place
until C has been produced anew. M may likewise stand for commodities
which are produced simultaneously with the C whose money-expression it
is. For instance in the exchange M — C (purchase of means of production)
coal may be bought before it has been mined. In so far as m figures as
an accumulation of money, is not spent as revenue, it may stand for
cotton which will not be produced until the following year. The same
holds good on spending the revenue of the capitalist, m — c. It also
applies to wages, to L equal to £50. This money is not only the
money-form of past labour of the labourers but at the same time a draft
on simultaneous and future labour which is just being realised or should
be realised in the future. The labourer may buy with his wages a coat
which will not be made until the following week. This applies especially
to the vast number of necessary means of subsistence which must be
consumed almost as soon as they have been produced to prevent spoilage.
Thus the labourer receives, in the money which is paid to him in wages,
the converted form of his own future labour or that of other labourers.
By giving the labourer a part of his past labour, the capitalist gives
him a draft on his own future labour. It is the labourer’s own
simultaneous or future labour that constitutes the not yet existing
supply out of which he will be paid for his past labour. In this case
the idea of hoarding disappears altogether. [Here Marx made the
following note in the manuscript: “All this, however, belongs to the
last part of Book Two.” — _Ed_.]

Secondly: In the circulation C — M — C[lmp] the same money changes place
twice; the capitalist first receives it as a seller and passes it on as
a buyer; the transformation of commodities into the money-form serves
only for the purpose of retransforming it from the money-form into the
commodity-form; the money-form of capital, its existence as
money-capital, is only a transient phase in this movement; or, so far as
the movement is fluent, money-capital appears only as a medium of
circulation when it serves as a means of purchase; it acts as a paying
medium proper when capitalists buy from one another and therefore only
have to square accounts.

Thirdly, the function of money-capital, whether it is a mere circulating
medium or a paying medium, effects only the replacement of C by L and
MP, i.e., the replacement of the yarn, the commodity which represents
the result of the productive capital (after deducting the surplus-value
to be used as revenue), by its elements of production, in other words,
the retransformation of capital-value from its form as a commodity into
the elements that build this commodity. In the last analysis, the
function of money-capital promotes only the retransformation of
commodity-capital into productive capital.

In order that the circuit may be completed normally, C' must be sold at
its value and in its entirety. Furthermore C — M — C includes not merely
replacement of one commodity by another, but replacement with
value-relations remaining the same. We assume that this takes place
here. As a matter of fact, however, the value of the means of production
vary. It is precisely capitalist production to which continuous change
of value-relations is peculiar, if only because of the ever changing
productivity of labour that characterises this mode of production. This
change in the value of the elements of production will be discussed
later on, [See Section V of Chapter XV of this volume. — _Ed_.] and we
merely mention it here. The transformation of the elements of production
into commodity-products, of P into C', takes place in the sphere of
production, while the transformation from C' into P occurs in the sphere
of circulation. It is brought about by a simple metamorphosis of
commodities, but its content is a phase in the process of reproduction,
regarded as a whole. C — M — C, being a form of circulation of capital,
involves a functionally determined exchange of matter. The
transformation C — M — C requires further that C should be equal to the
elements of production of the commodity-quantum C', and that these
elements should retain their original value-relations to one another. It
is therefore assumed that the commodities are not only bought at their
respective values, but also do not undergo any change of value during
the circular movement. Otherwise this process cannot run normally.

In M ... M', M represents the original form of the capital-value, which
is discarded only to be resumed. In P ... C' — M' — C ... P, M
represents a form which is only assumed in the process and which is
discarded before this process is over. The money-form appears here only
as a transient independent form of capital-value. Capital in the form of
C' is just as anxious to assume the money-form as it is to discard it in
M', after barely assuming that garb in order again to transform itself
into productive capital. So long as it remains in the garb of money, it
does not function as capital and its value does not therefore expand.
The capital lies fallow. M serves here as a circulating medium, but as a
circulating medium of capital. [Here Marx made the following note in the
manuscript: “Against Tooke.” — _Ed_.] The semblance of independence
which the money-form of capital-value possesses in the first form of its
circuit (the form of money-capital) disappears in this second form,
which thus is a criticism of Form I and reduces it to merely a special
form. If the second metamorphosis, M — C, meets with any obstacles — for
instance if there are no means of production in the market — the
circuit, the flow of the process of reproduction, is interrupted quite
as much as when capital is held fast in the form of commodity-capital.
But there is this difference: It can remain longer in the money-form
than in the transitory form of commodities. It does not cease to be
money, if it does not perform the functions of money-capital; but it
does cease to be a commodity, or a use-value in general, if it is
delayed too long in the exercise of its function of commodity-capital.
Furthermore, in its money-form it is capable of assuming another form in
the place of its original one of productive capital while it cannot
budge at all if held in the form of C'.

C' — M' — C includes acts of circulation only for C' in accordance with
its form, acts which are phrases of its reproduction; but the real
reproduction of C, into which C' transforms itself, is necessary for the
performance of C' — M' — C. This however is conditioned on processes of
reproduction which lie outside of the process of reproduction of the
individual capital represented by C'.

In Form I the act M — C[lmp] prepares on the first transformation of
money-capital into productive capital; in Form II it prepares the
retransformation from commodity-capital into productive capital; that is
to say, so far as the investment of industrial capital remains the same,
retransformation of the commodity-capital into the same elements of
production as those from which it originated. Consequently here as well
as in Form I, the act appears as a preparatory phase of the process of
production, but as a return to it, as a renewal of it, hence as a
precursor of the process of reproduction, hence also of a repetition of
the process of self-expansion of value.

It must be noted once more that M — L is not a simple exchange of
commodities but the purchase of a commodity, L, which is to serve for
the production of surplus-value, just as M — MP is only a procedure
which is materially indispensable for the attainment of this end.

With the completion of M — C[lmp] M is reconverted into productive
capital, into P, and the circuit begins anew.

The expanded form of P ... C' — M' — C ... P is therefore:

[formula]

The transformation of money-capital into productive capital is the
purchase of commodities for the production of commodities. Consumption
falls within the circuit of capital itself only in so far as it is
productive consumption; its premise is that surplus-value is produced by
means of the commodities so consumed. And this is something very
different from production and even commodity production, which has for
its end the existence of the producer. A replacement — commodity by
commodity — thus contingent on the production of surplus-value is quite
a different matter from the bare exchange of products brought about
merely by means of money. But the economists take this matter as proof
that no overproduction is possible.

Apart from the productive consumption of M, which is transformed into L
and MP, the circuit contains the first member M — L, which signifies,
from the standpoint of the labourer, L — M, which equals C — M. In the
labourer’s circulation, L — M — C, which includes his consumption, only
the first member falls within the circuit of the capital as a result of
M — L. The second act, M — C, does not fall within the circulation of
individual capital, although it springs from it. But the continuous
existence of the working class is necessary for the capitalist class,
and so is therefore the consumption of the labourer made possible by M —
C.

The only condition which the act C' — M' stipulates for capital-value to
continue its circuit and for surplus-value to be consumed by the
capitalist is that C' shall have been converted into money, shall have
been sold. Of course, C' is bought only because the article is a
use-value, hence serviceable for consumption of any kind, productive or
individual. But if C' continues to circulate for instance in the hands
of the merchant who bought the yarn, this at first does not in the least
affect the continuation of the circuit of the individual capital which
produced the yarn and sold it to the merchant. The entire process
continues and with it the individual consumption of the capitalist and
the labourer made necessary by it. This point is important in a
discussion of crises.

For as soon as C' has been sold, been converted into money, it can be
reconverted into the real factors of the labour process, and thus of the
reproductive process. Whether C' is bought by the ultimate consumer or
by a merchant for resale does not affect the case. The quantity of
commodities created in masses by capitalist production depends on the
scale of production and on the need for constantly expanding this
production, and not on a predestined circle of supply and demand, on
wants that have to be satisfied. Mass production can have no other
direct buyer, apart from other industrial capitalists, than the
wholesaler. Within certain limits, the process of reproduction may take
place on the same or on an increased scale even when the commodities
expelled from it did not really enter individual or productive
consumption. The consumption of commodities is not included in the
circuit of the capital from which they originated. For instance, as soon
as the yarn is sold the circuit of the capital value represented by the
yarn may begin anew, regardless of what may next become of the sold
yarn. So long as the product is sold, everything is taking its regular
course from the standpoint of the capitalist producer. The circuit of
capital-value he is identified with is not interrupted. And if this
process is expanded — which includes increased productive consumption of
the means of production — this reproduction of capital may be
accompanied by increased individual consumption (hence demand) on the
part of the labourers, since this process is initiated and effected by
productive consumption. Thus the production of surplus-value, and with
it the individual consumption of the capitalist, may increase, the
entire process of reproduction may be in a flourishing condition, and
yet a large part of the commodities may have entered into consumption
only apparently, while in reality they may still remain unsold in the
hands of dealers, may in fact still be lying in the market. Now one
stream of commodities follows another, and finally it is discovered that
the previous streams had been absorbed only apparently by consumption.
The commodity-capitals compete with one another for a place in the
market. Late-comers, to sell at all, sell at lower prices. The former
streams have not yet been disposed of when payment for them falls due.
Their owners must declare their insolvency or sell at any price to meet
their obligations. This sale has nothing whatever to do with the actual
state of the demand. It only concerns the _demand for payment_, the
pressing necessity of transforming commodities into money. Then a crisis
breaks out. It becomes visible not in the direct decrease of consumer
demand, the demand for individual consumption, but in the decrease of
exchanges of capital for capital, of the reproductive process of
capital.

If the commodities MP and L, into which M is transformed to perform its
function of money-capital, of capital-value destined to be retransformed
into productive capital — if those commodities are to be bought or paid
for on different terms, so that M — C represents a series of purchases
and payments, then a part of M performs the act M — C, while another
part persists in the form of money and does not serve to perform
simultaneous or successive acts of M — C until such time as the
conditions of this process itself may determine. This part is only
temporarily withheld from circulation, in order to go into action,
perform its function, in due time. This storing of it is then in its
turn a function determined by its circulation and intended for
circulation. Its existence as a fund for purchase and payment, the
suspension of its movement, the interrupted state of its circulation,
will then constitute a state in which money exercises one of its
functions as money-capital. As money-capital; for in this case the money
temporarily remaining at rest is itself a part of money-capital M (of M'
minus m, equal to M), of that portion of the value of commodity-capital
which is equal to P, to that value of productive capital from which the
circuit starts. On the other hand all money withdrawn from circulation
has the form of a hoard. Money in the form of a hoard therefore becomes
here a function of money-capital, just as in M — C the function of money
as a means of purchase or payment becomes a function of money-capital.
This is so because capital-value exists here in the form of money,
because the money state here is a state in which industrial capital
finds itself at one of its stages and which is prescribed by the
interconnections within the circuit. At the same time it is here proved
true once more that money-capital within the circuit of industrial
capital performs no other functions than those of money and that these
money-functions assume the significance of capital-functions only by
virtue of their interconnections with the other stages of this circuit.

The representation of M' as a relation of m to M, as a capital-relation,
is not directly a function of money-capital but of commodity-capital C',
which in its turn, as a relation of c and C, expresses but the result of
the process of production, of the self-expansion of capital-value which
took place in it.

If the continuation of the process of circulation meets with obstacles,
so that M must suspend its function M — C on account of external
circumstances, such as the conditions of the market, etc., and if it
therefore remains for a shorter or longer time in its money-form, then
we have once more money in the form of a hoard, which happens also in
simple commodity circulation whenever the transition from C — M to M — C
is interrupted by external circumstances. It is an involuntary formation
of a hoard. In the case at hand money has the form of fallow, latent
money-capital. But we will not discuss this point any further for the
present.

In either case however persistence of capital in its money state appears
as the result of interrupted movement, no matter whether this is
expedient or inexpedient, voluntary or involuntary, in accordance with
its functions or contrary to them.

II. Accumulation and Reproduction on an Extended Scale

Since the proportions which the expansion of the productive process may
assume are not arbitrary but prescribed by technology, the realised
surplus-value, though intended for capitalisation, frequently can only
by dint of several successive circuits attain such a size (and until
then must therefore be accumulated) as will suffice for its effective
functioning as additional capital or for entrance into the circuit of
functioning capital-value. Surplus-value thus congeals into a hoard and
in this form constitutes latent money-capital — latent because it cannot
act as capital so long as it persists in the money-form. [6a] The
formation of a hoard thus appears here as a factor included in the
process of capitalist accumulation, accompanying it but nevertheless
essentially differing from it; for the process of reproduction itself is
not expanded by the formation of latent money-capital. On the contrary,
latent money-capital is formed here because the capitalist producer
cannot directly expand the scale of his production. If he sells his
surplus-product to a producer of gold or silver, who puts new gold or
silver into circulation or, what amounts to the same thing, to a
merchant who imports additional gold or silver from foreign countries
for a part of the national surplus-product, then his latent
money-capital forms an increment of the national gold or silver hoard.
In all other cases, the £78 for instance, which were a circulating
medium in the hands of the purchaser, assume only the form of a hoard in
the hands of the capitalist. Hence all that has taken place is a
different distribution of the national gold or silver hoard.

If in the transaction of our capitalist the money serves as a means of
payment (the commodities having to be paid for by the buyer on longer or
shorter terms), then the surplus-product intended for capitalisation is
not transformed into money but into creditor’s claims, into titles of
ownership of an equivalent which the buyer may already have in his
possession or which he may expect to possess. It does not enter into the
reproductive process of the circuit any more than does money in invested
in interest-bearing securities, etc., although it may enter into the
circuits of other individual industrial capitals.

The entire character of capitalist production is determined by the
self-expansion of the advanced capital-value, that is to say, in the
first instance by the production of as much surplus-value as possible;
in the second place however (see Buch I, Kap. XXII) [English edition:
Ch. XXIV. — _Ed_.] by the production of capital, hence by the
transformation of surplus-value into capital. Accumulation, or
production on an extended scale, which appears as a means for constantly
more expanded production of surplus-value — hence for the enrichment of
the capitalist, as his personal aim — and is comprised in the general
tendency of capitalist production, becomes later, however, as was shown
in Book I, by virtue of its development, a necessity for every
individual capitalist. The constant augmentation of his capital becomes
a condition of its preservation. But we need not revert more fully to
what was previously expounded.

We considered first simple reproduction, assuming that the entire
surplus-value is spent as revenue. In reality under normal conditions a
part of the surplus-value must always be spent as revenue, and another
part must be capitalised. And it is quite immaterial whether a certain
surplus-value produced in any particular period is entirely consumed or
entirely capitalised. On the average — the general formula can represent
only the average movement — both cases occur. But in order not to
complicate the formula, it is better to assume that the entire
surplus-value is accumulated. The formula: P ... C' — M' — C'[lmp] ...
P' stands for productive capital, which is reproduced on an enlarged
scale and with greater value, and which as augmented productive capital
begins its second circuit, or, what amounts to the same, renews its
first circuit. As soon as this second circuit is begun, we once more
have P as the starting-point; only this P is a larger productive capital
than the first P was. Hence, if in the formula M ... M' the second
circuit begins with M', M' functions as M, as an advanced money-capital
of a definite magnitude. It is a larger money-capital than the one with
which the first circular movement was opened, but all reference to its
augmentation by the capitalisation of surplus-value ceases as soon as it
assumes the function of advanced money-capital. This origin is expunged
in its form of money-capital, which begins its circuit. This also
applies to P' as soon as it functions as the starting-point of a new
circuit.

If we compare P ... P' with M ... M', or with the first circuit, we find
that they have not the same significance at all. M ... M' taken by
itself as an isolated circuit, expresses only that M, the money-capital
(or industrial capital in its circuit as money-capital), is money
generating money, value generating value, in other words, produces
surplus-value. But in the P circuit the process of producing
surplus-value is already completed upon the termination of the first
stage, the process of production, and after going through the second
stage (the first stage of the circulation), C' — M', the capital-value
plus surplus-value already exist as realised money-capital, as M', which
appeared as the last extreme in the first circuit. That surplus-value
has been produced is depicted in the first-considered formula P ... P
(see expanded formula, [M — C[lmp] ... P ... (C + c) - (M + m)]) by c —
m — c, which, in its second stage, falls outside of the circulation of
capital and represents the circulation of surplus-value as revenue. In
this form, where the entire movement is represented by P ... P, where
consequently there is no difference in value between the two extremes,
the self-expansion of the advanced value the production of
surplus-value, is therefore represented in the same way as in M ... M',
except that the act C' — M', which appears as the last stage in M ...
M', and as the second stage of the circuit, serves as the first stage of
the circulation in P ... P.

In P ... P', P' does not indicate that the surplus-value has been
produced but that the produced surplus-value has been capitalised, hence
that capital has been accumulated and that therefore P', in contrast to
P, consists of the original capital-value plus the value of the capital
accumulated because of the capital-value’s movement.

M', as the simple close of M ... M', and also C', as it appears within
all these circuits, do not if taken by themselves express the movement
but its result: the self-expansion of capital-value realised in the form
of commodities or money, and hence, capital-value as M plus m, or C plus
c, as a relation of capital-value to its surplus-value, as its
offspring. They express this result as various circulation forms of the
self-expanded capital-value. But neither in the form of C' nor of M' is
the self-expansion which has taken place itself a function of
money-capital or of commodity-capital. As special, differentiated forms,
modes of existence corresponding to special functions of industrial
capital, money-capital can perform only money-functions and
commodity-capital only commodity-functions, the difference between them
being merely that between money and commodity. Similarly industrial
capital in its form of productive capital can consist only of the same
elements as those of any other labour-process which creates products: on
the one hand objective conditions of labour (means of production), on
the other productively (purposively) functioning labour-power. Just as
industrial capital can exist in the sphere of production only in a
composition which meets the requirements of the production process in
general, hence also of the non-capitalist production process, so it can
exist in the sphere of circulation only in the two forms corresponding
to it, viz., that of a commodity and of money. But just as the totality
of the elements of production announces itself at the outset as
productive capital by the fact that the labour-power is labour-power
that belongs to others and that the capitalist purchased it from its
proprietor, just as he purchased his means of production from other
commodity-owners; just as therefore the process of production itself
appears as a productive function of industrial capital, so money and
commodities appear as forms of circulation of the same industrial
capital, hence their functions appear as the functions of circulation,
which either introduce the functions of productive capital or emanate
from them. Here the money-function and the commodity-function are at the
same time functions of commodity-capital, but solely because they are
interconnected as forms of functions which industrial capital has to
perform at the different stages of its circuit. It is therefore wrong to
attempt to derive the specific properties and functions which
characterise money as money and commodities as commodities from their
quality as capital, and it is equally wrong to derive on the contrary
the properties of productive capital from its mode of existence in means
of production.

As soon as M' or C' have become fixed as M plus m or C plus c, i.e., as
the relation between the capital-value and surplus-value, its offspring,
this relation is expressed in both of them, in the first case in the
money-form, in the second case in the commodity-form, which does not
change matters in the least. Consequently this relation does not have
its origin in any properties or functions inherent in money as such or
commodities as such. In both cases the characteristic property of
capital, that of being a value, is expressed only as a result. C' is
always the product of the function of P, and M' is always merely the
form of C' changed in the circuit of industrial capital. As soon
therefore as the realised money-capital resumes its special function of
money capital, it ceases to express the capital-relation contained in M'
= M plus m. After M ... M' has been passed through and M' begins the
circuit anew, it does not figure as M even if the entire surplus-value
contained in M' is capitalised. The second circuit begins in our case
with a money-capital of £500, instead of £422, as in the first circuit.
The money-capital, which opens the circuit, is £78 larger than before.
This difference exists on comparing the one circuit with the other, but
no such comparison is made within each particular circuit. The £500
advanced as money-capital, £78 which formerly existed as surplus-value,
do not play any other role than would some other £500 with which another
capitalist inaugurates his first circuit. The same happens in the
circuit of the productive capital. The increased P' acts as P on
recommencing, just as P did in the simple reproduction P ... P.

In the stage M' — C'[lmp], the augmented magnitude is indicated only by
C', but not by L' or MP'. Since C is the sum of L and MP, C' indicates
sufficiently that the sum of L and MP contained in it is greater than
the original P. In the second place, the terms L' and MP' would be
incorrect, because we know that the growth of capital involves a change
in the constitution of its value and that as this change progresses the
value of MP increases, that of L always decreasing relatively and often
absolutely.

III. Accumulation of Money

Whether or not m, the surplus-value turned into money, is immediately
added to the capital-value in process and is thus enabled to enter the
circuit together with capital M now having the magnitude M', depends on
circumstances which are independent of the mere existence of m. If m is
to serve as money-capital in a second independent business, to be run
side by side with the first, it is evident that it cannot be used for
this purpose unless it is of the minimum size required for it. And if it
is intended to be used for the expansion of the original business, the
relations between the material factors of P and their value-relations
likewise demand a minimum magnitude for m. All the means of production
employed in this business have not only a qualitative but also a
definite quantitative relation to one another, are proportionate in
quantity. These material relations as well as the pertinent
value-relations of the factors entering into the productive capital
determine the minimum magnitude m must possess to be capable of
transformation into additional means of production and labour-power, or
only into the former, as an accretion to the productive capital. Thus
the owner of a spinning-mill cannot increase the number of his spindles
without at the same time purchasing a corresponding number of carders
and roving frames, apart from the increased expenditure for cotton and
wages which such an expansion of his business demands. To carry this out
the surplus-value must therefore have reached a considerable figure
(generally calculated to be £1 per newly installed spindle). If m does
not reach this minimum size the circuit of capital must be repeated
until the sum of m successively produced by it can function together
with M, hence M' — C'[lmp]. Even mere changes of detail, for instance in
the spinning machinery, introduced to make it more productive, require
greater expenditures for spinning material, more roving machinery, etc.
In the meantime m is accumulated, and its accumulation is not its own
function but the result of repeated P ... P. Its own function consists
in persisting in the money state until it receives sufficient increment
from the repeated surplus-value-creating circuits, i.e., from outside,
to possess the minimum magnitude necessary for its active function, the
magnitude in which alone it can really enter as money-capital — in the
case at hand as the accumulated part of the functioning of money-capital
M — into the functioning of M. But in the interim it is accumulated and
exists only in the shape of a hoard in process of formation, of growth.
Hence the accumulation of money, hoarding, appears here as a process by
which real accumulation, the extension of the scale on which industrial
capital operates, is temporarily accompanied. Temporarily, for so long
as the hoard remains in the condition of a hoard, it does not function
as capital, does not take part in the process of creating surplus-value,
remains a sum of money which grows only because money, come by without
its doing anything, is thrown in the same coffer.

The form of a hoard is simply the form of money not in circulation, of
money whose circulation has been interrupted and which is therefore
fixed in its money-form. As for the process of hoarding, it is common to
all commodity production and figures as an end in itself only in the
undeveloped, pre-capitalist forms of this production. In the present
case, however, the hoard appears as a form of money-capital and the
formation of a hoard as a process which temporarily accompanies the
accumulation of capital because and so far as the money here figures as
_latent money-capital_; because the formation of a hoard, the state of
being a hoard, in which the surplus-value existing in money-form finds
itself, is a functionally determined preparatory stage gone through
outside of the circuit described by the capital and required for the
transformation of the surplus-value into really functioning capital. By
its definition it is therefore latent money-capital. Hence the size it
must acquire before it can take part in the process is determined in
each case by the value constitution of the productive capital. But so
long as it remains in the condition of a hoard it does not yet perform
the functions of money-capital but is still idle money-capital; not
money-capital whose function has been interrupted, as was the case
before, but money-capital not yet capable of performing it.

We are here discussing the accumulation of money in its original real
form of an actual hoard of money. It may also exist in the form of a
mere outstanding money, of claims on debtors by capitalists who have
sold C'. As for other forms in which this latent money-capital may exist
in the meantime even in the shape of money-breeding money, such as
interest-bearing bank deposits, bills of exchange or securities of any
description, these do not belong here. Surplus-value realised in the
form of money in such cases performs special capital-functions outside
the circuit described by the industrial capital which originated it —
functions which in the first place have nothing to do with that circuit
as such but which in the second place presuppose capital-functions which
differ from the functions of industrial capital and which have not yet
been developed here.

IV. Reserve Fund

In the form in which we have just discussed, the hoard, as which the
surplus-value exists, is a fund for the accumulation of money, the
money-form temporarily assumed by capital accumulation and to that
extent a condition of this accumulation. However this accumulation-fund
can also perform special services of a subordinate nature, that is to
say can enter into capital’s movement in circuits without this process
assuming the form of P ... P', hence without an expansion of capitalist
reproduction.

If the process C' — M' is prolonged beyond its normal duration, if
therefore the commodity capital is abnormally delayed in its
transformation into the money-form or if, for instance, after the
completion of this transformation the price of the means of production
into which the money-capital must be transformed has risen above the
level prevailing at the beginning of the circuit, the hoard functioning
as accumulation-fund can be used in the place of money-capital or of
part of it. Thus the money-accumulation fund serves as a reserve fund
for counter-balancing disturbances in the circuit.

As such a reserve fund it differs from the fund of purchasing or paying
media discussed in the circuit P ... P. These media are a part of
functioning money-capital (hence forms of existence of a part of
capital-value in general going through the process) whose parts enter
upon their functions only at different times, successively. In the
continuous process of production, reserve-money capital is always
formed, since one day money is received and no payments have to be made
until later, and another day large quantities of goods are sold while
other large quantities are not due to be bought until a subsequent date.
In these intervals a part of the circulating capital exists continuously
in the form of money. A reserve fund on the other hand is not a part of
constituent capital already performing its functions, or, to be more
exact, of money-capital. It is rather a part of capital in a preliminary
stage of its accumulation, of surplus-value not yet transformed into
active capital. As for the rest, it needs no explaining that a
capitalist in financial straits does not concern himself about what the
particular functions of the money he has on hand are. He simply employs
whatever money he has for the purpose of keeping his capital
circulating. For instance in our illustration M is equal to £422, M' to
£500. If a part of the capital of £422 exists as a fund of means of
payment and purchase, as a money reserve, it is intended, other
conditions remaining the same, that it should enter wholly into the
circuit, and besides should suffice for this purpose. The reserve fund
however is a part of the £78 of surplus-value. It can enter the circular
course of the capital worth £422 only to the extent that this circuit
takes place under conditions not remaining the same; for it is a part of
the accumulation-fund, and figures here without any extension of the
scale of reproduction.

Money-accumulation fund implies the existence of latent money-capital,
hence the transformation of money into money-capital.

The following is the general formula for the circuit of productive
capital. It combines simple reproduction and reproduction on a
progressively increasing scale:

[formula]

If P equals P, then M in 2) equals M' minus m; if P equals P', then M in
2) is greater than M' minus m; that is to say m has been completely or
partially transformed into money-capital.

The circuit of productive capital is the form in which classical
Political Economy examines the circular movement of industrial capital.

Notes

6a The term “latent” is borrowed from the idea of latent heat in
physics, which has now been almost replaced by the theory of the
transformation of energy. Marx therefore uses in the third part (a later
version), another term, borrowed from the idea of potential energy,
viz.: “potential” or analogous to the virtual velocities of D’Alembert,
“virtual capital.” — _Ed_.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 3: The Circuit of Commodity-Capital

The general formula for the circuit of commodity-capital is:

C' — M' — C ... P ... C'.

C' appears not alone as the product but also as the premise of the two
previous circuits, since that which M — C means for the one capital C' —
M' means for the other, inasmuch as at least a part of the means of
production is itself the commodity-product of other individual capitals
describing their circuits. In our case for instance coal, machinery,
etc., represent the commodity-capital of the mine-owner, of the
capitalist machine-manufacturer, etc. Furthermore we have shown in
Chapter 1.4, that not only the circuit P ... P but also the circuit C'
... C' is assumed even in the first repetition of M ... M', before this
second circuit of money-capital is completed.

If reproduction takes place on an extended scale, then the final C' is
greater than the initial C' and should therefore be designated here as
C''.

The difference between the third form and the first two is as follows:
First, in this case the total circulation with its two antithetical
phases opens the circuit, while in the Form I the circulation is
interrupted by the process of production and in Form II the total
circulation with its two complementary phases appears merely as a means
of effecting the process of reproduction and therefore constitutes the
movement mediating between P ... P. In the case of M ... M', the form of
circulation is M — C ... C' — M' = M — C — M. In the case of P ... P it
has the inverted form C' — M'. M — C = C — M — C. In the case of C' — C'
it likewise has this form.

Secondly, when circuits I and II are repeated, even if the final points
M' and P' form the starting-points of the renewed circuit, the form in
which M' and P' were produced disappears. M' = M plus m and P' = P plus
p begin the new process as M and P. But in the form III the
starting-point C must be designated as C', even if the circuit is
renewed on the same scale, for the following reason. In Form I, as soon
as M' as such opens a new circuit it functions as money-capital M, as an
advance in money-form of the capital-value that is to produce
surplus-value. The size of the advanced money-capital, augmented by the
accumulation achieved during the first circuit, has increased. But
whether the size of the advanced money-capital is £422 or £500 does not
alter the fact that it appears as simple capital-value. M' no longer
exists as self-expanded capital or a capital pregnant with
surplus-value, as a capital-relation. Indeed, it is to expand itself
only during its process. The same is true of P ... P'; P' must steadily
continue to function as P, as capital-value which is to produce
surplus-value, and must renew its circuit.

The commodity-capital circuit, on the contrary, does not open with just
capital-value but with capital-value augmented in the commodity-form.
Hence it includes from the start the circuit of not only capital-value
existing in the form of commodities, but also of surplus-value.
Consequently if simple reproduction takes place in this form, the C' at
the terminal point is equal in size to the C' at the starting-point. If
a part of the surplus-value enters into the capital circuit, C'', an
enlarged C', appears at the close instead of C'. This is merely a larger
C' than that of the proceeding circuit, with a larger accumulated
capital-value. Hence it begins its new circuit with a relatively larger,
newly created surplus-value. In any event C' always inaugurates the
circuit as a commodity-capital which is equal to capital-value plus
surplus-value.

C' as C does not appear in the circuit of an individual industrial
capital as a form of this capital but as a form of some other industrial
capital, so far as the means of production are the product of the
latter. The act M — C (i.e., M — MP) of the first capital is C' — M' for
this second capital.

In the circulation act M — C[lmp] L and MP bear identical relations, as
they are commodities in the hands of their sellers — on the one hand the
labourers who sell their labour-power, on the other the owner of the
means of production, who sells these. For the purchaser, whose money
here functions as money-capital, L and MP function merely as commodities
until he has bought them, hence so long as they confront his capital,
existing in the form of money, as commodities of others. MP and L differ
here only in this respect, that MP may be C', hence capital, in the
hands of its seller, if MP is the commodity-form of his capital, while L
is always nothing else but a commodity for the labourer and becomes
capital only in the hands of its purchaser as a constituent part of P.

For this reason C' can never open any circuit as a mere C, as a mere
commodity-form of capital-value. As commodity-capital it is always
two-fold. From the point of view of use-value it is the product, in the
present case yarn, of the functioning of P whose elements L and MP,
coming as commodities from the sphere of circulation, have functioned
only as factors in the creation of this product. Secondly, from the
point of view of value, it is the capital-value P plus the surplus-value
s produced by the functioning of P.

It is only in the circuit described by C' itself that C equal to P and
equal to the capital-value can and must separate from that part of C' in
which the surplus-value is lodged. It does not matter whether the two
things can be actually separated, as in the case of yarn, or whether
they cannot, as in the case of a machine. They always become separable
as soon as C' is transformed into M'.

If the entire commodity-product can be separated into independent
homogeneous partial products, as in the case of our 10,000 lbs. of yarn,
and if therefore the act C' — M' can be represented by a number of
successive sales, then the capital-value in the form of commodities can
function as C, can be separated from C', before the surplus-value, hence
before C' in its entirety, has been realised.

Of the 10,000 lbs. of yarn worth £500, the value of 8,440 lbs., equal to
£422, is equal to the capital-value less the surplus-value. If the
capitalist sells first 8,440 lbs. of yarn at £422, then these 8,440 lbs.
of yarn represent C, the capital-value in commodity-form. The
surplus-product of 1,560 lbs. of yarn, contained besides in C' and equal
to a surplus value of £78, does not circulate until later. The
capitalist could get through C — M — C[lmp] before the circulation of
the surplus-product c — m — c is accomplished.

Or if he sells 7,440 lbs. of yarn worth £372, and then 1,000 lbs. of
yarn worth £50, he might replace the means of production (the constant
capital c) with the first part of C, and the variable capital v, the
labour-power, with the second part of C, and then proceed as before.

But if such successive sales take place and the conditions of the
circuit permit it, the capitalist, instead of separating C' into c + v +
s, may make such a preparation also in the case of aliquot parts of C'.

For example the 7,440 lbs. of yarn equal at £372, which as parts of C'
(10,000 lbs. of yarn worth £500) represent the constant part of capital,
may themselves be separated into 5,535.360 lbs. of yarn worth £276.768,
which replace only the constant part, the value of the means of
production used up in producing 7,440 lbs. of yarn; 744 lbs. of yarn
worth £37.200, which replace only the variable capital; and 1,160.640
lbs. of yarn worth £58.032, which, being surplus-product, are the
depositories of surplus-value. Consequently on selling the 7,440 lbs. of
yarn, he can replace the capital value contained in them out of the sale
of 6,279.360 lbs. of yarn at the price of £313.968, and he can spend as
his revenue the value of the surplus-product amounting to 1,160.640
lbs., or £58.032.

In the same way, he may divide up another 1,000 lbs. of yarn equal to
£50, equal to the variable capital-value, and sell them accordingly; 744
lbs. of yarn worth £37.200, constant capital-value contained in 1,000
lbs. of yarn; finally, 100 lbs. of yarn worth £5.000, variable
capital-value ditto; hence 844 lbs. of yarn worth £42.200, replacement
of the capital-value contained in the 1,000 lbs. of yarn; finally 156
lbs. of yarn worth £7.800, representing the surplus-product contained in
it, which may be consumed as such.

Finally, he may divide the remaining 1,560 lbs. of yarn worth £78, in
such a way, provided he succeeds in selling them, that the sale of
1,160.640 lbs. of yarn, worth £58.032, replaces the value of the means
of production contained in those 1,560 lbs. of yarn, and that 156 lbs.
of yarn worth £7.800, replaces the variable capital-value; altogether
1,316.640 lbs. of yarn equal to £65.832, replacement of the total
capital-value; finally the surplus-product of 243.360 lbs., equal to
£12.168, remains to be spent as revenue.

All the elements — c, v and s — contained in the yarn are divisible into
the same component parts, and so is every individual pound of yarn,
worth 1 s., or 12 d.

c = 0.744 lbs. of yarn = 8.928 d.
v = 0.100 lbs. of yarn = 1.200 d.
s = 0.156 lbs. of yarn = 1.872 d.
—————————————
c + v + s = 1 lb. of yarn = 12 d.

If we add the results of the above three partial sales we obtain the
same result on selling the entire 10,000 lbs. at one sweep.

We have of constant capital:

at the first sale: 5,535.360 lbs. of yarn = £276.768
at the second sale: 744.000 lbs. of yarn = £ 37.200
at the third sale: 1,160.640 lbs. of yarn = £ 58.032
—————————————————————
Total . . . . . . . 7,440 lbs. of yarn = £372

Of variable capital:

at the first sale: 744.000 lbs. of yarn = £37.200
at the second sale: 100.000 lbs. of yarn = £ 5.000
at the third sale: 156.000 lbs. of yarn = £ 7.800
—————————————————————
Total . . . . . . . 1,000 lbs. of yarn = £50

Of surplus-value:

at the first sale: 1,160.640 lbs. of yarn = £58.032
at the second sale: 156.000 lbs. of yarn = £ 7.800
at the third sale: 243.360 lbs. of yarn = £ 12.168
—————————————————————
Total . . . . . . . 1,560 lbs. of yarn = £78

Grand Total:

Constant capital . . . . . . . . . . 7,440 lbs. of yarn = £372
Variable capital . . . . . . . . . . .1,000 lbs. of yarn = £ 57
Surplus-value . . . . . . . . . .... 1,560 lbs. of yarn = £ 78
——————————————————————-
Total . . . . . . . . 10,000 lbs. of yarn = £500

C' — M' in itself stands merely for the sale of 10,000 lbs. of yarn.
These 10,000 lbs. of yarn, like all other yarn, are a commodity. The
purchaser is interested in the price of 1 s. per lb., or of £500 for
10,000 lbs. If during the negotiations he goes into the
value-composition of the yarn, he does so simply with the insidious
intention of proving that it could be sold at less than 1 s. per pound
and would still be a good bargain for the seller. But the quantity
purchased by him depends on his requirements. If he is for example the
owner of a weaving-mill, it depends on the composition of his own
capital functioning in this enterprise, not on the composition of the
spinner’s of whom he buys. The proportions in which C' has to replace on
the one hand the capital used up in its production (or the various
component parts of this capital), and on the other to serve as
surplus-product either for the spending of the surplus-value or for the
accumulation of capital, exist only in the circuit of capital which has
as its commodity-form the 10,000 lbs. of yarn. These proportions have
nothing to do with the sale as such. In the present case it is assumed
besides that C' is sold at its value, so that it is only a question of
its transformation from the commodity-form into the money-form. It is of
course of decisive importance with regard to C', the functional form in
the circuit of this individual capital out of which the productive
capital is to be replaced, to what extent, if at all, there is a
discrepancy between price and value in the sale. But this does not
concern us here in the examination of mere distinctions of form.

In Form I, or M ... M', the process of production intervenes midway
between the two complementary and mutually opposite phases of the
circulation of capital. It is past before the concluding phase C' — M'
begins. Money is advanced as capital, is first transformed into the
elements of production and from these into the commodity-product, and
this commodity-product in its turn is changed back into money. It is a
full and complete business cycle that results in money, something
everyone can use for everything. A new start is therefore only a
possibility. M ... P ... M' may be either be the last circuit that
concludes the functioning of some individual capital being withdrawn
from business, or the first circuit of some new capital entering upon
its function. The general movement is here M ... M', from money to more
money.

In Form II, P ... C' — M' — C ... P (P'), the entire circulation process
follows after the first P and precedes the second P; but it takes place
in the opposite order from that of Form I. The first P is the productive
capital, and its function is the productive process, the prerequisite of
the succeeding circulation process. The concluding P on the other hand
is not the productive process; it is only the renewed existence of the
industrial capital in its form of productive capital. And it is such as
a result of the transformation, during the last phase of circulation, of
the capital-value into L plus MP, into the subjective and objective
factors which by combining constitute the form of existence of the
productive capital. The capital, whether P or P', is at the end once
more present in a form in which it must function anew as productive
capital, must again perform the productive process. The general form of
the movement P ... P is the form of reproduction and, unlike M ... M',
does not indicate the self-expansion of value as the object of the
process. This form makes it therefore so much easier for classical
Political Economy to ignore the definite capitalistic form of the
process of production and to depict production as such as the purpose of
this process; namely that as much as possible must be produced and as
cheaply as possible, and that the product must be exchanged for the
greatest variety of other products, partly for the renewal of production
(M — C), partly for consumption (m — c). It is then possible to overlook
the peculiarities of money and money-capital, for M and m appear here
merely as transient media of circulation. The entire process seems
simple and natural, i.e., possesses the naturalness of a shallow
rationalism. In the same way profit is occasionally forgotten in
commodity-capital and the latter figures merely as a commodity when the
production circuit as a whole is under discussion. But as soon as the
constituents of value are debated, commodity-capital figures as
commodity-capital. Accumulation, of course, is seen in the same light as
production.

In Form III, C' — M' — C .... P ... C', the two phases of the
circulation process open the circuit, and do so in the same order which
obtains in Form II, P ... P; next follows P, with its function, the
productive process, the same as in Form I; the circuit closes with the
result of the process of production, C'. Just as in Form II the circuit
closes with P, the merely renewed existence of productive capital, so
here it closes with C', the renewed existence of commodity-capital. Just
as in Form II capital, in its concluding form P, must start the process
over again as a process of production, so here upon the reappearance of
industrial capital in the form of commodity-capital the circuit must
re-open with the circulation phase C' — M'. Both forms of the circuit
are incomplete because they do not close with M', the capital-value
retransformed into _money_ and self-expanded. Both must therefore be
continued and consequently include the reproduction. The total circuit
in Form III is C' ... C'.

The third form is distinguished from the first two by the fact that it
is only in this circuit that the self-expanded capital-value — and not
the original one, the capital-value that must still produce
surplus-value — appears as the starting point of its self-expansion. C
as a capital-relation is here the starting point and as such relation
has a determining influence on the entire circuit because it includes
the circuit of the capital-value as well as that of the surplus-value in
its first phase, and because the surplus-value must at least in the
average, if not in every single circuit, be expended partly as revenue,
go through the circulation c — m — c, and must perform the function of
an element of capital accumulation.

In the form C' ... C' the consumption of the entire commodity-product is
assumed as the condition of the normal course of the circuit of capital
itself. The individual consumption of the labourer and the individual
consumption of the unaccumulated part of the surplus-product comprise
the entire individual consumption. Hence consumption in its totality —
individual as well as productive — enters into circuit C' as a condition
of it. Productive consumption (which essentially includes the individual
consumption of the labourer, since labour-power is a continuous product,
with certain limits, of the labourer’s individual consumption) is
carried on by every individual capital. Individual consumption, except
in so far as it is required for the existence of the individual
capitalist, is here assumed to be only a social act, but by no means an
act of the individual capitalist.

In Forms I and II the aggregate movement appears as a movement of
advanced capital-value. In Form III the self-expanded capital, in the
shape of the total commodity-product, forms the starting-point and has
the form of moving capital, commodity-capital. Not until its
transformation into money has been accomplished does the movement branch
out into movements of capital and of revenue. The distribution of the
total social product, as well as the special distribution of the product
for each individual commodity-capital, into an individual
consumption-fund on the one hand and into reproduction fund on the other
is included in this form in the circuit of capital.

In M... M' possible enlargement of the circuit is included, depending on
the volume of m entering into the renewed circuit.

In P ... P the new circuit may be started by P with the same or perhaps
even a smaller value and yet may represent a reproduction on an extended
scale, for instance when certain elements of commodities become cheaper
on account of increased productivity of labour. Vice versa, a productive
capital which has increased in value may, in a contrary case, represent
reproduction on a materially contracted scale as for instance when
elements of production have become dearer. The same is true of C' ...
C'.

In C' ... C' capital in the form of commodities is the premise of
production. It re-appears as a premise within this circuit in the second
C. If this C has not yet been produced or reproduced the circuit is
obstructed. This C must be reproduced, for the greater part of as C' of
some other industrial capital. In this circuit C' exists as the point of
departure, of transition, and of the conclusion of the movement; hence
it is always there. It is a permanent condition of the process of
reproduction.

C' ... C' is distinguished from Forms I and II by still another feature.
All three circuits have this in common, that capital begins its circular
course in the same form in which it concludes it, and thus finds itself
in the initial form in which it opens the circuit anew. The initial form
M, P or C' is always the one in which capital-value (in III augmented by
its surplus-value) is advanced, in other words its original form in
regard to the circuit. The concluding form M', P or C' is always a
changed form of a functional form which preceded in the circuit and is
not the original form.

Thus M' in I is a changed form of C', the final P in II is a changed
form of M (and this transformation is accomplished in I and II by a
simple act of commodity circulation, by a formal change of position of
commodity and money); in III, C' is a changed form of the productive
capital P. But here, in III, the transformation, in the first place,
does not merely concern the functional form of capital but also the
magnitude of its value; in the second place, however, the transformation
is not the result of a merely formal change in position pertaining to
the circulation process, but of a real transformation experienced by the
use-form and value of the commodity constituents of the productive
capital in the process of production.

The form of the initial extreme M, P or C' is the premise of the
corresponding circuit I, II or III. The form returning in the final
extreme is premised and consequently brought about by the series of
metamorphoses of the circuit itself. C', as the terminal point in the
circuit of an individual industrial capital, presupposes only the
non-circulation form P of the same industrial capital of which it is the
product. M', as the terminal point of I, as the converted form of C' (C'
— M'), presupposes that M is in the hands of the buyer, exists outside
of the circuit M ... M', and is drawn into it and made its own terminal
form by the sale of C'. Thus the terminal P in II presupposes that L and
MP (C) exist outside and are incorporated in it as its terminal form by
means of M — C. But apart from the last extreme, the circuit of
individual money-capital does not presuppose the existence of
money-capital in general, nor does the circuit of individual productive
capital presuppose the existence of productive capital. In I, M may be
the first money-capital; in II, P may be the first productive capital
appearing on the historical scene. But in III,

[formula]

C is presupposed twice outside the circuit. The first time in the
circuit C' — M' — C<^(L)_(MP) . This C, so far as it consists of MP, is
commodity in the hands of the seller; it is itself commodity-capital, so
far as it is the product of a capitalist process of production; and even
if it is not, it appears as commodity-capital in the hands of the
merchant. The second time, in the second c of c — m — c, which must
likewise be at hand as a commodity so that it can be bought. At any
rate, whether they are commodity-capital or not, L and MP are just as
much commodities as is C' and bear to each other the relation of
commodities. The same is true of the second c in c — m — c. Inasmuch
therefore as C' is equal to C (L plus MP), it has commodities as
elements for its own production and must be replaced by the same
commodities in the circulation. In the same way the second c in c — m —
c must be replaced by similar commodities in the circulation.

On the basis that the capitalist mode of production is the prevailing
mode, all commodities in the hands of the seller must, besides, be
commodity-capital. And they continue to be so in the hands of the
merchant or become such if they were not such before. Or they have to be
commodities — such as imported articles — which replace original
commodity-capital and hence bestow upon it merely another form of
existence.

As forms of existence of P the commodity-elements L and MP, of which the
productive capital P consists, do not possess the same form as in the
various commodity markets where they are fetched. They are now united,
and so combined they can perform the functions of productive capital.

That C appears as the premise of C only in this Form III, within the
circuit itself, is due to capital in commodity-form being its starting
point. The circuit is opened by the transformation of C' (in so far as
it functions as capital-value, regardless of whether it has been
increased by the addition of surplus-value or not) into those
commodities which are its elements of production. But this
transformation comprises the entire process of circulation, C — M — C
(equal to L plus MP), and is its result. C here stands at both extremes,
but the second extreme, which receives its form C by means of M — C from
outside, the commodity-market, is not the last extreme of the circuit
but only of its first two stages comprising the process of circulation.
Its result is P, which then performs its function, the process of
production. It is only as the result of this process, hence not as that
of the circulation process, that C' appears as the terminal point of the
circuit and in the same form as the starting-point, C'. On the other
hand in M ... M' and P ... P, the final extremes M' and P are the direct
results of the process of circulation. Here therefore it is presupposed
only at the end that one time M' and the other time P exist in the hands
of others. In so far as the circuit is made between the extremes,
neither M in the one case nor P in the other — the existence of M as the
money of another person and of P as the production process of another
capital — appears as the premise of these circuits. C' ... C' on the
contrary presupposes the existence of C (equal to L plus MP) as
commodities of others in the hands of others — commodities drawn into
the circuit by the introductory process of circulation and transformed
into productive capital, as a result of whose functioning C' once more
becomes the concluding form of the circuit.

But just because the circuit C' ... C' presupposes within its sphere the
existence of other industrial capital in the form of C (equal to L + MP)
— and MP comprises diverse other capitals, in our case for instance
machinery, coal, oil, etc. — it clamours to be considered not only as
the _general_ form of the circuit, i.e., not only as a social form in
which every single industrial capital (except when first invested) can
be studied, hence not merely as a form of movement common to all
individual industrial capitals, but simultaneously also as a form of
movement of the sum of the individual capitals, consequently of the
aggregate capital of the capitalist class, a movement in which that of
each individual industrial capital appears as only a partial movement
which intermingles with the other movements and is necessitated by them.
For instance if we regard the aggregate of commodities annually produced
in a certain country and analyse the movement by which a part of it
replaces the productive capital in all individual businesses, while
another part enters into the individual consumption of the various
classes, then we consider C' ... C' as a form of movement of social
capital as well as of the surplus-value, or surplus-product, generated
by it. The fact that the social capital is equal to the sum of the
individual capitals (including the joint-stock capital or the state
capital, so far as governments employ productive wage-labour in mines,
railways, etc., perform the function of industrial capitalists), and
that the aggregate movement of social capital is equal to the algebraic
sum of the movements of the individual capitals, does not in any way
preclude the possibility that this movement as the movement of a single
individual capital, may present other phenomena than the same movement
does when considered from the point of view of a part of the aggregate
movement of social capital, hence in its interconnections with the
movements of its other parts, and that the movement simultaneously
solves problems the solution of which must be assumed when studying the
circuit of a separate, individual capital instead of being the result of
such study.

C' ... C' is the sole circuit in which the originally advanced
capital-value consists only a part of the extreme that opens the
movement and in which the movement from its inception thus reveals
itself as the total movement of the industrial capital — as the movement
of that part of the product which replaces the productive capital as
well as of that part which forms surplus-product and which on the
average is spent in part as revenue and employed in part as an element
of accumulation. Included in this circuit is the expenditure of
surplus-value as revenue and to that extent individual consumption is
likewise included. The latter is furthermore included for the reason
that the starting-point C, commodity, exists in the form of some
utility; but every article produced by capitalist methods is
commodity-capital, no matter whether its use-form destines it for
productive or for individual consumption, or for both. M ... M'
indicates only the value side, the self-expansion of the advanced
capital-value, as the purpose of the entire process; P ... P (P')
indicates the process of production of capital as a process of
reproduction with a productive capital of the same or of increasing
magnitude (accumulation). Revealing itself already in its initial
extreme as a form of capitalist commodity production, C' ... C'
comprises productive and individual consumption from the start;
productive consumption and the self-expansion of value therein included
appear only as a branch of its movement. Finally, since C' may exist in
a use-form which cannot enter any more into any process of production,
it is indicated at the outset that C'’s various constituents of value
expressed by parts of the product must occupy a different position,
according to whether C' ... C' is regarded as the form of the movement
of the total social capital or as the independent movement of an
individual industrial capital. All these peculiarities of the circuit
lead us beyond its own confines as an isolated circuit of some merely
individual capital.

In the formula C' ... C', the movement of the commodity-capital, that is
to say, of the total product created capitalistically, appears not only
as the premise of the independent circuit of the individual capital but
also as required by it. If the formula and its peculiarities are
grasped, it is no longer sufficient to confine oneself to indicating
that the metamorphoses C' — M' and M — C are on the one hand
functionally defined sections in the metamorphoses of capital, on the
other are links in the general circulation of commodities. It becomes
necessary to elucidate the intertwining of the metamorphoses of one
individual capital with those of other individual capitals and with that
part of the total product which is intended for individual consumption.
On analysing the circuit of an individual industrial capital, we
therefore base our studies mainly on the first two forms.

The circuit C' ... C' appears as a form of a single individual capital,
for instance in agriculture, where calculations are made from crop to
crop. In Formula II, the sowing is the starting-point, in Formula III
the harvest, or, to speak with the physiocrats, Formula II starts out
with the _avance_, and Formula III with the _reprises_. The movement of
capital-value appears in III from the outset only as a part of the
movement of the general mass of products, while in I and II the movement
of C' constitutes only a phase of the movement of some isolated capital.

In Formula III commodities in the market are the continuous premise of
the process of production and reproduction. Hence, if attention is fixed
exclusively on this formula all elements of the process of production
seem to originate in commodity circulation and to consist only of
commodities. This one-sided conception overlooks those elements of the
process of production which are independent of the commodity-elements.

Since in C' ... C' the starting-point is the total product (total
value), it turns out that (if foreign trade is disregarded) reproduction
on an extended scale, productivity remaining otherwise constant, can
take place only when the part of the surplus-product to be capitalised
already contains the material elements of the additional productive
capital; that therefore, so far as the production of one year serves as
the premise of the following year’s production or so far as this can
take place simultaneously with the process of simple reproduction within
one year, surplus-product is at once produced in a form which enables it
to perform the functions of additional capital. Increased productivity
can increase only the substance of capital but not its value; but
therewith it creates additional material for the self-expansion of that
value.

C' ... C' is the groundwork for Quesnay's _Tableau économique_, and it
shows great and true discretion on his part that in contrast to M ... M'
(the isolatedly and rigidly retained form of the mercantile system) he
selected this form and not P ... P.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 4: The Three Formulas of the Circuit

The three formulas may be set down in the following manner, using Tc for
“total circulation process”:

I. M — C ... P ... C' — M'
II. P ... Tc ... P
III. Tc ... P (C')

If we combine all three forms, all premises of the process appear as its
result, as a premise produced by it itself. Every element appears as a
point of departure, of transit, and of return. The total process
presents itself as the unity of the processes of production and
circulation. The process of production becomes the mediator of the
process of circulation and vice versa.

All three circuits have the following in common: The self-expansion of
value as the determining purpose, as the compelling motive. In I this is
expressed in its form. Formula II begins with P, the very process of
creating surplus-value. In III the circuit begins with the self-expanded
value, even if the movement is repeated on the same scale.

As C — M means M — C for the buyer, and M — C means C — M for the
seller, the circulation of capital presents only the ordinary
metamorphosis of commodities, and the laws evolved with regard to it
(Buch I, Kap. III, 2) [English edition: Ch. III, 2. — _Ed._] on the mass
of money in circulation are valid here. However, if we do not cling to
this formal aspect but rather consider the actual connection between the
metamorphoses of the various individual capitals, in other words, if we
study the connection between the circuits of individual capitals as
partial movements of the process of reproduction of the total social
capital, then the mere change of form of money and commodities cannot
explain the connection.

In a constantly revolving circle every point is simultaneously a point
of departure and a point of return. If we interrupt the rotation, not
every point of departure is a point of return. Thus we have seen that
not only does every individual circuit presuppose (_implicite_) the
others, but also that the repetition of the circuit in one form
comprises the performance of the circuit in the other forms. The entire
difference thus appears to be a merely formal one, or as a merely
subjective distinction existing solely for the observer.

Since every one of these circuits is considered a special form of this
movement in which various individual industrial capitals are engaged,
this difference exists only as an individual one. But in reality every
individual industrial capital is present simultaneously in all three
circuits. These three circuits, the forms of reproduction assumed by the
three forms of capital, are made continuously side by side. For
instance, one part of the capital-value, which now performs the function
of commodity-capital, is transformed into money-capital, but at the same
time another part leaves the process of production and enters the
circulation as a new commodity-capital. The circuit form C' ... C' is
thus continuously described; and so are the other two forms. The
reproduction of capital in each one of its forms and stages is just as
continuous as the metamorphosis of these forms and the successive
passage through the three stages. The entire circuit is thus a unity of
its three forms.

We assumed in our analysis that capital-value in its entire magnitude
acts as money-capital, productive-capital or commodity-capital. For
instance, we had those £422 first entirely as money-capital, then we
transformed them wholly into productive capital, and finally into
commodity-capital, into yarn of the value of £500 (containing £78 worth
of surplus-value). Here the various stages are just so many
interruptions. So long as, e.g., those £422 retain their money-form,
that is to say, until the purchases M — C (L plus MP) are made, the
entire capital exists and functions only as money-capital. As soon as it
is transformed into productive capital, it performs neither the function
of money-capital nor of commodity-capital. Its entire process of
circulation is interrupted, as soon as it functions in one of its two
circulation stages, either as M or as C'. Consequently, the circuit P
... P would represent not only a periodical renewal of the productive
capital but also the interruption of its function, the process of
production, up to the time when the process of circulation is completed.
Instead of proceeding continuously, production would take place in jerks
and would be renewed only in periods of accidental duration, according
to whether the two stages of the process of circulation are got through
with quickly or slowly. This would apply for instance to a Chinese
artisan who works only for private customers and whose process of
production ceases until he receives a new order.

This is indeed true of every single part of capital that is in motion,
and all parts of capital go through this motion in succession. Suppose
that the 10,000 lbs. of yarn are the weekly product of some spinner.
These 10,000 lbs. of yarn leave the sphere of production entirely and
enter the sphere of circulation; the capital-value contained in it must
all be converted into money-capital, and so long as this value continues
in the form of money-capital it cannot enter anew into the process of
production. It must first go into circulation and be reconverted into
the elements of productive capital, L plus MP. The circuit-describing
process of capital means constant interruption, the leaving of one stage
and the entering into the next, the discarding of one form and the
assuming of another. Each one of these stages not only presupposes the
next but also excludes it.

But continuity is the characteristic mark of capitalist production,
necessitated by its technical basis, although not always absolutely
attainable. Let us see then what happens in reality. While, e.g., the
10,000 lbs. of yarn appear in the market as commodity-capital and are
transformed into money (regardless of whether it is a paying or
purchasing medium or only money of account), new cotton, coal, etc.,
take the place of the yarn in the process of production, have therefore
already been reconverted from the money-form and commodity-form into
that of productive capital, and begin to function as such. At the same
time that these 10,000 lbs. of yarn are being reconverted into money,
the preceding 10,000 lbs. of yarn are going through the second stage of
their circulation and are being reconverted from money into the elements
of productive capital. All parts of capital successively describe
circuits, are simultaneously at its different stages. The industrial
capital, continuously progressing along its orbit, thus exists
simultaneously at all its stages and in the diverse functional forms
corresponding to these stages. That part of industrial capital which is
converted for the first time from commodity-capital into money begins
the circuit C' ... C', while industrial capital as a moving whole has
already passed through that circuit. One hand advances money, the other
receives it. The inauguration of the circuit M ... M' at one place
coincides with the return of the money at another place. The same is
true of productive capital.

The actual circuit of industrial capital in its continuity is therefore
not alone the unity of the processes of circulation and production but
also the unity of all its three circuits. But it can be such a unity
only if all the different parts of capital can go through the successive
stages of the circuit, can pass from one phase, from one functional form
to another, so that the industrial capital, being the whole of all these
parts, exists simultaneously in its various phases and functions and
thus describes all three circuits at the same time. The succession ]_das
Nacheinander_] of these parts is here governed by their co-existence
[_das Nebeneinander_], that is to say, by the division of capital. In a
ramified factory system the product is constantly in the various stages
of its process of formation and constantly passes from one phase of
production to another. As the individual industrial capital has a
definite size which depends on the means of the capitalist and which has
a definite minimum magnitude for every branch of industry, it follows
that its division must proceed according to definite proportions. The
magnitude of the available capital determines the dimensions of the
process of production, and this again determines the dimensions of the
commodity-capital and money-capital in so far as they perform their
functions parallel with the process of production. However co-existence,
by which continuity of production is determined, is only due to the
movement of those parts of capital in which they successively pass
through their different stages. Co-existence is itself merely the result
of succession. If for instance C' — M' as far as one part is concerned,
if the commodity cannot be sold, then the circuit of this part is
interrupted and no replacement by its means of reproduction takes place;
the succeeding parts, which emerge from the process of production in the
shape of C', find the change of their functions blocked by their
predecessors. If this lasts for some time, production is restricted and
the entire process brought to a halt. Every stagnation in succession
carries disorder into co-existence, every stagnation in one stage causes
more or less stagnation in the entire circuit of not only the stagnant
part of capital but also of the total individual capital.

The next form in which the process presents itself is that of a
succession of phases, so that the transition of capital into a new phase
is made necessary by its departure from another. Every separate circuit
has therefore one of the functional forms of capital for its point of
departure and point of return. On the other hand the aggregate process
is in fact the unity of the three circuits, which are the different
forms in which the continuity of the process expresses itself. The
aggregate circuit presents itself to every functional form of capital as
its specific circuit and every one of these circuits is a condition of
the continuity of the total process. The cycle of each functional form
is dependent upon the others. It is a necessary prerequisite of the
aggregate process of production, especially for the social capital, that
it is at the same time a process of reproduction and hence a circuit of
each one of its elements. Various fractional parts of capital pass
successively through the various stages and functional forms. Thanks to
this every functional form passes simultaneously with the others through
its own circuit, although always a different part of capital finds its
expression in it. One part of capital, continually changing, continually
reproduced, exists as a commodity-capital which is converted into money;
another as money-capital which is converted into productive capital; and
a third as productive capital which is transformed into
commodity-capital. The continuous existence of all three forms is
brought about by the circuit the aggregate capital describes in passing
through precisely these three phases.

Capital as a whole, then, exists simultaneously, spatially side by side,
in its different phases. But every part passes constantly and
successively from one phase, from one functional form, into the next and
thus functions in all of them in turn. Its forms are hence fluid and
their simultaneousness is brought about by their succession. Every form
follows another and precedes it, so that the return of one capital part
to a certain form is necessitated by the return of the other part to
some other form. Every part describes continuously its own cycle, but it
is always another part of capital which exists in this form, and these
special cycles form only simultaneous and successive elements of the
aggregate process.

The continuity — instead of the above-described interruption — of the
aggregate process is achieved only in the unity of the three circuits.
The aggregate social capital always has this continuity and its process
always exhibits the unity of the three circuits.

The continuity of the reproduction is at times more or less interrupted
so far as individual capitals are concerned. In the first place the
masses of value are frequently distributed at various periods in unequal
portions over the various stages and functional forms. In the second
place these portions may be differently distributed, according to the
character of the commodity to be produced, hence according to the
particular sphere of production in which the capital is invested. In the
third place the continuity may be more or less broken in those branches
of production which are dependent on the seasons, either on account of
natural conditions (agriculture, herring catch, etc.) or on account of
conventional circumstances, as for instance in so-called seasonal work.
The process goes on most regularly and uniformly in the factories and
mines. But this difference in the various branches of production does
not cause any difference in the general forms of the circular process.

Capital as self-expanding value embraces not only class relations, a
society of a definite character resting on the existence of labour in
the form of wage-labour. It is a movement, a circuit-describing process
going through various stages, which itself comprises three different
forms of circuit-describing process. Therefore it can be understood only
as a motion, not as a thing at rest. Those who regard the gaining by
value of independent existence as a mere abstraction forget that the
movement of industrial capital is this abstraction in _actu_. Value here
passes through various forms, various movements in which it maintains
itself and at the same time expands, augments. As we are here concerned
primarily with the mere form of this movement, we shall not take into
consideration the revolutions which capital-value may undergo during its
circuit. But it is clear that in spite of all the revolutions of value,
capitalist production exists and can endure only so long as
capital-value is made to create surplus-value, that is, so long as it
describes its circuit as a value that has gained independence, so long
therefore as the revolutions in value are overcome and equilibrated in
some way. The movements of capital appear as the action of some
individual industrial capitalist who performs the functions of a buyer
of commodities and labour, a seller of commodities, and an owner of
productive capital, who therefore promotes the circuit by this activity.
If social capital experiences a revolution in value, it may happen that
the capital of the individual capitalist succumbs to it and fails,
because it cannot adapt itself to the conditions of this movement of
values. The more acute and frequent such revolutions in value become,
the more does the automatic movement of the now independent value
operate with the elemental force of a natural process, against the
foresight and calculation of the individual capitalist, the more does
the course of normal production become subservient to abnormal
speculation, and the greater is the danger that threatens the existence
of the individual capitals. These periodical revolutions in value
therefore corroborate what they are supposed to refute, namely, that
value as capital acquires independent existence, which it maintains and
accentuates through its movement.

This succession of the metamorphoses of capital in process includes
continuous comparison of the change in the magnitude of value of the
capital brought about in the circuit with the original value. If value’s
acquisition of independence of the value-creating power, labour-power,
is inaugurated by the act M — L (purchase of labour-power) and is
effected during the process of production as exploitation of
labour-power, this acquisition of independence on the part of value does
not re-appear in that circuit, in which money, commodities, and elements
of production are merely alternating forms of capital-value in process,
and the former magnitude of value is compared with capital’s present
changed magnitude of value.

“Value,” argues Bailey against the acquisition of independence by value,
an independence which is characteristic of the capitalist mode of
production and which he treats as an illusion of certain economists;
“value is a relation between contemporary commodities, because such only
admit of being exchanged for each other.” [See Bailey, Samuel, _A
Critical Dissertation on the Nature, Measures, and Causes of Value;
Chiefly in Reference to the Writings of Mr. Ricardo and His Followers By
the Author of Essays on the Formation and Publication of Opinions_,
London, 1825, p. 72. — _Ed._]

This he says against the comparison of commodity-values of different
epochs, a comparison which amounts only to comparing the expenditure of
labour required in various periods for the production of the same sort
of commodities, once the value of money has been fixed for every period.
This comes from his general misunderstanding, for he thinks that
exchange-value is equal to value, that the form if value is value
itself; consequently commodity-value can no longer be compared, if they
do not function actively as exchange-values and thus cannot actually be
exchanged for one another. He has not the least inkling of the fact that
value functions as capital-value or capital only in so far as it remains
identical with itself and is compared with itself in the different
phases of its circuit, which are not at all “CONTEMPORARY” but succeed
one another.

In order to study the formula of the circuit in its purity it is not
sufficient to postulate that commodities are sold at their value; it
must also be assumed that this takes place with other things being
equal. Take for instance the form P ... P, disregarding all technical
revolutions within the process of production by which the productive
capital of a certain capitalist might be depreciated; disregarding
furthermore all reactions which a change in the elements of value of the
productive capital might have on the value of the existing
commodity-capital, which might appreciate or depreciate if a stock of it
is on hand. Suppose the 10,000 lbs. of yarn, C', have been sold at their
value of £500; 8,440 lbs. equal to £422, replace the capital-value
contained in C'. But if the value of cotton, coal, etc., has increased
(we do not consider mere fluctuations in price), these £422 may not
suffice for the full replacement of the elements of productive capital;
additional money-capital is required, money-capital is tied up. The
opposite takes place when those prices fall. Money-capital is set free.
The process takes a wholly normal course only when the value-relations
remain constant; its course is practically normal so long as the
disturbances during the repetitions of the circuit balance one another.
But the greater these disturbances the greater the money-capital which
the industrial capitalist must possess to tide over the period of
readjustment; and as the scale of each individual process of production
and with it the minimum size of the capital to be advanced increases in
the process of capitalist production, we have here another circumstance
to be added to those others which transform the function of the
industrial capitalist more and more into a monopoly of big
money-capitalists, who may operate singly or in association.

We remark incidentally that if a change in the value of the elements of
production occurs a difference appears between the form M...M' on one
side and of P ... P and C' ... C' on the other.

In M ... M', the formula of newly-invested capital, which first appears
as money-capital, a fall in the value of the means of production, such
as raw material, auxiliary material, etc., will permit of a smaller
expenditure of money-capital than before this fall for the purpose of
starting a business of a definite size, because the scale of the process
of production (productive power development remaining the same) depends
on the mass and volume of the means of production which a given quantity
of labour-power can cope with; but it does not depend on the value of
these means of production nor on that of the labour-power (the latter
value affects only the magnitude of self-expansion). Take the reverse
case. If there is a rise in the value of the elements of production of
the commodities which constitute the elements of the productive capital,
then more money-capital is needed for the establishment of a business of
definite proportions. In both cases it is only the amount of the
money-capital required for new investment that is affected. In the
former case money-capital becomes surplus, in the latter it is tied up,
provided the accession of new individual industrial capital proceeds in
the usual way in a given branch of production.

The circuits P ... P and C' ... C' present themselves as M ... M' only
to the extent that the movement of P and C' is at the same time
accumulation, hence to the extent that additional m, money, is converted
into money-capital; here, too, we do not take into consideration the
reaction of such changes in value on those constituent parts of capital
which are engaged in the process of production. It is not the original
expenditure which is directly affected here, but an industrial capital
engaged in its process of reproduction and not in its first circuit;
i.e., C' ... C[LMP], the reconversion of commodity-capital into its
elements of production, so far as they are composed of commodities. When
value (prices) fall three cases are possible: The process of
reproduction is continued on the same scale; in that event a part of the
money-capital existing hitherto is set free and money-capital is
accumulated, although no real accumulation (production on an extended
scale) or transformation of m (surplus-value) into an accumulation-fund
initiating and accompanying such accumulation has previously taken
place. Or the process of reproduction is carried on a more extensive
scale than ordinarily would have been the case, provided the technical
proportions admit it. Or, finally, a larger stock of raw materials,
etc., is laid in.

The opposite occurs if the value of the elements of replacement of a
commodity-capital increases. In that case reproduction no longer takes
place on its normal scale (e.g., the working-day gets shorter); or
additional money-capital must be employed in order to maintain the old
volume of work (money-capital is tied up); or the money-fund for
accumulation, when one exists, is employed entirely or partially for the
operation of the process of reproduction on its old scale instead of for
the enlargement of this process. This is also tying up money-capital,
except that here the additional money-capital does not come from the
outside, from the money-market, but from the means of the industrial
capitalist himself.

However, there may be modifying circumstances in P ... P and C' ... C'.
If our spinning-mill proprietor for example has a large stock of cotton
(a large proportion of his productive capital in the form of a stock of
cotton), a part of his productive capital is depreciated by a fall in
the prices of cotton; but if on the contrary these prices rise, this
part of his productive capital appreciates. On the other hand, if he has
tied up huge quantities in the form of commodity-capital, for instance
of cotton yarn, a part of his commodity-capital, hence of his circuit
describing capital in general, is depreciated by a fall of cotton, or
appreciated by a rise in its prices. Finally take the process C' — M —
C[lmp]. If C' — M, the realisation of the commodity-capital, has taken
place before a change in the value of the elements of C, then capital is
affected only in the way indicated in the first case, namely in the
second act of circulation, M — C[lmp]; but if such a change has occurred
before C' — M has been effected, then, other conditions remaining equal,
a fall in the price of cotton causes a corresponding fall in the price
of yarn, and a rise in the price of cotton means conversely a rise in
the price of yarn. The effect on the various individual capitals
invested in the same branch of production may differ widely, according
to the circumstances in which they find themselves.

Money-capital may also be set free or tied up on account of differences
in the duration of the process of circulation, hence also in the speed
of circulation. But this belongs in the discussion on turnover. At this
point we are only interested in the real difference that becomes
evident, with regard to changes of values of the elements of productive
capital, between M ... M' and the other two circuit forms.

In the circulation section M — C[lmp], in the epoch of the already
developed and hence prevailing capitalist mode of production, a large
portion of the commodities composing MP, the means of production, is
itself functioning as the commodity-capital of someone else. From the
standpoint of the seller, therefore, C' — M', the transformation of
commodity-capital into money-capital, takes place. But this is not an
absolute rule. On the contrary. Within its process of circulation, in
which industrial capital functions either as money or as commodities,
the circuit of industrial capital, whether as money-capital or as
commodity-capital, crosses the commodity circulation of the most diverse
modes of social production, so far as they produce commodities. No
matter whether commodities are the output of production based on
slavery, of peasants (Chinese, Indian ryots). of communes (Dutch East
Indies), of state enterprise (such as existed in former epochs of
Russian history on the basis of serfdom) or of half-savage hunting
tribes, etc. — as commodities and money they come face to face with the
money and commodities in which the industrial capital presents itself
and enter as much into its circuit as into that of the surplus-value
borne in the commodity-capital, provided the surplus-value is spent as
revenue; hence they enter in both branches of circulation of
commodity-capital. The character of the process of production from which
they originate is immaterial. They function as commodities in the
market, and as commodities they enter into the circuit of industrial
capital as well as into the circulation of the surplus-value
incorporated in it. It is therefore the universal character of the
origin of the commodities, the existence of the market as world-market,
which distinguishes the process of circulation of industrial capital.
What is true of the commodities of others is also true of the money of
others. Just as commodity-capital faces money only as commodities, so
this money functions vis-à-vis commodity-capital only as money. Money
here performs the functions of world-money.

However two points must be noted here.

First: as soon as act M — MP is completed, the commodities (MP) cease to
be such and become one of the modes of existence of industrial capital
in its functional form of P, productive capital. Thereby however their
origin is obliterated. They exist henceforth only as forms of existence
of industrial capital, are embodied in it. However it still remains true
that to replace them they must be reproduced, and to this extent the
capitalist mode of production is conditional on modes of production
lying outside of its own stage of development. But it is the tendency of
the capitalist mode of production to transform all production as much as
possible into commodity production. The mainspring by which this is
accomplished is precisely the involvement of all production into the
capitalist circulation process. And developed commodity production
itself is capitalist commodity production. The intervention of
industrial capital promotes this transformation everywhere, but with it
also the transformation of all direct producers into wage-labourers.

Secondly: the commodities entering into the circulation of industrial
capital (including the requisite means of subsistence into which
variable capital, after being paid to the labourers, is transformed for
the purpose of reproducing their labour-power), regardless of their
origin and of the social form of the productive process by which they
were brought into existence, come face to face with industrial capital
itself already in the form of commodity-capital, in the form of
commodity-dealer’s or merchant’s capital. And merchant’s capital, by its
very nature comprises commodities of all modes of production.

The capitalist mode of production presupposes not only large-scale
production but also, and necessarily so, sales on a large scale, hence
sale to the merchant, not to the individual consumer. If this consumer
is himself a productive consumer, hence an industrial capitalist, i.e.,
if the industrial capital of one branch of production supplies some
other branch of industry with means of production, direct sale by one
industrial capitalist to many others take place (in the form of orders,
etc.). To this extent every industrial capitalist is a direct seller and
his own merchant, which by the way is when he sells to a merchant.

Trading in commodities as the function of merchant’s capital is a
premise of capitalist production and develops more and more in the
course of development of such production. Therefore we occasionally take
its existence for granted to illustrate particular aspects of the
process of capitalist circulation; but in the general analysis of this
process we assume direct sale, without the intervention of a merchant,
because this intervention obscures various facets of the movement.

Cf. Sismondi, who presents the matter somewhat naively:

“Commerce employs considerable capital, which at first sight does not
seem to be a part of that capital whose movement we have described. The
value of the cloth accumulated in the stores of the cloth-merchant seems
at first to be entirely foreign to that part of the annual production
which the rich gives to the poor as wages in order to make him work.
However this capital has simply replaced the other of which we have
spoken. For the purpose of clearly understanding the progress of wealth,
we have begun with its creation and followed it to its consumption. Then
the capital employed in cloth manufacturing, for instance, always seemed
the same to us; it was exchanged for the revenue of the consumer, it was
divided into only two parts, one of them serving as revenue of the
manufacturer in the form of the profit, the other serving as revenue of
the labourers in the form of wages for the time they were manufacturing
new cloth.

“But it was soon found that it would be to the advantage of all if the
different parts of this capital were to replace one another and that, if
100,000 ècus were sufficient for the entire circulation between the
manufacturer and the consumer, they should be divided equally between
the manufacturer, the wholesale merchant, and the retail merchant. The
first then did with only one-third of this capital the same work as he
had done with the entire capital, because as soon as his work of
manufacturing was completed he found out that a merchant would rather
buy from him than a consumer would. On the other hand the capital of the
wholesaler was much sooner replaced by that of the retailer... The
difference between the sums advanced for wages and the purchase price
paid by the ultimate consumer was considered the profit of those
capitals. It was divided between the manufacturer, the merchant and the
retailer, from the moment that they had divided their functions among
themselves, and the work performed was the same, although it had
required three persons and three parts of capital instead of one.”
(_Nouveaux Principes_, I, pages 139-140.)

“All of them [the merchants] contributed indirectly to the production;
for having consumption for its object, production cannot be regarded as
completed until the thing produced is placed within the reach of the
consumer.” (_Ibid._, p. 137)

In the discussion of the general forms of the circuit and in the entire
second book in general, we take money to mean metallic money, with the
exception of symbolic money, mere tokens of value, which are designed
for specific use in certain states, and of credit-money, which is not
yet developed. In the first place, this is the historical order;
credit-production plays only a very minor role, or none at all, during
the first epoch of capitalist production. In the second place, the
necessity of this order is demonstrated theoretically by the fact that
everything of a critical nature which Tooke and others hitherto
expounded in regard to the circulation of credit-money compelled them to
hark back again and again to the question of what would be the aspect of
the matter if nothing but metal-money were in circulation. But it must
not be forgotten that metal-money may serve as a purchasing medium and
also as a paying medium. For the sake of simplicity, we consider it in
this second book generally only in its first functional form.

The process of circulation of industrial capital, which is only a part
of its individual circuit, is determined by the general laws previously
set forth (Buch I, Kap. III), [English edition: Ch. III. — _Ed._] in so
far as it is only a series of acts within the general circulation of
commodities. The greater the velocity of the currency of money, the more
rapidly therefore every individual capital passes through the series of
its commodity or money metamorphoses, the more numerous are the
industrial capitals (or individual capitals in the form of
commodity-capitals) started circulating successively by a given mass of
money, for example £500. The more the money functions as a paying
medium, the more therefore — for instance in the replacement of some
commodity-capital by its means of production — nothing but balances have
to be squared, and the shorter the periods of time when payments fall
due, as for instance in paying wages, the less money a given mass of
capital-value therefore requires for its circulation. On the other hand,
assuming that the velocity of the circulation and all other conditions
remain the same, the amount of money required to circulate as
money-capital is determined by the sum of the prices of the commodities
(price multiplied by the volume of commodities), or, if the quantity and
value of the commodities are fixed, by the value of the money itself.

But the laws of the general circulation of commodities are valid only
when capital’s circulation process consists of a series of simple acts
of circulation; they do not apply when the latter constitute
functionally determined sections of the circuit of individual industrial
capitals.

In order to make this plain, it is best to study the process of
circulation in its uninterrupted interconnection, such as it appears in
the following two forms:

[formula]

As series of acts of circulation in general, the process of circulation
(whether in the form of C — M — C or of M — C — M) represents the two
antithetical series of commodity metamorphoses, every single one of
which in its turn implies an opposite metamorphosis on the part of the
alien commodity or alien money confronting the commodity.

C — M on the part of the owner of a commodity means M — C on the part of
its buyer; the first metamorphosis of the commodity appearing in the
form of M; the opposite applies to M — C. What has been shown concerning
the intertwining of the metamorphosis of a certain commodity in one
stage with that of another in another stage applies to the circulation
of capital so far as the capitalist functions as a buyer and seller of
commodities, and his capital on that account functions in the form of
money opposed to the commodities of another. But this intertwining is
not to be identified with the intertwining of the metamorphoses of
capitals.

In the first place M — C (MP), as we have seen, may represent an
intermingling of the metamorphoses of different individual capitals. For
instance the commodity-capital of the spinning-mill owner, yarn is
partly replaced by coal. One part of his capital exists in the form of
money and is converted into the form of commodities, while the capital
of the capitalist producer of coal is in the form of commodities and is
therefore converted into the form of money; the same act of circulation
represents in this case opposite metamorphoses of two industrial
capitals (in different branches of production), hence an intertwining of
the series of metamorphoses of these capitals. But as we have seen the
MP into which M is transformed need not be commodity-capital in the
categorical sense, i.e., need not be a functional form of industrial
capital, need not be produced by a capitalist. It is always M — C on one
side and C — M on the other, but not always an intermingling of
metamorphoses of capitals. Furthermore M — L, the purchase of
labour-power, is never an intermingling of metamorphoses of capitals,
for labour-power, though the commodity of the labourer, does not become
capital until it is sold to the capitalist. On the other hand in the
process C' — M', it is not necessary that M' should represent converted
commodity-capital; it may be the realisation in money of the commodity
labour-power (wages), or of the product of some independent labourer,
slave, serf, or community.

In the second place however it is not at all required for the discharge
of the functionally determined role played by every metamorphosis
occurring within the process of circulation of some individual capital
that this metamorphosis should represent the corresponding opposite
metamorphosis in the circuit of the other capital, provided we assume
that the entire production of the world-market is carried on
capitalistically. For instance in the circuit P ... P, the M which
converts C' into money may be to the buyer only the realisation in money
of his surplus-value (if the commodity is an article of consumption); or
in M' — C'[lmp] (where therefore already accumulated capital enters) M'
may, as far as the vendor of MP is concerned, enter into the circulation
of his capital only to replace his advanced capital or it may not
re-enter at all by being diverted into revenue expenditure.

Therefore the manner in which the various component parts of the
aggregate social capital, of which the individual capitals are but
constituents functioning independently, mutually replace one another in
the process of circulation — in regard to capital as well as
surplus-value — is not ascertained from the simple intertwinings of the
metamorphoses in the circulation of commodities — intertwinings which
the acts of capital circulation have in common with all other
circulation of commodities. That requires a different method of
investigation. Hitherto one has been satisfied with uttering phrases
which upon closer analysis are found to contain nothing but indefinite
ideas borrowed from the intertwining of metamorphoses common to all
commodity circulation.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Natural Money and Credit Economy

One of the most obvious peculiarities of the movement in circuits of
industrial capital, and therefore also of capitalist production, is the
fact that on one hand the component elements of productive capital are
derived from the commodity-market and must be continually renewed out of
it, bought as commodities; and that on the other hand the product of the
labour-process emerges from it as a commodity and must be continually
sold anew as a commodity. Compare for instance a modern farmer of the
Scotch lowlands with an old-fashioned small peasant on the Continent.
The former sells his entire product and has therefore to replace all its
elements, even his seed, in the market; the latter consumes the greater
part of his product directly, buys and sells as little as possible,
fashions tools, makes clothing, etc., so far as possible himself.

Natural economy, money-economy, and credit-economy have therefore been
placed in opposition to one another as being the three characteristic
economic forms of movement in social production.

In the first place these three forms do not represent equivalent phases
of development. The so-called credit-economy is merely a form of the
money-economy, since both terms express functions or modes of exchange
among the producers themselves. In developed capitalist production, the
money-economy appears only as the basis of the credit-economy. The
money-economy and credit-economy thus correspond only to different
stages in the development of capitalist production, but they are by no
means independent forms of exchange vis-à-vis natural economy. With the
same justification one might contrapose as equivalents the very
different forms of natural economy to those two economies.

In the second place, since it is not the economy, i.e., the process of
production itself that is emphasised as the distinguishing mark of the
two categories, money-economy and credit-economy, but rather the mode of
exchange — corresponding to that economy — between the various agents of
production, or producers, the same should apply to the first category.
Hence exchange economy instead of natural economy. A completely isolated
natural economy, such as the Inca state of Peru, would not come under
any of these categories.

In the third place the money-economy is common to all commodity
production and the product appears as a commodity in the most varied
organisms of social production. Consequently what characterises
capitalist production would then be only the extent to which the product
is created as an article of commerce, as a commodity, and hence the
extent also to which its own constituent elements must enter again as
articles of commerce, as commodities, into the economy from which it
emerges.

As a matter of fact capitalist production is commodity production as the
general form of production. But it is so and becomes so more and more in
the course of its development only because labour itself appears here as
a commodity, because the labourer sells his labour, that is, the
function of his labour-power, and our assumption is that he sells it at
its value, determined by its cost of reproduction. To the extent that
labour becomes wage-labour, the producer becomes an industrial
capitalist. For this reason capitalist production (and hence also
commodity production) does not reach its full scope until the direct
agricultural producer becomes a wage-labourer. In the relation of
capitalist and wage-labourer, the money-relation, the relation between
the buyer and the seller, becomes a relation inherent in production. But
this relation has its foundation in the social character of production,
not in the mode of exchange. The latter conversely emanates from the
former. It is, however, quite in keeping with the bourgeois horizon,
everyone being engrossed in the transaction of shady business, not to
see in the character of the mode of production the basis of the mode of
exchange corresponding to it, but vice versa.^([7])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Meeting of Demand and Supply

The capitalist throws less value in the form of money into the
circulation than he draws out of it, because he throws into it more
value in the form of commodities than he withdrew from it in the form of
commodities. Since he functions simply as a personification of capital,
as an industrial capitalist, his supply of commodity-value is always
greater than his demand for it. If his supply and demand in this respect
covered each other it would mean that his capital had not produced any
surplus-value, that it had not functioned as productive capital, that
the productive capital had been converted into commodity-capital not big
with surplus-value; that it had not drawn any surplus-value in commodity
form out of labour-power during the process of production, had not
functioned at all as capital. The capitalist must indeed “sell dearer
than he has bought, ” but he succeeds in doing so only because the
capitalist process of production enables him to transform the cheaper
commodity he bought — cheaper because it contains less value — into a
commodity of greater value, hence a dearer one. He sells dearer, not
because he sells above the value of his commodity, but because his
commodity contains value in excess of that contained in the ingredients
of its production.

The rate at which the capitalist makes the value of his capital expand
is the greater, the greater the difference between his supply and his
demand, i.e., the greater the excess of the commodity-value he supplies
over the commodity-value he demands. His aim is not to equalize his
supply and demand, but to make the inequality between them, the excess
of his supply over his demand, as great as possible.

What is true of the individual capitalist applies to the capitalist
class.

In so far as the capitalist merely personifies industrial capital, his
own demand is confined to means of production and labour-power. In point
of value, his demand for MP is smaller than his advanced capital; he
buys means of production of a smaller value than that of his capital,
and therefore of a still smaller value than that of the
commodity-capital which he supplies.

As regards his demand for labour-power, it is determined in point of
value by the relation of his variable capital to his total capital,
hence equals v : C. In capitalist production this demand thereby grows
smaller than his demand for means of production. His purchases of MP
steadily rise above his purchases of L.

Since the labourer generally converts his wages into means of
subsistence, and for the overwhelmingly larger part into absolute
necessities, the demand of the capitalist for labour-power is indirectly
also a demand for the articles of consumption essential to the
working-class. But this demand is equal to v and not one iota greater
(if the labourer saves a part of his wages — we necessarily discard here
all credit relations — he converts part of his wages into a hoard and to
that extent does not act as a bidder, a purchaser). The upper limit of a
capitalist’s demand is C, equal to c + v, but his supply is equal to c +
v + s. Consequently if the composition of his commodity-capital is
80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s), his demand is equal to 80_(c) + 20_(v), hence,
considered from the angle of the value it contains, one-fifth smaller
than his supply. The greater the percentage of the mass of surplus-value
produced by him (his rate of profit) the smaller becomes his demand in
relation to his supply. Although with the further development of
production the demand of the capitalist for labour-power, and thus
indirectly for necessary means of subsistence, steadily decreases
compared with his demand for means of production, it must not be
forgotten on the other hand that his demand for MP is always smaller
than his capital. His demand for means of production must therefore
always be smaller in value than the commodity-product of the capitalist
who, working with a capital of equal value and under equal conditions,
furnishes him with those means of production. That many capitalists and
not only one do the furnishing does not alter the case. Take it that his
capital is £1,000, and its constant part £800; then his demand on all
these capitalists is equal to £800. Together they supply means of
production worth £1,200 for each £1,000 (regardless of what share in
each £1,000 may fall to each one of them and of the fraction of his
total capital which the share of each may represent), assuming that the
rate of profit is the same. Consequently his demand covers only
two-thirds of their supply, while his own total demand amounts to only
four-fifths of his own supply, measured in value.

It still remains for us, incidentally, to investigate the problem of
turnover. Let the total capital of the capitalist be £5,000, of which
£4,000 is fixed and £1,000 circulating capital; let this 1,000 be
composed of 800_(c) plus 200_(v), as assumed above. His circulating
capital must be turned over five times a year for his total capital to
turn over once. His commodity-product is then equal to £6,000, i.e.,
£1,000 more than his advanced capital, which results in the same ratio
of surplus-value as above:

5,000 C : 1,000_((c\ +\ v)) : 20_(s)

This turnover therefore does not change anything in the ratio of his
total demand to his total supply. The former remains one-fifth smaller
than the latter.

Suppose his fixed capital has to be renewed in 10 years. So the
capitalist pays every year one-tenth, or £400, into a sinking fund and
thus has only a value of £3,600 of fixed capital left plus £400 in
money. If the repairs are necessary and do not exceed the average, they
represent nothing but capital invested later. We may look at the matter
the same as if he had allowed for the cost of repairs beforehand, when
calculating the value of his investment capital, so far as this enters
into the annual commodity-product, so that it is included in the
one-tenth sinking fund payment. (If his need for repairs is below
average he is so much money to the good, and the reverse if above. But
this evens out for the entire class of capitalists engaged in the same
branch of industry.) At any rate, although his annual demand still
remains £5,000, equal to the original capital-value he advanced
(assuming his total capital is turned over once a year), this demand
increases with regard to the circulating part of the capital, while it
steadily decreases with regard to its fixed part.

We now come to reproduction. Let us assume that the capitalist consumes
the entire surplus-value m and reconverts only capital C of the original
magnitude into productive capital. Then the demand of the capitalist is
equal in value to his supply; but this does not refer to the movement of
his capital. As a capitalist he exercises a demand for only four-fifths
of his supply (in terms of value). He consumes one-fifth as a
non-capitalist, not in his function as capitalist but for his private
requirements or pleasures.

His calculation, expressed in percentages, is then as follows:

Demand as capitalist . . . . . . . . . . . 100, supply 120
Demand as man about town . . . . . . . 20, supply —
_________________________________________
Total demand . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 120, supply 120

This assumption is tantamount to assuming that capitalist production
does not exist, and therefore that the industrial capitalist himself
does not exist. For capitalism is abolished root and branch by the bare
assumption that it is personal consumption and not enrichment that works
as the compelling motive.

But such an assumption is impossible also technically. The capitalist
must not only form a reserve capital to cushion price fluctuations and
enable him to wait for favorable buying and selling conditions. He must
accumulate capital in order to extend his production and build technical
progress into his productive organism.

In order to accumulate capital he must first withdraw in money-form from
circulation a part of the surplus-value which he obtained from that
circulation, and must hoard it until it has increased sufficiently for
the extension of his old business or the opening of a side-line. So long
as the formation of the hoard continues, it does not increase the demand
of the capitalist. The money is immobilised. It does not withdraw from
the commodity-market any equivalent in commodities for the money
equivalent withdrawn from it for commodities supplied.

Credit is not considered here. And credit includes for example deposits
by the capitalist of accumulating money in a bank on current account
paying interest.

Notes

7. End of Manuscript V. What follows to the end of the chapter, is a
note contained in a notebook of 1877 or 1878 amid extracts from various
books. — _F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 5: The Time of Circulation^([8])

We have seen that the movement of capital through the sphere of
production and the two phases of the sphere of circulation takes place
in a series of periods of time. The duration of its sojourn in the
sphere of production is its time of production, that of its stay in the
sphere of circulation its time of circulation. The total time during
which it describes its circuit is therefore equal to the sum of its time
of production and its time of circulation.

The time of production naturally comprises the period of the
labour-process, but is not comprised in it. It will be remembered first
of all that a part of the constant capital exists in the form of
instruments of labour, such as machinery, buildings, etc., which serve
the same constantly repeated labour-processes until they are worn out.
Periodical interruptions of the labour-process, by night for instance,
interrupt the functioning of these instruments of labour, but not their
stay at the place of production. They belong to this place when they are
in function as well as when they are not. On the other hand the
capitalist must have a definite supply of raw material and auxiliary
material in readiness, in order that the process of production may take
place for a longer or shorter time on a previously determined scale,
without being dependent on the accidents of daily supply from the
market. This supply of raw material, etc., is productively consumed only
by degrees. There is, therefore, a difference between its time of
production ^([9]) and its time of functioning. The time of production of
the means of production in general comprises, therefore, 1) the time
during which they function as means of production, hence serve in the
productive process; 2) the stops during which the process of production,
and thus the functioning of the means of production embodied in it, are
interrupted; 3) the time during which they are held in readiness as
prerequisites of that process, hence already represent productive
capital but have not yet entered into the process of production.

The difference so far considered has in each case been the difference
between the time which the productive capital stays in the sphere of
production and that it stays in the process of production. But the
process of production may itself be responsible for interruptions of the
labour-process, and hence of the labour-time — intervals during which
the subject of labour is exposed to the action of physical processes
without the further intervention of human labour. The process of
production, and thus the functioning of the means of production,
continue in this case, although the labour-process, and thus the
functioning of the means of production as instruments of labour, have
been interrupted. This applies, for instance, to the grain, after it has
been sown, the wine fermenting in the cellar, the labour-material of
many factories, such as tanneries, where the material is exposed to the
action of chemical processes. The time of production is here longer than
the labour-time. The difference between the two consists in an excess of
the production time over the labour-time. This excess always arises from
the _latent_ existence of productive capital in the sphere of production
without functioning in the process of production itself or from its
functioning in the productive process without taking part in the
labour-process.

That part of the latent productive capital is held in readiness only as
a requisite for the productive process, such as cotton, coal, etc., in a
spinning-mill, acts as a creator of neither products nor value. It is
fallow capital, although its fallowness is essential for the
uninterrupted flow of the process of production. The buildings,
apparatus, etc., necessary for the storage of the productive supply
(latent capital) are conditions of the productive process and therefore
constitute component parts of the advanced productive capital. They
perform their function as conservators of the productive components in
the preliminary stage. Inasmuch as labour-processes are necessary in
this stage, they add to the cost of raw material, etc., but are
productive labour and productive surplus-value, because a part of this
labour, like of all other wage-labour, is not paid for. The normal
interruptions of the entire process of production, the intermissions
during which the productive capital does not function, create neither
value nor surplus-value. Hence the desire to the work going at night,
too. (Buch I, Kap. VIII, 4.) [English edition: Ch. X, 4. — _Ed_.]

The intervals in the labour-time which the subject of labour must endure
in the process of production itself create neither value nor
surplus-value. But they advance the product, form a part of its life, a
process through which it must pass. The value of the apparatus, etc., is
transferred to the product in proportion to the entire time during which
they perform their function; the product is brought to this stage by
labour itself, and the employment of these apparatus is as much a
condition of production as is the reduction to dust of a part of the
cotton which does not enter into the product but nevertheless transfers
its value to the product. The other part of the latent capital, such as
buildings, machinery, etc., the instruments of labour whose functioning
is interrupted only by the regular pauses of the productive process —
irregular interruptions caused by the restriction of production, crises,
etc., are total losses — adds value without entering into the creation
of the product. The total value which this part of capital adds to the
product is determined by its average durability; it loses value, because
it loses its use-value, both during the time that it performs its
functions as well as during that in which it does not.

Finally the value of the constant part of capital, which continues in
the productive process although the labour-process is interrupted,
re-appears in the result of the productive process. Labour itself has
here placed the means of production in conditions under which they pass
of themselves through certain natural processes, the result of which is
a definite useful effect or a change in the form of their use-value.
Labour always transfers the value of the means of production to the
product, in so far as it really consumes them in a suitable manner, as
means of production. And it does not change the matter whether labour
has to bear continually on its subject by means of the instruments of
labour in order to produce this effect or whether it merely needs to
give the first impulse by providing the means of production with
conditions under which they undergo the intended alteration of
themselves, in consequence of natural processes, without the further
assistance of labour.

Whatever may be the reason for the excess of production time over the
labour-time — whether the circumstance that means of production
constitute only latent productive capital and hence are still in a stage
preliminary to the actual productive process or that their own
functioning is interrupted within the process of production by its
pauses or finally that the process of production itself necessitates
interruptions of the labour-process — in none of these cases do the
means of production function as absorbers of labour. And if they do not
absorb labour, they do not absorb surplus-labour, either. Hence there is
no expansion of the value of productive capital so long as it stays in
that part of its production time which exceeds the labour-time, no
matter how inseparable from these pauses the carrying on of the process
of self-expansion may be. It is plain that the more the production time
and labour-time cover each other the greater is the productivity and
self-expansion of a given productive capital in a given space of time.
Hence the tendency of the capitalist production to reduce the excess of
the production time over the labour-time as much as possible. But while
the time of production of a certain capital may differ from its
labour-time, it always comprises the latter, and this excess is itself a
condition of the process of production. The time of production, then, is
always that time in which a capital produces use-values and expands,
hence functions as productive capital, although it includes time in
which it is either latent or produces without expanding its value.

Within the sphere of circulation, capital abides as commodity-capital
and money-capital. Its two processes of circulation consist in its
transformation from the commodity-form into that of money and from the
money-form into that of commodities. The circumstance that the
transformation of commodities into money is here at the same time a
realisation of the surplus-value embodied in the commodities, and that
the transformation of money into commodities is at the same time a
conversion or reconversion of capital-value into the form of its
elements of production does not in the least alter the fact that these
processes, as processes of circulation, are processes of the simple
metamorphosis of commodities.

Time of circulation and time of production mutually exclude each other.
During its time of circulation capital does not perform the functions of
productive capital and therefore produces neither commodities nor
surplus-value. If we study the circuit in its simplest form, as when the
entire capital-value passes in one bulk from one phase into another, it
becomes palpably evident that the process of production and therefore
also the self-expansion of capital-value are interrupted so long as its
time of circulation lasts, and that the renewal of the process of
production will proceed at a faster or a slower pace depending on the
length of the circulation time. But if on the contrary the various parts
of capital pass through the circuit one after another, so that the
circuit of the entire capital-value is accomplished successively in the
circuits of its various component parts, then it is evident that the
longer its aliquot parts stay in the sphere of circulation the smaller
must be the part functioning in the sphere of production. The expansion
and contraction of the time of circulation operate therefore as negative
limits to the contraction or expansion of the time of production or of
the extent to which a capital of a given size functions as productive
capital. The more the metamorphoses of circulation of a certain capital
are only ideal, i.e., the more the time of circulation is equal to zero,
or approaches zero, the more does capital function, the more does its
productivity and the self-expansion of its value increase. For instance,
if a capitalist executes an order by the terms of which he receives
payment on delivery of the product, and if this payment is made in his
own means of production, the time of circulation approaches zero.

A capital’s time of circulation therefore limits, generally speaking,
its time of production and hence its process of generating
surplus-value. And it limits this process in proportion to its own
duration. This duration may considerably increase or decrease and hence
may restrict capital’s time of production in a widely varying degree.
But Political Economy sees only what is apparent, namely the effect of
the time of circulation on capital’s process of the creation of
surplus-value in general. It takes this negative effect for a positive
one, because its consequences are positive. It clings the more tightly
to this appearance since it seems to furnish proof that capital
possesses a mystic source of self-expansion independent of its process
of production and hence of the exploitation of labour, a spring which
flows to it from the sphere of circulation. We shall see later that even
scientific Political Economy has been deceived by this appearance of
things. Various phenomena, it will turn out, give color to this
semblance: 1) The capitalist method of calculating profit, in which the
negative cause figures a positive one, since with capitals in different
spheres of investment, where only the time of circulation are different,
a longer time of circulation tends to bring about an increase in prices,
in short, serves as one of the causes of equalising profits. 2) The time
of circulation is but a phase of the time of turnover; the latter
however includes the time of production or reproduction. What is really
due to the latter seems to be due to the time of circulation. 3) The
conversion of commodities into variable capital (wages) is necessitated
by their previous conversion into money. In the accumulation of capital,
the conversion into additional variable capital therefore takes place in
the sphere of circulation, or during the time of circulation.
Consequently it seems that the accumulation thus achieved is owed to the
latter.

Within the sphere of circulation capital passes through the two
antithetical phases C — M and M — C; it is immaterial in what order.
Hence its time of circulation is likewise divided into two parts, viz.:
the time it requires for its conversion from commodities into money, and
that which it requires for its conversion from money into commodities.
We have already learned from the analysis of simple circulation of
commodities (Buch I, Kap. III) [English edition: Ch. III. — _Ed_.] that
C — M, the sale, is the most difficult part of its metamorphosis and
that therefore under ordinary conditions it takes up the greater part of
its time of circulation. As money, value exists in its always
convertible form. As a commodity it must first be transformed into money
before it can assume this form of direct convertibility and hence of
constant readiness for action. However, in capital’s process of
circulation, its phase M — C has to do with its transformation into
commodities which constitute definite elements of productive capital in
a given enterprise. The means of production may not be available in the
market and must first be produced or they must be procured from distant
markets or their ordinary supply has become irregular or prices have
changed, etc., in short there are a multitude of circumstances which are
not noticeable in the simple change of form M — C, but which
nevertheless requires now more, now less time also for this part of the
circulation phase. C — M and M — C may be separate not only in time but
also in space; the market for buying and the market for selling may be
located apart. In the case of factories for instance buyer and seller
are frequently different persons. In the production of commodities,
circulation is as necessary as production itself, so that circulation
agents are just as much needed as production agents. The process of
reproduction includes both functions of capital, therefore it includes
the necessity of having representatives of these functions, either in
the person of the capitalist himself or of wage-labourers, his agents.
But this furnishes no ground for confusing the agents of circulation
with those of production, any more than it furnishes ground for
confusing the functions of commodity-capital and money-capital with
those of productive capital. The agents of circulation must be paid by
the agents of production. But the capitalists, who sell to and buy from
one another, create neither values nor products by these acts, this
state of affairs is not changed if they are enabled or compelled by the
volume of their business to shift this function on to others. In some
businesses the buyers and sellers get paid in the form of percentages on
the profits. All talk about their being paid by the consumer does not
help matters. The consumers can pay only in so far as they, as agents of
production, produce an equivalent in commodities for themselves or
appropriate it from production agents either on the basis of some legal
title (as their co-partners, etc.) or by personal services.

There is a difference between C — M and M — C which has nothing to do
with the difference in forms of commodities and money but arises from
the capitalist character of production. Intrinsically both C — M and M —
C are mere conversions of given values from one form into another. But
C' — M' is at the same time a realisation of the surplus-value contained
in C'. M — C however is not. Hence selling is more important than
buying. Under normal conditions M — C is an act necessary for the
self-expansion of the value expressed in M, but it is not a realisation
of surplus-value; it is the introduction to its production, not an
afterword.

The form in which a commodity exists, its existence as a use-value, sets
definite limits to the circulation of commodity capital C' — M'.
Use-values are perishable by nature. Hence if they are not productively
or individually consumed within a certain time, depending on what they
are intended for, in other words, if they are not sold within a certain
period, they spoil and lose with their use-value the property of being
vehicles of exchange-value. The capital-value contained in them, hence
also the surplus-value accrued in it, gets lost. The use-values do not
remain the carriers of perennial self-expanding capital-value unless
they are constantly renewed and reproduced, are replaced by new
use-values of the same or of some other order. The sale of the
use-values in the form of commodities, hence their entry into productive
or individual consumption effected through this sale is however the ever
recurring condition of their reproduction. They must change their old
use-form within a definite time in order to continue their existence in
a new form. Exchange-value maintains itself only by means of this
constant renewal of its body. The use-values of various commodities
spoil sooner or later; the interval between their production and
consumption may therefore be comparatively long or short; hence they can
persist without spoiling in the circulation phase C — M for a shorter or
longer term in the form of commodity-capital, can endure a shorter or a
longer time of circulation as commodities. The limit of the circulation
time of a commodity-capital imposed by the spoiling of the body of the
commodity is the absolute limit of this part of the time of circulation,
or of the time of circulation of commodity-capital as such. The more
perishable a commodity and the sooner after its production it must
therefore be consumed and hence sold, the more restricted is its
capacity for removal from its place of production, the narrower
therefore is the spatial sphere of its circulation, the more localised
are the markets where it can be sold. For this reason the more
perishable a commodity is and the greater the absolute restriction of
its time of circulation as commodity on account of its physical
properties, the less is it suited to be an object of capitalist
production. Such a commodity can come within its grasp only in thickly
populated districts or to the extent that improved transportation
eliminate distance. But the concentration of the production of any
article in the hands of a few and in a populous district may create a
relatively large market even for such articles as are the products of
large breweries, dairies, etc.

Notes

------------------------------------------------------------------------

8 Beginning of Manuscript IV. — _F.E._

9 Time of production is here used in the active sense: The time of
production of the means of production does not mean in this case the
time required for their production, but the time during which they take
part in the process of production of a certain commodity. — _F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 6: The Costs of Circulation

I. Genuine Costs of Circulation

(a) The Time of Purchase and Sale

The transformations of the forms of capital from commodities into money
and from money into commodities are at the same time transactions of the
capitalist, acts of purchase and sale. The time in which these
transformations of forms take place constitutes subjectively, from the
standpoint of the capitalist, the time of purchase and sale; it is the
time during which he performs the functions of a seller and buyer in the
market. Just as the time of circulation of capital is a necessary
segment of its time of reproduction, so the time in which the capitalist
buys and sells and scours the market is a necessary part of the time in
which he functions as a capitalist, i.e., as personified capital. It is
a part of his business hours.

[Since we have assumed that commodities are bought and sold at their
values, these acts constitute merely the conversion of a certain value
from one form into another, from the commodity-form into the money-form
or from the money-form into the commodity-form — a change in the state
of being. If commodities are sold at their values, then the magnitudes
of value in the hands of the buyer and seller remain unchanged. Only the
form of existence of value is changed. If the commodities are not sold
at their values, then the sum of the converted values remains unchanged;
the plus on one side is a minus on the other.

The metamorphoses C — M and M — C are transactions between buyers and
sellers; they require time to conclude bargains, the more so as the
struggle goes on in which each seeks to get the best of the other, and
it is businessmen who face one another here; and “WHEN GREEK MEETS GREEK
THEN COMES THE TUG OF WAR.” [A paraphrase of words from the 17th century
tragedy _The Rival Queens, or the Death of Alexander the Great by
Nathaniel Lee_. — _Ed_.] To effect a change in the state of being costs
of time and labour-power, not for the purpose of creating value,
however, but in order to accomplish the conversion of value from one
form into another. The mutual attempt to appropriate an extra slice of
this value on this occasion changes nothing. This labour, increased by
the evil designs on either side, creates no value, any more than the
work performed in a judicial proceeding increases the value of the
subject matter of the suit. Matters stand with this labour — which is a
necessary element in the capitalist process of production as a whole,
including circulation or included by it — as they stand, say, with the
work of combustion of some substance used for the generation of heat.
This work of combustion does not generate any heat, although it is a
necessary element in the process of combustion. In order, e.g., to
consume coal as fuel, I must combine it with oxygen, and for this
purpose must transform it from the solid into the gaseous state (for in
the carbonic acid gas, the result of the combustion, coal is in the
gaseous state); consequently, I must bring about a physical change in
the form of its existence or in its state of being. The separation of
carbon molecules, which are united into a solid mass, and the splitting
up of these molecules into their separate atoms must precede the new
combination, and this requires a certain expenditure of energy which
thus is not transformed into heat but taken from it. Therefore, if the
owners of the commodities are not capitalists but independent direct
producers, the time employed in buying and selling is a diminution of
their labour-time, and for this reason such transactions used to be
deferred (in ancient and medieval times) to holidays.

Of course the dimensions assumed by the conversion of commodities in the
hands of the capitalists cannot transform this labour — which does not
create any value — into labour productive of value. Nor can the miracle
of this transubstantiation be accomplished by a transposition, i.e., by
the industrial capitalist making this "work of combustion" the exclusive
business of third persons, who are paid by them, instead of performing
it themselves. This third persons will of course not tender their
labour-power to the capitalist out of sheer love for them. It is a
matter of indifference to the rent collector of a real-estate owner or
the messenger of a bank that their labour does not add one iota or
tittle to the value of either the rent or the gold pieces carried to
another bank by the bagful.]^([10])

To the capitalist who has others working for him, buying and selling
becomes a primary function. Since he appropriates the product of many on
a large social scale, he must sell it on the same scale and then
reconvert it from money into elements of production. Now as before
neither the time of purchase nor of sale creates any value. The function
of merchant’s capital gives rise to an illusion. But without going into
this at length here this much is plain from the start: If by a division
of labour a function, unproductive in itself although a necessary
element of reproduction, is transformed from an incidental occupation of
many into an exclusive occupation of a few, into their special business,
the nature of this function itself is not changed. _One_ merchant (here
considered a mere agent attending to the change of form of commodities,
a mere buyer and seller) may by his operations shorten the time of
purchase and sale for _many_ producers. In such case he should be
regarded as a machine which reduces useless expenditure of energy or
helps to set production time free.^([11])

In order to simplify the matter (since we shall not discuss the merchant
as a capitalist and merchant’s capital until later) we shall assume that
this buying and selling agent is a man who sells his labour. He expends
his labour-power and labour-time in the operations C — M and M — C. And
he makes his living that way, just as another does by spinning or making
pills. He performs a necessary function, because the process of
reproduction itself includes unproductive functions. He works as well as
the next man, but intrinsically his labour creates neither value nor
product. He belongs himself to the _faux frais_ of production. His
usefulness does not consist in transforming an unproductive function
into a productive one, nor unproductive into productive labour. It would
be a miracle if such transformation could be accomplished by the mere
transfer of a function. His usefulness consists rather in the fact that
a smaller part of society’s labour-power and labour-time is tied up in
this unproductive function. More. We shall assume that he is a mere
wage-labourer, even one of the better paid, for all the difference it
makes. Whatever his pay, as a wage-labourer he works part of his time
for nothing. He may receive daily the value of the product of eight
working-hours, yet functions ten. But the two hours of surplus-labour he
performs do not produce value anymore than his eight hours of necessary
labour, although by means of the latter a part of the social product is
transferred to him. In the first place, looking at it from the
standpoint of society, labour-power is used up now as before for ten
hours in a mere function of circulation. It cannot be used for anything
else, not for productive labour. In the second place however society
does not pay for those two hours of surplus-labour, although they are
spent by the individual who performs this labour. Society does not
appropriate any extra product or value thereby. But the costs of
circulation, which he represents, are reduced by one-fifth, from ten
hours to eight. Society does not pay any equivalent for one-fifth of
this active time of circulation, of which he is the agent. But if this
man is employed by a capitalist, then the non-payment of these two hours
reduces the cost of circulation of _his_ capital, which constitutes a
deduction from his income. For the capitalist this is a positive gain,
because the negative limit for the self-expansion of his capital-value
is thereby reduced. So long as small independent producers of
commodities spend a part of their own time in buying and selling, this
represents nothing but time spent during the intervals between their
productive function or diminution of their time of production.

At all events the time consumed for this purpose constitutes one of the
costs of circulation which adds nothing to the converted values. It is
the cost of converting them from the commodity-form into the money-form.
The capitalist producer of commodities acting as an agent of circulation
differs from the direct producer of commodities only in the fact that he
buys and sells on a larger scale and therefore his function as such
agent assumes greater dimensions. And if the volume of his business
compels or enables him to buy (hire) circulation agents of his own to
serve as wage-labourers, the nature of the case is not changed thereby.
A certain amount of labour-power and labour-time must be expended in the
process of circulation (so far as it is merely a change of form). But
this now appears as an additional investment of capital. A part of the
variable capital must be laid out in the purchase of this labour-power
functioning only in circulation. This advance capital creates neither
product nor value. It reduces _pro tanto_ the dimensions in which the
advanced capital functions productively. It is as though one part of the
product were transformed into a machine which buys and sells the rest of
the product. This machine brings about a reduction of the product. It
does not participate in the productive process, although it can diminish
the labour-power, etc., spent on circulation. It constitutes merely a
part of the costs of circulation.

(b) Book-keeping

Apart from the actual buying and selling, labour-time is expended on
book-keeping, which besides absorbs materialised labour such as pens,
ink, paper, desks, office paraphernalia. This function, therefore,
exacts the expenditure on the one hand of labour-power and on the other
of instruments of labour. It is the same condition of things as obtained
in the case of the time of purchase and sale.

As unity within its circuits, as value in motion, whether in the sphere
of production or in either phase of the sphere of circulation, capital
exists ideally only in the form of money of account, primarily in the
mind of the producer of commodities, the capitalist producer of
commodities. This movement is fixed and controlled by book-keeping,
which includes the determination of prices, or the calculation of the
prices of commodities. The movement of production, especially of the
production of surplus-value — in which the commodities figure only as
depositories of value, as the names of things whose ideal existence as
values is crystallised in money of account — thus is symbolically
reflected in imagination. So long as the individual producer of
commodities keeps account only in his head (for instance, a peasant; the
book-keeping tenant-farmer was not produced until the rise of capitalist
agriculture), or books his expenditures, receipts, due dates of
payments, etc., only incidentally, outside of his production time, it is
palpably clear that this function and the instruments of labour consumed
by it, such as paper, etc., represent additional consumption of
labour-time and instruments which are necessary, but constitute a
deduction from the time available for productive consumption as well as
from the instruments of labour which functions in the real process of
production, enter into the creation of products and value.^([12]) The
nature of the function is not changed — neither by the dimensions which
it assumes on account of its concentration in the hands of the
capitalist producer of commodities and the fact that instead of
appearing as the function of many small commodity-producers it appears
as the function of _one_ capitalist, as a function within a process of
large-scale production; nor is it altered by its divorcement from those
productive functions of which it formed an appendage, nor by its
conversion into an independent function of special agents exclusively
entrusted with it.

Division of labour and assumption of independence do not make a function
one that creates products and value if it was not so intrinsically,
hence before it became independent. If a capitalist invests his capital
anew, he must invest a part of it in hiring a book-keeper, etc., and in
the wherewithal of book-keeping. If his capital is already functioning,
is engaged in the process of its own constant reproduction, he must
continually reconvert a part of his product into a book-keeper, clerks,
and the like, by transforming that part into money. That part of his
capital is withdrawn from the process of production and belongs in the
costs of circulation, deductions from the total yield (including the
labour-power itself that is expended exclusively for this function).

But there is a certain difference between the costs incidental to
book-keeping, or the unproductive expenditure of labour-time on the one
hand and those of mere buying and selling time on the other. The latter
arise only from the definite social form of the process of production,
from the fact that it is the process of production of commodities.
Book-keeping, as the control and ideal synthesis of the process, becomes
the more necessary the more the process assumes a social scale and loses
its purely individual character. It is therefore more necessary in
capitalist production than in the scattered production of handicraft and
peasant economy, more necessary in collective production than in
capitalist production. But the costs of book-keeping drop as production
becomes concentrated and book-keeping becomes social.

We are concerned here only with the general character of the costs of
circulation, which arise out of the metamorphosis of forms alone. It is
superfluous to discuss here all their forms in detail. But how forms
which belong in the sphere of pure changes of the form of value and
hence originate from the particular social form of the process of
production, forms which in the case of the individual commodity-producer
are only transient, barely perceptible elements, run alongside his
productive functions or become intertwined with them — how these can
strike the eye as the huge costs of circulation can be seen from just
the money taken in and paid out when these operations have become
independent and concentrated on a large scale as the exclusive function
of banks, etc., or of cashiers in individual businesses. But it must be
firmly borne in mind that these costs of circulation are not changed in
character by their change in appearance.

(c) Money

Whether a product is fabricated as a commodity or not, it is always a
material form of wealth, a use-value intended for individual or
productive consumption. Its value as a commodity is ideally expressed in
its price, which does not change its actual use-form in the least. But
the fact that certain commodities like gold and silver function as money
and as such reside exclusively in the process of circulation (even in
the form of hoards, reserve funds, etc., they remain in the sphere of
circulation, although latently) is a pure product of the particular
social form of the process of production, the process of production of
commodities. Since under capitalist production products assume the
general form of commodities, and the overwhelming mass of products is
created as commodities and must therefore assume the form of money, and
since the vast bulk of commodities, the part of social wealth
functioning as commodities, grows continually, it follows that the
quantity of gold and silver functioning as means of circulation, paying
medium, reserve fund, etc., likewise increases. These commodities
performing the function of money enter into neither individual nor
productive consumption. They represent social labour in a fixed form in
which it serves as a mere circulation machine. Besides the fact that a
part of social wealth has been condemned to assume this unproductive
form, the wearing down of the money demands its constant replacement, or
the conversion of more social labour, in the form of products, into more
gold and silver. These replacement costs are considerable in
capitalistically developed nations, because in general the portion of
wealth tied up in the form of money is tremendous. Gold and silver as
money-commodities mean circulation costs to society which arise solely
out of the social form of production. They are _faux frais_ of commodity
production in general, and they increase with the development of this
production, especially of capitalist production. They represent a part
of the social wealth that must be sacrificed to the process of
circulation.^([13])

II. Costs of Storage

Costs of circulation, which originate in a mere change of form of value,
in circulation, ideally considered, do not enter into the value of
commodities. The parts of capital expended as such costs are merely
deductions from the productively expended capital so far as the
capitalist is concerned. The costs of circulation which we shall
consider now are of a different nature. They may arise from processes of
production which are only continued in circulation, the productive
character of which is hence merely concealed by the circulation form. On
the other hand they may be, from the standpoint of society, mere costs,
unproductive expenditure of living or materialised labour, but for that
very reason they become productive of value for the individual
capitalist, may constitute an addition to the selling price of his
commodities. This already follows from the fact that these costs are
different in different spheres of production, and here and there even
for different individual capitals in one and the same sphere of
production. By being added to the prices of commodities they are
distributed in proportion to the amount to be borne by each individual
capitalist. But all labour which adds value can also add surplus-value,
and will always add surplus-value under capitalist production, as the
value created by labour depends on the amount of the labour itself,
whereas the surplus-value created by it depends on the extent to which
the capitalist pays for it. Consequently costs which enhance the price
of a commodity without adding to its use-value, which therefore are to
be classed as unproductive expenses so far as society is concerned, may
be a source of enrichment to the individual capitalist. On the other
hand, as this addition to the price of the commodity merely distributes
these costs of circulation equally, they do not thereby cease to be
unproductive in character. For instance insurance companies divide the
losses of individual capitalists among the capitalist class. But this
does not prevent these equalised losses from remaining losses so far as
the aggregate social capital is concerned.

(a) Formation of Supply in General

During its existence as commodity-capital or its stay in the market, in
other words, during the interval between the process of production, from
which it emerges, and the process of consumption, into which it enters,
the product constitutes a commodity supply. As a commodity in the
market, and therefore in the shape of a supply, commodity-capital
figures in a dual capacity in each circuit: one time as the
commodity-product of that capital in process whose circuit is being
examined; the other time however as the commodity-product of another
capital, which must be available in the market to be bought and
converted into productive capital. It is, indeed, possible that this
last-named commodity-capital is not produced until ordered. In that
event an interruption occurs until it has been produced. But the flow of
the process of production and reproduction requires that a certain mass
of commodities (means of production) should always be in the market,
should therefore form a supply. Productive capital likewise comprises
the purchase of labour-power, and the money-form is here only the
value-form of the means of subsistence, the greater part of which the
labourer must find at hand in the market. We shall discuss this more in
detail further on in this paragraph. But at this point the following is
already clear: As far as concerns capital-value in process which has
been transformed into a commodity and must now be sold or reconverted
into money, which therefore functions for the moment as
commodity-capital in the market, the condition in which it constitutes a
supply is to be described as an inexpedient, involuntary stay there. The
quicker the sale is effected the more smoothly runs the process of
reproduction. Delay in the form of conversion of C' — M' impedes the
real exchange of matter which must take place in the circuit of capital,
as well as its further functioning as productive capital. On the other
hand, so far as M — C is concerned, the constant presence of commodities
in the market, commodity-supply, appears as a condition of the flow of
the process of reproduction and of the investment of new or additional
capital.

The abidance of the commodity-capital as a commodity-supply in the
market requires buildings, stores, storage places, warehouses, in other
words, an expenditure of constant capital; furthermore the payment of
labour-power for placing the commodities in storage. Besides,
commodities spoil and are exposed to the injurious influences of the
elements. Additional capital must be invested, partly in instruments of
labour, in material form, and partly in labour-power to protect the
commodities against the above.^([14])

Thus the existence of capital in its form of commodity-capital and hence
of commodity-supply gives rise to costs which must be classed as costs
of circulation, since they do not come within the sphere of production.
These costs of circulation differ from those mentioned under I by the
fact that they enter to a certain extent into the value of the
commodities, i.e., they increase the prices of commodities. At all
events the capital and labour-power which serve the need of preserving
and storing the commodity-supply are withdrawn from the direct process
of production. On the other hand the capitals thus employed, including
labour-power as a constituent of capital, must be replaced out of the
social product. Their expenditure has therefore the effect of
diminishing the productive power of labour, so that a greater amount of
capital and labour is required to obtain a particular useful effect.
They are _unproductive costs_.

As the costs of circulation necessitated by the formation of a
commodity-supply are due merely to the time required for the conversion
of existing values from the commodity-form into the money-form, hence
merely to the particular social form of the production process (i.e.,
are due only to the fact that the product is brought forth as a
commodity and must therefore undergo the transformation into money),
these costs completely share the character of the circulation costs
enumerated under I. On the other hand the value of the commodities is
here preserved or increased only because the use-value, the product
itself, is placed in definite material conditions which cost capital
outlay and is subjected to operations which bring additional labour to
bear on the use-values. However the computation of the values of
commodities, the book-keeping incidental to this process, the
transactions of purchase and sale, do not affect the use-value in which
the commodity-value exists. They have to do only with the form of the
commodity-value. Although in the case submitted [i.e., Corbet’s
calculations given in Footnote 14. — _Ed._] the costs of forming a
supply (which is here done involuntarily) arise only from a delay in the
change of form and from its necessity, still these costs differ from
those mentioned under I, in that their purpose is not a change in the
form of the value, but the preservation of the value existing in the
commodity as a product, a utility, and which cannot be preserved in any
other way than by preserving the product, the use-value, itself. The
use-value is neither raised nor increased here; on the contrary, it
diminishes. But its diminution is restricted and it is preserved.
Neither is the advanced value contained in the commodity increased here;
but new labour, materialised and living, is added.

We have now to investigate furthermore to what extent these costs arise
from the peculiar nature of commodity production in general and from
commodity production in its general, absolute form, i.e., capitalist
commodity production; and to what extent on the other hand they are
common to all social production and merely assume a special shape, a
special form of appearance, in capitalist production.

Adam Smith entertained the splendid notion that the formation of a
supply was a phenomenon peculiar to capitalist production.^([15]) More
recent economists, for instance Lalor, insist on the contrary that it
declines with the development of capitalist production. [See: J. Lalor,
Money and Morals: A Book for the Times, London, 1852, pp. 43-44. —
_Ed_.] Sismondi even regards it as one of the drawbacks of the latter.
[See: J.C.L. Sismonde de Sismondi, _Etudes sur l’èconomie politique_,
Tome I. Bruxelles, 1837, p. 49, etc. — _Ed_.]

As a matter of fact, supplies exist in three forms: in the form of
productive capital, in the form a fund for individual consumption, and
in the form of a commodity-supply or commodity-capital. The supply in
one form decreases relatively when it increases in another, although its
quantity may increase absolutely in all three forms simultaneously.

It is plain from the outset that wherever production is carried on for
the direct satisfaction of the needs of the producer and only to a minor
extent for exchange or sale, hence where the social product does not
assume the form of commodities at all or only to a rather small degree,
the supply in the form of commodities, or commodity-supply, forms only a
small and insignificant part of wealth. But here the consumption-fund is
relatively large, especially that of the means of subsistence proper.
One need but take a look at old-fashioned peasant economy. There the
overwhelming part of the product is transformed directly into supplies
of means of production or means of subsistence, without becoming
supplies of commodities, for the very reason that it remains in the
hands of its owner. It does not assume the form of a commodity-supply
and for this reason Adam Smith declares that there is no supply in
societies based on this mode of production. He confuses the form of the
supply with the supply itself and believes that society hitherto lived
from hand to mouth or trusted to the hap of the morrow.^([16]) This is a
naive misunderstanding.

A supply in the form of productive capital exists in the shape of means
of production, which already are in the process of production or at
least in the hands of the producer, hence latently already in the
process of production. It was seen previously that with the development
of the productivity of labour and therefore also with the development of
the capitalist mode of production — there is a steady increase in the
mass of means of production (buildings, machinery, etc.) which are
embodied once and for all in the process in the form of instruments of
labour, and perform with steady repetition their function in it for a
longer or shorter time. It was also observed that this increase is at
the same time the premise and consequence of the development of the
social productive power of labour. The growth, not only absolute but
relative, of wealth in this form (cf. Buch I, Kap XXIII, 2) [English
edition: Ch. XXV, 2. — _Ed._] is characteristic above all of the
capitalist mode of production. The material forms of existence of
constant capital, the means of production, do not however consist only
of such instruments of labour but also of materials of labour in various
stages of processing, and of auxiliary materials. With the enlargement
of the scale of production and the increase in the productive power of
labour through co-operation, division of labour, machinery, etc., grows
the quantity of raw materials, auxiliary materials, etc., entering into
the daily process of reproduction. These elements must be ready at hand
in the place of production. The volume of this supply existing in the
form of productive capital increases therefore absolutely, in order that
the process may keep going — apart from the fact whether this supply can
be renewed daily or only at fixed intervals — there must always be a
greater accumulation of ready raw material, etc., at the place of
production than is used up, say, daily or weekly. The continuity of the
process requires that the presence of its conditions should not be
jeopardised by possible interruptions when making purchases daily, nor
depend on whether the product is sold daily or weekly, and hence is
reconvertible into its elements of production only irregularly. But it
is evident that productive capital may be latent or form a supply in
quite different proportions. There is for instance a great difference
whether the spinning-mill owner must have on hand a supply of cotton or
coal for three months or for one. Patently this supply, while increasing
absolutely, may decrease relatively.

This depends on various conditions, all of which practically amount to a
demand for greater rapidity, regularity, and reliability in furnishing
the necessary amount of raw material, so that no interruption will ever
occur. The less these conditions are complied with, hence the less
rapid, regular and reliable the supplies, the greater must be the latent
part of the productive capital, that is to say, the supply of raw
material, etc., in the hands of the producer waiting to be worked up.
These conditions are inversely proportional to the degree of development
of capitalist production, and hence of the productive power of social
labour. The same applies therefore to the supply in this form.

However that which appears here as a decrease of the supply (for
instance, in Lalor) is in part merely a decrease of the supply in the
form of commodity-capital, or of the commodity-supply proper; it is
consequently only a change of form of the same supply. If for instance
the quantity of coal daily produced in a certain country, and therefore
the scale and energy of operation of the coal industry, are great, the
spinner does not need a large store of coal in order to ensure the
continuity of his production. The steady and certain renewal of his coal
supply makes this unnecessary. In the second place the rapidity with
which the product of one process may be transferred as means of
production to another process depends on the development of the
transport and communication facilities. The cheapness of transportation
is of great importance in this question. The continually renewed
transport of coal from the mine to the spinning-mill for instance would
be more expensive than the storing up of a larger supply of coal for a
longer time when the price of transportation is relatively cheaper.
These two circumstances examined so far arise from the process of
production itself. In the third place the development of the
credit-system also exerts an influence. The less the spinner is
dependent on the direct sale of his yarn for the renewal of his supply
of cotton, coal, etc. — and this direct dependence will be the smaller,
the more developed the credit-system is — the smaller relatively these
supplies can be and yet ensure a continuous production of yarn on a
given scale, a production independent of the hazards of the sale of
yarn. In the fourth place, however, many raw materials, semi-finished
goods, etc., require long periods of time for their production. This
applies especially to all raw materials furnished by agriculture. If no
interruption of the process of production is to take place, a certain
amount of raw materials must be on hand for the entire period in which
no new products can take the place of the old. If this supply decreases
in the hands of the industrial capitalist, it proves merely that it
increases in the hands of the merchant in the form of commodity-supply.
The development of transportation for instance makes it possible rapidly
to ship the cotton lying, say, in Liverpool’s import warehouses to
Manchester, so that the manufacturer can renew his supply in
comparatively small portions, as and when needed. But in that case the
cotton remains in so much larger quantities as commodity-supply in the
hands of the Liverpool merchants. It is therefore merely a change in the
form of the supply, and this Lalor and others overlooked. And if you
consider the social capital, the same quantity of products exists in
either case in the form of supply. The quantity required for a single
country during the period of, say, one year decreases as transportation
improves. If a large number of sailing vessels and steamers ply between
America and England, England’s opportunities to renew its cotton supply
are increased while the average quantity to be held in storage in
England decreases. The same effect is produced by the development of the
world market and the consequent multiplication of the sources of supply
of the same merchandise. The article is supplied piecemeal from various
countries and at various intervals.

(b) The Commodity-Supply Proper

We have already seen that under capitalist production the product
assumes the general form of a commodity, and the more so the more that
production grows in size and depth. Consequently, even if production
retains the same volume, the far greater part of the products exists in
the shape of commodities, compared with either the former modes of
production or the capitalist mode of production at a less developed
stage. And every commodity — therefore, also every commodity-capital,
which is only commodities, but commodities serving as the form of
existence of capital-value — constitutes an element of the
commodity-supply, unless it passes immediately from its sphere of
production into productive or individual consumption, that is, does not
lie in the market in the interval. If the volume of production remains
the same, the commodity-supply (i.e., this isolation and fixation of the
commodity-form of the product) grows therefore of itself concomitantly
with capitalist production. We have seen above that this is merely a
change of form of the supply, that is to say, the supply in the form of
commodities increases on the one hand because on the other the supply in
the form intended directly for production or consumption decreases. It
is merely a changed social form of the supply. If at the same time it is
not only the relative magnitude of the commodity-supply compared with
the aggregate social product that increases but also its absolute
magnitude, that is so because the mass of the aggregate product grows
with the growth of capitalist production.

With the development of capitalist production, the scale of production
is determined less and less by the direct demand for the product and
more and more by the amount of capital available in the hands of the
individual capitalist, by the urge of self-expansion inherent in his
capital and by the need of continuity and expansion of the process of
production. Thus in each particular branch of production there is a
necessary increase in the mass of products available in the market in
the shape of commodities, i.e., in search of buyers. The amount of
capital fixed for a shorter or longer period in the form of
commodity-capital grows. Hence the commodity-supply also grows.

Finally the majority of the members of society are transformed into
wage-labourers, into people who live from hand to mouth, who receive
their wages weekly and spend them daily, who therefore must have their
means of subsistence made available to them in the shape of a supply.
Although the separate elements of this supply may be in continuous flow,
a part of them must always stagnate in order that the supply as a whole
may remain in a state of flux.

All these characteristics have their origin in the form of production
and in the incident change of form which the product must undergo in the
process of circulation.

Whatever may be the social form of the products-supply, its preservation
requires outlays for buildings, vessels, etc., which are facilities for
storing the product; also for means of production and labour, more or
less of which must be expended, according to the nature of the product,
in order to combat injurious influences. The more concentrated socially
the supply is, the smaller relatively are the costs. These outlays
always constitute a part of the social labour, in either materialised or
living form — hence in the capitalist form outlays of capital — which do
not enter into the formation of the product itself and thus are
deductions from the product. They are necessary, these unproductive
expenses of social wealth. They are the costs of preserving the social
product regardless of whether its existence as an element of the
commodity-supply stems merely from the social form of production, hence
from the commodity-form and its necessary change of form, or whether we
regard the commodity-supply merely as a special form of the supply of
products, which is common to all societies, although not in the form of
a _commodity_-supply that form of products-supply belonging in the
process of circulation.

It may now be asked to what extent these costs enhance the value of
commodities.

If the capitalist has converted the capital advanced by him in the form
of means of production and labour-power into a product, into a definite
quantity of commodities ready for sale, and these commodities remain in
stock unsold, then we have a case of not only the stagnation of the
process of self-expansion of his capital-value during this period. The
costs of preserving this supply in buildings, of additional labour,
etc., mean a positive loss. The buyer he would ultimately find would
laugh in his face if he were to say to him: “I could not sell my goods
for six months, and their preservation during that period did not only
keep so and so much of my capital idle, but also cost me so and so much
extra expense.” _“Tant pis pour vous!”_ the buyer would say. “Right here
alongside of you is another seller whose wares were completed only the
day before yesterday. Your articles are shop-worn and probably more or
less damaged by the ravages of time. Therefore you will have to sell
cheaper than your competitor.”

The conditions under which a commodity exists are not in the least
affected by whether its producer is the real producer or a capitalist
producer, hence actually only a representative of the real producer. He
has to turn his product into money. The expenses incurred by him because
of the fixation of the product in the form of commodities are a part of
his individual speculations with which the buyer of the commodities has
no concern. The latter does not pay him for the time of circulation of
his commodities. Even when the capitalist keeps his goods intentionally
off the market, in times of an actual or anticipated revolution of
values, it depends on the advent of this revolution of values, on the
correctness or incorrectness of his speculation, whether he will recover
his additional costs or not. But the revolution in values does not ensue
in consequence of his additional costs. Hence in so far as the formation
of a supply entails a stagnation of circulation, the expense incurred
thereby does not add to the value of the commodities. On the other hand
there cannot be any supply without a stay in the sphere of circulation,
without capital staying for a longer or shorter time in its
commodity-form; hence no supply without stagnation of circulation, just
as no money can circulate without the formation of a money-reserve.
Hence no commodity circulation without commodity-supply. If the
capitalist does not come face to face with this necessity in C' — M', he
will encounter it in M — C; if not with regard to his own
commodity-capital, then with regard to that of other capitalists, who
produce means of production for him and means of subsistence for his
labourers.

Whether the formation of a supply is voluntary or involuntary, that is
to say, whether the commodity-producer keeps a supply intentionally or
whether his products form a supply in consequence of the sales
resistance offered by the conditions of the process of circulation
itself cannot effect the matter essentially, it would seem. But for the
solution of this problem it is useful to know what distinguishes
voluntary from involuntary supply formation. Involuntary formation
arises from, or is identical with, a stagnation of the circulation which
is independent of the knowledge of the commodity-producer and thwarts
his will. And what characterises the voluntary formation of a supply? In
both instances the seller seeks to get rid of his commodity as fast as
ever. He always offers his product for sale as a commodity. If he were
to withdraw it from sale, it would be only a potential (δυνάμει), not an
actual (έναγεία) element of the commodity-supply. To him the commodity
as such is as much a depository of exchange-value as ever and as such
can act only by and after stripping off its commodity-form and assuming
the money-form.

The commodity-supply must be of a certain volume in order to satisfy the
demand during a given period. A continual extension of the circle of
buyers is counted upon. For instance, in order to last for one day, a
part of the commodities in the market must constantly remain in the
commodity-form while the remainder is fluent, turns into money. True,
the part which stagnates while the rest is fluent decreases steadily,
just as the size of the supply itself decreases until it is all sold.
The stagnation of commodities thus counts as a requisite condition of
their sale. The volume must furthermore be larger than the average sale
or the average demand. Otherwise the excess over these averages could
not be satisfied. On the other hand the supply must constantly be
renewed, because it is constantly being drawn on. This renewal cannot
come from anywhere in the last instance except from production, from a
supply of commodities. It is immaterial whether this comes from abroad
or not. The renewal depends on the periods required by the commodities
for their reproduction. The commodity-supply must last the whole time.
The fact that it does not remain in the hands of the original producer
but passes through various reservoirs, from the wholesaler to the
retailer, changes merely the appearance and not the nature of the thing.
From the point of view of society, a part of the capital retains in both
instances the form of a commodity-supply until the commodities enter
productive or individual consumption. The producer tries to keep a stock
corresponding to his average demand in order not to depend directly on
production and to ensure for himself a steady clientele. Purchase
periods corresponding to the periods of production are formed and the
commodities constitute supplies for longer or shorter time, until they
can be replaced by new commodities of the same kind. Constancy and
continuity of the process of circulation, and therefore of the process
of reproduction, which includes the process of circulation, are
safeguarded only by the formation of such supplies.

It must be remembered that C' — M' may have been transacted for the
producer of C, even if C is still in the market. If the producer were to
keep his own commodities in stock until they are sold to the ultimate
consumer, he would have to set two capitals in motion, one as the
producer of the commodities and one as a merchant. As far as the
commodity itself is concerned, whether we look upon it as an individual
commodity or as a component part of social capital, it is immaterial
whether the costs of forming the supply must be borne by its producer or
by a series of merchants from A to Z.

Since the commodity-supply is nothing but the commodity-form of the
product which at a particular level of social production would exist
either as a productive supply (latent production fund) or as a
consumption-fund (reserve of means of consumption) if it did not exist
as a commodity-supply, the expenses required for its preservation, that
is, the costs of supply formation — i.e., materialised or living labour
spent for this purpose — are merely expenses incurred for maintaining
either the social fund for production or the social fund for
consumption. The increase in the value of commodities caused by them
distributes these costs simply _pro rata_ over the different
commodities, since the costs differ with different kinds of commodities.
And the costs of supply formation are as much as ever deductions from
the social wealth, although they constitute one of the conditions of its
existence.

Only to the extent that the commodity-supply is a premise of commodity
circulation and is itself a form necessarily arising in commodity
circulation, only in so far as this apparent stagnation is therefore a
form of the movement itself, just as the formation of a money-reserve is
a premise of money circulation — only to that extent is such stagnation
normal. But as soon as the commodities lying in the reservoirs of
circulation do not make room for the swiftly succeeding wave of
production, so that the reservoirs become over-stocked, the
commodity-supply expands in consequence of the stagnation in circulation
just as the hoards increase when money-circulation is clogged. It does
not make any difference whether this jam occurs in the warehouses of the
industrial capitalist or in the storerooms of the merchant. The
commodity-supply is in that case not a prerequisite of uninterrupted
sale, but a consequence of the impossibility of selling the goods. The
costs are the same, but since they now arise purely out of the form,
that is to say, out of the necessity of transforming the commodities
into money and out of the difficulty of going through this
metamorphosis, they do not enter into the values of the commodities but
constitute deductions, losses of value in the realisation of the value.
Since the normal and abnormal forms of the supply do not differ in form
and both clog circulation, these phenomena may be confused and deceive
the agent of production himself so much the more since for the producer
the process of circulation of his capital may continue while that of his
commodities which have changed hands and now belong to merchants may be
arrested. If production and consumption swell, other things being equal,
then the commodity-supply swells likewise. It is renewed and absorbed
just as fast, but its size is greater. Hence the bulging size of the
commodity-supply, for which stagnant circulation is responsible, may be
mistaken for a symptom of the expansion of the process of reproduction,
especially when the development of the credit-system makes it possible
to wrap the real movement in mystery.

The costs of supply formation consist: 1) of a quantitative diminution
of the mass of the products (for instance in the case of a flour supply;
2) of a deterioration of quality; 3) of the materialised and living
labour required for the preservation of the supply.

III. Costs of Transportation

It is not necessary to go here into all the details of the costs of
circulation, such as packing, sorting, etc. The general law is that _all
costs of circulation, which arise only from changes in the forms of
commodities do not add to their value_. They are merely expenses
incurred in the realisation of the value or in its conversion from one
form into another. The capital spent to meet those costs (including the
labour done under its control) belongs among the _faux frais_ of
capitalist production. They must be replaced from the surplus-product
and constitute, as far as the entire capitalist class is concerned, a
deduction from the surplus-value or surplus-product, just as the time a
labourer needs for the purchase of his means of subsistence is lost
time. But the costs of transportation play a too important part to pass
them by without a few brief remarks.

Within the circuit of capital and the metamorphosis of commodities,
which forms a part of the circuit, an interchange of matter takes place
in social labour. This interchange of matter may necessitate a change of
location of products, their real motion from one place to another.
Still, circulation of commodities can take place without physical motion
by them, and there can be transportation of products without circulation
of commodities, and even without a direct exchange of products. A house
sold by A to B does not wander from one place to another, although it
circulates as a commodity. Movable commodity-values, such as cotton or
pig iron, may lie in the same storage dump at a time when they are
passing through dozens of circulation processes, are bought and resold
by speculators.^([17]) What really does move here is the title of
ownership in goods, not the goods themselves. On the other hand,
transportation played a prominent role in the land of the Incas,
although the social product neither circulated as a commodity nor was
distributed by means of barter.

Consequently, although the transportation industry when based on
capitalist production appears as a cause of circulation costs, this
special form of appearance does not alter the matter in the least.

Quantities of products are not increased by transportation. Nor, with a
few exceptions, is the possible alteration of their natural qualities,
brought about by transportation, an intentional useful effect; it is
rather an unavoidable evil. But the use-value of things is materialised
only in their consumption, and their consumption may necessitate a
change of location of these things, hence may require an additional
process of production, in the transport industry. The productive capital
invested in this industry imparts value to the transported products,
partly by transferring value from the means of transportation, partly by
adding value through the labour performed in transport. This last-named
increment of value consists, as it does in all capitalist production, of
a replacement of wages and of surplus-value.

Within each process of production, a great role is played by the change
of location of the subject of labour and the required instruments of
labour and labour-power — such as cotton trucked from the carding to the
spinning room or coal hoisted from the shaft to the surface. The
transition of the finished product as finished goods from one
independent place of production to another located at a distance shows
the same phenomenon, only on a larger scale. The transport of products
from one productive establishment to another is furthermore followed by
the passage of the finished products from the sphere of production to
that of consumption. The product is not ready for consumption until it
has completed these movements.

As was shown above, the general law of commodity production holds: The
productivity of labour is inversely proportional to the value created by
it. This is true of the transport industry as well as of any other. The
smaller the amount of dead and living labour required for the
transportation of commodities over a certain distance, the greater the
productive power of labour, and vice versa.^([18])

The absolute magnitude of the value which transportation adds to the
commodities stands in inverse proportion to the productive power of the
transport industry and in direct proportion to the distance traveled,
other conditions remaining the same.

The relative part of the value added to the prices of commodities by the
costs of transportation, other conditions remaining the same, is
directly proportional to their cubic content and weight, and inversely
proportional to their value. But there are many modifying factors.
Transportation requires, for instance, more or less important
precautionary measures, and therefore more or less expenditure of labour
and instruments of labour, depending on how fragile, perishable,
explosive, etc., the articles are. Here the railway kings show greater
ingenuity in the invention of fantastic species than do botanists and
zoologists. The classification of goods on English railways, for
example, fills volumes and, in principle, rests on the general tendency
to transform the diversified natural properties of goods into just as
many ills of transportation and routine pretexts for fraudulent charges.

“Glass, which was formerly worth £11 per CRATE, is now worth only £2
since the improvements which have taken place in manufactures, and since
the abolition of the duty; but the rate for carriage is the same as it
was formerly, and higher than it was previously, when carried by canal.
Formerly, manufacturers inform me that they had glass and glass wares
for the plumbers’ trade carried at about 10 s. per ton, within 50 miles
of Birmingham. At the present time, the rate to cover risk of breakage
is three times that amount... The companies always resist any claim that
is made for breakages.”^([19])

The fact that furthermore the part of the value added to an article by
the costs of transportation is inversely proportional to its value
furnishes special grounds to the railway kings to tax articles in direct
proportion to their values. The complaints of the industrialists and
merchants on this score are found on every page of the testimony given
in the report quoted.

The capitalist mode of production reduces the costs of transportation of
the individual commodity by the development of the means of
transportation and communication, as well as by concentration —
increasing scale — of transportation. It increases that part of the
living and materialised social labour which is expended in the transport
of commodities, firstly by converting the great majority of all products
into commodities, secondly, by substituting distant for local markets.

The circulation, i.e., the actual locomotion of commodities in space,
resolves itself into the transport of commodities. The transport
industry forms on the one hand an independent branch of production and
thus a separate sphere of investment of productive capital. On the other
hand its distinguishing feature is that it appears as a continuation of
a process of production _within_ the process of circulation and _for_
the process of circulation.

Notes

10 The bracketed text is taken from a note at the end of Manuscript
VIII. — _F.E._

11 “The costs of commerce, although necessary, must be regarded as an
onerous outlay. ” (Quesnay, _Analyse du Tableau économique_, in Daire,
_Physiocrates_, Part I, Paris, 1846, p. 71.) According to Quesnay, the
“profit” which the competition among merchants produces, in that it
compels them to “content themselves with a smaller reward or gain ...
is, strictly speaking, nothing but a _prevention of loss_ (privation de
perte) for the seller at first hand and for the buyer-consumer. Now, a
prevention of loss on the costs of commerce is not a _real product_ or
an accession of wealth through commerce. If considered simply as an
exchange, whether with or without the cost of transportation.” (pp. 145
and 146.) “The costs of commerce are always paid by those who sell the
products and who would enjoy the full prices paid for them by the
buyers, if there were no intermediate expenses.” (p. 163.) The
proprietors and producers are “_salariants_” (payers of wages), the
merchants are “_salariès_” (recipients of wages). (p.164, Quesnay,
_Dialogues sur le Commerce et sur les Travaux des Artisans_. In Daire,
_Physiocrates_, Part I, Paris, 1846.)

12 In the Middle Ages we find book-keeping for agriculture only in the
monasteries. But we have seen (Buch I, p. 343 [English edition: p. 357,
— _Ed_.]) that a book-keeper was installed for agriculture as early as
the primitive Indian communities. Book-keeping is there made the
independent and exclusive function of the communal officer. This
division of labour saves time, effort and expense, but production and
book-keeping in the sphere of production remain as much two different
things as the cargo of a ship and the bill of lading. In the person of
the book-keeper, a part of the labour-power of the community is
withdrawn from production, and the costs of his function are not made
good by his own labour but by a deduction from the communal product.
What is true of the book-keeper of an Indian community is true _mutatis
mutandis_ of the book-keeper of the capitalist. (From Manuscript II).

13 “The money circulating in a country is a certain portion of the
capital of the country, absolutely withdrawn from productive purposes,
in order to facilitate or increase the productiveness of the remainder.
A certain amount of wealth is, therefore, as necessary in order to adopt
gold as a circulating medium, as it is to make a machine, in order to
facilitate any other production.” (_Economists_, Vol. V, p. 520.)

14 Corbet calculates, in 1841, that the cost of storing wheat for a
season of nine months amounts to a loss of ½ per cent in quantity, 3 per
cent for interest on the price of wheat, 2 percent for warehouse rental,
1 percent for sifting and drayage, ½ percent for delivery, together 7
percent, or 3s. 6d. on a price of 50s. per quarter. (Th. Corbet, _An
Inquiry into the Causes and Modes of Wealth of Individuals, etc_.,
London, 1841.) According to the testimony of Liverpool merchants before
the Railway Commission, the (net) costs of grain storage in 1865
amounted to about 2d. per quarter per month, or 9d. or 10d. a ton.
(_Royal Commission on Railways_, 1867. Evidence, p. 19, No. 331.)

15 Book II. Introduction. [A. Smith, _An Inquiry into the Nature and
Causes of the Wealth of Nations_. A new edition in four volumes, London,
1843, Vol. II, pp. 249-52. — _Ed_.]

16 Instead of a supply arising only upon and from the conversion of the
product into a commodity, and of the consumption-supply into a
commodity-supply, as Adam Smith wrongly imagines, this change of form,
on the contrary, causes most violent crises in the economy of the
producers during the transition from production for one’s own needs to
commodity production. In India, for instance, “the disposition to hoard
largely the grain for which little could be got in years of abundance”
was observed until very recent times. (Return. _Bengal and Orissa Famine
H. of C., 1867_, I, pp. 230-31, No. 74.) The sudden increase in the
demand for cotton, jute, etc., due to the American Civil War led in many
parts of India to a severe restriction of rice culture, a rise in the
price of rice, and a sale of the producers’ old rice supplies. To this
must be added the unexampled export of rice to Australia, Madagascar,
etc., after 1864-66. This accounts for the acute character of Orissa
alone (loc. cit., 174, 175, 213, 214, and III: _Papers relating to the
famine in Behar_, pp. 32, 33, where the “DRAIN OF OLD STOCKS” is
emphasised as one of the causes of the famine). (From Manuscript II.)

17 Storch calls this “circulation factice” (fictitious circulation).

18 Ricardo quotes Say, who considers it one of the blessings of commerce
that by means of the costs of transportation it increases the price, or
the value, of products. “Commerce,” writes Say, “enables us to obtain a
commodity in the place where it is to be found, and to convey it to
another where it is to be consumed; it therefore gives us the power of
increasing the value of the commodity, by the whole difference between
its price in the first of these places, and its price in the second.”
[J.B. Say, _Traitè d’èconomie politique_, Troisième edition, Paris,
1817, Tome II, p. 433. — _Ed_.] Ricardo remarks with reference to this:
“True, but how is this additional value given to it? By adding to the
cost of production, first, the expenses of conveyance; secondly, the
profit on the advances of capital made by the merchant. The commodity is
only more valuable, for the same reason that every other commodity may
become more valuable, because more labour is expended on its production
and conveyance before it is purchased by the consumer. This must not be
mentioned as one of the advantages of commerce.” (Ricardo, _Principles
of Political Economy_, 3rd. ed., London, 1821, pp. 309, 310.)

19 Royal Commission on Railways, p. 31, No. 630.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents



PART II: THE TURNOVER OF CAPITAL


Chapter 7: The Turnover Time and the Number of Turnovers

We have seen that the entire time of turnover of a given capital is
equal to the sum of its time of circulation and its time of production.
It is the period of time from the moment of the advance of capital-value
in a definite form to the return of the functioning capital-value in the
same form.

The compelling motive of capitalist production is always the creation of
surplus-value by means of the advanced value, no matter whether this
value is advanced in its independent form, i.e., in the money-form, or
in commodities, in which case its value-form possesses only ideal
independence in the price of the advanced commodities. In both cases
this capital-value passes through various forms of existence during its
circular movement. Its identity with itself is fixed in the books of the
capitalists, or in the form of money of account.

Whether we take the form of M ... M' or the form P ... P, the
implication is (1) that the advanced value performs the function of
capital-value and has created surplus-value; (2) that after completing
its process it has returned to the form in which it began it. The
self-expansion of the advanced value M and at the same time the return
of capital to this form (the money-form) is plainly visible in M ... M'.
But the same takes place in the second form. For the starting-point of P
is the existence of the elements of production, of commodities having a
given value. The form includes the self-expansion of this value (C' and
M') and the return to the original form, for in the second P the
advanced value has again the form of the elements of production in which
it was originally advanced.

We have seen previously: “If production be capitalistic in form, so,
too, will be reproduction. Just as in the former the labour-process
figures but as a means towards the self-expansion of capital, so in the
latter it figures but as a means of reproducing as capital — _i.e_., as
self-expanding value — the value advanced.” (Buch I, Kap. XXI, S. 588.)
[English edition: Ch. XXIII, p. 566. — _Ed_.]

The three forms (I) M ... M' (II) P ... P, and (III) C' ... C', present
the following distinctions: in form II, P ... P, the renewal of the
process, the process of reproduction, is expressed as a reality, while
in form I only as a potentiality. But both differ from form III in that
with them the advanced capital-value — advanced either in the form of
money or of material elements of production — is the starting-point and
therefore also the returning point. In M ... M' the return is expressed
by M' = M + m. If the process is renewed on the same scale, M is again
the starting-point and m does not enter into it, but shows merely that M
has self-expanded as capital and hence created a surplus-value, m, but
cast it off. In the form P ... P capital-value P advanced in the form of
elements of production is likewise the starting-point. This form
includes its self-expansion. If simple reproduction takes place, the
same capital-value renews the same process in the same form P. If
accumulation takes place, then P' (equal in magnitude of value to M',
equal to C') reopens the process as an expanded capital-value. But the
process begins again with the advanced capital-value in its initial
form, although with a greater capital-value than before. In form III, on
the contrary, the capital-value does not begin the process as an
advance, but as a value already expanded, as the aggregate wealth
existing in the form of commodities, of which the advanced capital-value
is but a part. This last form is important for Part III, in which the
movements of the individual capitals are discussed in connection with
the movement of the aggregate social capital. But it is not to be used
in connection with the turnover of capital, which always begins with the
advance of capital-value, whether in the form of money or commodities,
and which always necessitates the return of the rotating capital-value
in the form in which it was advanced. Of the circuits I and II, the
former is of service in a study primarily of the influence of the
turnover on the formation of surplus-value and the latter in a study of
its influence on the creation of the product.

Economists have little distinguished between the different forms of
circuits, nor have they examined them individually with relation to the
turnover of capital. They generally consider the form M ... M', because
it dominates the individual capitalist and aids him in his calculations,
even if money is the starting-point only in the shape of money of
account. Others start with outlays in the form of elements of production
to the point when returns are received, without alluding at all to the
form of the returns, whether made in commodities or money. For instance,

“the Economic Cycle, ... the whole course of production, from the time
that outlays are made till returns are received. In agriculture,
seedtime is its commencement, and harvesting its ending.” S. P. Newman,
_Elements of Political Economy_, Andover and New York, p. 81.

Others begin with C' (the third form): Says Th. Chalmers, in his work
_On Political Economy_, 2nd ed., Glasgow, 1832, p. 85 et seq.:

“The world of trade may be conceived to revolve in what we shall call an
economic cycle, which accomplishes one revolution by business, coming
round again, through its successive transactions, to the point from
which it set out. Its commencement may be dated from the point at which
the capitalist has obtained those returns by which his capital is
replaced to him: whence he proceeds anew to engage his workmen; to
distribute among them, in wages, their maintenance, or rather, the power
of lifting it; to obtain from them, in finished work, the articles in
which he specially deals; to bring these articles to market and there
terminate the orbit of one set of movements, by effecting a sale, and
receiving, in its proceeds, a return for the whole outlays of the
period.”

As soon as the entire capital-value invested by some individual
capitalist in any branch of production whatever has described its
circuit, it finds itself once more in its initial form and can now
repeat the same process. It must repeat it, if the value is to
perpetuate itself as a capital-value and to create surplus-value. An
individual circuit is but a constantly repeated section in the life of a
capital; hence a period. At the end of the period M ... M' capital has
once more the form of money-capital, which passes anew through that
series of changes of form in which its process of reproduction, or
self-expansion, is included. At the end of the period P ... P capital
resumes the form of elements of production, which are the prerequisites
for a renewal of its circuit. A circuit performed by a capital and meant
to be a periodical process, not an individual act, is called its
turnover. The duration of this turnover is determined by the sum of its
time of production and its time of circulation. This time total
constitutes the time of turnover of the capital. It measures the
interval of time between one circuit period of the entire capital-value
and the next, the periodicity in the process of life of capital or, if
you like, the time of the renewal, the repetition, of the process of
self-expansion, or production, of one and the same capital-value.

Apart from the individual adventures which may accelerate or shorten the
time of turnover of certain capitals, this time differs in the different
spheres of investment. Just as the working day is the natural unit for
measuring the function of labour-power, so the year is the natural unit
for measuring the turnovers of functioning capital. The natural basis of
this unit is the circumstance that the most important crops of the
temperate zone, which is the mother country of capitalist production,
are annual products. If we designate the year as the unit of measure of
the turnover time by T, the time of turnover of a given capital by t,
and the number of its turnovers by n, then n = T/t. If, for instance,
the time of turnover t is 3 months, then n is equal to 12/3, or 4;
capital is turned over four times per year. If t = 18 months, then n =
12/18 = ⅔, or capital completes only two-thirds of its turnover in one
year. If its time of turnover is several years, it is computed in
multiples of one year.

From the point of view of the capitalist, the time of turnover of his
capital is the time for which he must advance his capital in order to
create surplus-value with it and receive it back in its original shape.

Before examining more closely the influence of the turnover on the
processes of production and self-expansion, we must investigate two new
forms which accrue to capital from the process of circulation and affect
the form of its turnover.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 8: Fixed Capital and Circulating Capital

I. Distinctions of Form

We have seen (Buch I, Kap. VI) [English edition: Ch. VIII. — _Ed_.]
that, in relation to the products toward the creation of which it
contributes, a portion of the constant capital retains that definite
use-form in which it enters into the process of production. Hence it
performs the same functions for a longer or shorter period, in ever
repeated labour-processes. This applies for instance to industrial
buildings, machinery, etc. — in short to all things which we comprise
under the name of _instruments of labour_. This part of constant capital
yields up value to the product in proportion as it loses its own
exchange-value together with its own use-value. This delivery of value,
or this transition of the value of such a means of production to the
product which it helps to create is determined by a calculation of
averages. It is measured by the average duration of its function, from
the moment that the means of production enters into the process of
production to the moment that it is completely spent, dead and gone, and
must be replaced by a new sample of the same kind, or reproduced.

This, then, is the peculiarity of this part of constant capital, of the
labour instruments proper:

A part of capital has been advanced in the form of constant capital,
i.e., of means of production, which function as factors of the
labour-process so long as they retain the independent use-form in which
they enter this process. The finished product, and therefore also the
creators of the product, so far as they have been transformed into
product, is thrust out of the process of production and passes as a
commodity from the sphere of production to the sphere of circulation.
But the instruments of labour never leave the sphere of production, once
they have entered it. Their function holds them there. A portion of the
advanced capital-value becomes _fixed_ in this form determined by the
function of the instruments of labour in the process. In the performance
of this function, and thus by the wear and tear of the instruments of
labour, a part of their value passes on to the product, while the other
remains fixed in the instruments of labour and thus in the process of
production. The value fixed in this way decreases steadily, until the
instrument of labour is worn out, its value having been distributed
during a shorter or longer period over a mass of products originating
from a series of constantly repeated labour-processes. But so long as
they are still effective as instruments of labour and need not yet be
replaced by new ones of the same kind, a certain amount of constant
capital-value remains fixed in them, while the other part of the value
originally fixed in them is transferred to the product and therefore
circulates as a component part of the commodity-supply. The longer an
instrument lasts, the slower it wears out, the longer will its constant
capital-value remains fixed in this use-form. But whatever may be its
durability, the proportion in which it yields value is always inverse to
the entire time it functions. If of two machines of equal value one
wears out in five years and the other in ten, then the first yields
twice as much value in the same time as the second.

This portion of the capital-value fixed in the instrument of labour
circulates as well as any other. We have seen in general that all
capital-value is constantly in circulation, and that in this sense all
capital is circulating capital. But the circulation of the portion of
capital which we are now studying is peculiar. In the first place it
does not circulate in its use-form, but it is merely its value that
circulates, and this takes place gradually, piecemeal, in proportion as
it passes from it to the product, which circulates as a commodity.
During the entire period of its functioning, a part of its value always
remain fixed in it, independently of the commodities which it helps to
produce. It is this peculiarity which gives to this portion of constant
capital the form of _fixed capital_. All the other material parts of
capital advanced in the process of production form by way of contrast
the _circulating_, or _fluid, capital_.

Some means of production do not enter materially into the product. Such
are auxiliary materials, which are consumed by the instruments of labour
themselves in the performance of their functions, like coal consumed by
a steam-engine; or which merely assist in the operation, like gas for
lighting, etc. It is only their value which forms a part of the value of
the products. The product circulates in its own circulation the value of
these means of production. This feature they have in common with fixed
capital. But they are entirely consumed in every labour-process which
they enter and must therefore be wholly replaced by new means of
production of the same kind in every new labour-process. They do not
preserve their independent use-form while performing their function.
Hence while they function no portion of capital-value remains fixed in
their old use-form, their bodily form, either. The circumstance that
this portion of the auxiliary materials does not pass bodily into the
product but enters into the value of the product only according to its
own value, as a portion of that value, and what hangs together with
this, namely, that the function of these substances is strictly confined
to the sphere of production, has misled economists like Ramsay (who at
the same time got fixed capital mixed up with constant capital) to
classify them as fixed capital. [Karl Marx, _Theorien über den Mehrwert_
(Vierter Band des Kapitals), 3. Teil, Berlin, 1962, SS. 323-25. — _Ed_.]

That part of the means of production which bodily enters into the
product, i.e., raw materials, etc., thus assumes in part forms which
enable it later to enter into individual consumption as articles of use.
The instruments of labour properly so called, the material vehicles of
the fixed capital, are consumed only productively and cannot enter into
individual consumption, because they do not enter into the product, or
the use-value, which they held to create but retain their independent
form with reference to it until they are completely worn out. The means
of transportation are an exception to this rule. The useful effect which
they produce during the performance of their productive function, hence
during their stay in the sphere of production, the change of location,
passes simultaneously into the individual use in the same way in which
he pays for the use of other articles of consumption. We have seen [Karl
Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, pp. 181-82. — _Ed_.] that for instance in
chemical manufacture raw and auxiliary materials blend. The same applies
to instruments of labour and auxiliary and raw materials. Similarly in
agriculture the substances added for the improvement of the soil pass
partly into the plants raised and help to form the product. On the other
hand their effect is distributed over a lengthy period, say four or five
years. A portion of them therefore passes bodily into the product and
thus transfers its value to the product while the other portion remains
fixed in its old use-form and retains its value. It persists as a means
of production and consequently keeps the form of fixed capital. As a
beast of toil an ox is fixed capital. If he is eaten, he no longer
functions as an instrument of labour, nor as fixed capital either.

What determines that a portion of the capital-value invested in means of
production is endowed with the character of fixed capital is exclusively
the peculiar manner in which this value circulates. This specific manner
of circulation arises from the specific manner in which the instrument
of labour transmits its value to the product, or in which it behaves as
a creator of values during the process of production. This manner again
arises from the special way in which the instruments of labour function
in the labour-process.

We know that a use-value which emerges as a product from one
labour-process enters into another as a means of production. [Karl Marx,
_Capital_, Vol. I, p. 181. — _Ed_.] It is only the functioning of a
product as an instrument of labour in the process of production that
makes it fixed capital. But when it itself only just emerges from a
process, it is by no means fixed capital. For instance a machine, as a
product or commodity of the machine-manufacturer, belongs to his
commodity-capital. It does not become fixed capital until it is employed
productively in the hands of its purchaser, the capitalist.

All other circumstances being equal, the degree of fixity increases with
the durability of the instrument of labour. It is this durability that
determines the magnitude of the difference between the capital-value
fixed in instruments of labour and that part of its value which it
yields to the product in repeated labour-processes. The slower this
value is yielded — and value is given up by the instrument of labour in
every repetition of the labour-process — the larger is the fixed capital
and the greater the difference between the capital employed in the
process of production and the capital consumed in it. As soon as this
difference has disappeared the instrument of labour has outlived its
usefulness and has lost with its use-value also its value. It has ceased
to be the depository of value. Since an instrument of labour, like every
other material carrier of constant capital, parts with value to the
product only to the extent that together with its use-value it loses its
value, it is evident that the more slowly its use-value is lost, the
longer it lasts in the process of production, the longer is the period
in which constant capital-value remains fixed in it.

If a means of production which is not an instrument of labour strictly
speaking, such as auxiliary substances, raw material, partly finished
articles, etc., behaves with regard to value yield and hence manner of
circulation of its value in the same way as the instruments of labour,
then it is likewise a material depository, a form of existence, of fixed
capital. This is the case with the above-mentioned improvements of the
soil, which add to it chemical substances whose influence is distributed
over several periods of production or years. Here a portion of the value
continues to exist alongside the product, in its independent form or in
the form of fixed capital, while the other portion of the value has been
delivered to the product and therefore circulates with it. In this case
it is not alone a portion of the value of the fixed capital which enters
into the product, but also the use-value, the substance, in which this
portion of value exists.

Apart from the fundamental mistake — the mixing up of the categories
“fixed” and “circulating capital” with the categories “constant” and
“variable capital” — the confusion of the economists hitherto in the
definitions of concepts is based first of all on the following points:

One turns certain properties materially inherent in instruments of
labour into direct properties of fixed capital; for instance physical
immobility, say, of a house. However it is always easy to prove in such
case that other instruments of labour, which as such are likewise fixed
capital, possess the opposite property: for instance physical mobility,
say, of a ship.

Or one confuses the economic definiteness of form which arises from the
circulation of value with an objective property; as if objects which in
themselves are not capital at all but rather become so only under
definite social conditions could _in themselves_ and in their very
nature be capital in some definite form, fixed or circulating. We have
seen (Buch I, Kap. V) [English edition: Ch. VII. — _Ed_.] that the means
of production in every labour-process, regardless of the social
conditions in which it takes place, are divided into instruments of
labour and subjects of labour. But both of them become capital only
under the capitalist mode of production, when they become “productive
capital,” as shown in the preceding part. Thus the distinction between
instruments of labour and subject of labour, which is grounded on the
nature of the labour-process, is reflected in a new form: the
distinction between fixed capital and circulating capital. It is only
then that a thing which performs the function of an instrument of labour
becomes fixed capital. If owing to its material properties it can
function also in other capacities than that of instrument of labour, it
may be fixed capital or not, depending on the specific function it
performs. Cattle as beasts of toil are fixed capital; as beef cattle
they are raw material which finally enters into circulation as a
product; hence they are circulating, not fixed capital.

The mere fixation of a means of production for a considerable length of
time in repeated labour-processes, which however are connected,
continuous, and therefore form a production period — i.e., the entire
time of production required to finish a certain product — obliges the
capitalist, just as fixed capital does, to make his advances for a
longer or shorter term, but this does not make his capital fixed
capital. Seeds for instance are not fixed capital, but only raw material
which is held for about a year in the process of production. All capital
is held in the process of production so long as it functions as
productive capital, and so are therefore all elements of productive
capital, whatever their material forms, their functions and the modes of
circulation of their values. Whether this period of fixation lasts a
long or a short time — a matter depending on the kind of process of
production involved or the useful effect aimed at — this does not effect
the distinction between fixed and circulating capital.^([20])

A part of the instruments of labour, which includes the general
instruments of labour, is either localised as soon as it enters the
process of production as an instrument of labour, i.e., is prepared for
its productive function, such as for instance machinery, or is produced
from the outset in its immovable, localised form, such as improvements
of the soil, factory buildings, blast furnaces, canals, railways, etc.
The constant attachment of the instrument of labour to the process of
production in which it is to function is here also due to its physical
mode of existence. On the other hand an instrument of labour may
physically change continually from place to place, may move about, and
nevertheless be constantly in the process of production; for instance a
locomotive, a ship, beasts of burden, etc. Neither does immobility in
the one case bestow upon it the character of fixed capital, nor does
mobility in the other case deprive it of this character. But the fact
that some instruments of labour are localised, attached to the soil by
their roots, assigns to this portion of fixed capital a peculiar role in
the economy of nations. They cannot be sent abroad, cannot circulate as
commodities in the world-market. Title to this fixed capital may change,
it may be bought and sold, and to this extent may circulate ideally.
These titles of ownership may even circulate in foreign markets, for
instance in the form of stocks. But a change of the persons owning this
class of fixed capital does not alter the relation of the immovable,
materially fixed part of the national wealth to its immovable
part.^([21])

The peculiar circulation of fixed capital results in a peculiar
turnover. That part of the value which it loses in its bodily form by
wear and tear circulates as a part of the value of the product. The
product converts itself by means of its circulation from commodities
into money; hence the same applies to the value-part of the instrument
of labour circulated by the product, and this value drips down in the
form of money from the process of circulation in proportion as this
instrument of labour ceases to be a depository of value in the process
of production. Its value thus acquires a double existence. One part of
it remains attached to its use-form or bodily form belonging in the
process of production. The other part detaches itself from that form in
the shape of money. In the performance of its function that part of the
value of an instrument of labour which exists in its bodily form
constantly decreases, while that which is transformed into money
constantly increases until the instrument is at last exhausted and its
entire value, detached from its corpse, is converted into money. Here
the peculiarity of the turnover of this element of productive capital
becomes apparent. The transformation of its value into money keeps pace
with the pupation into money of the commodity which is the carrier of
its value. But its reconversion from the money-form into a use-form
proceeds separately from the reconversion of the commodities into other
elements of their production and is determined rather by its own period
of reproduction, that is, by the time during which the instrument of
labour wears out and must be replaced by another of the same kind. If a
machine worth £10,000 lasts for, say, a period of ten years, then the
period of turnover of the value originally advanced for it amounts to
ten years. It need not be renewed and continues to function in its
bodily form until this period has expired. In the meantime its value
circulates piecemeal as a part of the value of the commodities whose
continuous production it serves and it is thus gradually transformed
into money until finally at the end of ten years it entirely assumes the
form of money and is reconverted from money into a machine, in other
words, has completed its turn-over. Until this time of reproduction
arrives, its value is gradually accumulated, in the form of a money
reserve fund to start with.

The remaining elements of productive capital consist partly of those
elements of constant capital which exist as auxiliary and raw materials,
partly of variable capital invested in labour-power.

The analysis of the labour-process and of the process of producing
surplus-value (Buch I, Kap. V) [English edition: Ch. VII. — _Ed_.]
showed that these different components behave quite differently as
creators of products and as creators of values. The value of that part
of constant capital which consists of auxiliary and raw materials — the
same as of that part which consists of instruments of labour —
re-appears in the value of the product as only transferred value, while
labour-power adds an equivalent of its value to the product by means of
the labour-process, in other words, actually reproduces its value.
Furthermore, one part of the auxiliary substances — fuel, lighting gas,
etc. — is consumed in the process of labour without entering bodily into
the product, while the other part of them enters bodily into the product
and forms its material substance. But all these differences are
immaterial so far as the circulation and therefore the mode of turnover
is concerned. Since auxiliary and raw materials are entirely consumed in
the creation of the product, they transfer their value entirely to the
product. Hence this value is circulated in its entirety by the product,
transforms itself into money and from money back into the elements of
production of the commodity. Its turnover is not interrupted, as is that
of fixed capital, but passes uninterruptedly through the entire circuit
of its forms, so that these elements of productive capital are
continually renewed in kind.

As for the variable component of productive capital, which is invested
in labour-power, be it noted that labour-power is purchased for a
definite period of time. As soon as the capitalist has bought it and
embodied it in the process of production, it forms a component part of
his capital, its variable component. Labour-power acts daily during the
period of time in which it adds to the product not only its own value
for the whole day but also a surplus-value in excess of it. We shall not
consider this surplus-value for the present. After labour-power has been
bought and it has performed its function, say for a week, its purchase
must be constantly renewed within the customary intervals of time. The
equivalent of its value, which the labour-power adds to the product
during its functioning and which is transformed into money in
consequence of the circulation of the product, must continually be
reconverted from money into labour-power or continually pass through the
complete circuit of its forms, that is, must be turned over, if the
circuit of continuous production is not to be interrupted.

Hence that part of the value of the productive capital which has been
advanced for labour-power is entirely transferred to the product (we
constantly leave the question of surplus-value out of consideration
here), passes with it through the two metamorphoses belonging in the
sphere of circulation and always remains incorporated in the process of
production by virtue of this continuous renewal. Hence, however
different otherwise may be the relation between labour-power, so far as
the creation of value is concerned, and the component parts of constant
capital which _do not constitute fixed_ capital, this kind of turnover
of its value labour-power shares with them, in contradistinction to
fixed capital. These components of the productive capital — the parts of
its value invested in labour-power and in means of production which do
not constitute fixed capital — by reason of their common turnover
characteristics confront the fixed capital as _circulating_ or _fluent_
capital.

We have already shown [Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, Ch. VI, pp. 167-76.
— _Ed_.] that the money which the capitalist pays to the labourer for
the use of his labour-power is nothing more or less than the form of the
general equivalent for the means of subsistence required by the
labourer. To this extent, the variable capital consists in substance of
means of subsistence. But in this case, where we are discussing
turnover, it is a question of form. The capitalist does not buy the
labourer’s means of subsistence but his labour-power. And that which
forms the variable part of his capital is not the labourer’s means of
subsistence but his labour-power in action. What the capitalist consumes
productively in the labour-process is the labour-power itself and not
the labourer’s means of subsistence. It is the labourer himself who
converts the money received for his labour-power into means of
subsistence, in order to reconvert them into labour-power, to keep
alive, just as the capitalist for instance converts a part of the
surplus-value of the commodities he sells for money into means of
subsistence for himself without thereby warranting the statement that
the purchaser of his commodities pays him in means of subsistence. Even
if the labourer is paid a part of his wages in means of subsistence, in
kind, this nowadays amounts to a second transaction. He sells his
labour-power at a certain price, with the understanding that he shall
receive a part of this price in means of subsistence. This changes
merely the form of the payment, but not the fact that what he actually
sells is his labour-power. It is a second transaction, which does not
take place between the labourer and the capitalist, but between the
labourer as a buyer of commodities and the capitalist as a seller of
commodities, while in the first transaction the labourer is a seller of
a commodity (his labour-power) and the capitalist its buyer. It is
exactly the same as if a capitalist, on selling his commodity, say, a
machine, to an iron works, has it replaced by some other commodity, say,
iron. It is therefore not the labourer’s means of subsistence which
acquire the definite character of circulating capital as opposed to
fixed capital. Nor is it his labour-power. It is rather that part of the
value of productive capital which is invested in labour-power and which,
by virtue of the form of its turnover, receives this character in common
with some, and in contrast with other, component parts of the constant
capital.

The value of the circulating capital — in labour-power and means of
production — is advanced only for the time during which the product is
in process of production, in accordance with the scale of production
determined by the volume of the fixed capital. This value enters
entirely into the product, is therefore fully returned by its sale from
the sphere of circulation, and can be advanced anew. The labour-power
and means of production, in which the circulating component of capital
exists, are withdrawn from circulation to the extent required for the
creation and sale of the finished product, but they must be continually
replaced and renewed by purchasing them back, by reconverting them from
the money-form into the elements of production. They are withdrawn from
the market in smaller quantities at a time than the elements of fixed
capital, but they must be withdrawn again from it so much the more
frequently and the advance of capital invested in them must be renewed
at shorter intervals. This constant renewal is effected by the
continuous conversion of the product which circulates their entire
value. And finally, they pass through the entire circuit of
metamorphoses, not only so far as their value is concerned but also
their material form. They are perpetually reconverted from commodities
into the elements of production of the same commodities.

Together with its own value, labour-power always adds to the product
surplus-value, the embodiment of unpaid labour. This is continuously
circulated by the finished product and converted into money just as are
other elements of its value. But here, where we are primarily concerned
with the turnover of capital-value, and not with that of the
surplus-value occurring at the same time, we dismiss the latter for the
present.

From the foregoing one may conclude the following:

1. The definiteness of form of fixed and circulating capital arises
merely from the different turnovers of the capital-value, functioning in
the process of production, or of the _productive capital_. This
difference in turnover arises in its turn from the different manner in
which the various components of productive capital transfer their value
to the product; it is not due to the different parts played by these
components in the generation of product value, nor to their
characteristic behaviour in the process of self-expansion. Finally the
difference in the delivery of value to the product — and therefore the
different manner in which this value is circulated by the product and is
renewed in its original bodily form through the metamorphoses of the
product — arises from the difference of the material shapes in which the
productive capital exists, one portion of it being entirely consumed
during the creation of an individual product and the other being used up
only gradually. Hence it is only the productive capital which can be
divided into fixed and circulating capital. But this antithesis does not
apply to the other two modes of existence of industrial capital, that is
to say, commodity-capital and money-capital, nor does it exist as an
antithesis of these two modes to productive capital. It exists _only for
productive capital and within its sphere_. No matter how much
money-capital and commodity-capital may function as capital and no
matter how fluently they may circulate, they cannot become circulating
capital as distinct from fixed capital until they are transformed into
circulating components of productive capital. But because these two
forms of capital dwell in the sphere of circulation, Political Economy
as we shall see has been misled since the time of Adam Smith into
lumping them together with the circulating part of productive capital
and assigning them to the category of circulating capital. They are
indeed circulation capital in contrast to productive capital, but they
are not circulating capital in contrast to fixed capital.

2. The turnover of the fixed component part of capital, and therefore
also the time of turnover necessary for it, comprises several turnovers
of the circulating constituents of capital. In the time during which the
fixed capital turns over once, the circulating capital turns over
several times. One of the component parts of the value of the productive
capital acquires the definiteness of form of fixed capital only in case
the means of production in which it exists is not wholly worn out in the
time required for the fabrication of the product and its expulsion from
the process of production as a commodity. One part of its value must
remain tied up in the form of the still preserved old use-form, while
the other part is circulated by the finished product, and this
circulation on the contrary simultaneously circulates the entire value
of the fluent component parts of the capital.

3. The value-part of the productive capital, the part invested in fixed
capital, is advanced in one lump sum for the entire period of employment
of that part of the means of production of which the fixed capital
consists. Hence this value is thrown into the circulation by the
capitalist all at one time. But it is withdrawn again from the
circulation only piecemeal and gradually by realising the parts of value
which the fixed capital adds piecemeal to the commodities. On the other
hand the means of production themselves, in which a component part of
the productive capital becomes fixed, are withdrawn from the circulation
all at one time to be embodied in the process of production for the
entire period in which they function. But they do not require for this
period any replacement by new samples of the same kind, do not require
reproduction. They continue for a longer or shorter period to contribute
to the creation of the commodities thrown into circulation without
withdrawing from circulation the elements of their own renewal. Hence
they do not require from the capitalist a renewal of his advance during
this period. Finally the capital-value invested in fixed capital does
not pass bodily through the circuit of its forms, during the functioning
period of the means of production in which this capital-value exists,
but only as concerns its value, and even this it does only parts and
gradually. In other words, a portion of its value is continually
circulated and converted into money as a part of the value of the
commodities, without being reconverted from money into its original
bodily form. This reconversion of money into the bodily form of the
means of production does not take place until the end of its functioning
period, when the means of production has been completely consumed.

4. The elements of circulating capital are as permanently fixed in the
process of production — if it is to be uninterrupted — as the elements
of fixed capital. But the elements of circulating capital thus fixed are
continually renewed in kind (the means of production by new products of
the same kind, labour-power by constantly renewed purchases) while in
the case of the elements of fixed capital neither they themselves are
renewed nor need their purchases be renewed so long as they continue to
exist. There are always raw and auxiliary materials in the process of
production, but always new products of the same kind, after the old
elements have been consumed in the creation of the finished product.
Labour-power likewise always exists in the process of production, but
only by means of ever new purchases, frequently involving changes of
persons. But the same identical buildings, machines, etc., continue to
function, during repeated turnovers of the circulating capital, in the
same repeated processes of production.

II. Components, Replacements, Repairs and Accumulation of Fixed Capital

In any investment of capital the separate elements of the fixed capital
have different lifetimes, and therefore different turnover times. In a
railway, for instance, the rails, sleepers, earthworks, terminals,
bridges, tunnels, locomotives, and carriages have different functional
periods and times of reproduction, hence the capital advanced for them
has different times of turnover. For a great number of years, buildings,
platforms, water tanks, viaducts, tunnels, cuttings, dams, in short
everything called “WORKS OF ART” in English railroading, do not require
any renewal. The things which wear out most are the tracks and ROLLING
STOCK.

Originally in the construction of modern railways it was the prevailing
opinion, nursed by the most prominent practical engineers, that a
railway would last a century and that the wear and tear of the rails was
so imperceptible that it could be ignored for all financial and other
practical purposes; 100 to 150 years was supposed to be the life of good
rails. But it was soon found that the life of a rail, which naturally
depends on the speed of the locomotives, the weight and number of
trains, the diameter of the rails, and on a multitude of other attendant
circumstances, did not exceed an average of 20 years. In some railway
terminals, great traffic centres, the rails even wear out every year.
About 1867 began the introduction of steel rails, which cost about twice
as much as iron rails but which last more than twice as long. The
life-time of wooden sleepers was from 12 to 15 years. It was also
ascertained with regard to the rolling stock that freight cars wear out
faster than passenger cars. The life of a locomotive was estimated in
1867 to be about 10 to 12 years.

The wear and tear is first of all a result of use. As a rule “the wear
of the rails is proportionate to the number of trains.” (R.C., No.
17645.)^([22]) With increased speed the wear and tear of a railway
increased in a higher ratio than the square of the speed; that is to
say, if you doubled the speed of the engine, you more than quadrupled
the cost of wear and tear of the road. (R.C., No. 17046.)

Wear and tear is furthermore caused by the action of natural forces. For
instance sleepers suffer not only from actual wear but also from rot.

“The cost of maintaining the road does not depend so much upon the wear
and tear of the traffic passing over it, as upon the quality of wood,
iron, bricks and mortars exposed to the atmosphere. A month of severe
water would do not more damage to the road of a railway than a year’s
traffic.” (R. P. Williams, “On the Maintenance of Permanent Way,” Paper
read at the Institute of Civil Engineers, Autumn, 1867. [R. P.
Williams’s paper was published in Money Market Review of December 2,
1867. — _Ed_.])

Finally, here as everywhere else in modern industry, the moral
depreciation plays a role. After the lapse of ten years, one can
generally buy the same number of cars and locomotives for £30,000 that
would previously have cost £40,000. Depreciation in the rolling stock
must be set at 25 per cent of the market price even when there is no
depreciation whatever in its use-values. (Lardner, _Railway Economy_.)

“Tube bridges will not be replaced in their present form.”

(Because now there are better forms for such bridges.)

“Ordinary repairs, taking away gradually, and replacing are not
practicable.” (W. P. Adams, _Roads and Rails_, London, 1862.)

The instruments of labour are largely modified all the time by the
progress of industry. Hence they are not replaced in their original, but
in their modified form. On the one hand the mass of the fixed capital
invested in a certain bodily form and endowed in that form with a
certain average life constitutes one reason for the only gradual pace of
the introduction of new machinery, etc., and therefore an obstacle to
the rapid general introduction of improved instruments of labour. On the
other hand competition compels the replacement of the old instruments of
labour by new ones before the expiration of their natural life,
especially when decisive changes occur. Such premature renewals of
factory equipment on a rather large social scale are mainly enforced by
catastrophes or crises.

By wear and tear (moral depreciation excepted) is meant that part of
value which the fixed capital, on being used, gradually transmits to the
product, in proportion to its average loss of use-value.

This wear and tear takes place partly in such a way that the fixed
capital has a certain average durability. It is advanced for this entire
period in one sum. After the termination of this period it must be
totally replaced. So far as living instruments of labour are concerned,
for instance horses, their reproduction is timed by nature itself. Their
average lifetime as instruments of labour is determined by laws of
nature. As soon as this term has expired they must be replaced by new
ones. A horse cannot be replaced piecemeal; it must be replaced by
another horse.

Other elements of fixed capital permit of a periodical or partial
renewal. In this instance partial or periodical replacement must be
distinguished from gradual extension of the business.

The fixed capital consists in part of homogeneous constituents which do
not however last the same length of time but are renewed piecemeal at
various intervals. This is true for instance of the rails and railway
stations, which must be replaced more often than those of the remainder
of the trackage. It also applies to the sleepers, which on the Belgian
railways had to be renewed in the forties at the rate of 8 per cent
annually, according to Lardner, so that all the sleepers were renewed in
the course of 12½ years. Hence we have here the following situation: a
certain sum is advanced for a certain kind of fixed capital for say ten
years. This expenditure is made at one time. But a definite part of this
fixed capital, the value of which has entered into the value of the
product and been converted with it into money, is replaced in kind every
year, while the remainder continues to exist in its original body form.
It is this advance in one sum and the only partial reproduction in
bodily form which distinguish this capital, as fixed, from circulating
capital.

Other pieces of the fixed capital consist of heterogeneous components,
which wear out in unequal periods of time and must so be replaced. This
applies particularly to machines. What we have just said concerning the
different durabilities of different constituent parts of a fixed capital
applies in this case to the durability of different component parts of
any machine figuring as a piece of this fixed capital.

With regard to the gradual extension of the business in the course of
the partial renewal, we make the following remarks: Although, as we have
seen, the fixed capital continues to perform its functions in the
process of production in kind, a part of its value, proportionate to the
average wear and tear, has circulated with the product, has been
converted into money, and forms an element in the money reserve fund
intended for the replacement of the capital pending its reproduction in
kind. This part of the value of the fixed capital transformed into money
may serve to extend the business or to make improvements in the
machinery which will increase the efficiency of the latter. Thus
reproduction takes place in larger or smaller periods of time, and this
is, from the standpoint of society, reproduction on an enlarged scale —
extensive if the means of production is extended; intensive if the means
of production is made more effective. This reproduction on an extended
scale does not result from accumulation — transformation of
surplus-value into capital — but from the reconversion of the value
which has branched off, detached itself in the form of money from the
body of the fixed capital into new additional or at least more effective
fixed capital of the same kind. Of course it depends partly on the
specific nature of the business, to what extent and in what proportions
it is capable of such gradual addition, hence also in what amount a
reserve fund must be collected to be reinvested in this way, and what
period of time this requires. To what extent furthermore improvements in
the details of existing machinery can be made, depends of course on the
nature of these improvements and the construction of the machine itself.
How well this point is considered at the very outset in the construction
of railways is shown by Adams:

“The whole structure should be set out on the principle which governs
the beehive — capacity for indefinite extension. Any fixed and decided
symmetrical structure is to be deprecated, as needing subsequent pulling
down in case of enlargement.” (p. 123.)

This depends largely on the available space. In the case of some
buildings additional storeys may be built; in the case of others lateral
extension, hence more land, is required. Within capitalist production
there is on the one side much waste of material, on the other much
impracticable lateral extension of this sort (partly to the injury of
the labour-power) in the gradual expansion of the business, because
nothing is undertaken according to a social plan, but everything depends
on the infinitely different conditions, means, etc., with which the
individual capitalist operates. This results in a great waste of the
productive forces.

This piecemeal reinvestment of the money reserve fund (i.e., of that
part of the fixed capital which has been reconverted into money) is
easiest in agriculture. A field of production of a given area is here
capable of the greatest possible gradual absorption of capital. The same
applies to where there is natural reproduction as in cattle breeding.

Fixed capital entails special maintenance costs. A part of this
maintenance is provided by the labour-process itself; fixed capital
spoils, if it is not employed in the labour-process (Buch I, Kap. VI, S.
196 and Kap. XIII, S. 423, [English edition: Ch. VIII and XV. — _Ed_.]
on wear and tear of machinery when not in use). The English law
therefore explicitly treats it as WASTE, if rented lands are not
cultivated according to the custom of the land. (W. A. Holdsworth,
Barrister at Law, _The Law of Landlord and Tenant_, London, 1857, p.
96.)

This maintenance resulting from use in the labour-process is a free gift
inherent in the nature of living labour. Moreover the preservative power
of labour is of a two-fold character. On the one hand it preserves the
value of the materials of labour by transferring it to the product, on
the other hand it preserves the value of the instruments of labour
without transferring this value to the product, by preserving their
use-value through their activity in the process of production.

The fixed capital however requires also a positive expenditure of labour
for its maintenance in good repair. The machinery must be cleaned from
time to time. It is a question here of additional labour without which
the machinery becomes useless, of merely warding off the noxious
influences of the elements, which are inseparable from the process of
production; hence it is a question of keeping the machinery literally in
working order. It goes without saying that the normal durability of
fixed capital is calculated on the supposition that all the conditions
which it can perform its functions normally during that time are
fulfilled, just as we assume, in placing a man’s life at 30 years on the
average, that he will wash himself. It is here not a question of
replacing the labour contained in the machine, but of constant
additional labour made necessary by its use. It is not a question of
labour performed by the machine, but of labour spent on it, of labour
which it is not an agent of production but raw material. The capital
expended for this labour must be classed as circulating capital,
although it does not enter into the labour-process proper to which the
product owes its existence. This labour must be continually expended in
production, hence its value must be continually replaced by that of the
product. The capital invested in it belongs in that part of circulating
capital which has to cover the unproductive costs and is to be
distributed over the produced values according to an annual average
calculation. We have seen [Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, p. 426, Note 1.
— _Ed_.] that in industry proper this labour of cleaning is performed by
the workingmen gratis, during the rest periods, and for that very reason
often also during the process of production itself, and most accidents
can be traced to this source. This labour does not figure in the price
of the product. As far as that goes the consumer receives it gratis. On
the other hand the capitalist thus does not pay the maintenance costs of
the machine. The labourer pays _in persona_, and this is one of the
mysteries of the self-preservation of capital, which in point of fact
constitute a legal claim by the labourer on the machinery, on the
strength of which he is a co-owner of the machine even from the
standpoint of bourgeois law. However, in various branches of production,
in which the machinery must be removed from the process of production
for the purpose of cleaning and where therefore the cleaning cannot be
performed in between, as for instance in the case of locomotives, this
maintenance work counts as current expenses and is therefore an element
of circulating capital. For instance a goods engine should not run more
than 3 days without being kept one day in the shed. If you attempt to
wash out the boiler before it has cooled down that is very injurious.
(R.C., No. 17823.)

The actual repairs or patchwork require expenditures of capital and
labour which are not contained in the originally advanced capital and
cannot therefore be replaced and covered, at least not always, by the
gradual replacement of the value of the fixed capital. For instance if
the value of the fixed capital is £10,000 and its total life of 10
years, then these £10,000, having been entirely converted into money
after the lapse of ten years, will replace only the value of the capital
originally invested, but they do not replace the capital, or labour,
added in the meantime for repairs. This is an additional component part
of the value, which is not advanced all at one time but whenever a need
for it arises, and the various times for advancing it are in the very
nature of things accidental. All fixed capital demands such subsequent,
dosed out, additional outlay of capital for instruments of labour and
labour-power.

The damage which separate parts of the machinery, etc., may incur is
naturally accidental and so are therefore the repairs involved.
Nevertheless two kinds of repairs are to be distinguished in the general
mass, which are of a more or less fixed character and fall within
various periods of the life of fixed capital. These are the ailments of
childhood and the far more numerous ailments of the post-middle
durability period. A machine for instance may be commissioned in ever so
perfect a condition, still actual use will reveal shortcomings which
must be remedied by subsequent labour. On the other hand the more a
machine passes beyond the mid-durability point, the more therefore the
normal wear and tear has accumulated and the more the material of which
it consists has been worn out and become decrepit, the more numerous and
considerable will be the repairs required to keep it going for the
remainder of its average durability. It is the same with an old man, who
incurs more medical expenses to keep from dying prematurely than a young
and strong man. So in spite of its accidental character repair work is
unevenly distributed over the various periods of life of fixed capital.

From the foregoing and from the generally accidental character of repair
work on machines its follows:

In one respect the actual expenditure of labour-power and instruments of
labour on repairs is accidental, like the circumstances which
necessitate these repairs; the amount of the repairs needed is unevenly
distributed over the different periods of fixed capital’s life. In other
respects it is taken for granted in estimating the average life of fixed
capital that it is constantly kept in good working order, partly by
cleaning (including the cleaning of the premises), partly by repairs as
often as required. The transfer of value through wear and tear of fixed
capital is calculated on its average life, but this average life itself
is based on the assumption that the additional capital required for
maintenance purposes is continually advanced.

But then it is also evident that the value added by this extra
expenditure of capital and labour cannot enter into the price of the
commodities concerned at the same time as it is incurred. For example, a
manufacturer of yarn cannot sell his yarn dearer this week than last,
merely because one of his wheels broke or a belt tore this week. The
general costs of spinning have not been changed in any way by this
accident in some individual factory. Here, as in all determinations of
value, the average decides. Experience shows the average occurrence of
such accidents and the average volume of the maintenance and repair work
necessary during the average life of the fixed capital invested in a
given branch of business. This average expense is distributed over the
average life and added to the price of the product in corresponding
aliquot parts; hence it is replaced by means of its sale.

The additional capital which is thus replaced belongs to the circulating
capital, although the manner of its expenditure is irregular. As it is
of paramount importance to remedy every damage to machinery immediately,
every comparatively large factory employs in addition to the regular
factory force special personnel — engineers, carpenters, mechanics,
locksmiths, etc. Their wages are a part of the variable capital and the
value of their labour is distributed over the product. On the other hand
the expenses for means of production are calculated on the basis of the
above-mentioned average, according to which they form continually a part
of the value of the product, although they are actually advanced in
irregular periods and therefore enter into the product or the fixed
capital in irregular periods. This capital, expended in repairs properly
so called, is in many respects a capital _sui generis_, which can be
classed neither as circulating nor as fixed capital, but belongs with
greater justification to the former, since it figures among the running
expenses.

The manner of book-keeping does not of course change in any way the
actual state of affairs booked. But it is important to note that
customarily many lines of business figure the costs of repairs together
with the actual wear and tear of the fixed capital in the following
manner: Let the advanced fixed capital be £10,000 and its durability 15
years. The annual wear and tear is then £666⅔. But the depreciation is
calculated on a durability of only ten years; in other words, £1,000 are
added annually to the price of the produced commodities for wear and
tear of the fixed capital, instead of £666⅔. Thus £333⅓ are reserved for
repairs, etc. (The figures 10 and 15 are chosen only by way of
illustration.) This amount is spent on an average for repairs, so that
the fixed capital may last 15 years. Such a calculation naturally does
not prevent the fixed capital and the additional capital spent on
repairs from belonging to different categories. On the strength of this
mode of calculation it was assumed for instance that the lowest cost
estimate for the maintenance and replacement of steamships was 15 per
cent annually the time of reproduction being therefore 6⅔ years. In the
sixties, the English government indemnified the Peninsular and Oriental
Co. at the annual rate of 16 percent, corresponding to a reproduction
time of 6¼ years. On railways the average life of a locomotive is 10
years, but the depreciation, counting in repairs is taken as 12½ per
cent, which brings down its durability to 8 years. In the case of
passenger and goods cars, the estimate is 9 per cent, or a durability of
11 1/9 years.

Legislation has everywhere drawn a distinction, in leases of houses and
other objects which represent fixed capital to their owners and are
leased as such, between normal depreciation, which is the result of
time, the action of the elements, and normal wear on the one hand and on
the other those occasional repairs which are required from time to time
for maintenance during the normal life of the house and during its
normal use. As a rule, the former are borne by the owner, the latter by
the tenant. Repairs are further divided into ordinary and substantial
ones. The last-named are partly a renewal of the fixed capital in its
bodily form, and they fall likewise on the shoulders of the owner,
unless the lease explicitly states the contrary. Take for instance the
English law:

“A tenant from year to year, on the other hand, is not bound to do more
than keep the premises wind and watertight, when that can be done
without ‘substantial’ repairs; and generally to do repairs coming fairly
under the head ‘ordinary.’ Even with respect to those parts of the
premises which are the subject of ‘ordinary’ repairs, regard must be had
to their age and general state, and condition, when he took possession,
for he is not bound to replace old and worn-out materials with new ones,
nor to make good the inevitable depreciation resulting from time and
ordinary wear and tear.” (Holdsworth, _Law of Landlord and Tenant_, pp.
90 and 91.)

Entirely different from the replacement of wear and tear and from the
work of maintenance and repair is _insurance_, which relates to
destruction caused by extraordinary phenomena of nature, fire, flood,
etc. This must be made good out of the surplus-value and is a deduction
from it. Or, considered from the point of view of society as a whole,
there must be continuous over-production, that is, production on a
larger scale than is necessary for the simple replacement and
reproduction of the existing wealth, quite apart from the increase in
population, so as to be in possession of the means of production
required to compensate for the extraordinary destruction caused by
accidents and natural forces.

In point of fact only the smallest part of the capital needed for
replacement consists of the money reserve fund. The most substantial
part consists in the extension of the scale of production itself, which
partly is actual expansion and partly belongs to the normal volume of
production in those branches of industry which produce the fixed
capital. For instance a machine factory must arrange things so that the
factories of its customers can annually be extended and that a number of
them will always stand in need of total or partial reproduction.

On determining the wear and tear as well as the costs of repairs,
according to the social average, great disparity necessarily appears,
even in the case of capital investments of equal size, operating
otherwise under equal conditions and in the same branch of industry. In
practice a machine, etc., lasts with one capitalist longer than the
average period, while with another it does not last so long. With the
one the costs of repairs are above, with the other below average, etc.
But the addition to the price of the commodities resulting from wear and
tear and from costs of repairs is the same and is determined by the
average. The one therefore gets more out of this additional price than
he really added, the other less. This circumstance as well as all others
which result in different gains for different capitalists in the same
line of business with the same degree of exploitation of labour-power
tends to enhance the difficulty of understanding the true nature of
surplus-value.

The line between repairs proper and replacement, between costs of
maintenance and costs of renewal, is rather flexible. Hence the eternal
dispute, for instance in railroading, whether certain expenses are for
repairs or for replacement, whether they must be defrayed from current
expenditures or from the original stock. A transfer of expenses for
repairs to capital account instead of revenue account is the familiar
method by which railway boards of directors artificially inflate their
dividends. However, experience has already furnished the most important
clues for this. According to Lardner, the subsequent labour required
during the early life of a railway for example

“ought not to be denominated repairs, but should be considered as an
essential part of the construction of the railway, and in the financial
accounts should be debited to capital, and not to revenue, not being
expenses due to wear and tear, or to the legitimate operation of the
traffic, but to the original and inevitable incompleteness of the
construction of the line.” (Lardner, loc. cit., p. 40.)

“The only sound way is to charge each year’s revenue with the
depreciation necessarily suffered to earn the revenue, whether the
amount is actually spent or not.” (Captain Fitzmaurice, “Committee of
Inquiry on Caledonian Railway,” published in _Money Market Review_,
1867.)

The separation of the replacement and maintenance of fixed capital
become practically impossible and purposeless in agriculture, at least
when not operated by steam. According to Kirchhof (_Handbuch der
landwirthschaftlichen Betriebslehre_, Dresden, 1852, p. 137),

“wherever there is a complete, though not excessive, supply of
implements (of agricultural and other implements and farm appliances of
every description) it is the custom to estimate the annual wear and tear
and maintenance of the implements, according to the different existing
conditions, at a general average of 15 to 25 per cent of the original
stock.”

In the case of the rolling stock of a railway, repairs and replacement
cannot be separated at all.

“We maintain our stock by number. Whatever number of engines we have we
maintain that. If one is destroyed by age, and it is better to build a
new one, we build it at the expense of revenue, of course, taking credit
for the materials of the old one as far as they go.... there is a great
deal left; there are the wheels, the axles, the boilers, and in fact a
great deal of the old engine is left.” (T. Gooch, Chairman of Great
Western Railway Co., R. C. on Railways, p. 858, Nos. 17327-17329.)
“...Repairing means renewing; I do not believe in the word
replacement...; once a railway company has bought a vehicle or an
engine, it ought to be repaired, and in that way admit of going on for
ever.” (No. 17784.) “...The engines are maintained for ever out of this
8½ d. We rebuild our engines. If you purchase an engine entirely it
would be spending more money than is necessary ... yet there is always a
pair of wheels or an axle or some portion of the engine which comes in,
and hence it cheapens the cost of producing a practically new engine.”
(No. 17790.) “I am at this moment turning out a new engine every week,
or practically a new engine, for it has a new boiler, cylinder, or
framing.” (No. 17823. Archibald Sturrock, LOCOMOTIVE SUPERINTENDENT OF
GREAT NORTHERN RAILWAY, IN R. C., 1867.)

The same with coaches:

“In the course of time the stock of engines and vehicles is continually
repaired. New wheels are put on at one time, and a new body at another.
The different moving parts most subject to wear are gradually renewed;
and the engines and vehicles may be conceived even to be subject to such
a succession of repairs, that in many of them not a vestige of the
original materials remains.... Even in this case, however, the old
materials of coaches or engines are more or less worked up into other
vehicles or engines, and never totally disappear from the road. The
movable capital therefore may be considered to be in a state of
continual reproduction; and that which, in the case of the permanent
way, must take place altogether at a future epoch, when the entire road
will have to be relaid, takes place in the rolling stock gradually from
year to year. Its existence is perennial, and it is in a constant state
of rejuvenescence.” (Lardner, _op. cit._, pp. 115-16.)

This process, which Lardner here describes relative to a railway, does
not fit the case of an individual factory, but may well serve as an
illustration of continuous, partial reproduction of fixed capital
intermingled with repairs within an entire branch of industry or even
within the aggregate production considered on a social scale.

Here is proof of the lengths to which adroit boards of directors may go
in manipulating the terms repairs and replacement for the purpose of
extracting dividends. According to the above-quoted paper read by R. P.
Williams, various English railway companies wrote off the following sums
from the revenue account, as averages over a number of years, for
repairs and maintenance of the permanent way and buildings (per English
mile of track annually).

  ------------------------ ------
  London & North Western   £370
  Midland                  £225
  London & South Western   £257
  Great Northern           £360
  Lancashire & Yorkshire   £377
  South Eastern            £263
  Brighton                 £266
  Manchester & Sheffield   £200
  ------------------------ ------

These differences arise only to a very minor degree from differences in
the actual expenses; they are due almost exclusively to different
methods of calculation, according to whether items of expenses are
debited to the capital or the revenue account. Williams says so in so
many words that a lesser charge is booked because this is necessary for
a good dividend, and a higher charge is booked because there is a
greater revenue which can bear it.

In certain cases the wear and tear, and therefore its replacement, is
practically infinitesimal so that nothing but costs of repairs have to
be charged. Lardner’s statements below relative to works of art in
railroading apply in general to all such durable structures as docks,
canals, iron and stone bridges, etc.

“That wear and tear which, being due to the slow operation of time
acting upon the more solid structures, produces an effect altogether
insensible when observed through short periods, but which, after a long
interval of time, such, for example, as centuries, must necessitate the
reconstruction of some or all even of the most solid structures. These
changes may not unaptly be assimilated to the periodical and secular
inequalities which take place in the movements of the great bodies of
the universe. The operation of time upon the more massive works of art
upon the railway, such as the bridges, tunnels, viaducts, etc., afford
examples of what may be called the secular wear and tear. The more rapid
and visible deterioration, which is made good by repairs or
reconstruction effected at shorter intervals, is analogous to the
periodic inequalities. In the annual repairs is included the casual
damage which the exterior of the more solid and durable works may from
time to time sustain; but, independently of these repairs, age produces
its effects even on these structures, and an epoch must arrive, however
remote it be, at which they would be reduced to a state which will
necessitate their reconstruction. For financial and economic purposes
such an epoch is perhaps too remote to render it necessary to bring it
into practical calculation, and therefore it need here only be noticed
in passing.” (Lardner, loc. cit., pp., 38, 39.)

This applies to all similar structures of secular duration, in which
cases therefore the capital advanced need not be gradually replaced
commensurate with their wear and tear, but only the annual average costs
of maintenance and repair need be transferred to the prices of the
product.

Although, as we have seen, a greater part of the money returning for the
replacement of the wear and tear of the fixed capital is annually, or
even in shorter intervals, reconverted into its bodily form,
nevertheless every single capitalist requires a sinking fund for that
part of his fixed capital which falls due for reproduction only after a
lapse of years but must then be entirely replaced. A considerable
component part of the fixed capital precludes gradual reproduction
because of its peculiar properties. Besides, in cases where the
reproduction takes place piecemeal in such a way that at short intervals
new stock is added to the depreciated old stock, a previous accumulation
of money of a greater or smaller amount, depending on the specific
character of the branch of industry, is necessary before the replacement
can be effected. Not just any sum of money will suffice for this
purpose; a definite amount is needed.

If we study this question on the assumption of simple circulation of
money, without regard to the credit system, of which we shall treat
later, [The capitalist credit system is treated in parts IV and V of the
third volume of Capital. — _Ed_.] then the mechanism of this movement is
as follows: It was shown (Buch I, Kap. III, 3a) [English edition: Volume
I, Ch. III, 3a, — _Ed_.] that the proportion in which the aggregate mass
of money is distributed over a hoard and means of circulation varies
steadily, if one part of the money available in society constantly lies
fallow as a hoard, while another performs the functions of a medium of
circulation or of an immediate reserve fund of the directly circulating
money. Now in our case money that must be accumulated as a hoard in the
hands of a relatively big capitalist in rather large amounts is thrown
all at once into circulation on the purchase of the fixed capital. It
then divides again in society into medium of circulation and hoard. By
means of the sinking fund, in which the value of the fixed capital flows
back to its starting-point in proportion to its wear and tear, a part of
the circulating money again forms a hoard, for a longer or shorter
period, in the hands of the same capitalist whose hoard had, upon the
purchase of the fixed capital, been transformed into a medium of
circulation and passed away from him. It is a continually changing
distribution of the hoard which exists in society and alternately
functions as a medium of circulation and then is separated again, as a
hoard, from the mass of the circulating money. With the development of
the credit system, which necessarily runs parallel with the development
of modern industry and capitalist production, this money no longer
serves as a hoard but as capital; however not in the hands of its owner
but of other capitalists at whose disposal it has been placed.

Notes

20 On account of the difficulty of determining what is fixed and what
circulating capital, Herr Lorenz Stein thinks that this distinction is
meant only to facilitate the treatment of the subject.

21 End of Manuscript IV, beginning of Manuscript II. — _Ed_.

22 The quotations marked R. C. are from: _Royal Commission on Railways.
Minutes of Evidence taken before the Commissioners. Presented to both
Houses of Parliament_, London, 1867.—The questions and answers are
numbered and the numbers given here.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 9: The Aggregate Turnover of Advanced Capital, Cycles of Turnover

We have seen that the fixed and circulating component parts of
productive capital are turned over in various ways and at various
periods, also that the different constituents of the fixed capital of a
business have different periods of turnover, depending on their
different durabilities and therefore on their different times of
reproduction. (On the real or apparent difference in the turnover of
different constituents of circulating capital in the same business, see
the close of this chapter, under 6.)

1) The aggregate turnover of an advanced capital is the average turnover
of its various constituent parts; the mode of its calculation is given
later. Inasmuch as it is merely a question of different periods of time,
nothing is easier than to compute their average. But

2) We have here not alone quantitative but also qualitative difference.

The circulating capital entering into the process of production
transfers its entire value to the product and must therefore be
continually replaced in kind by the sale of the product, if the process
of production is to proceed without interruption. The fixed capital
entering into the process of production transfers only a part of its
value (the wear and tear) to the product and despite this wear and tear
continues functioning in the process of production. Therefore it need
not be replaced in kind until the lapse of intervals of various
duration, at any rate not as frequently as the circulating capital. This
necessity of replacement, the reproduction term, is not only
quantitatively different for the various constituent parts of fixed
capital, but, as we have seen, a part of the perennial fixed capital,
that which lasts longer, may be replaced annually or at shorter
intervals and added in kind to the old fixed capital. In the case of
fixed capital of different properties the replacement can take place
only all at once at the end of its period of durability.

It is therefore necessary to reduce the specific turnovers of the
various parts of fixed capital to a homogeneous form of turnover, so
that they will remain different only quantitatively, namely, according
to duration of turnover.

The qualitative identity does not come about if we take as our
starting-point P ... P, the form of the continuous process of
production. For definite elements of P must be constantly replaced in
kind while others need not. However the form M ... M' undoubtedly yields
this identity of turnover. Take for instance a machine worth £10,000,
which lasts ten years of which one-tenth, or £1,000, is annually
reconverted into money. These £1,000 have been converted in the course
of one year from money-capital into productive capital and
commodity-capital, and then reconverted from this into money-capital.
They have returned to their original form, the money-form, just like the
circulating capital, if we study the latter in this form, and it is
immaterial whether this money-capital of £1,000 is once more converted
at the end of the year into the bodily form of a machine or not. In
calculating the aggregate turnover of the advanced productive capital we
therefore fix all its elements in the money-form, so that the return to
that form concludes the turnover. We assume that value is always
advanced in money, even in the continuous process of production, where
this money-form of value is only that of money of account. Thus we can
compute the average.

3) It follows that even if by far the greater part of the advanced
productive capital consists of fixed capital whose period of
reproduction, hence also of turnover, comprises a cycle of many years,
the capital-value turned over during the year may, on account of the
repeated turnovers of the circulating capital within the same year, be
larger than the aggregate value of the advanced capital.

Suppose the fixed capital is £80,000 and its period of reproduction 10
years, so that £8,000 of it annually return to their money-form, or it
completes one-tenth of its turnover. Suppose further the circulating
capital is £20,000, and its turnover is completed five times per year.
The total capital would then be £100,000. The turned-over fixed capital
is £8,000, the turned-over circulating capital five times £20,000, or
£100,000. Then the capital turned over during one year is £108,000, or
£8,000 more than the advanced capital. 1 + 2/25 of the capital have been
turned over.

4) Therefore the _turnover time of the value_ of the advanced capital
differs from its actual time of reproduction or from the actual time of
turnover of its component parts. Take for instance a capital of £4,000
and let it turn over, say, five times a year. The turned-over capital is
then five times £4,000, or £20,000. But what returns at the end of each
turnover to be advanced anew is the originally advanced capital of
£4,000. Its magnitude is not changed by the number of turnover periods,
during which it performs anew its functions as capital. (Apart from
surplus-value.)

In the illustration under No. 3, then, the sums assumedly returned into
the hands of the capitalist at the end of one year are (a) a sum of
value amounting to £20,000 which he invests again in the circulating
constituents of the capital, and (b) a sum of £8,000 which has been set
free by wear and tear from the value of the advanced fixed capital;
simultaneously this same fixed capital remains in the process of
production, but with the reduced value of £72,000 instead of £80,000.
The process of production therefore would have to be continued for nine
years more, before the advanced fixed capital outlived its term and
ceased to function as a creator of products and values, so that it would
have to be replaced. The advanced capital-value, then, has to pass
through a cycle of turnovers, in the present case a cycle of ten annual
ones, and this cycle is determined by the life, hence the reproduction
or turnover time of the applied fixed capital.

As the magnitude of the value and the durability of the applied fixed
capital develop with the development of the capitalist mode of
production, the lifetime of industry and of industrial capital lengthens
in each particular field of investment to a period of many years, say of
ten years on an average. Whereas the development of fixed capital
extends the length of this life on the one hand it is shortened on the
other by the continuous revolution in the means of production, which
likewise incessantly gains momentum with the development of the
capitalist mode of production. This involves a change in the means of
production and the necessity of their constant replacement, on account
of moral depreciation, long before they expire physically. One may
assume that in the essential branches of modern industry this life-cycle
now averages ten years. However we are not concerned here with the exact
figure. This much is evident: the cycle of interconnected turnovers
embracing a number of years, in which capital is held fast by its fixed
constituent part, furnishes a material basis for the periodic crises.
During this cycle business undergoes successive periods of depression,
medium activity, precipitancy, crisis. True, periods in which capital is
invested differ greatly and far from coincide in time. But a crisis
always forms the starting-point of large new investments. Therefore,
from the point of view of society as a whole, more or less, a new
material basis for the next turnover cycle.^([22a])

5) On the way to calculate the turnovers, an American economist states:

“In some trades the whole capital embarked is turned or circulated
several times within the year. In others a part is turned oftener than
once a year, another part less often. It is the average period which his
entire capital takes in passing through his hands, or making one
revolution, from which a capitalist must calculate his profits. Suppose
for example that a person engaged in a particular business has one half
of his capital invested in buildings and machinery; so as to be turned
only once in ten years; that one-fourth more, the cost of his tools,
etc., is turned once in two years; and the remaining fourth, employed in
paying wages and purchasing material, is turned twice in one year. Say
that his entire capital is $50,000. Then his annual expenditure will be,

$25,000 : 10 = $ 2,500
 12,500 : 2  =   6,500
 12,500 × 2  =  25,000
———————-
               $33,750

... the mean term in which his capital is turned being about sixteen
months [In the manuscript Marx points out the fallacy of such a method
of calculating the period of the turnover of capital. The mean term of
turnover (16 months) given in the quotation was calculated with account
taken of a profit of 7.5 per cent on the aggregate capital of $50,000.
Profit discounting, the turnover of capital is equal to 18 months. —
_Ed_.]

“... Take another case, ... say that one-fourth of the entire capital
circulates in ten years, one-fourth in one year, and one half twice in
the year. Then the annual expenditure will be,

       $12,500 : 10 = $ 1,250
        12,500      =  12,500
        25,000 × 2  =  50,000
——————————
Turned over in 1 year $63,750

(Scrope, _Pol. Econ._, edit. Alonzo Potter, New York, 1841, pp. 142,
143.) [The book referred to is A. Potter’s _Political Economy, Its
Objects, Uses, and Principles_, New York, 1840. According to the
author’s “Advertisement”, the second part of the book is substantially a
reprint (with many alterations made by A. Potter) of G. J. P. Scrope’s
_The Principles of Political Economy_, London, 1833. — _Ed_.]

6) Real and apparent differences in the turnover of the various parts of
capital.

The same Scrope says in the same passage:

“The capital laid out by a manufacturer, farmer, or tradesman in the
payment of his labourer’s wages, circulates most rapidly, being turned
perhaps once a week (if his men are paid weekly), by the weekly receipts
on his bills or sales. That invested in his materials and stock in hand
circulates less quickly, being turned perhaps twice, perhaps four times
in the year, according to the time consumed between his purchases of the
one and sales of the other, supposing him to buy and sell on equal
credits. The capital invested in his implements and machinery circulates
still more slowly, being turned, that is, consumed and renewed, on the
average, perhaps but once in five or ten years; though there are many
tools that are worn out in one set of operations. The capital which is
embarked in buildings, as mills, shops, warehouses, barns, in roads,
irrigation, etc., may appear scarcely to circulate at all. But, in
truth, these things are, to the full, as much as those we have
enumerated, consumed in contributing to production, and must be
reproduced in order to enable the producer to continue his operations;
with this only difference, that they are consumed and reproduced by
slower degrees than the rest ... and the capital invested in them may be
turned perhaps every twenty of fifty years.” [pp. 141-42.]

Scrope confuses here the difference in the flow of certain parts of the
circulating capital, brought about for the individual capitalist by
terms of payment and conditions of credit, with the difference in the
turnovers due to the nature of capital. He says that wages must be paid
weekly out of the weekly receipts from paid sales or bills. It must be
noted here in the first place that certain differences occur relative to
wages themselves, depending on the length of the term of payment, that
is, the length of time for which the labourer must give credit to the
capitalist, whether wages are payable every week, month, three months,
six months, etc. In this case, the law expounded before, holds good, to
the effect that “the quantity of the means of payment required for all
periodical payments” (hence of the money-capital to be advanced at one
time) “is in inverse [This is evidently a slip of the pen, the
proportion being direct and not inverse. — _Ed_.] proportion to the
length of their periods.” (Buch I, Kap. III, 3b, Seite 124.) [English
edition: Ch. III, 3b, p. 141. — _Ed_.]

In the second place, it is not only the new value added in the process
of production by the week’s labour which enters completely into the
weekly product, but also the value of the raw and auxiliary materials
consumed by the weekly product. This value circulates with the product
containing it. It assumes the form of money through the sale of the
product and must be reconverted into the same elements of production.
This applies as much to the labour-power as to the raw and auxiliary
materials. But we have already seen (Chapter VI, II, 1) that continuity
of production requires a supply of means of production different for
different branches of industry, and different within one and the same
branch of business for different component parts of this element of the
circulating capital, for instance, for coal and cotton. Hence, although
these materials must be continually replaced in kind, they need not
always be bought anew. The frequency of purchases depends on the size of
the available stock, on the time it takes to exhaust it. In the case of
labour-power there is no such storing of a supply. The reconversion into
money of the part of capital laid out in labour-power goes hand in hand
with that of the capital invested in raw and auxiliary materials. But
the reconversion of the money, on the one hand into labour-power, on the
other into raw materials, proceeds separately on account of the special
terms of purchase and payment of these two constituents, one of them
being bought as a productive supply for long periods, the other,
labour-power, for shorter periods, for instance a week. On the other
hand the capitalist must keep a stock of finished commodities besides a
stock of materials for production. Let us leave sales difficulties
aside. A certain quantity of goods must be produced, say, on order.
While the last portion of this lot is being produced, the finished
products are waiting in the warehouse until the order can be completely
filled. Other differences in the turnover of circulating capital arise
whenever some of its separate elements must stay in some preliminary
stage of the process of production (drying of wood, etc.) longer than
others.

The credit system, to which Scrope here refers, as well as commercial
capital, modifies the turnover for the individual capitalist. On a
social scale it modifies the turnover only in so far as it does not
accelerate merely production but also consumption.


Notes

22a “Urban production is bound to a cycle of days, rural production on
the contrary to one of years.” (Adam G. Müller, _Die Elemente der
Staatskunst_, Berlin, 1809, III, p. 178.) this is the naive conception
of industry and agriculture held by the romantic school.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 10: Theories of Fixed and Circulating Capital. The Physiocrats and Adam Smith

In Quesnay the distinction between fixed and circulating capital
presents itself as _avances primitives_ and _avances annuelles_. He
correctly represents this distinction as one existing within productive
capital, capital directly engaged in the process of production. As he
regards the capital employed in agriculture, the capital of the farmer,
as the only really productive capital, he draws these distinctions only
for the capital of the farmer. This also accounts for the annual period
of turnover of one part of the capital, and the more than annual
(decennial) period of the other part. In the course of the development
the physiocrats incidentally applied these distinctions also to other
kinds of capital and to industrial capital in general. The distinction
between annual advances and others of longer duration has retained such
importance for society that many economists, even after Adam Smith,
return to this definition.

The difference between these two kinds of advances does not arise until
advanced money has been transformed into the elements of productive
capital. It is a difference that exists solely within productive
capital. It therefore never occurs to Quesnay to classify money either
among the original or the annual advances. As advances for production,
i.e., as productive capital, both of them stand opposed to money as well
as the commodities existing in the market. Furthermore the difference
between these two elements of productive capital is correctly reduced in
Quesnay to the different manner in which they enter into the value of
the finished product, hence to the different manner in which their
values are circulated together with those of the products, and hence to
the different manner of their replacement or their reproduction, the
value of the one being wholly replaced annually, that of the other
partly and at longer intervals.[23]

The only progress made by Adam Smith is the generalisation of the
categories. With him it no longer applies to one special form of
capital, the farmer’s capital, but to every form of productive capital.
Hence it follows as a matter of course that the distinction derived from
agriculture between an annual turnover and one of two or more years’
duration is superseded by the general distinction into different periods
of turnover, one turnover of the fixed capital always comprising more
than one turnover of the circulating capital, regardless of the periods
of turnover of the circulating capital, whether they be annual, more
than annual, or less than annual. Thus in Adam Smith the _avances
annuelles_ transform themselves into circulating capital, and the
_avances primitives_ into fixed capital. But his progress is confined to
this generalisation of the categories. His implementation is far
inferior to that of Quesnay.

The crudely empirical manner in which Smith broaches the investigation
engenders at the very outset a lack of clarity:

“There are two different ways in which a capital may be employed so as
to yield a revenue or profit to its employer.” (_Wealth of Nations_,
Book II, Chap. I, p. 189, Aberdeen edition, 1848. [Wherever Marx did not
give a page reference to quotations from Smith’s work, editorial page
references are given in square brackets to the London 1843 edition of
_An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations, A new
edition in four volumes_. This and all the following quotations from
Smith have been checked with this edition. — _Ed_.]

The ways in which value may be invested so as to perform the functions
of capital, to yield surplus value to its owner, are as different and
varied as the spheres of investment of capital. It is a question of the
different branches of production in which capital may be invested. If
put in this way, the question implies still more. It includes the
question of the way in which value, even if it is not invested as
productive capital, can function as capital for its owner, for instance
as interest-bearing capital, merchants’ capital, etc. At this point we
are already miles away from the real subject of the analysis, viz., the
question of how the division of _productive_ capital into its different
elements, apart from their different spheres of investment, affects
their turnover.

Adam Smith immediately continues:

“First, it may be employed in raising, manufacturing, or purchasing
goods, and selling them again with a profit.” [Vol. II, p. 254.]

He does not tell us anything else here than that capital may be employed
in agriculture, manufacture, and commerce. He speaks therefore only of
the different spheres of investment of capital, including such in which,
as in commerce, capital is not directly embodied in the process of
production, hence does not function as productive capital. In so doing
he abandons the foundation on which the physiocrats base the
distinctions within productive capital and their effect on the turnover.
More. He uses merchant’s capital as an illustration in a problem which
concerns exclusively differences within the _productive_ capital in the
product and value-creating process, which in turn cause differences in
its turnover and reproduction.

He continues:

“The capital employed in this manner yields no revenue or profit to its
employer, while it either remains in his possession or continues in the
same shape.” [Vol. II, p. 254.]

“The capital employed in this manner!” But Smith speaks of capital
invested in agriculture, in industry, and he tells us later that a
capital so employed divides into fixed and circulating capital! Hence
investment of capital in this manner cannot make fixed or circulating
capital of it.

Or does he mean to say that capital employed in order to produce goods
and to sell these at a profit must be sold after its transformation into
goods and by means of the sale must in the first place pass from the
possession of the seller into that of the buyer, and in the second place
change from its bodily form, goods, into its money-form, so that it is
of no use to its owner so long as it either remains in his possession or
continues in the same shape? In that case, the whole thing amounts to
this: The capital-value that formerly functioned in the form of
productive capital, in a form peculiar to the process of production, now
functions as commodity-capital and money-capital, in forms peculiar to
the process of circulation, where it is no longer either fixed or
circulating capital. And this applies equally to those elements of value
which are added by raw and auxiliary material, i.e., by circulating
capital, and to those which are added by the wear and tear of
instruments of labour hence by fixed capital. We do not get any nearer
to the difference between fixed and circulating capital in this way.

Further:

“The goods of the merchant yield him no revenue or profit till he sells
them for money, and the money yields him as little till it is again
exchanged for goods. His capital is continually going from him in one
shape, and returning to him in another, and it is only by means of such
circulation, or successive exchanges, that it can yield him any profit.
Such capitals therefore may very properly be called circulating
capitals.” [Vol. II, p. 254.]

What Adam Smith here defines as circulating capital is what I want to
call _capital of circulation_, capital in a form pertinent to the
process of circulation, to a change of form by means of exchange (a
change of substance and change of hands), hence commodity-capital and
money-capital, as distinguished from its form pertinent to the process
of production, that of productive capital. These are not different kinds
into which the industrial capitalist divides his capital, but different
forms over and over again assumed and stripped off successively by the
same advanced capital-value during its _curriculum vitae_. Adam Smith
lumps this together — and this is a big step back compared to the
physiocrats — with the distinctions in form which arise in the sphere of
circulation of capital-value, in its circular course through its
successive forms, while the capital-value exists in the form of
_productive_ capital; and they arise because of the different ways in
which the different elements of productive capital take part in the
formation of values and transfer their value to the product. We shall
see below the consequences of this basic confusion of productive capital
and capital in the sphere of circulation (commodity-capital and
money-capital) on the one hand, with fixed and circulating capital on
the other. The capital-value advanced in fixed capital is as much
circulated by the product as that which has been advanced in the
circulating capital, and both are equally converted into money-capital
by the circulation of the commodity-capital. The difference evolves only
from the fact that the value of the fixed capital circulates piece-meal
and therefore must likewise be replaced piecemeal, at shorter or longer
intervals, must be reproduced in its bodily form.

That by circulating capital Adam Smith means here nothing but capital of
circulation, i.e., capital-value in the forms pertaining to the process
of circulation (commodity capital and money-capital) is shown by his
singularly ill-chosen illustration. He selects for this purpose a kind
of capital which does not belong at all in the process of production,
but whose abode is exclusively the sphere of circulation, which consists
solely of capital of circulation — merchant’s capital.

How absurd it is to start out with an illustration in which capital does
not figure altogether as productive capital is stated right afterwards
by him himself:

"The capital of a merchant, for example, is altogether a circulating
capital."

[Vol. II, p. 255.] Yet we are told later on that the difference between
circulating and fixed capital evolves out of essential differences
within the productive capital itself. On the one hand Adam Smith has the
distinction of the physiocrats in mind, on the other the different forms
assumed by capital-value in its circuit. And both these things are
higgledy-piggledy jumbled together.

But how a profit is to come into existence by changes of form of money
and commodities, by a mere transmutation of value from one of these
forms into another, is more than anyone can tell. And an explanation
becomes absolutely impossible because he starts out here with merchants’
capital, which moves only in the sphere of circulation. We shall return
to this later. Let us first hear what he has to say about fixed capital.
[Vol. II, pp. 254-55.]

“Secondly, it (capital) may be employed in the improvement of land, in
the purchase of useful machines and instruments of trade, or in suchlike
things as yield a revenue or profit without changing masters, or
circulating any further. Such capitals therefore may very properly be
called fixed capitals. Different occupations require very different
proportions between the fixed and circulating capitals employed in them.
... Some part of the capital of every master artificer or manufacturer
be fixed in the instruments of his trade. This part, however, is very
small in some, and very great in others. ... The far greater part of the
capital of all such master artificers (such as tailors, shoemakers,
weavers) however is circulated, either in the wages of their workmen, or
in the price of their materials, and to be repaid with a profit by the
price of work.”

Apart from the naïve determination of the source of profit weakness and
confusion become at once apparent from the following: To a machine
manufacturer for example the machine is his product, which circulates as
commodity-capital, or in Adam Smith’s words, “is parted with, changes
masters, circulates further.” According to his own definition therefore
this machine would not be fixed but circulating capital. This confusion
is again due to the fact that Smith mixes up the distinction between
fixed and circulating capital evolved out of the manifold circulation of
the various elements of productive capital, with differences in the form
assumed by the same capital which functions as productive capital within
the process of production and as circulation capital, that is to say, as
commodity-capital or as money-capital, within the sphere of circulation.
Consequently with Adam Smith things can function as fixed capital (as
instruments of labour, elements of productive capital), or as
“circulating” capital, commodity-capital (as products thrust out of the
sphere of production into that of circulation), all depending on the
position they occupy in the life-process of capital.

But Adam Smith suddenly changes the entire basis of his classification,
and contradicts the text with which he had opened the entire
investigation a few lines previously. This refers particularly to the
statement: “There are two different ways in which a capital may be
employed so as to yield a revenue or a profit to its employer,” [Vol.
II, p. 254] namely, as circulating or as fixed capital. According to
that these are therefore different methods of employing different
capitals independent of one another, such as capitals that can be
employed either in industry or in agriculture. And then we read [Vol.
II, p. 255]:

“Different occupations require very different proportions between the
fixed and circulating capitals employed in them.”

Fixed and circulating capital are now no longer different, independent
investments of capital, but different portions of the same productive
capital, which form different parts of the total value of this capital
in different spheres of investment. Hence we have here differences
arising from an appropriate division of the _productive_ capital itself
and therefore valid only with respect to it. But this runs counter to
the circumstance that merchants’ capital, being merely circulating
capital, is opposed to fixed capital, for Adam Smith says himself: “The
capital of a merchant for example is altogether a circulating capital.”
[Vol. II, p. 255.] It is indeed a capital performing its functions
solely within the sphere of circulation and as such stands opposed in
general to productive capital, the capital embodied in the process of
production. But for this very reason it cannot be contrasted, as the
circulating component part of productive capital, to its fixed component
part.

In the illustrations Smith gives he designates the “instruments of
trade” as fixed capital, and the portion of capital laid out in wages
and raw materials, including auxiliary materials, as circulating capital
(“repaid with a profit by the price of the work”).

And so he starts out, in the first place, from the various constituents
of the labour-process, from labour-power (labour) and raw materials on
the one hand, and instruments of labour on the other. But these are
constituents of capital, because a sum of value which is to function as
capital is invested in them. To this extent they are material elements,
modes of existence of _productive_ capital, that is to say, of capital
functioning in the process of production. But why is one of these parts
called fixed? Because

"some parts of the capital must be fixed in the instruments of trade."
[Vol. II, p. 254.]

But the other part is also fixed — in wages and raw materials. Machines
however and

"instruments of trade ... or suchlike things ... yield a revenue or
profit without changing masters, or circulating any further. Such
capitals, therefore, may very properly be called fixed capitals." [Vol.
II, p. 254.]

Take for instance the mining industry. No raw material at all is used
there, because the subject of labour, such as copper, is a product of
nature, which must first be appropriated by labour. The copper to be
first appropriated, the product of the process, which circulates later
as a commodity, or commodity-capital, does not form an element of
productive capital. No part of its value is invested in it. On the other
hand the other elements of the productive process, labour-power and
auxiliary materials such as coal, water, etc., do not enter materially
into the product, either. The coal is entirely consumed and only its
value enters into the product, just as a part of the value of the
machine, etc., enters into it. Finally, the labourer remains as
independent vis-à-vis the product, the copper, as the machine; except
that the value which he produces by means of his labour is now a
component part of the value of the copper. Hence in this illustration
not a single constituent of productive capital changes “masters,” nor is
any of them circulated further, because none of them enter materially
into the product. What becomes of the circulating capital in this case?
According to Adam Smith’s own definition the entire capital employed in
a copper mine consists of fixed capital and nothing else.

Let us take on the other hand a different industry, one which utilises
raw materials that form the substance of its product, and auxiliary
materials that enter into the product bodily and not only as so much
value, as is the case with fuel coal. The product, for instance the
yarn, changes hands together with the raw material, the cotton,
composing it, and passes from the process of production into that of
consumption. But so long as the cotton functions as an element of
productive capital, its master does not sell it, but processes it, has
it made into yarn. He does not part with it. Or, to use Smith’s crudely
erroneous and trivial terms, he does not make any profit “by parting
with it, by its changing masters, or by circulating it.” He does not
permit his materials to circulate any more than his machines. They are
fixed in the process of production, the same as the spinning machines
and the factory buildings. Indeed, a part of the productive capital must
be just as continually fixed in the form of coal, cotton, etc., as in
the form of instruments of labour. The difference is only that for
instance the cotton, coal, etc., required for one week’s yarn
production, are always entirely consumed in the manufacture of the
weekly product, so that new cotton, coal, etc., must be supplied in
their place; in other words, these elements of productive capital,
although remaining identical in kind, always consist of new specimens of
the same kind, while the same individual spinning machine or the same
individual factory building continues its participation in a whole
series of weekly productions without being replaced by a new specimen of
its kind. As elements of the productive capital all its constituent
parts are continually fixed in the process of production, for it cannot
proceed without them. And all the elements of productive capital,
whether fixed or circulating, equally confront, as productive capital,
the capital of circulation, i.e., commodity-capital and money-capital.

It is the same with labour-power. A part of the productive capital must
be continually fixed in it, and it is the same identical labour-powers,
just as it is the same machines, that are everywhere employed for a
certain length of time by the same capitalist. The difference between
labour-power and machines in this case is not that the machines are
bought once and for all (which is not so when they are paid for in
instalments), while the labourer is not. The difference is rather that
the labour expended by the labourer enters wholly into the value of the
product, while the value of the machines enters only piecemeal.

Smith confuses different definitions when he says of circulating capital
as opposed to fixed:

“The capital employed in this manner yields no revenue or profit to its
employer, while it either remains in his possession or continues in the
same shape.”

[Vol. II, p. 254.] He places the merely formal metamorphosis of the
commodity, which the product, the commodity-capital, undergoes in the
sphere of circulation and which brings about the change of hands of the
commodities, on the same level as the bodily metamorphosis, which the
various elements of productive capital undergo during the process of
production. He indiscriminately jumbles together the transformation of
commodities into money and of money into commodities, or purchase and
sale, with the transformation of elements of production into products.
His illustration for circulating capital is merchants’ capital, which is
converted from commodities into money and from money into commodities —
the change of form C—M—C pertaining to the circulation of commodities.
But this change of form within the circulation signifies for the
industrial capital in action that the commodities into which the money
is reconverted are elements of production (instruments of labour and
labour-power), that, therefore, the change of form renders the function
of industrial capital continuous, renders the process of production a
continuous one, or a process of reproduction. This entire change of form
takes place in circulation. It is this change of form that brings about
the real passage of the commodities from hand to hand. But the
metamorphoses gone through by productive capital within its process of
production are on the contrary metamorphoses that pertain to the
_labour-process_ and are necessary to transform the elements of
production into the desired product. Adam Smith clings to the fact that
a part of the means of production (the instruments of labour proper)
serve in the labour-process (“yield a profit to their master,” as he
erroneously expresses it) without changing their bodily form and wear
out only by degrees; while the other part, the materials, change and by
virtue of this very change attain their destination as means of
production. This difference in the behaviour of the elements of
productive capital in the labour-process forms however only the point of
departure of the difference between fixed and non-fixed capital, not
this difference itself. That follows from the fact alone that this
different behaviour exists in equal measure under all modes of
production, capitalist and non-capitalist. To this different behaviour
of material elements corresponds however the _transmission of value_ to
the product, and to this in turn corresponds the replacement of value by
the sale of the product. That and that alone is what constitutes the
difference in question. Hence capital is not called fixed because it is
fixed in the instruments of labour but because a part of its value laid
out in instruments of labour remains fixed in them, while the other part
circulates as a component part of the value of the product.

"If it (the stock) is employed in procuring future profit, it must
procure this profit either by staying with him (the employer), or by
going from him. In the one case it is a fixed, in the other it is a
circulating capital." (p. 189.)

What strikes one here above all is that the crudely empirical conception
of profit derived from the outlook of the ordinary capitalist, which
wholly contradicts the better esoteric understanding of Adam Smith. Not
only the price of materials and that of the labour-power is replaced in
the price of the product, but also that part of value which is
transferred by wear and tear from the instruments of labour to the
product. Under no circumstances does this replacement yield profit.
Whether a value advanced for the production of a commodity is replaced
entirely or piecemeal, at one time or gradually, by the sale of that
commodity, cannot change anything except the manner and time of
replacement. But in no event can it transform that which is common to
both, the replacement of value, into a creation of surplus-value. At the
bottom of it all lies the commonly held idea that, because surplus-value
is not realised until the product is sold, until it circulates, it
originates only from sales, from the circulation. Indeed the different
manner of origination of profit is in this case but a wrong way of
expressing the fact that the different elements of productive capital
serve differently, that as productive elements they act differently in
the labour-process. In the end, the difference is not derived from the
process of labour or self-expansion, not from the function of productive
capital itself, but it is supposed to apply only subjectively to the
individual capitalist, to whom one part of capital serves a useful
purpose in one way, while another part does so in another way.

Quesnay, on the other hand, had derived these differences from the
process of reproduction and its necessities. In order that this process
may be continuous, the value of the annual advances must annually be
replaced in full out of the value of the annual product, while the value
of the investment capital need be replaced only piecemeal, so that it
requires complete replacement and therefore complete reproduction only
in a period of, say, ten years (by a new material of the same kind).
Consequently Adam Smith falls far below Quesnay.

So there is therefore absolutely nothing left to Adam Smith for a
definition of fixed capital except that it is instruments of labour
which do not change their shape in the process of production and
continue to serve in production until they are worn out, as opposed to
the products in the formation of which they assist. He forgets that all
elements of productive capital continually confront in their bodily form
(as instruments of labour, materials, and labour-power) the product and
the product circulating as a commodity, and that the difference between
the part consisting of materials and labour-power and that consisting of
instruments of labour is only this: with regard to labour-power, that it
is always purchased afresh (not bought for the time it lasts, as are the
instruments of labour); with regard to the materials, that it is not the
same identical materials that function in the labour-process throughout,
but always new materials of the same kind. At the same time the false
impression is created that the value of the fixed capital does not
participate in the circulation, although of course Adam Smith previously
explained the wear and tear of fixed capital as a part of the price of
the product.

In opposing circulating capital to fixed, no emphasis is placed on the
fact that this opposition exists solely because it is that constituent
part of productive capital which must be _wholly_ replaced out of the
value of the product and must therefore fully share in its
metamorphoses, while this is not so in the case of the fixed capital.
Instead the circulating capital is jumbled together with those forms
which capital assumes on passing from the sphere of production to that
of circulation, as commodity-capital and money-capital. But both forms,
commodity-capital as well as money-capital, are carriers of the value of
both the fixed and the circulating component parts of productive
capital. Both of them are capital of circulation, as distinguished from
productive capital, but not circulating (fluent) capital as
distinguished from fixed capital.

Finally, owing to the wholly erroneous explanation that profit is made
by fixed capital staying in the process of production, and by
circulating capital leaving it and being circulated, and also on account
of the identity of form assumed in the _turnover_ by the variable
capital and the circulating constituent of the constant capital, their
essential difference in the _process of self-expansion_ and of the
formation of surplus-value is hidden, so that the entire secret of
capitalist production is obscured still more. The common designation
"circulating capital" abolishes this essential difference. Political
Economy subsequently went still farther by holding fast not to the
antithesis between variable and constant capital but to the antithesis
between fixed and circulating capital as the essential and sole
delimitation.

After Adam Smith has designated fixed and circulating capital as two
particular ways of investing capital, each of which yields a profit by
itself, he says:

"No fixed capital can yield any revenue but by means of a circulating
capital. The most useful machines and instruments of trade will produce
nothing without the circulating capital which affords the materials they
are employed upon, the maintenance of the workmen who employ them." (P.
188.)

Here it becomes apparent what the previously used expressions “yield a
revenue,” “make a profit,” etc., signify, viz., that both parts of
capital serve as creators of product.

Adam Smith then gives the following illustration:

“That part of the capital of the farmer which is employed in the
instruments of agriculture is a fixed, that which is employed in the
wages and maintenance of his labouring servants is a circulating
capital.”

(Here the difference between fixed and circulating capital is correctly
applied only to difference in circulation, to the turnovers of different
constituent parts of productive capital.)

“He makes a profit of the one by keeping it in his own possession, and
of the other by parting with it. The price or value of his labouring
cattle is a fixed capital”

(here he is again correct when he says it is the value, not the material
element, to which the difference applies)

“in the same manner as that of the instruments of husbandry; their
maintenance” (that of the labouring cattle) “is a circulating capital in
the same manner as that of the labouring servants. The farmer makes his
profit by keeping the labouring cattle, and by parting with their
maintenance.”

(The farmer keeps the fodder of the cattle, he does not sell it. He uses
it to feed the cattle, while he uses us the cattle themselves as
instruments of labour. The difference is only this: The fodder that goes
for the maintenance of the labouring cattle is consumed wholly and must
be continually replaced by new cattle fodder out of the products of
agriculture or by their sale; the cattle themselves are replaced only as
each head becomes incapacitated for work.)

“Both the price and the maintenance of the cattle which are bought in
and fattened, not for labour but for sale, are a circulating capital.
The farmer makes his profit by parting with them.” [Vol. II, pp.
255-56.]

(Every producer of commodities, hence likewise the capitalist producer,
sells his product, the result of his process of production, but this is
no reason why this product should form a part of either the fixed or the
circulating component of his _productive_ capital. The product now
exists rather in that form in which it is thrust out of the process of
production and must function as commodity-capital. The fattened stock
function in the process of production as raw material, not as
instruments of labour like the labouring cattle. Hence the fattened
cattle enter into the product as substance, and their whole value enters
into it, just as that of the auxiliary material [its fodder]. The
fattened cattle are therefore a circulating part of the productive
capital, but not because the sold product, the fattened cattle, have the
same bodily form as the raw material, the cattle not yet fattened. This
is accidental. At the same time Adam Smith might have seen by this
illustration that it is not the material form of the element of
production but its function within the process of production that
determines the value contained in it as fixed or circulating.)

“The whole value of the seed too is properly a fixed capital. Though it
goes backwards and forwards between the ground and the granary, it never
changes masters, and therefore it does not properly circulate. The
farmer makes his profit not by its sale, but by its increase.” [Vol. II,
p. 256.]

At this point the utter thoughtlessness of the Smithian distinction
reveals itself. According to him seed would be fixed capital, if there
would be no “change of masters,” that is to say, if the seed is directly
replaced out of the annual product, is deducted from it. On the other
hand it would be circulating capital, if the entire product were sold
and with a part of its value seed of another owner were bought. In the
one case there is a “change of masters,” in the other there is not.
Smith once more confuses here circulating and commodity-capital. The
product is the material vehicle of the commodity-capital, but of course
only that part of it which actually enters into the circulation and does
not re-enter directly into the process of production from which it
emerged as a product.

Whether the seed is directly deducted from the product as a part of it
or the entire product is sold and a part of its value converted in the
purchase of another man’s seed — in either case it is mere replacement
that takes place and no profit is made by this replacement. In the one
case the seed enters into circulation as a commodity together with the
remainder of the product; in the other it figures only in book-keeping
as a component part of the value of the advanced capital. But in both
cases it remains a circulating constituent of the productive capital.
The seed is entirely consumed to get the product ready, and it must be
entirely replaced out of the product to make reproduction possible.

“Hence raw material and auxiliary substances lose the characteristic
form with which they are clothed on entering the labour-process. It is
otherwise with the instruments of labour. Tools, machines, workshops,
and vessels, are of use in the labour-process, only so long as they
retain their original shape, and are ready each morning to renew the
process, with their shape unchanged. And just as during their lifetime,
that is to say, during the continued labour-process in which they serve,
they retain their shape independent of the product, so too, they do
after their death. The corpses of machines, tools, workshops, etc., are
always separate and distinct from the product they helped to turn out.”
(Buch I, Kap. VI, S. 192.) [English edition: Volume I, Ch. VIII, p. 203.
— _Ed_.]

These different ways in which means of production are consumed to form
the product, some of them preserving their independent shape vis-à-vis
the product, others changing or losing it entirely — this difference
pertaining to the labour-process as such and therefore just as well to
the labour-processes aimed at satisfying merely one’s own needs, e.g.,
the needs of the patriarchal family, without any exchange, without
production of commodities — are falsified by Adam Smith. He does so 1)
by introducing here the totally irrelevant definition of profit,
claiming that some of the means of production yield a profit to their
owner by preserving their form, while the others do so by losing it; 2)
by jumbling together the alterations of a part of the elements of
production in the labour-process with the change of form (purchase and
sale) that is characteristic of the exchange of products, of commodity
circulation, and which at the same time includes a change in the
ownership of the circulating commodities.

The turnover presupposes reproduction effected by circulation, hence by
the sale of the product, by its conversion into money and its
reconversion from money into its elements of production. But since a
part of the capitalist producer’s own product serves him directly as
means of production, he appears as a seller of it to himself, and that
is how the matter figures in his books. In that case this part of the
reproduction is not brought about by circulation but proceeds directly.
However the part of the product thus serving again as means of
production replaces circulating, not fixed capital, since 1) its value
passes wholly into the product, and 2) it itself has been wholly
replaced in kind by a new specimen out of the new product.

Adam Smith tells us now what circulating and fixed capital consist of.
He enumerates the things, the material elements, which form fixed, and
those which form circulating capital, as if this definiteness were
inherent in these things materially, by nature, and did not rather
spring from their definite function within the capitalist process of
production. And yet in the same chapter (Book II, Chapter I) he makes
the remark that although a certain thing, e.g., a dwelling, which is
reserved as "stock" for "immediate consumption,"

“may yield a revenue to its proprietor, and thereby serve _in the
function of a capital_ to him, it cannot yield any to the public, nor
serve in the function of a capital to it, and the revenue of the whole
body of the people can never be in the smallest degree increased by it.”
(p. 186.)

Here, then, Adam Smith clearly states that the property of being capital
is not inherent in things as such and in any case, but is a function
with which they may or may not be invested, according to circumstances.
But what is true of capital in general is also true of its subdivisions.

Things form constituent parts of the circulating or fixed capital,
depending on what function they perform in the labour-process. A head of
cattle for instance, as labouring cattle (instrument of labour),
represents the material mode of existence of fixed capital, while as
cattle for fattening (raw material) it is a constituent part of the
farmer’s circulating capital. On the other hand the same thing may now
function as a constituent part of productive capital and now belong to
the fund for direct consumption. A house for instance when performing
the function of a workshop, is a fixed component part of productive
capital; when serving as a dwelling it is in no wise a form of capital.
The same instruments of labour may in many cases serve either as means
of production or as means of consumption.

It was one of the errors following from Adam Smith’s idea that the
property of being fixed or circulating capital was conceived as inherent
in the things themselves. The mere analysis of the labour-process (Buch
I, Kap. V) [ English edition: Volume I, Ch. VII. — _Ed_.] shows that the
definitions of instruments of labour, materials of labour, and product
change according to the various roles played by one and the same thing
in the process. The definitions of fixed and non-fixed capital are based
in their turn on the definite roles played by these elements in the
labour-process, and therefore also in the value formation process.

In the second place, on enumerating the things fixed and circulating
capitals consist of, it becomes fully apparent that Smith lumps together
the distinction — valid and making sense only with regard to productive
capital (capital in its productive form) — between the fixed and
circulating components of the same, with the distinction between
productive capital and those forms which pertain to capital in its
process of circulation, viz., commodity-capital and money-capital. He
says in the same passage (pp. 187 and 188):

“The circulating capital consists ... of the provisions, materials, and
finished work of all kinds that are in the hands of their respective
dealers, and of the money that is necessary for circulating and
distributing them, etc.”

Indeed, if we look more closely we observe that here, contrary to his
previous statements, circulating capital is again equated to
commodity-capital and money-capital, that is to say, to two forms of
capital which do not belong in the process of production at all, which
do not form circulating (fluent) capital as opposed to fixed, but
capital of circulation as opposed to productive capital. It is only
_alongside_ these that the constituents of productive capital advanced
in materials (raw materials or semi-finished products) and really
incorporated in the process of production then play a role again. He
says:

“... The third and last of the three portions into which the general
stock of the society naturally divides itself, is the circulating
capital, of which the characteristic is, that it affords a revenue only
by circulating or changing masters. It is composed likewise of four
parts: first of the money ...”

(but money is never a form of productive capital, of capital functioning
in the productive process; it is always only one of the forms assumed by
capital within its process of circulation);

“secondly, of the stock of provisions which are in the possession of the
butcher, the grazier, the farmer ... from the sale of which they expect
to derive a profit ... Fourthly and lastly, of the work which is made up
and completed, but which is still in the hands of the merchant and
manufacturer. And, thirdly, of the materials, whether altogether rude,
or more or less manufactured, of clothes, furniture, and buildings,
which are not yet made up into any of those three shapes, but which
remain in the hands of the growers, the manufacturers, the mercers and
drapers, the timber-merchants, the carpenters and jointers, the
brick-makers, etc.”

Nos. 2 and 4 contain nothing but products which have been thrust out as
such from the process of production and must be sold, in short, which
now function as commodities, hence as commodity-capital, and which
therefore have a form and occupy a place in the process in which they
are not elements of productive capital, no matter what may be their
eventual destination, i.e., whether, in order to answer their purpose
(use-value), they should finally be allotted to individual or productive
consumption. The products mentioned in 2 are foodstuffs, in 4 all other
finished products, which in turn consist only of finished instruments of
labour or finished articles of consumption (foodstuffs other than those
mentioned under 2).

The fact that Smith at the same time speaks of the merchant shows his
confusion. Once the producer sells his product to the merchant, it no
longer constitutes any form of his capital. From the point of view of
society, it is indeed still commodity-capital, although in other hands
than those of its producer; but for the very reason that it is a
commodity-capital it is neither fixed nor circulating capital.

In every kind of production not meant for the satisfaction of the
producer’s direct needs, the product must circulate as a commodity,
i.e., it must be sold, not in order to make a profit on it, but that the
producer may be able to live at all. Under capitalist production, there
is to be added the circumstance that when a commodity is sold the
surplus-value embodied in it is also realised. The product emerges as a
commodity from the process of production and is therefore neither a
fixed nor a circulating element of this process.

Incidentally, Smith here argues against himself. The finished products,
whatever their material form or their use-value, their useful effect,
are all commodity-capital here, hence capital in a form characteristic
of the process of circulation. Being in this form, they are not
constituent parts of any productive capital their owner may have. This
does not in the least prevent them from becoming, right after their
sale, in the hands of their purchaser, constituent parts of productive
capital, either fixed or circulating. Here it is evident that things
which for a certain time appear in the market as commodity-capital, as
opposed to productive capital, may or may not function as circulating or
fixed constituents of productive capital after they have been removed
from the market.

The product of the cotton spinner, yarn, is the commodity-form of his
capital, is commodity-capital as far as he is concerned. It cannot
function again as a constituent part of his productive capital, neither
as material of labour nor as an instrument of labour. But in the hands
of the weaver who buys it it is incorporated in the productive capital
of the latter as one of its circulating constituent parts. For the
spinner, however, the yarn is the depository of the value of part of his
fixed as well as circulating capital (apart from the surplus-value). In
the same way a machine, the product of a machine-manufacturer, is the
commodity-form of his capital, is commodity-capital to him. And so long
as it stays in this form it is neither circulating nor fixed capital.
But if sold to a manufacturer for use it becomes a fixed component part
of a productive capital. Even if by virtue of its use-form the product
can partly re-enter as means of production into the process from which
it originated, e.g., coal into coal production, precisely that part of
the output of coal which is intended for sale represents neither
circulating nor fixed capital but commodity-capital.

On the other hand a product, due to its use-form, may be wholly
incapable of forming any element of productive capital, either as
material of labour or as an instrument of labour. For instance any means
of subsistence. Nevertheless it is commodity-capital for its producer,
is the carrier of the value of his fixed as well as circulating capital;
and of the one or the other according to whether the capital employed in
its production has to be replaced in whole or in part, has transferred
its value to the product in whole or in part.

With Smith, in No. 3, the raw material (material not worked up,
semi-finished products, auxiliary substances) does not figure on the one
hand as a component part embodied in the productive capital, but
actually only as a special kind of use-values of which the social
product can at all consist, as a special kind of commodities existing
alongside the other material constituent parts, means of subsistence,
etc., enumerated under Nos. 2 and 4. On the other hand these materials
are indeed cited as incorporated in the productive capital and therefore
as elements of it in the hands of the producer. The confusion is
evidenced by the fact that they are partly conceived as functioning in
the hands of the producer (“in the hands of the growers, the
manufacturers, etc.”), and partly in the hands of merchants (“mercers,
drapers, timber-merchants”), where they are merely commodity-capital,
not component parts of productive capital.

Indeed, Adam Smith wholly forgets here, in enumerating the elements of
circulating capital, the distinction — applying only to the productive
capital — between fixed and circulating capital. He rather places
commodity-capital and money-capital, i.e., the two forms of capital
typical of the process of circulation, in opposition to the productive
capital, but that quite unconsciously.

Finally, it is a striking fact that Adam Smith forgets to mention
labour-power when counting off the constituent parts of circulating
capital. There are two reasons for this.

We have just seen that, apart from money-capital, circulating capital is
only another name for commodity-capital. But to the extent that
labour-power circulates in the market, it is not capital, no form of
commodity-capital. It is not capital at all; the labourer is not a
capitalist, although he brings a commodity to market, namely his own
skin. Not until labour-power has been sold, been incorporated in the
process of production, hence not until it has ceased to circulate as a
commodity, does it become a constituent of productive capital — variable
capital as the source of surplus-value, a circulating component part of
productive capital with reference to the turnover of the capital-value
invested in it. Since Smith here confuses the circulating capital with
commodity-capital, he cannot bring labour-power under the head of
circulating capital. Hence the variable capital here appears in the form
of the commodities the labourer buys with his wages, viz., means of
subsistence. In this form the capital-value invested in wages is
supposed to belong to circulating capital. That which is incorporated in
the process of production is labour-power, the labourer himself, not the
means of subsistence wherewith the labourer maintains himself. True, we
have seen (Buch I, Kap. XXI) [English edition: Volume I, Ch. XXIII. —
_Ed_.] that from the point of view of society the reproduction of the
labourer himself by means of his individual consumption is likewise part
of the process of reproduction of social capital. But this does not
apply to the individual, isolated process of production which we are
studying here. The “acquired and useful abilities” (p. 187) which Smith
mentions under the head of fixed capital are on the contrary component
parts of circulating capital, since they are “abilities” of the
wage-labourer and he has sold his labour together with its “abilities.”

It is a great mistake on the part of Adam Smith to divide the entire
social wealth into 1) a fund for immediate consumption, 2) fixed
capital, and 3) circulating capital. According to the above, wealth
would have to be divided into 1) a consumption-fund which does not form
any part of functioning social capital although parts of it _can_
continually function as capital; and 2) capital. Accordingly one part of
the wealth functions as capital, the other as non-capital, or
consumption-fund. And here appears the absolute necessity that all
capital be either fixed or circulating somewhat like the natural
necessity that a mammal be male or female. But we have seen that the
antithesis between fixed and circulating capital applies solely to the
elements of _productive_ capital, that consequently there is besides
these a considerable amount of capital — commodity-capital and
money-capital — exists in a form in which it _can be_ neither fixed nor
circulating.

Inasmuch as under capitalist production the entire mass of social
products circulates in the market as commodity-capital, with the
exception of that part of the products which is directly used up again
by the individual capitalist producers in its bodily form as means of
production without being sold or bought, it is evident that not only the
fixed and circulating elements of productive capital, but likewise all
the elements of the consumption-fund are derived from the
commodity-capital. This is tantamount to saying that on the basis of
capitalist production both means of production and articles of
consumption first appear as commodity-capital, even though they are
intended for later use as means of production or articles of
consumption, just as labour-power itself is found in the market as a
commodity, although not as commodity-capital.

This accounts for the following new confusion in Adam Smith. He says:

“Of these four parts”

(of the “circulating” capital, i.e., of capital in its forms of
commodity-capital and money-capital belonging in the process of
circulation, two parts which are turned into four by the material
distinctions Adam Smith makes between the constituent parts of
commodity-capital)

“three — provisions, materials, and finished work, are either annually
or in a longer or shorter period, regularly withdrawn from it and placed
either in the fixed capital, or in the stock reserved for immediate
consumption. Every fixed capital is both originally derived from, and
requires to be continually supported by, a circulating capital. All
useful machines and instruments of trade are originally derived from a
circulating capital which furnishes the materials of which they are made
and the maintenance of the workmen who make them. They require, too, a
capital of the same kind to keep them in constant repair.” (p. 188.)

With the exception of that part of the product which is constantly
consumed again as means of production directly by its producers, the
following general proposition applies to capitalist production: All
products reach the market as commodities and therefore circulate for the
capitalist as the commodity-form of his capital, as commodity-capital,
regardless of whether these products must or can function in their
bodily form, in accordance with their use-values, as elements of
productive capital (of the process of production), as means of
production and therefore as fixed or circulating elements of productive
capital; or whether they can serve only as means of individual, not of
productive, consumption. All products are thrown upon the market as
commodities; all means of production or consumption, all elements of
productive and individual consumption, must therefore be extracted from
the market by purchasing them as commodities. This truism is of course
correct. It applies for this reason to the fixed as well as the
circulating elements of productive capital, to instruments of labour as
well as material of labour in all forms. (This, moreover, ignores the
fact that there are elements of productive capital which are furnished
by nature, are not products.) A machine is bought in the market, as is
cotton. But it does not follow from this by any means that every fixed
capital stems originally from some circulating capital; that follows
only from the Smithian confusion of capital of circulation with
circulating or fluent, i.e., non-fixed capital. Besides, Smith actually
refutes himself. According to him himself, machines, as commodities,
form a part of No. 4 of the circulating capital. Hence to say that they
come from the circulating capital means only that they functioned as
commodity-capital before they functioned as machines, but that
materially they are derived from themselves; so is cotton, as the
circulating element of some spinner’s capital, derived from the cotton
in the market. But if Adam Smith in his further exposition derives fixed
capital from circulating capital for the reason that labour and raw
material are required to build machines, it must be borne in mind that
in the first place, instruments of labour, hence fixed capital, are also
required to build machines, and in the second place fixed capital, such
as machinery, etc., is likewise required to make raw materials, since
productive capital always includes instruments of labour, but not always
material of labour. He himself says immediately afterwards:

“Land, mines, and fisheries, require all both a fixed and a circulating
capital to cultivate them;”

(thus he admits that not only circulating but also fixed capital is
required for the production of raw material)

“and” (new error at this point) “their produce replaces with a profit,
not only those capitals, but _all the others in the society_.” (p. 188.)

This is entirely wrong. Their produce furnishes the raw material,
auxiliary material, etc., for all other branches of industry. But their
value does not replace the value of all other social capitals; it
replaces only their own capital-value (plus the surplus-value). Adam
Smith is here again in the grip of his physiocratic reminiscences.

Considered socially it is true that the part of the commodity-capital
which consists of products that can serve only as instruments of labour
must — unless they have been produced to no purpose, cannot be sold —
sooner or later function as instruments of labour, i.e., with capitalist
production as their basis, they must, whenever they cease to be
commodities, form real, as before they formed prospective, elements of
the fixed part of the social productive capital.

But there is a distinction here, arising from the bodily form of the
product.

A spinning machine for instance has no use-values, unless it is used for
spinning, unless therefore it functions as an element of production and
consequently, from the point of view of the capitalist, as a fixed
component part of a productive capital. But a spinning machine is
movable. It may be exported from the country in which it was produced
and sold abroad directly or indirectly for raw materials, etc., or for
champagne. In that case it has functioned only as a commodity-capital in
the country in which it was produced, but never as fixed capital, not
even after its sale.

Products however which are localised by being anchored in the soil, and
can therefore be used only locally, such as factory buildings, railways,
bridges, tunnels, docks, etc., soil improvements, etc., cannot be
exported bodily, neck and crop. They are not movable. They are either
useless, or as soon as they have been sold must function as fixed
capital in the country that produced them. To their capitalist producer,
who builds factories or improves land for speculative sale, these things
are forms of his commodity-capital, or, according to Adam Smith, forms
of circulating capital. But viewed socially these things — if they are
not to be useless — must ultimately function as fixed capital in that
very country, in some local process of production. From this it does not
follow in the least that immovables are in themselves fixed capital.
They may belong, as dwelling houses, etc., to the consumption-fund, and
in that case they are not part whatever of the social capital, although
they constitute an element of the social wealth of which capital is only
a part. The producer of these things, to speak in the language of Adam
Smith, makes a profit by their sale. And so they are circulating
capital! Their practical utiliser, their ultimate purchaser, can use
them only by applying them in the process of production, and so they are
fixed capital!

Titles to property, for instance railway shares, may change hands every
day, and their owner may make a profit by their sale even in foreign
countries, so that titles to property are exportable, although the
railway itself is not. Nevertheless these things must either lie fallow
in the very country in which they are localised, or function as a fixed
component of some productive capital. In the same way manufacturer A may
make a profit by selling his factory to manufacturer B, but this does
not prevent the factory from functioning as fixed capital the same as
before.

Therefore, while the locally fixed instruments of labour, which cannot
be detached from the soil, will nevertheless, in all probability, have
to function as commodity-capital for their producer and not constitute
any elements of his fixed capital (which is made up as far as he is
concerned of the instruments of labour he needs for the construction of
buildings, railways, etc.), one should not by any means draw the
contrary conclusion that fixed capital necessarily consists of
immovables. A ship and a locomotive are effective only through their
motion; yet they function, not for him who produced them, but for him
who applies them as fixed capital. On the other hand things which are
most decidedly fixed in the process of production, live and die in it
and never leave it any more after once entering it, are circulating
component parts of the productive capital. Such are for instance the
coal consumed to drive the machine in the process of production, the gas
used to light the factory, etc. They are circulating capital not because
they bodily leave the process of production together with the product
and circulate as commodities, but because their value enters wholly into
that of the commodity which they help to produce and which therefore
must be entirely replaced out of the proceeds of the sale of the
commodity.

In the passage last quoted from Adam Smith, notice must also be taken of
the following phrase:

“A circulating capital which furnishes ... the maintenance of the
workmen who make them” (machines, etc.).

With the physiocrats that part of capital which is advanced for wages
figures correctly under the avances annuelles as distinguished from the
avances primitives. On the other hand it is not he labour-power itself
that appears with them as a constituent part of the productive capital
employed by the farmer, but the means of subsistence (the maintenance of
the workmen, as Smith calls it) given to the farm-labourers. This hangs
together exactly with their specific doctrine. For according to them the
value-part added to the product by labour (quite like the value-part
added to the product by raw material, instruments of labour, etc., in
short, by all the material components of constant capital) is equal only
to the value of the means of subsistence paid to the labourers and
necessarily consumed for the maintenance of their ability to function as
labour-power. Their very doctrine stands in the way of their discovering
the distinction between constant and variable capital. If it is labour
that produces surplus-value (in addition to reproducing its own price),
then it does so in industry as well as in agriculture. But since,
according to their system, labour produces surplus-value only in one
branch of production, namely agriculture, it does not arise out of
labour but out of the special activity (assistance) of nature in this
branch. And only for this reason agricultural labour is to them
productive labour, as distinct from other kinds of labour.

Adam Smith classifies the means of subsistence of labourers as
circulating capital in contradistinction to fixed capital:

1) Because he confuses circulating as distinguished from fixed capital
with forms of capital pertaining to the sphere of circulation, with
capital of circulation — a confusion uncritically accepted. He therefore
mixes up commodity-capital and the circulating component of productive
capital, and in that case it is a matter of course that whenever the
social product assumes the form of commodities, the means of subsistence
of the labourers as well as those of the non- labourers, the materials
as well as the instruments of labour themselves, must be supplied out of
the commodity capital.

2) But the physiocratic conception too lurks in Smith’s analysis,
although it contradicts the esoteric — really scientific — part of his
own exposition.

Generally speaking the advanced capital is converted into productive
capital, i.e., it assumes the form of elements of production which are
themselves the products of past labour. (Among them labour-power.)
Capital can function in the process of production only in this form.
Now, if instead of labour-power itself, into which the variable part of
capital has been converted, we take the labourer’s means of subsistence,
it is evident that these means as such do not differ, so far as the
formation of value is concerned, from the other elements of productive
capital, from the raw materials and the food of the labouring cattle, on
which ground Smith in one of the passages quoted above places them,
after the manner of the physiocrats, on the same level. The means of
subsistence cannot themselves expand their own value or add any
surplus-value to it. Their value, like that of the other elements of the
productive capital, can re-appear only in the value of the product. They
cannot add any more to its value than they have themselves. Like raw
materials, semi-finished goods, etc., they differ from fixed capital
composed of instruments of labour only in that they are entirely
consumed in the product (at least as far as concerns the capitalist who
pays for them) in the formation of which they participate and that
therefore their value must be replaced as a whole, while in the case of
the fixed capital this takes place only gradually, piecemeal. The part
of productive capital advanced in labour-power (or in the labourer’s
means of subsistence) differs here only materially and not in respect of
the process of labour and production of surplus-value from the other
material elements of productive capital. It differs only in so far as it
falls into the category of circulating capital together with one part of
the objective creators of the product ("materials" Adam Smith calls them
generally), as opposed to the other part of these objective product
creators, which belong in the category of fixed capital.

The fact that the capital laid out in wages belongs in the circulating
part of productive capital and, unlike the fixed component of productive
capital, shares the quality of fluency with a part of the objective
product creators, the raw materials, etc., has nothing whatever to do
with the role played in the process of self-expansion by this variable
part, as distinct from the constant part of capital. This refers only to
how this part of the advanced capital-value is to be replaced, renewed,
hence reproduced out of the value of the product of means of the
circulation. The purchase and repurchase of labour-power belong in the
process of circulation. But it is only within the process of production
that the value laid out in labour-power is converted (not for the
labourer but for the capitalist) from a definite, constant magnitude
into a variable one, and only thus the advanced value is converted
altogether into capital-value, into capital, into self-expanding value.
But by classing, like Smith, the value expended for the means of
subsistence of the labourers, instead of value laid out in labour-power,
as the circulating component of productive capital, the understanding of
the distinction between variable and constant capital, and thus the
understanding of the capitalist process of production in general, is
rendered impossible. The determination that this part of capital is
variable capital in contrast to the constant capital, spent for material
creators of the product, is buried beneath the determination that the
part of the capital invested in labour-power belongs, as far as the
turnover is concerned, in the circulating part of productive capital.
And the burial is brought to completion by enumerating the labourer’s
means of subsistence instead of his labour-power as an element of
productive capital. It is immaterial whether the value of the
labour-power is advance in money or directly in means of subsistence.
However under capitalist production the latter can be but an
exception.[24]

By thus establishing the definition of circulating capital as being the
determinant of the capital value laid out for labour-power — this
physiocratic definition without the premise of the physiocrats — Adam
Smith fortunately killed among his followers the understanding that that
part of capital which is spent on labour-power is variable capital. The
more profound and correct ideas developed by him elsewhere did not
prevail, but this blunder of his did. Indeed, other writers after him
went even further. They were not content to make it the decisive
definition of the part of capital invested in labour-power to be
circulating as opposed to fixed capital; they made it the essential
definition of circulating capital to be invested in labour-power to be
circulating as opposed to fixed capital; they made it the essential
definition of circulating capital to be invested in means of subsistence
for labourers. Naturally associated with this is the doctrine that the
labour-fund, [Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, pp. 609-11. — _Ed_.]
consisting of the necessary means of subsistence, is of a definite
magnitude, which on the one hand physically limits the share of the
labourers in the social product, but on the other has to be fully
expended in the purchase of labour-power.

Notes

23 Cf. Quesnay, _Analyse du Tableau Economique_ (_Physiocrates_, èd.
Daire, 1. partie, Paris, 1846). There we read, for instance: "The annual
advances consist of the expenses incurred annually for the labour of
cultivation; these advances must be distinguished from the original
advances, which form the fund for the establishment of the farming
enterprise." (P. 59.) In the works of the later physiocrats these
advances are sometimes termed directly capital: _Capital ou avances_
Dupont de Nemours, _Maximes du Docteur Quesnay, ou Rèsumè de ses
Principes d’Economie Sociale_ (Daire, I, p. 391); furthermore Le Trosne
writes: "As a result of the greater or smaller durability of the works
of human labour, a nation possesses a substantial fund of wealth
independent of its annual reproduction, this fund forming a capital —
accumulated over a long period and originally paid with products — which
is continually preserved and augmented." (Daire, II, pp. 928-29.) Turgot
employs the term capital more regularly for _avances_, and identifies
the _avances_ of the manufacturers still more with those of the farmers.
(Turgot, _Rèflexions surla Formation et la Distribution des Richesses_,
1766.)

24 To what extent Adam Smith has blocked his own way to an understanding
of the role of labour-power in the process of self-expansion of value is
proven by the following sentence, which in the manner of the physiocrats
places the labour of labourers on a level with that of labouring cattle.
“Not only his (the farmer’s) labouring servants, but his labouring
cattle are productive labourers.” (Book II, Ch. V, p. 243.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 11: Theories of Fixed and Circulating Capital

Ricardo

Ricardo introduces the distinction between fixed and circulating capital
merely for the purpose of illustrating the exceptions to the rule of
value, namely, cases where the rate of wages affects prices. The
discussion of this point is reserved for Book III. [Karl Marx,
_Capital_, Vol. III, Ch. XI, pp. 196-200. — _Ed_.]

But the original lack of clarity is apparent at the outset in the
following immaterial juxtaposition:

“This difference in the degree of durability of fixed capital, _and_
this variety in the proportions in which the two sorts of capital may be
combined.”^([25])

And if we ask him which two sorts of capital he is referring to, we are
told:

“The proportions, too, in which the capital that is to support labour,
and the capital that is invested in tools, machinery, and buildings, may
be variously combined.”^([26])

In other words, fixed capital equals instruments of labour and
circulating capital equals capital laid out in labour. “Capital that is
to support labour” is a senseless term culled from Adam Smith. On the
one hand the circulating capital is here lumped together with the
variable capital, i.e., with that part of productive capital which is
laid out in labour. But on the other hand doubly erroneous definitions
arise for the reason that the antithesis is not derived from the process
of self-expansion of value — constant and variable capital — but from
the process of circulation (Adam Smith’s old confusion).

First: The differences in the degree of durability of fixed capital and
the difference arising from capital being composed of constant and
variable capital are conceived as being of equal significance. But the
last-named difference determines the difference in the production of
surplus-value; the first named on the other hand, so far as the process
of self-expansion is concerned, refers only to the manner in which a
particular value is transferred from a means of production to the
product; so far as the process of circulation is concerned, this
difference refers only to the period of the renewal of the expended
capital, or, from another point of view, to the time for which it has
been advanced. If instead of seeing through the internal machinery of
the capitalist process of production one considers merely the
accomplished phenomena, then these distinctions actually coincide. In
the distribution of the social surplus-value among the various capitals
invested in different branches of industry, the differences in the
different periods of time for which capital is advanced (for instance
the various degrees of durability of fixed capital) and the different
organic compositions of capital (and therefore also the different
circulations of constant and variable capital) contribute equally toward
an equalisation of the general rate of profit and the conversion of
values into prices of production.

Secondly: From the point of view of the process of circulation, we have
on one side the instruments of labour — fixed capital, on the other the
material of labour and wages — circulating capital. But from the point
of view of the process of labour and self-expansion, we have on the one
side means of production (instruments of labour and material of labour)
— constant capital; on the other, labour-power — variable capital. It is
wholly immaterial for the organic composition of capital (Buch I, Kap.
XXIII, 2, p. 647) [English edition, Volume I, Ch. XXV, 2, pp. 622-23. —
_Ed_.] whether a specified quantity of value of constant capital
consists of many instruments of labour and little material of labour or
of much material of labour and few instruments of labour, while
everything depends on the ratio of the capital laid out in means of
production to that laid out in labour-power. Vice versa: from the point
of view of the process of circulation, of the distinction between fixed
and circulating capital, it is just as immaterial in what proportions a
particular quantity of value circulating capital divides into material
of labour and wages. From one of these points of view the material of
labour is classed in the same category with the instruments of labour,
as opposed to the capital-value laid out in labour-power; from the other
view-point the part of capital laid out in labour-power ranges with that
laid out in material of labour, as opposed to that laid out in
instruments of labour.

For this reason the part of the capital-value laid out in material of
labour (raw and auxiliary materials) does not appear on either side in
Ricardo. It disappears entirely; for it will not do to class it with
fixed capital, because its mode of circulation coincides entirely with
that of the part of capital laid out in labour-power. And on the other
hand it should not be placed alongside circulating capital, because in
that event the identification of the antithesis of fixed and circulating
capital with that of constant and variable capital, which had been
handed down by Adam Smith and is tacitly retained, would abolish itself.
Ricardo has too much logical instinct not to feel this, and for this
reason that part of capital vanishes entirely from his sight.

It is to be noted at this point that the capitalist, to use the jargon
of Political Economy, advances the capital laid out in wages for various
periods of time, according to whether he pays these wages weekly,
monthly, or quarterly. But as a matter of fact the reverse takes place.
It is the labourer who advances his labour to the capitalist for a week,
a month, or three months, according to whether he is paid by the week,
by the month, or every three months. If the capitalist _bought_
labour-power instead of paying for it, in other words, if he paid the
labourer his wages in advance for a day, a week, a month, or a quarter,
he would be justified in claiming that he advanced wages for those
periods. But since he pays after the labour _has_ lasted for days,
weeks, or months, instead of buying it and paying for the time which it
is to last, the whole thing amounts to a capitalist _quid pro quo_, and
the advance which the labour gives to the capitalist in labour is turned
into an advance of money given to the labourer by the capitalist. It
does not alter the case in the least that the capitalist gets back the
product itself or its value (together with the surplus-value embodied in
it) from circulation, or realises it, only after a relatively long or
short period of time, according to the different periods required for
its manufacture or for its circulation. The seller of a commodity does
not care a rap what its buyer is going to do with it. The capitalist
does not get a machine cheaper because he must advance its entire value
at one shot, while this value returns to him only gradually and
piecemeal from circulation; nor does he pay more for cotton because its
value enters entirely into the value of the product into which it is
made and is therefore replaced fully and at one time by the sale of the
product.

Let us return to Ricardo.

1. The characteristic feature of variable capital is that a definite,
given (and as such constant) part of capital, a given sum of values
(assumed to be equal in value to the labour-power, although it does not
matter here whether the wages are equal, more or less than the value of
the labour-power) is exchanged for a self-expanding, value-creating
power, viz., labour-power, which not only reproduces its value, paid by
the capitalist, but simultaneously produces a surplus-value, a value not
existing previously and not paid for by any equivalent. This
characteristic property of the part of capital laid out for wages, which
distinguishes it _toto coelo_ as variable capital from constant capital,
disappears whenever the part of capital expended on wages is considered
solely from the point of view of the process of circulation and thus
appears as circulating capital in contradistinction to the fixed capital
laid out in instruments of labour. This is apparent if only from the
fact that it is then brought under one head — that of circulating
capital — together with the component part of the constant capital laid
out in material of labour and opposed to the other component of the
constant capital — that laid out in instruments of labour.
Surplus-value, hence the very circumstance which converts the laid-out
sum of value into capital, is entirely ignored thereby. Similarly the
fact is ignored that the part of the value added to the product by the
capital laid out in wages is newly produced (and therefore really
reproduced), while the part of the value which the raw material adds to
the product is not newly produced, not really reproduced, but only
preserved in the value of the product, conserved, and hence merely
reappears as a component part of the value of the product. The
distinction, as now seen from the point of view of the contrast between
fixed and circulating capital, consists simply in this: The value of the
instruments of labour used for the production of a commodity enters only
partially into the value of the commodity and is therefore only
partially replaced by its sale, hence is replaced altogether only
piecemeal and gradually. On the other hand the value of the labour-power
and subjects of labour (raw materials, etc.) used for the production of
a commodity entirely enters into it and is therefore entirely replaced
by its sale. In this respect, as far as the process of circulation is
concerned, one part of capital presents itself as fixed, the other as
fluent, or circulating. In both cases it is a matter of transferring
given, advanced values to the product and of their replacement by the
sale of the product. The difference now depends only on whether the
transfer of value, and consequently the replacement of the value, takes
place piecemeal and gradually, or in bulk. By this means the distinction
between the variable and constant capital, which decides everything, is
blotted out, hence the whole secret of the production of surplus-value
and of capitalist production, the circumstances which transform certain
values and the things in which they present themselves into capital, are
obliterated. All constituent parts of capital are then distinguished
merely by their mode of circulation (and, of course, circulation of
commodities concerns itself solely with already existing given values);
and the capital laid out in wages shares a peculiar mode of circulation
with the part of capital laid out in raw materials, semi-finished
products, auxiliary materials, as opposed to the part of capital laid
out in instruments of labour.

It is therefore understandable why bourgeois Political Economy
instinctively clung to Adam Smith’s confusion of the categories
“constant and variable capital” with the categories “fixed and
circulating,” and repeated it parrotlike, without criticism, from
generation to generation for a century. The part of capital laid out for
wages is no longer in the least distinguished by bourgeois Political
Economy from the part of capital laid out for raw materials, and differs
only formally from constant capital — on the point of whether it is
circulated piecemeal or in one lump by the product. Thereby the basis
for an understanding of the real movement of capitalist production, and
hence of capitalist exploitation, is buried at one stroke. It is but a
question of the reappearance of advanced values.

In Ricardo the uncritical adoption of the Smithian confusion is more
disturbing not only than in the later apologists, in whom the confusion
of ideas is rather something not disturbing, but than in Adam Smith
himself, because Ricardo, in contrast to the latter, is more consistent
and incisive in his analysis of value and surplus-value, and indeed
upholds the esoteric Adam Smith against the exoteric Adam Smith.

Among the physiocrats there is no such confusion. The distinction
between _avances annuelles_ and _avances primitives_ refers only to the
different periods of reproduction of the different component of capital,
especially of agricultural capital, while their views on the production
of surplus-value form a part of their theory that is independent of
these distinctions, a part they hold up as the strong point of the
theory. The formation of surplus-value is not explained as originating
from capital as such, but is attributed to one particular sphere of the
production of capital, agriculture.

Secondly. The essential point in the definition of variable capital —
and therefore for the conversion of any sum of values into capital — is
that the capitalist exchanges a definite, given (and in this sense
constant) magnitude of value for value-creating power, a magnitude of
value for the production, self-expansion, of value. Whether the
capitalist pays the labourer in money or in means of subsistence does
not affect this basic definition. It only alters the mode of existence
of the value advanced by the capitalist which in one case exists in the
form of money for which the labourer buys himself his means of
subsistence in the market, in the other case in the form of means of
subsistence which he consumes directly. Developed capitalist production
rests indeed on the assumption that the labourer is paid in money, just
as in general it presupposes the process of production brought about by
the process of circulation, hence presupposes the monetary system. But
the creation of surplus-value — and consequently the capitalisation of
the advanced sum of values — has its source neither in the money-form of
wages nor in the form of wages paid in kind, nor in the capital laid out
in the purchase of labour-power. It arises out of the exchange of value
for value-creating power, out of the conversion of a constant into a
variable magnitude.

The greater or smaller fixity of the instruments of labour depends on
their degree of durability, hence on a physical property. Other
circumstances being equal, they will wear out sooner or later, will
therefore function a longer or a shorter time as fixed capital,
according to their durability. But it is by no means solely on account
of this physical property of durability that they function as fixed
capital. The raw material in metal factories is just as durable as the
machines used in manufacturing, and more durable than many component
parts of these machines, such as leather and wood. Nevertheless the
metal serving as raw materials forms a part of the circulating capital,
while the instrument of labour, although probably built of the same
metal, is a part of the fixed capital when in use. Consequently it is
not because of the material, physical nature, nor the relatively great
or small speed with which it wears out that a metal is put now in the
category of fixed, now in that of circulating capital. This distinction
is rather due to the role played by it in the process of production,
being a subject of labour in one case and an instrument of labour in the
other.

The function of an instrument of labour in the process of production
requires that on the average it should serve for a longer or shorter
period in ever renewed labour-processes. Its very function therefore
prescribes that the stuff of which it is composed should be more or less
durable. But it is not the durability of the material of which it is
fabricated that by itself makes it fixed capital. The same stuff, when
raw material, becomes circulating capital, and among economists who
confuse the distinction between commodity-capital and productive capital
with the distinction between circulating and fixed capital, the same
stuff, the same machine, is circulating capital as product and fixed
capital as instrument of labour.

Although it is not the durability of the material of which it is
fabricated that makes an instrument of labour fixed capital,
nevertheless its role as such an instrument requires that it should be
composed of relatively durable material. The durability of its material
is therefore a condition of its function as an instrument of labour, and
consequently the material basis of the mode of circulation which renders
it fixed capital. Other things being equal, the higher or lower degree
of wear and tear of the stuff it is made of impresses upon it in a
higher or lower degree the stamp of fixedness, is therefore very closely
interwoven with the quality of being fixed capital.

If the part of capital laid out in labour-power is considered
exclusively from the point of view of circulating capital, hence in
contrast with fixed capital, and if consequently the distinctions
between constant and variable capital are lumped with those between
fixed and circulating capital, then it is natural — supposing that
material reality of the instrument of labour forms an essential basis of
its character of fixed capital — to derive its character of circulating
capital, in contrast with the fixed capital, from the material reality
of the capital invested in labour-power, and then again to determine the
circulating capital with the aid of the material reality of the variable
capital.

The real substance of the capital laid out in wages is labour itself,
active, value-creating labour-power, living labour, which the capitalist
exchanges for dead, materialised labour and embodies in his capital, by
which means, and by which alone, the value in his hands turns into
self-expanding value. But this power of self-expansion is not sold by
the capitalist. It is always only a constituent part of his productive
capital, the same as his instruments of labour; it is never a part of
his commodity-capital, as for instance the finished product which he
sells. In the process of production the instruments of labour, as
components of the productive capital, are not opposed to labour-power as
fixed capital any more than materials of labour and auxiliary substances
are identified with it as circulating capital. Labour-power confronts
both of them as a personal factor, while those are objective factors —
speaking from the point of view of the labour-process. Both of them
stand opposed to labour-power, as constant capital to variable capital —
speaking from the point of view of the process of self-expansion of
value. Or, if mention is to be made here of a material difference, so
far as it affects the process of circulation, it is only this: It
follows from the nature of value, which is nothing but materialised
labour, and from the nature of active labour-power, which is nothing but
labour in process of materialisation, that labour-power continually
creates value and surplus-value during the time it functions; that what
on the part of labour-power appears as motion, as a creation of value,
appears on the part of its product in a state of rest, as created value.
If the labour-power has performed its function, capital no longer
consists of labour-power on the one side and means of production on the
other. The capital-value that was invested in labour-power is now value
which ( + surplus-value) was added to the product. In order to repeat
the process, the product must be sold and new labour-power constantly
bought with the proceeds and incorporated in the productive capital.
This then gives to the part of capital invested in labour-power, and to
that invested in material of labour, etc., the character of circulating
capital as opposed to the capital remaining fixed in the instruments of
labour.

But if, on the contrary, the secondary definition of the circulating
capital, which it shares with a part of the constant capital (raw and
auxiliary materials), is made the essential definition of the part of
capital laid out in labour-power, to wit, that the value laid out in it
is transferred in full to the product in whose creation it is consumed,
and not gradually and piecemeal as in the case of the fixed capital, and
that consequently it must be replaced in full by the sale of the product
— then the part of the capital laid out in wages must likewise consist,
materially, not of active labour-power but of the material elements
which the labourer buys with his wages, i.e., it must consist of that
part of the social commodity-capital which passes into the consumption
of the labourer, viz., of means of subsistence. In that case the fixed
capital consists of the more slowly perishable instruments of labour
which therefore have to be replaced more slowly, and the capital laid
out in labour-power consists of the means of subsistence, which must be
replaced more rapidly.

However, the border-line between greater or lesser perishableness is
very vague and indistinct.

“The food and clothing consumed by the labourer, the buildings in which
he works, the implements with which his labour is assisted, are all of a
perishable nature. There is however a vast difference in the time for
which these different capitals will endure: a steam-engine will last
longer than a ship, a ship than the clothing of the labourer, and the
clothing of the labourer longer than the food which he consumes.”^([27])

Ricardo forgets to mention the house in which the labourer lives, his
furniture, his tools of consumption, such as knives, forks, dishes,
etc., all of which have the same quality of durability as the
instruments of labour. The same things, the same kinds of things, appear
in one place as articles of consumption and in another as instruments of
labour.

The difference, as stated by Ricardo, is this:

“According as capital is rapidly perishable and requires to be
frequently reproduced, or is of slow consumption, it is classed under
the heads of circulating or fixed capital.”^([28])

And he adds this note:

“A division not essential, and in which the line of demarcation cannot
be accurately drawn.”^([29])

Thus we have once more happily arrived in the camp of the physiocrats,
where the distinction between _avances annuelles_ and _avances
primitives_ was one referring to the time of consumption, and
consequently also to the different times of reproduction of the capital
employed. Only, what with them constitutes an important phenomenon of
social production and is described in the _Tableau Économique_ in
connection with the process of circulation, becomes here a subjective
and, in Ricardo’s own words, superfluous distinction.

Once the part of capital invested in labour differs from that invested
in instruments of labour only by its period of reproduction and hence
its term of circulation, and once one part consists of means of
subsistence and the other of instruments of labour so that those differ
from these only in being more rapidly perishable, there being various
degrees of durability within the first group itself, all _differentia
specifica_ between capital invested in labour-power and capital invested
in means of production is naturally obliterated.

This wholly contradicts Ricardo’s doctrine of value, likewise his theory
of profit, which is in fact a theory of surplus-value. In general he
considers the distinction between fixed and circulating capital only to
the extent that different proportions of both of them in equally large
capitals invested in different branches of production influence the law
of value, particularly the extent to which an increase or decrease of
wages in consequence of these conditions affects prices. But even within
this restricted investigation he commits the gravest errors on account
of his confusing fixed and circulating with constant and variable
capital. Indeed, he starts his analysis on an entirely wrong basis. In
the first place, in so far as the part of the capital-value laid out in
labour-power has to be classified under the head of circulating capital,
the definitions of circulating capital itself are wrongly developed,
particularly the circumstances which place the part of capital laid out
in labour under this head. In the second place there is a confusion of
the definition according to which the part of capital invested in labour
is variable capital with the definition according to which it is
circulating capital, as opposed to fixed capital.

It is evident at the outset that the definition of capital invested in
labour-power as circulating or fluent capital is a secondary one,
obliterating its _differentia specifica_ in the process of production.
For in this definition, on the one hand, the capitals invested in labour
are of the same importance as those invested in raw material, etc. A
classification which identifies a part of the constant capital with the
variable capital does not deal with the _differentia specifica_ of
variable capital in opposition to constant capital. On the other hand
the parts of capital laid out in labour are indeed opposed to those
invested in instruments of labour, but not in the least with reference
to the fact that these parts enter into the production of value in quite
different ways, but with reference to the fact that both transfer their
value to the product, but in different periods of time.

In all of these cases the point at issue is _how_ a given value, laid
out in the process of production of commodities, whether it be wages,
the price of raw materials, or that of instruments of labour, is
transferred to the product, hence is circulated by the product, and
returned to its starting-point by the sale of the product, or is
replaced. The only difference lies here in the “_how_,” in the
particular manner of the transfer, and therefore also of the circulation
of this value.

Whether the price of labour-power previously stipulated by contract in
each individual case is paid in money or means of subsistence does not
alter in any way its character of being a fixed price. However it is
evident in the case of wages paid in money that the money itself does
not pass into the process of production in the way that the value as
well as the material of the means of production do. But if on the other
hand the means of subsistence which the labourer buys with his wages are
directly classed in the same category, alongside raw materials, etc., as
the material form of circulating capital and are opposed to the
instruments of labour, then the matter assumes a different aspect. If
the value of these things, of the means of production, is transferred to
the product in the labour-process, the value of those other things, the
means of subsistence, reappears in the labour-power that consumes them
and is likewise transferred to the product by the functioning of this
power. In both these cases it is equally a question of the mere
reappearance, in the product, of the values advanced during production.
(The physiocrats took this seriously and therefore denied that
industrial labour created surplus-value.) Thus the previously quoted
[Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, p. 207, Note 3. — _Ed_.] passage from
Wayland.

“The form, however, is of no consequence... The various kinds of food,
clothing, and shelter, necessary for the existence and comfort of the
human being, are also changed. They are consumed, from time to time, and
their value reappears...” (_Elements of Pol. Econ_., pp. 31, 32.)

The capital-values advanced for production in the form of both means of
production and means of subsistence reappear here equally in the value
of the product. Thus the transformation of the capitalist process of
production into a complete mystery is happily accomplished and the
origin of the surplus-value existing in the product is entirely
withdrawn from view.

Furthermore this brings to completion the fetishism peculiar to
bourgeois Political Economy, the fetishism which metamorphoses the
social, economic character impressed on things in the process of social
production into a natural character stemming from the material nature of
those things. For instance, “instruments of labour are fixed capital,”
is a scholastic definition, which leads to contradictions and confusion.
Just as was demonstrated in the case of the labour-process (Buch I, Kap.
V), [English edition: Ch. VII. — _Ed_.] that it depends wholly on the
role which the material components play in a particular labour-process,
on their function — whether they function as instruments of labour,
material of labour, or products — so instruments of labour are fixed
capital only if the process of production is really a capitalist process
of production and the means of production are therefore really capital
and possess economic definiteness, the social character of capital. And
in the second place, they are fixed capital only if they transfer their
value to the product in a particular way. If not, they remain
instruments of labour without being fixed capital. In the same way if
auxiliary materials like manure give up value in the same peculiar
manner as the greater part of the instruments of labour, they become
fixed capital although they are not instruments of labour. It is not a
question here of definitions, which things must be made to fit. We are
dealing here with definite functions which must be expressed in definite
categories.

If to be capital laid out in wages is considered one of the qualities of
means of subsistence as such under all circumstances, then it will also
be a quality of this “circulating” capital “TO SUPPORT LABOUR.”
(Ricardo, p. 25.) If the means of subsistence were not “capital” they
would not support labour-power; whereas it is precisely their quality of
capital that endows them with the faculty of supporting _capital by
foreign labour_.

If means of subsistence as such are circulating capital — after the
latter had been converted into wages — it follows further that the
magnitude of wages depends on the ratio of the number of labourers to
the given amount of circulating capital — a favourite economic
proposition — while as a matter of fact the quantity of means of
subsistence withdrawn from the market by the labourer, and the quantity
of means of subsistence available for the consumption of the capitalist,
depend on the ratio of the surplus-value to the price of labour.

Ricardo, like Barton, ^([29a]) everywhere confounds the relation of
variable to constant capital with that of circulating to fixed capital.
We shall see later to what extent this vitiates his investigation of the
rate of profit. [Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. III, Ch. I-III. — _Ed_.]

Ricardo furthermore identifies the differences which arise in the
turnover from other causes than the distinction between fixed and
circulating capital with this distinction:

“It is also to be observed that the circulating capital may circulate,
or be returned to its employer, in very unequal times. The wheat bought
by a farmer to sow is comparatively a fixed capital to the wheat
purchased by a baker to make into loaves. The one leaves it in the
ground, and can obtain no return for a year; the other can get it ground
into flour, sell it as bread to his customers, and have his capital
free, to renew the same, or commence any other employment in a
week.”^([30])

It is characteristic here that wheat, although not serving as a means of
subsistence but as raw material when used for sowing, is in the first
place circulating capital, because in itself it is a means of
subsistence, and in the second placed fixed capital, because its return
takes over a year. However it is not only the more or less slow or rapid
return which makes a fixed capital of a means of production, but also
the definite manner in which it transfers its value to the product.

The confusion created by Adam Smith has brought about the following
results:

1. The distinction between fixed and circulating capital is confused
with that between productive capital and commodity-capital. For instance
a machine is considered circulating capital when in the market as a
commodity, and fixed capital when incorporated in the process of
production. Moreover, it is absolutely impossible to ascertain why one
kind of capital should be more fixed or circulating than another.

2. All circulating capital is identified with capital laid out or to be
laid out in wages. This is so in John Stewart Mill, [J. St. Mill,
_Essays on Some Unsettled Questions of Political Economy_, London, 1844,
p. 164. — _Ed_. ] and others.

3. The distinction between variable and constant capital, which was
previously mistaken by Barton, Ricardo, and others for that between
circulating and fixed capital, is finally wholly reduced to this
last-named distinction, for instance in Ramsay, where all means of
production, raw materials, etc., as well as instruments of labour are
fixed capital, and only capital laid out in wages is circulating
capital. [G. Ramsay, _An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth_,
Edinburgh, 1833, pp. 21-24. — _Ed_.] But because the reduction takes
place in this form, the real distinction between constant and variable
capital is not understood.

4. The latter-day British, especially Scotch, economists, who look upon
all things from the inexpressibly narrow-minded point of view of a bank
clerk, such as MacLeod, [H. D. MacLeod, _The Elements of Political
Economy_, London, 1858, pp. 76-80. — _Ed_.] Patterson, [R. H. Patterson,
_The Science of Finance. A Practical Treatise_, Edinburgh and London,
1868, pp. 129-44. — _Ed_.] and others, transform the distinction between
fixed and circulating capital into one between MONEY AT CALL and MONEY
NOT AT CALL.

Notes

25 Ricardo, _Principles_, etc., p. 25.

26 _Loc. cit._

27 Ricardo, _Principles_, etc., p. 26.

28 _Ibid._

29 _Ibid._

29a _Observations on the Circumstances Which Influence the Condition of
the Labouring Classes of Society_, London, 1817. A pertinent passage is
quoted in Book I, p. 655, Note 79. [English edition: p. 631, Note 1.]

30 _Principles_, etc., pp. 26 and 27.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 12: The Working Period

Let us take two branches of business with working-days of equal length,
say, of ten hours each, one of them a cotton spinning-mill, the other a
locomotive works. In one of these branches a definite quantity of
finished product, cotton yarn, is turned out daily or weekly; in the
other, the labour-process has to be repeated for perhaps three months in
order to manufacture a finished product, a locomotive. In one case the
product is discrete in nature; and each day or week the same labour
starts over again. In the other case the labour-process is continuous
and extends over a rather great number of daily labour-processes which,
in their interconnection, in the continuity of their operation, bring
forth a finished product only after a rather long period of time.
Although the duration of the daily labour-process is the same here,
there is a very marked difference in the duration of the productive act,
i.e., in the duration of the repeated labour-processes required to get
out a finished product, to market it as a commodity, hence to convert it
from productive to commodity-capital. The distinction between fixed and
circulating capital has nothing to do with this. The distinction
indicated would exist even if the very same proportions of fixed and
circulating capital were employed in both branches of production.

These differences in the duration of the productive act can be observed
not alone between different spheres of production, but also within one
and the same sphere of production, depending on the amount of product to
be turned out. An ordinary dwelling house is built in less time than a
large factory and therefore requires fewer continuous labour-processes.
While the building of a locomotive takes three months, that of an
armoured man-of-war requires one year or more. It takes nearly a year to
produce grain and several years to raise big cattle, while
timber-growing needs from twelve to one hundred years. A few months will
suffice for a country road, while a railway is a job of years. An
ordinary carpet is made in about a week, but a _Gobelin_ takes years,
etc. Hence the time consumed in the performance of the productive act
varies infinitely.

The difference in the duration of the productive act must evidently give
rise to a difference in the velocity of the turnover, if invested
capitals are equal, in other words, must make a difference in the time
for which a certain capital is advanced. Assume that a spinning-mill and
a locomotive works employ the same amount of capital, that the ratio of
their constant to their variable capital is the same, likewise the
proportion between the fixed and circulating parts of the capitals, and
that lastly their working-day is of equal length and its division into
necessary and surplus-labour the same. In order to eliminate,
furthermore, all the circumstances arising out of the process of
circulation and having no bearing on the present case, let us suppose
that both the yarn and the locomotive are made to order and will be paid
on delivery of the finished product. At the end of the week, on delivery
of the finished yarn, the spinning-mill owner recovers his outlay for
circulating capital (leaving the surplus-value out of consideration),
likewise the fixed capital’s wear and tear incorporated in the value of
the yarn. He can therefore repeat the same circuit anew with the same
capital. It has completed its turnover. The locomotive manufacturer on
the other hand must lay out ever new capital for wages and raw material
every week for three months in succession, and it is only after three
months, after the delivery of the locomotive, that the circulating
capital, meanwhile gradually laid out in one and the same productive act
for the manufacture of one and the same commodity, once more exists in a
form in which it can renew its circuit. The wear and tear of his
machinery during these three months is likewise replaced only now. The
expenditure of the one is made for one week, that of the other is the
weekly expenditure multiplied by twelve. All other circumstances being
assumed as equal, the one must have twelve times as much circulating
capital at his disposal as the other.

It is however immaterial here that the capitals advanced weekly are
equal. Whatever the amount of the advanced capital, it is advanced for
only one week in the one case and for twelve weeks in the other, and the
above periods must respectively elapse before it can be used for a new
operation, before the same operation can be repeated with it, or a
different one inaugurated.

The difference in the velocity of the turnover, or in the length of time
for which the individual capital must be advanced before the same
capital-value can be employed in a new labour- or self-expansion
process, arises here from the following circumstances:

Granted the manufacture of a locomotive or of any other machine requires
100 working-days. So far as the labourers employed in the manufacture of
yarn or the building of locomotives are concerned, 100 working-days
constitute in either case a discontinuous (discrete) magnitude,
consisting, according to our assumption, of 100 consecutive separate
ten-hour labour-processes. But so far as the product — the machine — is
concerned, these 100 working-days form a continuous magnitude, a
working-day of 1,000 working-hours, one single connected act of
production. I call such a working-day which is composed of a more or
less numerous succession of connected working days a _working period_.
When we speak of a working-day we mean the length of working time during
which the labourer must daily spend his labour-power, must work day by
day. But when we speak of a working period we mean the number of
connected working-days required in a certain branch of industry for the
manufacture of a finished product. In this case the product of every
working-day is but a partial one, which is further worked upon from day
to day and only at the end of the longer or shorter working period
receives its finished form, is a finished use-value.

Interruptions, disturbances of the process of social production, in
consequence for instance of crises, have therefore very different
effects on labour-products of a discrete nature and on those that
require for their production a prolonged connected period. In the one
case all that happens is that today’s production of a certain quantity
of yarn, coal, etc., is not followed by tomorrow’s new production of
yarn, coal, etc. Not so in the case of ships, buildings, railways, etc.
Here it is not only the day’s work but an entire connected act of
production that is interrupted. If the job is not continued, the means
of production and labour already consumed in its production are wasted.
Even if it is resumed, a deterioration has inevitably set in in the
meantime.

For the entire length of the working period, the part of the value daily
transferred to the product by the fixed capital accumulates in layers,
as it were, until the product is finished. And here the difference
between fixed and circulating capital is revealed at the same time in
its practical significance. Fixed capital is advanced in the process of
production for a comparatively long period; it need not be renewed until
after the expiration of perhaps a period of several years. Whether a
steam-engine transfers its value daily piecemeal to some yarn, the
product of a discrete labour-process, or for three months to a
locomotive, the product of a continuous act of production, is immaterial
as far as laying out the capital required for the purchase of the
steam-engine is concerned. In the one case its value flows back in small
doses, for instance weekly, in the other case in larger quantities, for
instance quarterly. But in either case the renewal of the steam-engine
may take place only after twenty years. So long as every individual
period within which the value of the steam-engine is returned piecemeal
by the sale of the product is shorter than the lifetime of the engine
itself, the latter continues to function in the process of production
for several working periods.

It is different with the circulating components of the advanced capital.
The labour-power bought for a definite week is expended in the course of
the same week and is materialised in the product. It must be paid for at
the end of the week. And this investment of capital in labour-power is
repeated every week during the three months; yet the expenditure of this
part of the capital during the week does not enable the capitalist to
settle for the purchase of the labour the following week. Every week
additional capital must be expended to pay for labour-power, and,
leaving aside the question of credit, the capitalist must be able to lay
out wages for three months, even if he pays them only in weekly doses.
It is the same with the other portion of circulating capital, the raw
and auxiliary materials. One layer of labour after another is piled up
on the product. It is not alone the value of the expended labour-power
that is continually being transferred to the product during the
labour-process, but also surplus-value. This product, however, is
unfinished, it has not yet the form of a finished commodity, hence it
cannot yet circulate. This applies likewise to the capital-value
transferred in layers from the raw and auxiliary materials to the
product.

Depending on the length of the working period exacted by the specific
nature of the product or by the useful effect to be achieved in its
manufacture, a continuous additional investment of circulating capital
(wages and raw and auxiliary materials) is required, no part of which is
in a form capable of circulation and hence of promoting a renewal of the
same operation. Every part is on the contrary held fast successively in
the sphere of production as a component of the nascent product, tied up
in the form of productive capital. Now, the time of turnover is equal to
the sum of the time of production and the time of circulation of the
capital. Hence a prolongation of the time of production reduces the
velocity of the turnover quite as much as a prolongation of the time of
circulation. In the present case however the following two points must
be noted:

Firstly: The prolonged stay in the sphere of production. The capital
advanced for instance for labour, raw material, etc., during the first
week, as well as the portions of value transferred to the product by the
fixed capital, are held fast in the sphere of production for the entire
term of three months, and, being incorporated in an only nascent, still
unfinished product, cannot pass into circulation as commodities.

Secondly: Since the working period required for the performance of the
productive act lasts three months, and forms in fact only one connected
labour-process, a new dose of circulating capital must be continually
added week after week to the preceding amount. The total of the
successively advanced additional capital grows therefore with the length
of the working period.

We have assumed that capitals of equal size are invested in spinning and
machine-building, that these capitals contain equal proportions of
constant and variable, fixed and circulating capital, that the
working-days are of equal length, in brief, that all conditions are
equal except the duration of the working period. In the first week, the
outlay for both is the same, but the product of the spinner can be sold
and the proceeds of the sale used to buy new labour-power, new raw
materials, etc.; in short, production can be resumed on the same scale.
The machine-manufacturer on the other hand cannot reconvert the
circulating capital expended in the first week into money and resume
operations with it until three months later, when his product is
finished. There is therefore first a difference in the return of the
identical quantities of capital invested. But in the second place
identical amounts of productive capital are employed during the three
months in both spinning and machine-building. However the magnitude of
the outlay of capital in the case of the yarn manufacturer is quite
different from that of the machine-builder; for in the one case the same
capital is rapidly renewed and the same operation can therefore be
repeated, while in the other case the renewal of the capital is
relatively slow, so that ever new quantities of capital must be added to
the old up to the time of its renewal. Consequently there is a
difference not only in the length of time of renewal of definite
portions of capital, or in the length of time for which the capital is
advanced, but also in the quantity of the capital to be advanced
according to the duration of the labour-process (although the capitals
employed daily or weekly are equal). This circumstance is worthy of note
for the reason that the term of the advance may be prolonged, as we
shall see in the cases treated in the next chapter, without thereby
necessitating a corresponding increase in the amount of the capital to
be advanced. The capital must be advanced for a longer time, and a
larger amount of capital is tied up in the form of productive capital.

At the less developed stages of capitalist production, undertakings
requiring a long working period, and hence a large investment of capital
for a long time, such as the building of roads, canals, etc., especially
when they can be carried out only on a large scale, are either not
carried out on a capitalist basis at all, but rather at communal or
state expense (in earlier times generally by forced labour, so far as
the labour-power was concerned). Or objects whose production requires a
lengthy working period are fabricated only for the smallest part by
recourse to the private means of the capitalist himself. For instance,
in the building of a house, the private person for whom it is built
makes a number of partial advance payments to the building contractor.
He therefore actually pays for the house piecemeal, in proportion as the
productive process progresses. But in the advanced capitalist era, when
on the one hand huge capitals are concentrated in the hands of single
individuals, while on the other the associated capitalist (joint-stock
companies) appears side by side with the individual capitalist and a
credit system has simultaneously been developed, a capitalist building
contractor builds only in exceptional cases on the order of private
individuals. His business nowadays is to build whole rows of houses and
entire sections of cities for the market, just as it is the business of
individual capitalists to build railways as contractors.

To what extent capitalist production has revolutionised the building of
houses in London is shown by the testimony of a builder before the
banking committee of 1857. When he was young, he said, houses were
generally built to order and the payments made in instalments to the
contractor as certain stages of the building were being completed. Very
little was built on speculation. Contractors used to assent to such
operations mainly to keep their men in constant employment and thus hold
them together. In the last forty years all that has changed. Very little
is now built to order. Anyone wanting a new house picks one from among
those built on speculation or still in process of construction. The
builder no longer works for his customers but for the market. Like every
other industrial capitalist he is compelled to have finished articles in
the market. While formerly a builder had perhaps three or four houses
building at a time for speculation, he must now buy a large plot of
ground (which in continental language means rent it for ninety-nine
years, as a rule), build from 100 to 200 houses on it, and thus embark
on an enterprise which exceeds his resources twenty to fifty times. The
funds are procured through mortgaging and the money is placed at the
disposal of the contractor as the buildings proceed. Then, if a crisis
comes along and interrupts the payment of the advance instalments, the
entire enterprise generally collapses. At best, the houses remain
unfinished until better times arrive; at the worst they are sold at
auction for half their cost. Without speculative building, and on a
large scale at that, no contractor can get along today. The profit from
just building is extremely small. His main profit comes from raising the
ground-rent, from careful selection and skilled utilisation of the
building terrain. It is by this method of speculation anticipating the
demand for houses that almost the whole Belgravia and Tyburnia, and the
countless thousands of villas round London have been built. (Abbreviated
from the Report of the Select Committee on Bank Acts, Part I, 1857,
Evidence, Questions 5413-18; 5435-36.)

The execution of enterprises requiring working periods of considerable
length and operations on a large scale does not fall fully within the
province of capitalist production until the concentration of capital
becomes very pronounced, and the development of the credit system offers
to the capitalist, on the other hand, the convenient expedient of
advancing and thus risking other people’s capital instead of his own. It
goes without saying that whether the capital advanced in production
belongs to him who uses it or does not has no effect on the velocity or
time of turnover.

Conditions such as cooperation, division of labour, application of
machinery, which augment the product of the individual working-day,
shorten at the same time the working period of connected acts of
production. Thus machinery shortens the building time of houses,
bridges, etc.; mowers and threshers reduce the working period required
to transform ripe grain into the finished product. Greater speed due to
improved shipbuilding cuts the turnover time of capital invested in
shipping. But improvements that shorten the working period and thereby
the time during which circulating capital must be advanced generally go
hand in hand with an increased outlay of fixed capital.

On the other hand the working period in certain branches of production
may be diminished by the mere extension of cooperation. The completion
of a railway is expedited by setting afoot huge armies of labourer and
thus tackling the job in many spots at once. The time of turnover is
lessened in that case by an increase of the advanced capital. More means
of production and more labour-power must be united under the command of
the capitalist.

Whereas the shortening of the working period is thus mostly connected
with an increase of the capital advanced for this abbreviated time — the
shorter the term of advance the greater the capital advanced — it must
here be recalled that regardless of the existing amount of social
capital, the essential point is the degree in which the means of
production and subsistence, or the disposal of them, are scattered or
concentrated in the hands of individual capitalists, in other words, the
degree of concentration of capitals already attained. Inasmuch as credit
promotes, accelerates and enhances the concentration of capital in one
hand, it contributes to the shortening of the working period and thus of
the turnover time.

In branches of production in which the working period, whether
continuous or discontinuous, is prescribed by definite natural
conditions, no shortening by the above-mentioned means can take place.
Says W. Walter Good, in his _Political, Agricultural, and Commercial
Fallacies_ (London, 1866, p. 325):

“In regard to quicker returns, this term cannot be made to apply to corn
crops, as one return only can be made per annum. In respect to stock, we
will simply ask, how is the return of two- and three-year-old sheep, and
four- and five-year-old oxen to be quickened.”

The necessity of securing ready money as soon as possible (for instance
to meet fixed obligations, such as taxes, ground-rent, etc.) solves this
problem, e.g., by selling or slaughtering cattle before they have
reached the economically normal age, to the great detriment of
agriculture. This also brings about in the end a rise in the price of
meat.

“Men who have mainly reared cattle for supplying the pastures of the
Midland counties in summer, and the yards of the eastern counties in
winter ... have become so crippled through the uncertainty and lowness
in the prices of corn that they are glad to take advantage of the high
prices of butter and cheese; the former they take to market weekly to
help to pay current expenses, and draw on the other from some factor,
who takes the cheese when fit to move, and, of course, nearly at his own
price. For this reason, remembering that farming is governed by the
principles of Political Economy, the calves which used to come south
from the dairying counties for rearing, are now largely sacrificed at
times at a week and ten days old, in the shambles of Birmingham,
Manchester, Liverpool, and other large neighbouring towns. If, however,
malt had been free from duty, not only would farmers have made more
profit and therefore been able to keep their stock till it got older and
heavier, but it would have been substituted for milk for rearing by men
who did not keep cows, and thus the present alarming scarcity of young
cattle which has befallen the nation would have been largely averted.
What these little men now say, in reply to recommendations to rear, is,
‘We know very well it would pay to rear on milk, but it would first
require us to put our hands in our purse, which we cannot do, and then
we should have to wait a long time for a return, instead of getting it
at once by dairying.’“ (_Ibid_., pp. 11 and 12.)

If the prolongation of the turnover has such consequences for the small
English farmers, it is easy to see what disarrangement it must produce
among the small peasants of the continent.

The part of the value transferred in layers by the fixed capital to the
product accumulates, and the return of this part is delayed, in
proportion to the length of the working period and thus also of the
period of time required for the completion of the commodity capable of
circulation. But this delay does not cause a renewed outlay of fixed
capital. The machine continues to function in the process of production,
whether the replacement of its wear and tear in the form of money
returns slowly or rapidly. It is different with the circulating capital.
Not only must capital be tied up for a rather long time, in proportion
to the length of the working period, but new capital must be continually
advanced in the shape of wages, and raw and auxiliary materials. A
delayed return has therefore a different effect on each. No matter
whether the return is rapid or slow, the fixed capital continues to
function. But the circulating capital becomes unable to perform its
functions, if the return is delayed, if it is tied up in the form of
unsold, or unfinished and as yet unsaleable products, and if no
additional capital is at hand for its renewal in kind.

“While the peasant farmer starves, his cattle thrive. Repeated showers
had fallen in the country, and the forage was abundant. The Hindoo
peasant will perish by hunger beside a fat bullock. The prescriptions of
superstition, which appear cruel to the individual, are conservative for
the community; and the preservation of the labouring cattle secures the
power of cultivation, and the sources of future life and wealth. It may
sound harsh and sad to say so, but in India it is more easy to replace a
man than an ox.” (Return, East India, Madras and Orissa Famine. No. 4,
p. 44.)

Compare with the preceding the utterance of Manava Dharma Sastra,
[Manava Dharma Sastra or Manu laws — an ancient Indian religious, legal
and ritual code which determined the duties of every Hindu in keeping
with the tenets of Brahmanism. The compilation of these laws is
traditionally attributed to Manu, the mythical progenitor of man. Marx
quotes from Manava Dharma Sastra, or the Institutes of Manu According to
the Gloss of Kulluka, Comprising the Indian System of Duties, Religious
and Civil, third edition, Madras, 1863, p. 281. — _Ed_.] Chapter X, §
62.

“Desertion of life, without reward, for the sake of preserving a priest
or a cow ... may cause the beatitude of those base-born tribes.”

Naturally, it is impossible to deliver a five-year-old animal before the
lapse of five years. But what is possible, within certain limits, is
getting animals ready for their destination in less time by changing the
way of treating them. This is precisely what Bakewell accomplished.
Formerly English sheep, like the French as late as 1855, were not fit
for the butcher until four or five years old. According to the Bakewell
system, sheep may be fattened when only one year old and in every case
have reached their full growth before the end of the second year. By
careful selection, Bakewell, a Dishley Grange farmer, reduced the
skeleton of sheep to the minimum required for their existence. His sheep
are called the New Leicesters.

“... the breeder can now sent three to market in the same space of time
that it formerly took him to prepare one; and if they are not taller,
they are broader, rounder, and have a greater development in those parts
which give most flesh. Of bone, they have absolutely no greater amount
than is necessary to support them, and almost all their weight is pure
meat.” (Lavergne, _The Rural Economy of England, etc_., 1855, p. 20.)

The methods which shorten the working periods are applicable in various
branches of industry to a widely varying extent and do not eliminate the
time differences of the various working periods. To stick to our
illustration, the working period required for the building of a
locomotive may be absolutely shortened by the employment of new
machine-tools. But if at the same time the finished product turned out
daily or weekly by a cotton-spinning mill is still more rapidly
increased by improved processes, then the working period in
machine-building, compared with that in spinning, has nevertheless grown
relatively in length.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 13: The Time of Production

Working time is always production time, that is to say, time during
which capital is held fast in the sphere of production. But vice versa,
not all time during which capital is engaged in the process of
production is necessarily working time.

It is here not a question of interruptions of the labour-process
necessitated by natural limitations of the labour-power itself, although
we have seen to what extent the mere circumstance that fixed capital —
factory buildings, machinery, etc. — lies idle during pauses in the
labour-process, [See: Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. I, pp. 256-63. — _Ed_.]
became one of the motives for an unnatural prolongation of the
labour-process and for day-and-night work. We are dealing here rather
with interruptions independent of the length of the labour-process,
brought about by the very nature of the product and its fabrication,
during which the subject of labour is for a longer or shorter time
subjected to natural processes, must undergo physical, chemical and
physiological changes, during which the labour-process is entirely or
partially suspended.

For instance grape after being pressed must ferment awhile and then rest
for some time in order to reach a certain degree of perfection. In many
branches of industry the product must pass through a drying process, for
instance in pottery, or be exposed to certain conditions in order to
change its chemical properties, as for instance in bleaching. Winter
grain needs about nine months to mature. Between the time of sowing and
harvesting the labour-process is almost entirely suspended. In
timber-raising, after the sowing and the incidental preliminary work are
completed, the seed requires about 100 years to be transformed into a
finished product and during all that time it stands in comparatively
very little need of the action of labour.

In all these cases additional labour is drawn on only occasionally
during a large portion of the time of production. The condition
described in the previous chapter, where additional capital and labour
must be supplied to the capital already tied up in the process of
production, obtains here only with longer or shorter intervals.

In all these cases therefore the production time of the advanced capital
consists of two periods: one period during which the capital is engaged
in the labour-process and a second period during which its form of
existence — that of an unfinished product — is abandoned to the sway of
natural processes, without being at that time in the labour-process. Nor
does it matter in the least here and there. The working period and the
production period do not coincide in these cases. The production period
is longer than the working period. But the product is not finished, not
ready, hence not fit to be converted from the form of productive into
that of commodity-capital until the production period is completed.
Consequently the length of the turnover period increases in proportion
to the length of the production time that does not consist of working
time. In so far as the production time in excess of the working time is
not fixed by natural laws given once and for all, such as govern the
maturing of grain, the growth of an oak, etc., the period of turnover
can often be more or less shortened by an artificial reduction of the
production time. Such instances are the introduction of chemical
bleaching instead of bleaching on the green and more efficient drying
apparatus. Or, in tanning, where the penetration of the tannic acid into
the skins, by the old method, took from six to eighteen months, while
the new method, by means of an air-pump, does it in only one and a half
to two months. (J. G. Courcelle-Seneuil, _Traitè thèorique et pratique
des entreprises industrielles, etc._, Paris, 1857, 2-me èd.) The most
magnificent illustration of an artificial abbreviation of the time of
production taken up exclusively with natural processes is furnished by
the history of iron manufacture, more especially the conversion of pig
iron into steel during the last 100 years, from the puddling process
discovered about 1780 to the modern Bessemer process and the latest
methods introduced since. The time of production has been brought down
tremendously, but the investment of fixed capital has increased in
proportion.

A peculiar illustration of the divergence of the production time from
the working time is furnished by the American manufacture of shoe-lasts.
In this case a considerable portion of the unproductive costs arises
from having to hold the timber at least eighteen months before it is dry
enough to work, so as to prevent subsequent warping. During this time
the wood does not pass through any other labour-process. The period of
turnover of the invested capital is therefore not determined solely by
the time required for the manufacture of the lasts but also by the time
during which it lies unproductive in the shape of drying wood. It stays
18 months in the process of production before it can enter into the
labour-process proper. This example shows at the same time that the
times of turnover of different parts of the aggregate circulating
capital may differ in consequence of conditions which do not arise
within the sphere of circulation but owe their origin to the production
process.

The difference between production time and working time becomes
especially apparent in agriculture. In our moderate climates the land
bears grain once a year. Shortening or lengthening the period of
production (for winter grain it averages nine months) itself depends on
the alternation of good and bad seasons, and for this reason cannot be
accurately determined and controlled beforehand as in industry proper.
Only such by-products as milk, cheese, etc., can steadily be produced
and sold in comparatively short periods. On the other hand, working time
data are as follows:

“The number of working-days in the various regions of Germany, with due
regard to the climatic and other determining conditions, will for the
three main working periods presumably be: For the spring period, from
the middle of March or beginning of April to the middle of May, about 50
to 60 working-days; for the summer period, from the beginning of June to
the end of August, 65 to 80; and for the autumn period, from the
beginning of September to the end of October, or the middle or end of
November, 55 to 75 working-days. For the winter, only the jobs market
goods, building materials, etc., are to be noted." (F. Kirchhof,
_Handbuch der landwirthschaftlichen Betriebslehre_, Dessau, 1852, S.
160.)

The more unfavourable the climate, the more congested is the working
period in agriculture, and hence the shorter is the time in which
capital and labour are expended. Take Russia for instance. In some of
the northern districts of that country field labour is possible only
from 130 to 150 days throughout the year, and it may be imagined what a
loss Russia would sustain if 50 out of the 65 millions of her European
population remained without work during the six or eight months of the
winter, when agricultural labour is at a standstill. Apart from the
200,000 peasants who work in the 10,500 factories of Russia, local
domestic industries have everywhere developed in the villages. There are
villages in which all the peasants have been for generations weavers,
tanners, shoemakers, locksmiths, cutlers, etc. This is particularly the
case in the gubernias of Moscow, Vladimir, Kaluga, Kostroma, and
Petersburg. By the way, this domestic industry is being pressed more and
more into the service of capitalist production. The weavers for instance
are supplied with warp and woof directly by merchants or through
middlemen. (Abbreviated from the Reports by H. M. Secretaries of Embassy
and Legation, on the Manufactures, Commerce, etc., No. 8, 1865, pp. 86
and 87.) We see here that the divergence of the production period from
the working period, the latter being but a part of the former,
constitutes the natural basis for the combination of agriculture with
subsidiary rural industries, and that these subsidiary industries in
turn offer points of vantage to the capitalist, who intrudes first in
the person of the merchant. When capitalist production later
accomplishes the separation of manufacture and agriculture, the rural
labourer becomes ever more dependent on merely casual accessory
employment and his condition deteriorates thereby. For capital, as will
be seen later, all differences in the turnover are evened out. Not so
for the labourer.

In most branches of industry proper, of mining, transportation, etc.,
operations proceed evenly, the working time being the same year in year
out and the outlay of capital passing daily into the circulation process
being uniformly distributed, apart from such abnormal interruptions as
fluctuations of prices, business dislocations, etc. Likewise the return
of the circulating capital or its renewal is evenly distributed
throughout the year, market conditions otherwise remaining the same. Yet
there is in the course of the various periods of the year the greatest
inequality in the outlay of circulating capital in such capital
investments in which the working time constitutes only a part of the
production time, while the return takes place only in bulk at a time
fixed by natural conditions. If the scale of business is the same, i.e.,
if the amount of advanced circulating capital is the same, it must be
advanced in larger quantities at a time and for longer periods than in
enterprises with continuous working periods. There is also a
considerably greater difference here between the life of the fixed
capital and the time in which it really functions productively. Due to
the difference between working time and production time, the time of
employment of the applied fixed capital is of course likewise
continually interrupted for a longer or shorter time, for instance in
agriculture in the case of working cattle, implements and machines. In
so far as this fixed capital consists of draught animals, it requires
continually the same, or nearly the same, expenditure for feed, etc., as
it does during the time they work. In the case of dead stock non-use
also brings on a certain amount of depreciation. Hence the product is in
general increasing in price, since the transfer of value to it is not
calculated according to the time during which the fixed capital
functions but according to the time during which it depreciates in
value. In branches of production such as these, the idling of the fixed
capital, whether combined with current expenses or not, forms as much a
condition of its normal employment as for instance the loss of a certain
quantity of cotton in spinning; and in the same way the labour-power
expended unproductively but unavoidably in any labour-process under
normal technical conditions counts just as well as that expended
productively. Every improvement which reduces the unproductive
expenditure of instruments of labour, raw material, and labour-power
also reduces the value of the product.

In agriculture we have a combination of both the longer working period
and the great difference between working time and production time.
Hodgskin rightly remarks:

“The difference of time” (although he does not differentiate here
between working time and production time) “required to complete the
products of agriculture, and of other species of labour,” is “the main
cause of the great dependence of the agriculturists. They cannot bring
their commodities to market in less time than a year. For that whole
period they are obliged to borrow of the shoemaker, the tailor, the
smith, the wheelwright, and the various other labourers, whose products
they cannot dispense with, but which are completed in a few days or
weeks. Owing to this natural circumstance, and owing to the more rapid
increase of the wealth produced by other labour than that of
agriculture, the monopolisers of all the land, though they have also
monopolised legislation, have not been able to save themselves and their
servants, the farmers, from becoming the most dependent class of men in
the community.” (Thomas Hodgskin, _Popular Political Economy_, London,
1827, p. 147. note.)

All methods by which in agriculture on the one hand the expenditures for
wages and instruments of labour are distributed more evenly over the
entire year, while on the other the turnover is shortened by raising a
greater variety of crops, thus making different harvests possible
throughout the year, require an increase of the circulating capital
advanced in production, invested in wages, fertilisers, seed, etc. This
is the case in the transition from the three-field system with fallow
land to the system of crop rotation without fallow. It applies
furthermore to the _cultures dèrobèes_ of Flanders.

“The root crops are planted in _culture dèrobèe_; the same field yields
in succession first grain, flax, colza, for the wants of man, and after
they are harvested root crops are sown for the maintenance of cattle.
This system, which permits the keeping of horned cattle in the stables,
yields a considerable amount of manure and thus becomes the pivot of
crop rotation. More than a third of the cultivated area in sandy
districts is taken up with _cultures dèrobèes_; it is just as if the
cultivated area had been increased by one-third.”

Apart from root crops, clover and other fodder plants are likewise used
for this purpose.

“Agriculture, being thus carried to a point where it turns into
horticulture, naturally requires a considerable investment of capital.
This capital, estimated in England at 250 francs per hectare, must be
almost 500 francs in Flanders, a figure which good farmers will
undoubtedly consider far too low, judging by their own lands.” (Émile de
Laveleye, _Essais sur l'èconomie rurale de la Belgique_, Paris, 1863,
pp. 45, 46 and 48.)

Take finally timber-growing.

“The production of timber differs from most of the other branches of
production essentially in that here the forces of nature act
independently and do not require the power of man or capital when the
increase is natural. Even in places where forests are propagated
artificially the expenditure of human and capital energy is
inconsiderable compared with the action of the natural forces. Besides,
a forest will still thrive in soils and on sites where grain no longer
gets along or where its cultivation no longer pays. Furthermore forestry
engaged in as a regular economy requires a larger area than grain
culture, because small plots do not permit of proper forestry methods,
largely prevent the enjoyment of the secondary uses to which the land
can be put, make forest protection more difficult, etc. But the
productive process extends over such long periods that it exceeds the
planning of an individual farm and in certain cases surpasses the entire
span of a human life. The capital invested in the purchase of forest
land”

(in the case of communal production this capital becomes unnecessary,
the question then being simply what acreage the community can spare from
its sowing and grazing area for forestry)

“will not yield substantial returns until after a long period, and even
then is turned over only partially. With forests producing certain
species of trees the complete turnover takes as much as 150 years.
Besides, a properly managed timber-growing establishment itself demands
a supply of standing timber which amounts to ten to forty times the
annual yield. Unless a man has therefore still other sources of income
and owns vast tracts of forest land, he cannot engage in regular
forestry.” (Kirchhof, p. 58.)

The long production time (which comprises a relatively small period of
working time) and the great length of the periods of turnover entailed
make forestry an industry of little attraction to private and therefore
capitalist enterprise, the latter being essentially private even if the
associated capitalist takes the place of the individual capitalist. The
development of culture and of industry in general has evinced itself in
such energetic destruction of forest that everything done by it
conversely for their preservation and restoration appears infinitesimal.

The following passage in the above quotation from Kirchhof in
particularly worthy of note:

“Besides, a properly managed timber-growing establishment itself demands
a supply of standing timber which amounts to ten to forty times the
annual yield.”

In other words, a turnover occurs once in ten to forty or more years.

The same applies to stock raising. A part of the herd (supply of cattle)
remains in the process of production, while another part is sold
annually as a product. In this case only a part of the capital is turned
over every year, just as in the case of fixed capital: machinery,
working cattle, etc. although this capital is a capital fixed in the
process of production for a long time, and thus prolongs the turnover of
the total capital, it is not a fixed capital in the strict definition of
the term.

What is here called a supply — a certain amount of standing timber or
livestock — exists relatively in the process of production
(simultaneously as instruments of labour and material of labour); in
accordance with the natural conditions of its reproduction under proper
management, a considerable part of this supply must always be available
in this form.

A similar influence on the turnover is exerted by another kind of
supply, which is productive capital only potentially, but which owing to
the nature of this economy, must be accumulated in more or less
considerable quantities and hence advanced for purposes of production
for a long term, although it enters into the actual process of
production only gradually. In this class belongs for instance manure
before it is hauled to the field, furthermore grain, hay, etc., and such
supplies of means of subsistence as are employed in the production of
cattle.

“A considerable part of the working capital is contained in the farm’s
supplies. But these may lose more or less of their value, if the
precautionary measures necessary for their preservation in good
condition are not properly observed. Lack of attention may even result
in the total loss of a part of the produce supplies for the farm. For
this reason, a careful inspection of the barns, feed and grain lofts,
and cellars becomes indispensable, the store rooms must always be well
closed, kept clean, ventilated, etc. The grain and other crops held in
storage must be thoroughly turned over from time to time, potatoes and
beets must be protected against frost, rain and rot.” (Kirchhof, p.
292.) “In calculating one’s own requirements, especially for the keeping
of cattle, the distribution must be made according to the product
obtained and its intended use. One must not only consider covering one’s
ordinary needs but also see to it that there is a proportionate reserve
for extraordinary cases. If it is then found that the demand cannot be
fully met by one’s own production, it becomes necessary to reflect first
whether the deficiency cannot be covered by other products
(substitutes), or by the cheaper procurement of such in place of the
deficient ones. For instance if there should happen to be a shortage of
hay, this might be made good by roots and an admixture of straw. In
general, the intrinsic value and market-price of the various crops must
always be kept in mind in such cases, and consumption regulated
accordingly. If for instance oats are high, while peas and rye are
relatively low, it will pay to substitute peas or rye for a part of the
oats intended for horses and to sell the oats thus saved.” (_Ibid._, p.
300.)

It was previously stated, when discussing the formation of a supply,
[See pp. 140-146 of this book. — Ed.] that a definite quantity, big or
small, of potential productive capital is required, i.e., of means of
production intended for use in production, which must be available in
bigger or smaller quantities for the purpose of entering by and by into
the productive process. The remark was incidentally made that, given a
certain business or capitalist enterprise of definite proportions, the
magnitude of this productive supply depends on the greater or lesser
difficulties of its renewal, the relative nearness of markets of supply,
the development of transportation and communication facilities, etc. All
these circumstances affect the minimum of capital which must be
available in the form of a productive supply, hence affect the length of
time for which the capital must be advanced and the amount of capital to
be advanced at one time. This amount, which affects also the turnover,
is determined by the longer or shorter time during which a circulating
capital is tied up in the form of a productive supply as merely
potential productive capital. On the other hand, inasmuch as this
stagnation depends on the greater or smaller possibility of rapid
replacement, on market conditions, etc., it arises itself out of the
time of circulation, out of circumstances that belong in the sphere of
circulation.

“Furthermore, all such implements and accessories as hand tools, sieves,
baskets, ropes, wagon grease, nails, etc., must be the more available
for immediate replacement, the less there is opportunity for purchasing
them nearby without delay. Finally, the entire supply of implements must
be carefully overhauled every winter, and new purchases or repairs found
necessary must be provided for at once. Whether or not one is to keep a
great or small supply of articles of equipment is to be settled mainly
by local conditions. Wherever there are no artisans or stores in the
vicinity, it is necessary to keep larger supplies than in places where
these are to be had on the spot or nearby. But if the necessary supplies
are procured in large quantities at a time, then other circumstances
being equal, one generally gets the benefit of cheaper purchases,
provided an appropriate time has been chosen to make them. True, the
rotating working capital is thereby shorn of a correspondingly larger
sum, all at once, which cannot always be well spared in the business.”
(Kirchhof, p. 301.)

The difference between production time and working time admits of many
variations, as we have seen. For the circulating capital it may be
production time before it enters into the labour-process proper
(production of lasts); or it may be production time after it has passed
through the labour-process proper (wine, seed grain); or the production
time is occasionally interrupted by working time (agriculture,
timber-growing). A large portion of the product fit for circulation
remains incorporated in the active process of production, while a much
smaller part enters into annual circulation (timber-growing and cattle
raising); the longer or shorter period of time for which a circulating
capital must be invested in the form of potential productive capital,
hence also the larger or smaller amount of this capital to be advanced
at one time, depends partly on the kind of productive process
(agriculture), and partly on the proximity of markets, etc., in short,
on circumstances pertinent to the sphere of circulation.

We shall see later (Volume III), what senseless theories MacCulloch,
James Mill, etc., arrived at as a result of the attempt to identify the
production time diverging from working time with the latter, an attempt
which in turn is due to a misapplication of the theory of value.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The turnover cycle which we considered above is determined by the
durability of the fixed capital advanced for the process of production.
Since this cycle extends over a number of years it comprises a series of
either annual turnovers of fixed capital or of turnovers repeated during
the year.

In agriculture such a cycle of turnovers arises out of the system of
crop rotation.

“The duration of the lease must in no case be less than the time of
completion of the adopted system of crop rotation. Hence one always
calculates 3, 6, 9, etc., in the three-field system. In that system with
clean fallow, a field is cultivated only four times in six years, being
sown to winter and summer grain in the years of cultivation, and, if the
properties of the soil require or permit it, to wheat and rye, barley
and oats successively. Every species of grain differs in its yield from
the others on the same soil, every one of them has a different value and
is sold at a different price. For this reason the yield of a field is
different every year it is cultivated, and different in the first half
of the rotation (the first three years) from that of the second. Even
the average yield of one period of rotation is not equal to that of
another, for fertility does not depend solely on the good quality of the
soil, but also on the weather each year, just as prices depend on a
multitude of changing conditions. If one now calculates the income from
a field by taking into account the average fertility and the average
prices for the entire six-year rotation period, one finds the total
income of one year in either period of the rotation. But this is not so
if the proceeds are calculated only for half of the time rotation, that
is to say, for three years; for then the total income figures would not
coincide. It follows from the foregoing that a lease of land worked by
the three-field system should run for at least six years. It is however
always still more desirable for lessor and lessee that the duration of
the lease should be multiple of the duration of the lease (_sic!_);
hence that it should be 12, 18, and ever more years instead of 6 years
in a system of three fields and 14, 28 years instead of 7 in a system of
seven fields.” (Kirchhof, pp. 117, 118.)

(At this place the manuscript contains the note: “The English system of
crop rotation. Give a note here.”)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 14: The Time of Circulation

All circumstances considered so far which distinguish the periods of
turnover of different capitals invested in different branches of
industry and hence also the periods for which capital must be advanced,
originate in the process of production itself, such as the difference
between fixed and circulating capital, the difference in the working
periods, etc. But the time of turnover of capital is equal to the sum of
its production time plus its circulation, or rotation, time. It is
therefore a matter of course that a difference in the time of
circulation causes a difference in the time of turnover and hence in the
length of the period of turnover. This becomes more evident either on
comparing two different investments of capital in which all
circumstances modifying the turnover are equal except the time of
circulation, or on selecting a given capital with a given proportion of
fixed and circulating capital, a given working period, etc., with only
the times of circulation varying, hypothetically.

One of the sections of the time of circulation — relatively the most
decisive — consists of the time of selling, the period during which
capital exists in the state of commodity-capital. The time of
circulation, and hence the period of turnover in general, are long or
short depending on the relative length of this selling time. An
additional outlay of capital may become necessary as a result of
expenses of storage, etc. It is clear at the very start that the time
required for the sale of finished goods may differ considerably for the
individual capitalists in one and the same branch of industry. Hence it
may differ not only for the aggregate capitals invested in the various
branches of industry, but also for the various independent capitals,
which are in fact merely parts of the aggregate capital invested in the
same sphere of production but which have made themselves independent.
Other circumstances remaining equal, the period of selling will vary for
the same individual capital with the general fluctuations of the market
or with its fluctuations in that particular line of business. We shall
not dwell on this point any longer. We merely state this simple fact:
All circumstances which in general give rise to differences in the
periods of turnover of the capitals invested in different branches of
industry bring in their train differences also in the turnover of the
various individual capitals operating in the same business, provided
these circumstances operate individually (for instance, if one
capitalist has an opportunity to sell more rapidly than his competitor,
if one employs more methods shortening the working periods than the
other, etc.)

One cause which acts permanently in differentiating the times of
selling, and thus the periods of turnover in general, is the distance of
the market in which a commodity is sold from its place of production.
During the entire trip to the market, capital finds itself fettered in
the state of commodity-capital. If goods are made to order, up to the
time of delivery; if they are not made to order, there must be added to
the time of the trip to the market the time during which the goods are
in the market waiting to be sold. The improvement of the means of
communication and transportation cuts down absolutely the wandering
period of the commodities but does not eliminate the relative difference
in the time of circulation of different commodity-capitals arising from
their peregrinations, nor that of different portions of the same
commodity-capital which migrate to different markets. For instance the
improved sailing vessels and steamships, which shorten travelling, do so
equally for near and distant ports. The relative difference remains,
although often diminished. But the relative difference may be shifted
about by the development of the means of transportation and
communication in a way that does not correspond to the geographical
distances. For instance a railway which leads from a place of production
to an inland centre of population may relatively or absolutely lengthen
the distance to a nearer inland point not connected by rail, as compared
to the one which geographically is more remote. In the same way the same
circumstances may alter the relative distance of places of production
from the larger markets, which explains the deterioration of old and the
rise of new centres of production because of changes in communication
and transportation facilities. (To this must be added the circumstances
that long hauls are relatively cheaper than short ones.) Moreover with
the development of transport facilities not only is the velocity of
movement in space accelerated and thereby the geographic distance
shortened in terms of time. Not only is there a development of the mass
of communication facilities so that for instance many vessels sail
simultaneously for the same port, or several trains travel
simultaneously on different railways between the same two points, but
freight vessels may clear on consecutive days of the same week from
Liverpool for New York, or goods trains may start at different hours of
the same day from Manchester to London. True, the absolute velocity —
hence this part of the time of circulation — is not altered by this
latter circumstance, a certain definite capacity of the means of
transportation being given. But successive shipments of commodities can
start their passage at shorter intervals of time and thus reach the
market one after another without accumulating in large quantities as
potential commodity-capital before actual shipment. Hence the return of
capital likewise is distributed over shorter successive periods of time,
so that a part is continually transformed into money-capital, while the
other circulates as commodity-capital. By spreading the return over
several successive periods the total time of circulation and hence also
the turnover are abridged. The first to increase is the frequency with
which the means of transportation function, for instance the number of
railway trains, as existing places of production produce more, become
greater centres of production. The development tends in the direction of
the already existing market, that is to say, towards the great centres
of production and population, towards ports of exports, etc. On the
other hand these particularly great traffic facilities and the resultant
acceleration of the capital turnover (since it is conditional on the
time of circulation) give rise to quicker concentration of both the
centres of production and the markets. Along with this concentration of
masses of men and capital thus accelerated at certain points, there is
the concentration of these masses of capital in the hands of a few.
Simultaneously one may note again a shifting and relocation of places of
production and of markets as a result of the changes in their relative
positions caused by the transformations in transport facilities. A place
of production which once had a special advantage by being located on
some highway or canal may now find itself relegated to a single
side-track, which runs trains only at a relatively long intervals, while
another place, which formerly was remote from the main arteries of
traffic, may now be situated at the junction of several railways. This
second locality is on the upgrade, the former on the downgrade. Changes
in the means of transportation thus engender local differences in the
time of circulation of commodities, in the opportunity to buy, sell,
etc., or an already existing local differentiation is distributed
differently. The importance of this circumstance for the turnover of
capital is evidenced by the wrangling of the commercial and industrial
representatives of the various localities with the railway managements.
(See for instance the above-quoted Bluebook of the Railway Committee.
[See p. 154 of this book. — _Ed_.] )

All branches of production which by the nature of their product are
dependent mainly on local consumption, such as breweries, are therefore
developed to the greatest extent in the principal centres of population.
The more rapid turnover of capital compensates here in part for the
circumstance that a number of conditions of production, building lots,
etc., are more expensive.

Whereas on the one hand the improvement of the means of transportation
and communication brought about by the progress of capitalist production
reduces the time of circulation of particular quantities of commodities,
the same progress and the opportunities created by the development of
transport and communication facilities make it imperative, conversely,
to work for ever more remote markets, in a word — for the world-market.
The mass of commodities in transit for distant places grows enormously,
and with it therefore grows, both absolutely and relatively, that part
of social capital which remains continually for long periods in the
stage of commodity-capital, within the time of circulation. There is a
simultaneous growth of that portion of social wealth which, instead of
serving as direct means of production, is invested in means of
transportation and communication and in the fixed and circulating
capital required for their operation.

The mere relative length of the transit of the commodities from their
place of production to their market produces a difference not only in
the first part of the circulation time, the selling time, but also in
its second part, the reconversion of the money into the elements of the
productive capital, the buying time. Suppose a commodity is shipped to
India. This requires, say, four months. Let us assume that the selling
time is equal to zero, i.e., the commodities are made to order and are
paid for on delivery to the agent of the producer. The return of the
money (no matter in what form) requires another four months. Thus it
takes altogether eight months before a capital can again function as
productive capital, renew the same operation. The differences in the
turnover thus occasioned form one of the material bases of the various
terms of credit, just as overseas commerce in general, for instance in
Venice and Genoa, is one of the sources of the credit system, properly
speaking.

“The crisis of 1847 enabled the banking and mercantile community of that
time to reduce the India and China usance” (time allowed for the
currency of bills of exchange between there and Europe) “from ten
months’ date to six months’ sight, and the lapse of twenty years with
all the accelerations of speed and establishment of telegraphs ...
renders necessary ... a further reduction” from six months’ sight to
four months’ date as a first step to four months’ sight. “The voyage of
a sailing vessel _via_ the Cape from Calcutta to London is on the
average under 90 days. A usance of four months’ sight would be equal to
a currency of say 150 days. The present usance of six months’ sight is
equal to a currency of say 210 days.” (_London Economist_, June 16,
1866.)

On the other hand:

“The Brazilian usance remains at two and three months’ sight, bills from
Antwerp are drawn” (on London) “at three months’ date, and even
Manchester and Bradford draw upon London at three months and longer
dates. By tacit consent, a fair opportunity is afforded to the merchant
of realising the proceeds of his merchandise, not indeed before, but
within a reasonable time of, the bills drawn against it falling due. In
this view, the present usance for Indian bills cannot be considered
excessive. Indian produce for the most part being sold in London with
three months’ prompt, and allowing for loss of time in effecting sales,
cannot be realised much within five months, while another period of five
months will have previously elapsed (on an average) between the time of
purchase in India and of delivery in the English warehouse. We have here
a period of ten months, whereas the bill drawn against the goods does
not live beyond seven months.” (_Ibid._, June 30, 1866.)

“On July 2, 1866, five big London banks dealing mainly with India and
China, and the Paris _Comptoir d'Escompte_, gave notice that from the
1st January, 1867, their branches and agencies in the East will only buy
and sell bills of exchange at a term not exceeding four months’ sight.”
(_Ibid._, July 7, 1866.)

However this reduction miscarried and had to be abandoned. (Since then
the Suez Canal has revolutionized all this.)

It is a matter of course that with the longer time of commodity
circulation the risk of a change of prices in the market increases,
since the period in which price changes can take place is lengthened.

Differences in the time of circulation, partly individual between the
various separate capitals of the same branch of business, partly between
different branches of business according to the different usances, when
payment is not made in spot cash, arise from the different terms of
payment in buying and selling. We shall not dwell any longer here on
this point which is of importance to the credit system.

Differences in the turnover time arise also from the size of contracts
for the delivery of goods, and their size grows with the extent and
scale of capitalist production. A contract of delivery, being a
transaction between buyer and seller, is an operation pertaining to the
market, the sphere of circulation. The differences in the time of
turnover arising here stem therefore from the sphere of circulation, but
react immediately on the sphere of production, and do so apart from all
terms of payment and conditions of credit, hence also in the case of
cash payment. For instance coal, cotton, yarn, etc., are discrete
products. Every day supplies its quantum of finished product. But if the
master-spinner or the mine-owner accepts contracts for the delivery of
such large quantities of products as require, say, a period of four or
six weeks of consecutive working-days, then this is quite the same, so
far as the time of advancement of capital is concerned, as if a
continuous working period of four or six weeks had been introduced in
this labour-process. It is of course assumed here that the entire
quantity ordered is to be delivered in one bulk, or at least is paid for
only after total delivery. Individually considered, every day has thus
furnished its definite quantum of finished product. But this finished
quantum is only a part of the quantity contracted for. While in this
case the portion finished so far is no longer in the process of
production, still it lies in the warehouse as potential capital only.

Now let us take up the second stage of the time of circulation, the
buying time, or that period in which capital is reconverted from the
money-form into the elements of productive capital. During this period
it must persist for a shorter or longer time in its condition of
money-capital, hence a certain portion of the total capital advanced
must all the time be in the condition of money-capital, although this
portion consists of constantly changing elements. For instance, of the
total capital advanced in a certain business, _n_ times £100 must be
available in the form of money-capital, so that, while all the
constituent parts of these _n_ times £100 are continually converted into
productive capital, this sum is nevertheless just as continually
replenished by the influx from the circulation, from the realised
commodity-capital. A definite part of the advanced capital-value is
therefore continually in the condition of money-capital, i.e., a form
not pertaining to its sphere of production but its sphere of
circulation.

We have already seen that the prolongation of the time for which capital
is fettered in the form of commodity-capital on account of the distance
of the market results in direct delay of the return of the money and
consequently also the transformation of the capital from money-capital
into productive capital.

We have furthermore seen (Chapter VI) with reference to the purchase of
commodities, that the time of buying, the greater or smaller distance
from the main sources of the raw material, makes it necessary to
purchase raw material for a longer period and have it available in the
form of a productive supply, of latent or potential productive capital;
that in consequence it increases the amount of capital to be advanced at
one time, and the time for which it must be advanced, if the scale of
production remains otherwise the same.

A similar effect is produced in various branches of business by the more
or less prolonged periods in which rather large quantities of raw
material are thrown on the market. In London for example great auction
sales of wool take place every three months, and the wool market is
controlled by them. The cotton market on the other hand is on the whole
restocked continuously, if not uniformly, from harvest to harvest. Such
periods determine the principal dates when these raw materials are
bought. Their effect is particularly great on speculative purchases
necessitating advances for longer or shorter periods for these elements
of production, just as the nature of the produced commodities acts on
the speculative, intentional withholding of a product for a longer or
shorter term in the form of potential commodity-capital.

“The agriculturist must also be a speculator to a certain extent and
therefore hold back the sale of his products if prevailing conditions so
suggest...”

Here follow a few general rules.

“...However in the sale of the products, it all depends mainly on the
person, the product itself, and the locality. Anyone who, besides being
skilful and lucky (!), is provided with sufficient working capital will
not be blamed if for once he keeps his grain crop stored as long as a
year when prices are unusually low. On the other hand a man who lacks
working capital or is altogether devoid (!) of speculative spirit will
try to get the current average prices and will be compelled to sell as
soon and as often as opportunity presents itself. It will almost always
mean a loss to keep wool stored longer than a year, while corn and oil
seed may be stored for several years without detriment to their
properties and high quality. Products generally subject to severe
fluctuation at short intervals, for instance oil seed, hops, teasel and
the like, may be stored to good advantage during years in which the
selling price is far below the price of production. It is least
permissible to postpone the sale of articles whose preservation involves
daily expense, such as fatted cattle, or which are perishable, such as
fruit, potatoes, etc. In various localities a certain product fetches
its lowest average price in certain seasons, its highest in others.
Thus, in some parts the average price of corn is lower around St.
Martin’s Day than between Christmas and Easter. Furthermore some
products sell well in certain localities only at certain times, as is
the case with wool in the wool markets of those localities where the
wool trade at other times is dull, etc.” (Kirchhof, p. 302.)

In the study of the second half of the time of circulation, during which
the money is reconverted into the elements of productive capital, it is
not only this transformation, taken by itself, that should be given
consideration, not only the time within which the money returns,
according to the distance of the market in which the product is sold.
What must also be considered, and primarily so, is the amount of that
part of the advanced capital which is always to be available in the form
of money, in the condition of money-capital.

Apart from all speculation, the volume of the purchases of those
commodities which must always be available as a productive supply
depends on the times of the renewal of this supply, hence on
circumstances which in their turn are dependent on market conditions and
which therefore are different for different raw materials. In these
cases money must be advanced from time to time in rather large
quantities and in lump sums. It returns more or less rapidly, but always
in instalments, according to the turnover of capital. One portion of it,
namely the part reconverted into wages, is just as continually expended
again at short intervals. But another portion, namely that which is to
be reconverted into raw material, etc., must be accumulated for rather
long periods, as a reserve fund for either buying or paying. Therefore
it exists in the form of money-capital, although the volume in which it
exists as such, changes.

We shall see in the next chapter that other circumstances arising either
from the process of production or that of circulation make it necessary
for a certain portion of the advanced capital to be available in the
form of money. In general it must be noted that the economists are very
prone to forget not only that a part of the capital required in a
business passes successively through the three stages of money-capital,
productive capital, and commodity-capital, but also that different
portions of it continuously and simultaneously possess these forms,
although the relative magnitudes of these portions vary all the time. It
is especially the part always available as money-capital that is
forgotten by the economists, although precisely this circumstance is
highly essential for an understanding of bourgeois economy and
consequently makes its importance felt as such also in practice.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 15: Effect of the Time of Turnover on the Magnitude of Advanced Capital

In this chapter and in the next, the sixteenth, we shall treat of the
influence of the time of turnover on the self-expansion of capital.

Take the commodity-capital which is the product of a working period of,
say, nine weeks. Let us, for the time being, leave aside that portion of
the value of the product which is added to it by the average wear and
tear of the fixed capital, and also the surplus-value added to the
product during the process of production. The value of this product is
then equal to that of the circulating capital, advanced for its
production, i.e., of the wages and the raw and auxiliary materials
consumed in its production. Let this value be £900, so that the weekly
outlay is £100. The period of production, which here coincides with the
working period, is therefore nine weeks. It is immaterial whether it is
assumed that this is the working period of a continuous product, or
whether it is a continuous working period for a discrete product, so
long as the quantity of discrete product brought to market at one time
costs nine weeks’ labour. Let the time of circulation be three weeks.
Then the entire period of turnover is twelve weeks. At the end of nine
weeks the advanced productive capital is converted into
commodity-capital, but now it stays for three weeks in the period of
circulation. The new period of production therefore cannot start before
the beginning of the thirteenth week, and production would be at a
standstill for three weeks, or for a quarter of the entire period of
turnover. It again does not make any difference whether it is assumed
that it takes so long on an average to sell the product, or that this
length of time is bound up with the remoteness of the market or the
terms of payment for the goods sold. Production would be standing still
for three weeks every three months, making it four times three, or
twelve weeks in a year, which means three months, or one-quarter, of the
annual period of turnover. Hence, if production is to be continuous and
carried along the same scale week after week, there is only this
alternative:

Either the scale of production must be reduced, so that the £900 suffice
to keep the work going both during the working period and the time of
circulation of the first turnover, is then commenced with the tenth
week, before the first period of turnover is completed, for the period
of turnover is twelve weeks, and the working period nine weeks. A sum of
£900 distributed over twelve weeks makes £75 per week. It is evident in
the first place that such a reduced scale of business presupposes
changed dimensions of the fixed capital and therefore, on the whole, a
curtailment of the business. In the second place, it is questionable
whether such a reduction can take place at all, for in each business
there exists, commensurate with the development of its production, a
normal minimum of invested capital essential to maintain its capacity to
complete. This normal minimum grows steadily with the advance of
capitalist production, and hence it is not fixed. There are numerous
intermediate grades between the normal minimum existing at any
particular time and the ever increasing normal maximum, a medium which
permits of many different scales of capital investment. Within the
limits of this medium reductions may take place, their lowest limit
being the prevailing normal minimum.

When there is a hitch in production, when the markets are overstocked,
and when raw materials rise in price, etc., the normal outlay of
circulating capital is restricted — once the pattern of the fixed
capital has been set — by cutting down working time to, say, one half.
On the other hand, in times of prosperity, the pattern of the fixed
capital given, there is an abnormal expansion of the circulating
capital, partly through the extension of working time and partly through
its intensification. In businesses which have, from the outset, to
reckon with such fluctuations, the situation is relieved partly by
recourse to the above measures and partly by employing simultaneously a
greater number of labourers, in combination with the application of
reserve fixed capital, such as reserve locomotives on railways, etc.
However, such abnormal fluctuations are not considered here, where we
assume normal conditions.

In order to make production continuous, therefore, the expenditure of
the same circulating capital is here distributed over a longer period,
over twelve weeks instead of nine. In every section of time there
consequently functions a reduced productive capital. The circulating
portion of the productive capital is reduced from 100 to 75, or
one-quarter. The total amount by which the productive capital
functioning for a working period of nine weeks is reduced equals 9 times
25, or £225, or one-quarter of £900. But the ratio of the time of
circulation to that of turnover is likewise three-twelfths, or
one-quarter. It follows therefore: circulation of the productive capital
transformed into commodity-capital, if it is rather to be carried on
simultaneously and continuously week after week, and if no special
circulating capital is available for this purpose, it can be done only
by curtailing productive operations, by reducing the circulating
component of the functioning productive capital. The portion of
circulating capital thus set free for production during the time of
circulation is to the total advanced circulating capital as the time of
circulation is to the period of turnover. This applies, as has already
been stated, only to branches of production in which the labour-process
is carried on in the same scale week after week, where therefore no
varying amounts of capital are to be invested in different working
periods, as for instance in agriculture.

If on the other hand we assume that the nature of the business excludes
a reduction of the scale of production, and thus of the circulating
capital to be advanced each week, then continuity of production can be
secured only by additional circulating capital, in the above-named case
of £300. During the twelve-week turnover period, £1,200 are successively
invested, and £300 is one-quarter of this sum as three weeks is of
twelve. At the end of the working time of nine weeks the capital-value
of £900 has been converted from the form of productive into that of
commodity-capital. Its working period is concluded, but it cannot be
re-opened with the same capital. During the three weeks in which it
stays in the sphere of circulation, functioning as commodity-capital, it
is in the same state, so far as the process of production is concerned,
as if it did not exist at all. We rule out in the present case all
credit relations and take for granted that the capitalist operates only
with his own money. But during the time the capital advanced for the
first working period, having completed its process of production, stays
three weeks in the process of circulation, there functions an additional
capital investment of £300, so that the continuity of production is not
broken.

Now, the following must be noted in this connection:

Firstly: The working period of the capital of £900 first advanced is
completed at the close of nine weeks and it does not return until after
three weeks are up, that is to say, at the beginning of the thirteenth
week. But a new working period is immediately begun with the additional
capital of £300. By this means continuity of production is maintained.

Secondly: The functions of the original capital of £900 and of the
capital of £300 newly added at the close of the first nine-week working
period, inaugurating the second working period after the conclusion of
the first without any interruption, are, or at least could be, clearly
distinguished in the first period of turnover, while they cross each
other each other in the course of the second period of turnover.

Let us make this matter plainer.

First period of turnover of 12 weeks. First working period of 9 weeks;
the turnover of the capital advanced for this is completed at the
beginning of the 13th week. During the last 3 weeks the additional
capital of £300 functions, opening the second working period of 9 weeks.

Second period of turnover. At the beginning of the 13th week, £900 have
returned and are able to begin a new turnover. But the second working
period has already been opened in the 10th week by the additional £300.
At the start of the 13th week, thanks to this, one-third of the working
period is already over and £300 has been converted from productive
capital into product. Since only 6 weeks more are required for the
completion of the second working period, only two-thirds of the returned
capital of £900, or only £600, can enter into the productive process of
the second working period. £300 of the original £900 are set free to
play the same role which the additional capital of £300 played in the
first working period. At the close of the 6th week of the second period
of turnover the second working period is up. The capital of £900
advanced in it returns after 3 weeks, or at the end of the 9th week of
the second, 12-week period of turnover. During the 3 weeks of its period
of circulation, the freed capital of £300 comes into action. This begins
the third working period of a capital of 900 in the 7th week of the
second period of turnover, or the 19th week of the year.

Third period of turnover. At the close of the 9th week of the second
period of turnover there is a new reflux of £900. But the third working
period has already commenced in the 7th week of the previous period of
turnover and 6 weeks have already elapsed. The third working period,
then, lasts only another 3 weeks. Hence only £300 of the returned £900
enter into the productive process. The fourth working period fills out
the remaining 9 weeks of this period of turnover and thus the 37th week
of the year begins simultaneously the fourth period of turnover and the
fifth working period.

In order to simplify the calculation in this case let us assume a
working period of 5 weeks and a period of circulation of 5 weeks, making
a turnover period of 10 weeks. Figure the year as composed of fifty
weeks and the capital outlay per week as £100. A working period then
requires a circulating capital of £500 and the time of circulation an
additional capital of £500. The working periods and times of turnover
then are as follows:

1st wrkg. period

1st-5th wk.

(£500 in goods) returned end of 10th wk.

2nd wrkg. period

6th-10th wk.

(£500 in goods) returned end of 15th wk.

3rd wrkg. period

11th-15th wk.

(£500 in goods) returned end of 20th wk.

4th wrkg. period

16th-20th wk.

(£500 in goods) returned end of 25th wk.

5th wrkg. period

21st-25th wk.

(£500 in goods) returned end of 30th wk.

and so forth.

If the time of circulation is zero, so that the period of turnover is
equal to the working period, then the number of turnovers is equal to
the number of working periods of the year. In the case of a 5-week
working period this would make 50/5, or 10, periods of turnover per
year, and the value of the capital turned over would be 500 times 10, or
5,000. In our table, in which we have assumed a circulation time of 5
weeks, the total value of the commodities produced per year would also
be £5,000, but one-tenth of this, or £500, would always be in the form
of commodity-capital, and would not return until after 5 weeks. At the
end of the year the product of the tenth working period (the 46th to the
50th working week) would have completed its time of turnover only by
half, and its time of circulation would fall within the first five weeks
of the next year.

Now let us take a third illustration: Working period 6 weeks time of
circulation 3 weeks, weekly advance during labour-process £100.

1st working period: 1st-6th week. At the end of the 6th week a
commodity-capital of £600, returned at the end of the 9th week.

2nd working period: 7th-12th week. During the 7th-9th week £300 of
additional capital is advanced. At the end of the 9th week, return of
£600. Of this, £300 are advanced during the 10th-12th week. At the end
of the 12th week therefore £300 are free and £600 are in the form of
commodity-capital, returnable at the end of the 15th week.

3rd working period: 13th-18th week. During the 13th-15th week, advance
of above £300, then reflux of £600, of which 300 are advanced for the
16th-18th week. At the end of the 18th week, £300 are free in
money-form, £600 on hand as commodity-capital which returns at the end
of the 21st week. (See the more detailed presentation of this case under
II, below.)

In other words during 9 working periods (54 weeks) a total of 600 times
9 or £5,400 worth of commodities are produced. At the end of the ninth
working period the capitalist has £300 in money and £600 in commodities
which have not yet completed their term of circulation.

A comparison of these three illustrations shows, first, that a
successive release of capital I of £500 and of additional capital II of
likewise £500 takes place only in the second illustration, so that these
two portions of capital move separately and apart from each other. But
this is so only because we have made the very exceptional assumption
that the working period and the time of circulation form two equal
halves of the turnover period. In all other cases, whatever the
difference between the two constituents of the period of turnover, the
movements of the two capitals cross each other, as in illustrations I
and III, beginning with the second period of turnover. The additional
capital II, with a portion of capital I, then forms the capital
functioning in the second turnover period, while the remainder of
capital I is set free to perform the original function of capital II.
The capital operating during the circulation time of the
commodity-capital is not identical, in this case, with the capital II
originally advanced for this purpose, but it is of the same value and
forms the same aliquot part of the total capital advanced.

Secondly: The capital which functioned during the working period lies
idle during the time of circulation. In the second illustration the
capital functions during the 5 weeks of the working period and lies idle
during the 5 weeks of the circulation period. Therefore the entire time
during which capital I lies idle here amounts to one half of the year.
It is the additional capital II that appears during this time having, in
the case before us, also in its turn lain idle half a year. But the
additional capital required to ensure the continuity of production
during the time of circulation is not determined by the aggregated
amount, or sum total, of the times of circulation during the year, but
only by the ratio of the time of circulation to the period of turnover.
(We assume, of course, that all the turnovers take place under the same
conditions.) For this reason £500 of additional capital, and not £2,500,
are required in the second illustration. This is simply due to the fact
that the additional capital enters just as well into the turnover as the
capital originally advanced, and that it therefore makes up its
magnitude just as the other by the number of its turnovers.

Thirdly: The circumstances here considered are not affected by whether
the time of production is longer than the working time or not. True, the
aggregate of the periods of turnover is prolonged thereby, but this
extension does not necessitate any additional capital for the
labour-process. The additional capital serves merely the purpose of
filling the gaps in the labour-process that arise on account of the time
of circulation. Hence it is there simply to protect production against
interruptions, originating in the time of circulation. Interruptions
arising from the specific conditions of production are to be eliminated
in another way, which need not be discussed at this point. There are
however establishments in which work is carried on only intermittently,
to order, so that there may be intervals between the working periods. In
such cases, the need for additional capital is _pro tanto_ eliminated.
On the other hand in most cases of seasonal work there is a certain
limit for the time of reflux. The same work cannot be renewed next year
with the same capital, if the circulation time of this capital has not,
in the meantime, run out. On the other hand the time of circulation may
also be shorter than the interval between two periods of production. In
that event the capital lies fallow, unless it is meanwhile employed
otherwise.

Fourthly: The capital advanced for a certain working period — for
instance the £600 in the third illustration — is invested partly in raw
and auxiliary materials, in a productive supply for the working period,
in constant circulating capital, and partly in variable circulating
capital, in the payment of labour itself. The portion laid out in
constant circulating capital, may not exist for the same length of time
in the form of a productive supply; the raw material for instance may
not be on hand for the entire working period, coal may be procured only
every two weeks. However, as credit is still out of the question here,
this portion of capital, in so far as it is not available in the form of
a productive supply, must be kept on hand in the form of money so that
it can be converted into a productive supply as and when needed. This
does not alter the magnitude of the constant circulating capital-value
advanced for 6 weeks. On the other hand — regardless of the money-supply
for unforeseen expenses, the reserve fund proper for the elimination of
disturbances — wages are paid in shorter intervals, mostly weekly.
Therefore unless the capitalist compels the labourer to advance his
labour for a longer time, the capital required for wages must be on hand
in the form of money. During the reflux of the capital a portion must
therefore be retained in money-form for the payment of the labour, while
the remaining portion may be converted into productive supply.

The additional capital is divided exactly like the original. But it is
distinguished from capital I by the fact that (apart from credit
relations) in order to be available for its own working period it must
advanced during the entire duration of the first working period of
capital I, into which it does not enter. During this time it can already
be converted, at least in part, into constant circulating capital,
having been advanced for the entire period of turnover. To what extent
it assumes this form or persists in the form of additional money-capital
until this conversion becomes necessary, will depend partly on the
special conditions of production of definite lines of business, partly
on local conditions, partly on the price fluctuations of raw material,
etc. If social capital is viewed in its entirety, a more or less
considerable part of this additional capital will always be for a rather
long time in the state of money-capital. But as for that portion of
capital II which is to be advanced for wages, it is always converted
only gradually into labour-power, as small working periods expire and
are paid for. This portion of capital II, then, is available in the form
of money-capital during the entire working period, until by its
conversion into labour-power it take part in the function of productive
capital.

Consequently, the accession of the additional capital required for the
transformation of the circulation time of capital I into time of
production, increases not only the magnitude of the advanced capital and
the length of time for which the aggregate capital must necessarily be
advanced, but also, and specifically so, that portion of the advanced
capital which exists as money-supply, which hence exists in the state of
money-capital and has the form of potential money-capital.

The same thing also takes place — as far as it concerns both the advance
in the form of a productive supply and in that of a money-supply — when
the separation of capital into two parts made necessary by the time of
circulation, namely into capital for the first working period and
replacement capital for the time of circulation, is not caused by the
increase of the capital laid out but by a decrease of the scale of
production. The amount of capital tied up in the money-form grows here
still more in relation to the scale of production.

What is achieved in general by this separation of capital into an
originally productive and an additional capital is a continuous
succession of the working periods, the constant function of an equal
portion of the advanced capital as productive capital.

Let us look at the second illustration. The capital continuously
employed in the process of production amounts to £500. As the working
period is 5 weeks it operates ten times during 50 weeks (taken as a
year). Hence its product, apart from surplus-value, is 10 times £500, or
£5,000. From the standpoint of a capital working directly and
uninterruptedly in the process of production — a capital-value of £500 —
the time of circulation seems to be brought to nought. The period of
turnover coincides with the working period, and the time of circulation
is assumed to be equal to zero.

But if the capital of £500 were regularly interrupted in its productive
activity by a 5-week circulation time, so that it would again become
capable of production only after the close of the entire 10-week
turnover period, we should have 5 turnovers of ten weeks each in the 50
weeks of the year. These would comprise five 5-week periods of
production, or a sum of 25 productive weeks with a total product worth 5
times £500 or £2,500, and five 5-week periods of circulation, or a total
circulation time of likewise 25 weeks. If we say in this case that the
capital of £500 has been turned over 5 times in the year, it will be
clear and obvious that during half of each period of turnover this
capital of £500 did not function at all as a production capital and
that, all in all, it performed its functions only during one half of the
year, but did not function at all during the other half.

In our illustration the replacement capital of £500 appears on the scene
during those five periods of circulation and the turnover is thus
expanded from £2,500 to £5,000. But now the advanced capital is £1,000
instead of £500. 5,000 divided by 1,000 is 5. Hence, there are five
turnovers instead of ten. And that is just the way people figure. But
when it is said that the capital of £1,000 has been turned over five
times during the year, the recollection of the time of circulation
disappears from the hollow skulls of the capitalists and a confused idea
is formed that this capital has served continuously in the production
process during the five successive turnovers. But if we say that the
capital of £1,000 has been turned over five times this includes both the
time of circulation and the time of production. Indeed, if £1,000 had
really been continuously active in the process of production, the
product would, according to our assumptions, have to be £10,000 instead
of £5,000. But in order to have £1,000 continuously in the process of
production, £2,000 would have to be advanced. The economists, who as a
general rule have nothing clear to say in reference to the mechanism of
the turnover, always overlook this main point, to wit, that only a part
of the industrial capital can actually be engaged in the process of
production if production is to proceed uninterruptedly. While one part
is in the period of production, another must always be in the period of
circulation. Or in other words, one part can perform the function of
productive capital only on condition that another part is withdrawn from
production proper in the form of commodity- or money-capital. In
overlooking this, the significance and role of money-capital is entirely
ignored.

We have now to ascertain what differences in the turnover arise if the
two sections of the period of turnover, the working period and the
circulation period, are equal, or if the working period is greater or
smaller than the circulation period, and, furthermore, what effect this
has on the tie-up of capital in the form of money-capital.

We assume the capital advanced weekly to be in all cases £100, and the
period of turnover 9 weeks, so that the capital to be advanced in each
period of turnover is £900.

I. The Working Period Equal to the Circulation Period

Although this case occurs in reality only as an accidental exception, it
must serve as our point of departure in this investigation, because here
relations shape themselves in the simplest and most intelligible way.

The two capitals (capital I advanced for the first working period, and
supplemental capital II, which functions during the circulation period
of capital I) relieve one another in their movements without crossing.
With the exception of the first period, either of the two capitals is
therefore advanced only for its own period of turnover. Let the period
of turnover be 9 weeks, as indicated in the following illustrations, so
that the working period and the circulation period are each 4½ weeks.
Then we have the following annual diagram.

Table I

CAPITAL I

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

ADVANCE

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I.1st-9th week

1st-4th ½ week

£450

4th ½-9th week

II. 10th-18th "

10th-13th ½ "

£450

13th ½-18th "

III. 19th-27th "

19th-22nd ½ "

£450

22nd ½-27th "

IV. 28th-36th "

28th-31st ½ "

£450

31st ½-36th "

V. 37th-45th "

37th-40th ½ "

£450

40th ½-45th "

VI. 46th-[54th]

46th-49th ½ "

£450

49th ½-[54th] "^([31])

 

CAPITAL II

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

 ADVANCE 

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 1st-9th week

4th ½-9th week

£450

10th-13th ½ week

II. 10th-18th "

13th ½-18th "

£450

19th-22nd ½ "

III. 19th-27th "

22nd ½-27th "

£450

28th-31st ½ "

IV. 28th-36th "

31st ½-36th "

£450

37th-40th ½ "

V. 37th-45th "

40th ½-45th "

£450

46th-49th ½ "

VI. 46th-[54th] "

49th ½-[54th] "

£450

[55th-58th ½] "

Within the 51 weeks which here stand for one year, capital I runs
through six full working periods, producing 6 times 450, or £2,700 worth
of commodities, and capital II producing in five full working periods 5
times £450, or £2,250 worth of commodities. In addition, capital II
produced, within the last one and a half weeks of the year (middle of
the 50th to the end of the 51st week), an extra £150 worth. The
aggregate product in 51 weeks is worth £5,100. So far as the direct
production of surplus-value is concerned, which takes place only during
the working period, the aggregate capital of £900 would have been turned
over 5⅔ times (5⅔ times 900 equals £5,100)). But if we consider the real
turnover, capital I has been turned over 5⅔ times, since at the close of
the 51st week it still has 3 weeks to go of its sixth period of
turnover; 5⅔ times 450 makes £2,550; and capital II turned over 5 1/6
times, since it has completed only 1½ weeks of its sixth period of
turnover, so that 7½ weeks of it run into the next year; 5 1/6 times 450
makes £2,325; real aggregate turnover: £4,875.

Let us consider capital I and capital II as two capitals wholly
independent of one another. They are entirely independent in their
movements; these movements complement one another merely because their
working and circulating periods directly relieve one another. They may
be regarded as two totally independent capitals belonging to different
capitalists.

Capital I has completed five full turnovers and two-thirds of its sixth
turnover period. At the end of the year it has the form of
commodity-capital, which is three weeks short of its normal realisation.
During this time it cannot enter into the process of production. It
functions as commodity-capital, it circulates. It has completed only
two-thirds of its last period of turnover. This is expressed as follows:
It has been turned over only two-thirds of a time, only two-thirds of
its total value have performed a complete turnover. We say that £450
complete their turnover in 9 weeks, hence £300 do in 6 weeks. But in
this mode of expression the organic relations between the two
specifically different components of the turnover time are ignored. The
exact meaning of the expression that the advanced capital of £450 has
made 5⅔ turnovers is merely that it has accomplished five turnovers
fully and only two-thirds of the sixth. On the other hand the expression
that the turned-over capital equals 5⅔ times the advanced capital —
hence, in the above case, 5⅔ times £450, making £2,550 — is correct,
meaning that unless this capital of £450 were complemented by another
capital of £450, one portion of it would have to be in the process of
production while another in the process of circulation. If the time of
turnover is to be expressed in terms of the capital turned over, it can
always be expressed only in terms of existing value (in fact, of
finished product). The circumstance that the advanced capital is not in
a condition in which it may re-open the process of production finds
expression in the fact that only a part of it is in a state capable of
production or that, in order to be in a state of uninterrupted
production, the capital would have to be divided into a portion which
would be continually in the period of production and into another which
would be continually in the period of circulation, depending upon the
relation of these periods to each other. It is the same law which
determines the quantity of the constantly functioning productive capital
by the ratio of the time of circulation to the time of turnover.

By the end of the 51st week, which we regard here as the end of the
year, £150 of capital II have been advanced to the production of an
unfinished lot of goods. Another part of it exists in the form of
circulating constant capital — raw materials, etc. — i.e., in a form in
which it can function as productive capital in the production process.
But a third part of it exists in the form of money, at least the amount
of the wages for the remainder of the working period (3 weeks), which is
not paid, however, until the end of each week. Now, although at the
beginning of a new year, hence of a new turnover cycle, this portion of
the capital is not in the form of productive capital but in that of
money-capital, in which it cannot take part in the process of
production, at the opening of the new turnover circulating variable
capital, i.e., living labour-power, is nevertheless active in the
process of production. This is due to the fact that labour-power is not
paid until the end of the week, although bought at the beginning of the
working period, say, per week, and so consumed. Money serves here as a
means of payment. For this reason it is still as money in the hands of
the capitalist, on the one hand, while, on the other hand, labour-power,
the commodity into which money is being transformed, is already active
in the process of production, so that the same capital-value appears
here doubly.

If we look merely at the working periods,

capital  I produces 6     times 450, or £2,700
capital II produces 5⅓ times 450, or £2,400
————————————————
Hence together      5⅓ times 900, or £5,100.

Hence the total advanced capital of £900 has functioned 5⅔ times
throughout the year as productive capital. It is immaterial for the
production of the surplus-value whether there are always £450 in the
production process and always £450 in the circulation process, or
whether £900 function 4½ weeks in the process of production and the
following 4½ weeks in the process of circulation.

On the other hand, if we consider the periods of turnover, there has
been turned over:

capital  I,              5⅔ times 450, or £2,550
capital II,              5 1/6 times 450, or £2,325
—————————————————-
Hence the total capital 5 5/12 times 900, or £4,875.

For the number of turnovers of the total capital is equal to the sum of
the amounts turned over by I and II, divided by the sum of I and II.

It is to be noted that if capitals I and II were independent of each
other they would nevertheless form merely different independent portions
of the social capital advanced in the same sphere of production. Hence
if the social capital within this sphere of production were composed
_solely_ of I and II, the same calculation would apply to the turnover
of the social capital in this sphere as applies here to the constituent
parts I and II of the same private capital. Going further, every portion
of the entire social capital invested in any particular sphere of
production may be so calculated. But in the last analysis, the number of
turnovers made by the entire social capital is equal to the sum of the
capitals turned over in the various spheres of production divided by the
sum of the capitals advanced in those spheres.

It must further be noted that just as capitals I and II in the same
private business have here strictly speaking different turnover years
(the cycle of turnover of capital II beginning 4½ weeks later than that
of capital I, so that the year of I ends 4½ weeks earlier than that of
II), so the various private capitals in the same sphere of production
begin their operations at totally different periods and therefore
conclude their turnover years at different times of the year. The same
calculation of averages that we employed above for I and II suffices
also here to bring down the turnover years of the various independent
portions of the social capital to one uniform turnover year.

II. The Working Period Greater than the Period of Circulation

The working and turnover periods of capitals I and II cross one another
instead of relieving one another. Simultaneously some capital is set
free. This was not so in the previously considered case.

But this does not alter the fact that, as before, 1) the number of
working periods of the total capital advanced is equal to the sum of the
value of the annual product of both advanced portions of capital divided
by the total capital advanced, and 2) the number of turnovers made by
the total capital is equal to the sum of the two amounts turned over
divided by the sum of the two advanced capitals. Here too we must
consider both portions of capital as if they performed turnover
movements entirely independent of each other.

Thus, we assume once more, that £100 are to be advanced weekly to the
labour-process. Let the working period last 6 weeks, requiring therefore
every time an advance of £600 (capital I). Let the time of circulation
be 3 weeks, so that the period of turnover is 9 weeks, as before. Let
capital II of £300 step in during the three-week circulation period of
capital I. Considering both capitals as independent of each other, we
find the schedule of the annual turnover to be as follows:

Table II

CAPITAL I, £600

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

ADVANCE

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 1st-9th week

1st-6th week

£600

7th-9th week

II. 10th-18th "

10th-15th "

£600

16th-18th"

III. 19th-27th "

19th-24th "

£600

25th-27th "

IV. 28th-36th "

28th-33rd "

£600

34th-36th "

V. 37th-45th "

37th-42nd "

£600

43rd-45th "

VI. 46th-[54th] "

46th-51st "

£600

[52nd-54th] "

ADDITIONAL CAPITAL II, £300

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

ADVANCE

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 7th-15th week

7th-9th week

£300

10th-15th week

II. 16th-24th "

16th-18th "

£300

19th-24th "

III. 25th-33rd "

25th-27th "

£300

28th-33rd "

IV. 34th-42nd "

34th-36th "

£300

37th-42nd "

V. 43rd-51st "

43rd-45th "

£300

46th-51st "

The process of production continues uninterruptedly the whole year round
on the same scale. The two capitals I and II remain entirely separate.
But in order to represent them as separate, we had to tear apart their
real intersections and intertwinings, and thus also to change the number
of turnovers. For according to the above table the amounts turned over
would be:

by capital  I,             5⅔ times 600, or £3,400 and
by capital II,             5     times 300, or £1,500
——————————————————
Hence by the total capital 5 4/9 times 900, or £4,900.

But this is not correct, for, as we shall see, the actual periods of
production and circulation do not absolutely coincide with those of the
above schedule, in which it was mainly a question of presenting capitals
I and II as independent of each other.

In reality, capital II has no working and circulating periods separate
and distinct from those of capital I. The working period is 6 weeks, the
circulation period 3 weeks. Since capital II amounts to only £300, it
can suffice only for a part of the working period. This is indeed the
case. At the end of the 6th week a product valued at £600 passes into
circulation and returns in money-form at the close of the 9th week.
Then, at the opening of the 7th week, capital II begins its activity,
and covers the requirements of the next working period, the 7th to 9th
week. But according to our assumption the working period is only half up
at the end of the 9th week. Hence capital I of £600 having just
returned, at the beginning of the 10th week, once more enters into
operation and with its £300 supplies the advances needed for the 10th to
12th week. This disposes of the second working period. A product value
of £600 is in circulation and will return at the close of the 15th week.
At the same time, £300, the amount of the original capital II, are set
free and are able to function in the first half of the following working
period, that is to say, in the 13th to 15th week. After the lapse of
these weeks the £600 return; £300 of them suffice for the remainder of
the working period, and £300 remain for the following working period.

The thing therefore works as follows:

First period of turnover: 1st-9th week.

1st working period: 1st-6th week. Capital I, £600, performs its
function.
1st period of circulation: 7th-9th week. End of 9th week, £600 return.

Second period of turnover: 7th-15th week.

2nd working period: 7th-12th week.
First half: 7th-9th week. Capital II, £300, performs its function.
End of 9th week, £600 return in money-form (capital I).
Second half: 10th-12th week. £300 of capital I perform their function.
The other £300 of capital I remain freed.

2nd period of circulation: 13th-15th week.
End of 15th week, £600 (half taken from capital I, half from capital II)
return in the form of money.

Third period of turnover; 13-21st week.

3rd working period: 13th-18th week.
First half: 13th-15th week. The freed £300 perform their function. End
of 15th week, £600 return in money-form.
Second half: 16th-18th week, £300 of the returned £600 function, the
other £300 again remain freed.

3rd period of circulation: 19th-21st week at the close of which £600
again return in money-form. In these £600 capital I and capital II are
now indistinguishably fused.

And so there are eight full turnover periods of a capital of £600 (I:
1st-9th week; II: 7th-15th week; III: 13th-21st; IV: 19th-27th; V:
25th-33rd; VI: 31st-39th; VII: 37th-45th; VIII: 43rd-51st week) to the
end of the 51st week. But as the 49th-51st weeks fall within the eighth
period of circulation, the £300 of freed capital must step in and keep
production going. Thus the turnover at the end of the year is as
follows: £600 have completed their circuit eight times, making £4,800.
In addition we have the product of the last 3 weeks (49th-51st), which,
however, has completed only one-third of its circuit of 9 weeks, so that
in the sum turned over it counts for only one-third of its amount, £100.
If, then, the annual product of 51 weeks is £5,100, the capital turned
over is only 4,800 plus 100, or £4,900. The total capital advanced,
£900, has therefore been turned over 5 4/9 times, a trifle more than in
the first case.

In the present example we assumed a case in which the working time was ⅔
and the circulation time ⅓ of the period of turnover, i.e., the working
time was a simple multiple of the circulation time. The question now is
whether capital is likewise set free, in the way shown above, when this
assumption is not made.

Let us assume a working time of 5 weeks, a circulation time of 4 weeks,
and a capital advance of £100 per week.

First period of turnover: 1st-9th week.

1st working period: 1st-5th week. Capital I, or £500, performs its
function.

1st circulation period: 6th-9th week. End of 9th week, £500 return in
money-form.

Second period of turnover: 6th-14th week.

2nd working period: 6th-10th week.
First section: 6th-9th week. Capital II, of £400, performs its function.
End of 9th week, capital I of £500 returns in money-form.
Second section: 10th week. £100 of the returned £500 perform their
function. The remaining £400 are set free for the following working
period.

2nd circulation period: 11th-14th week. End of 14th week. £500 return in
money-form.

Up to the end of the 14th week (11th-14th), the £400 set free above
perform their function; £100 of the £500 then returned fill the
requirements of the third working period (11th-15th week) so that £400
are once more released for the fourth working period. The same thing is
repeated in every working period; at its beginning £40 are ready at
hand, sufficing for the first 4 weeks. End of the 4th week, £500 return
in money-form, only £100 of which are needed for the last week, while
the other £400 remain free for the next working period.

Let us further assume a working period of 7 weeks, with a capital I of
£700; a circulation period of 2 weeks, with a capital II of £200.

In that case the first period of turnover lasts from the 1st to the 9th
week; its first working period from the 1st to the 7th week, with an
advance of £700, its first circulation period from the 8th to the 9th
week. End of the 9th week, £700 flow back in money-form.

The second period of turnover, from the 8th to the 16th week, contains
the second working period of the 8th to the 14th week. The requirements
of the 8th and 9th weeks of this period are covered by capital II. End
of the 9th week, the above £700 return. Up to the close of this working
period (10th-14th week), £500 of this sum are used up; £200 remain free
for the next working period. The second circulation period lasts from
the 15th to the 16th week. End of the 16th week £700 return once more.
From now on, the same thing is repeated in every working period. The
need for capital during the first two weeks is covered by the £200 set
free at the close of the preceding working period; at the close of the
second week £700 return; but only 5 weeks remain of the working period,
so that it can consume only £500; therefore £200 always remain free for
the next working period.

We find, then, that in the given case, where the working period has been
assumed to be greater than the circulation period, a money-capital will
at all events have been set free at the close of each working period,
which is of the same magnitude as capital II advanced for the
circulation period. In our three illustrations capital II was £300 in
the first, £400 in the second, and £200 in third. Accordingly, the
capital set free at the close of each working period was £300, £400 and
£200 respectively.

III. The Working Period Smaller than the Circulation Period

We begin by assuming once more a period of turnover of 9 weeks, of which
3 weeks are assigned to the working period with an available capital I
of £300. Let the circulation period be 6 weeks. For these 6 weeks, an
additional capital of £600 is required, which we may divide in turn into
two capitals of £300, each of them meeting the requirements of one
working period. We then have three capitals of £300 each, of which £300
are always engaged in production, while £600 circulate.

TABLE III

CAPITAL I

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 1st-9th week

1st-3rd week

4th-9th week

II. 10th-18th "

10th-12th "

13th-18th "

III. 19th-27th "

19th-21st "

22nd-27th "

IV. 28th-36th "

28th-30th "

31st-36th "

V. 37th-45th "

37th-39th "

40th-45th "

VI. 46th-[54th] "

46th-48th "

49th-[54th] "

CAPITAL II

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 1st-9th week

4th-6th week

7th-12th week

II. 10th-18th "

13th-15th "

16th-21st "

III. 19th-27th "

22nd-24th "

25th-30th "

IV. 28th-36th "

31st-33rd "

34th-39th "

V. 37th-45th "

40th-42nd "

43rd-48th "

VI. 46th-[54th] "

49th-51st "

51st-[57th] "

CAPITAL III

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 7th-15th week 

7th-9th week

10th-15th week

II. 16th-24th "

16th-18th "

19th-24th "

III. 25th-33rd "

25th-27th "

28th-33rd "

IV. 34th-42nd "

34th-36th "

37th-42nd "

V. 43rd-51st "

43rd-45th "

46th-51st "

We have here the exact counterpart of Case I, with the only difference
that now three capitals relieve one another instead of two. There is no
intersection or intertwining of capitals. Each one of them can be traced
separately to the end of the year. Just as in Case I, no capital is set
free at the close of a working period, Capital I is completely laid out
at the end of the 3rd week, returns entirely at the end of the 9th, and
resumes its functions at the beginning of the 10th week. Similarly with
capitals II and III. The regular and complete relief excludes any
release of capital.

The total turnover is as follows:

capital   I,   £300 times 5⅔, or £1,700
capital  II,   £300 times 5⅓, or £1,600
capital III,   £300 times 5   , or £1,500
——————————————
Total capital, £900 times 5⅓, or £4,800

Let us now also take an illustration in which the circulation period is
not an exact multiple of the working period. For instance, working
period — 4 weeks, circulation period — 5 weeks. The corresponding
amounts of capital would then be: capital I — £400; capital II — £400;
capital III — £100. We present only the first three turnovers.

TABLE IV

CAPITAL I

Periods of Turnover

Working Periods

Periods of Circulation

I. 1st-9th week

1st-4th week

5th-9th week

II. 9th-17th "

9. 10th-12th "

13th-17th "

III. 18th-25th "

17. 18th-20th "

21st-25th "

CAPITAL II

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 5th-13th week

5th-8th week

9th-13th week

II. 13th-21st "

13. 14th-16th "

17th-21st "

III. 21st-29th "

21. 22nd-24th "

25th-29th "

CAPITAL III

PERIODS OF TURNOVER

WORKING PERIODS

PERIODS OF CIRCULATION

I. 9th-17th week

9th week

10th-17th week

II. 17th-25th "

17th "

18th-25th "

III. 25th-33rd "

25th "

26th-33rd "

There is in this case an intertwining of capitals in so far as the
working period of capital II, which has no independent working period,
because it suffices for only one week, coincides with the first working
week of capital I. On the other hand an amount of £100, equal to capital
III, is set free at the close of the working period of both capital I
and II. For if capital III fills up the first week of the second and all
succeeding working periods of capital I and £400, the entire capital I,
return at the close of this first week, then only 3 weeks and a
corresponding capital investment of £300 will remain for the rest of the
working period of capital I. The £200 thus set free suffice for the
first week of the immediately following working period of capital II; at
the end of that week the entire capital II of £400 returns. But since
the working period already started can absorb only another £300, £100
are once more disengaged at its close. And so forth. We have, then, a
release of capital at the close of a working period whenever the
circulation period is not a simple multiple of the working period. And
this liberated capital is equal to that portion of the capital which has
to fill up the excess of the circulation period over the working period
or over a multiple of working periods.

In all cases investigated it was assumed that both the working period
and the circulation period remain the same throughout the year in any of
the businesses here examined. This assumption was necessary if we wished
to ascertain the influence of the time of circulation on the turnover
and advancement of capital. That in reality this assumption is not so
unconditionally valid, and that it frequently is not valid at all does
not alter the case in the least.

In this entire section we have discussed only the turnovers of the
circulating capital, not those of the fixed, for the simple reason that
the question at issue has nothing to do with fixed capital. The
instruments of labour, etc., employed in the process of production form
only fixed capital, inasmuch as their time of employment exceeds the
period of turnover of the circulating capital; inasmuch as the period of
time during which these instruments of labour continue to serve in
perpetually repeated labour-processes is greater than the period of
turnover of the circulating capital, and hence equal to the _n_ periods
of turnover of the circulating capital. Regardless of whether the total
time represented by these n periods of turnover of the circulating
capital is longer or shorter, that portion of the productive capital
which was advanced for this time in fixed capital is not advanced anew
during its course. It continues its functions in its old use-form. The
difference is merely this: In proportion to the varying length of a
single _working period_ of each period of turnover of the circulating
capital, the fixed capital gives up a greater or smaller part of its
original value to the product of that working period, and proportionally
to the duration of the circulation time of each period of turnover this
value-part of the fixed capital given up to the product returns quicker
or slower in money-form. The nature of the subject we are discussing in
this section — the turnover of the circulating portion of productive
capital — derives from the very nature of this portion. The circulating
capital employed in a working period cannot be applied in a new working
period until it has completed its turnover, until it has been
transformed into commodity-capital, from that into money-capital, and
from that back into productive capital. Hence, in order that the first
working period may be immediately followed by a second, capital must be
advanced anew and converted into the circulating elements of productive
capital, and its quantity must be sufficient to fill the void occasioned
by the circulation period of the circulating capital advanced or the
first working period. This is the source of the influence exerted by the
length of the working period of the circulating capital over the scale
of the labour-process and the division of the advanced capital or the
addition of new portions of capital. This was precisely what we had to
examine in this section.

IV. Conclusion

From the preceding investigation it follows that

_A._ The different portions into which capital must be divided in order
that one part of it may be continually in the working period while
others are in the period of circulation, relieve one another, like
different independent individual capitals, in two cases: (1) when the
working period is equal to the period of circulation, so that the period
of turnover is divided into two equal sections; (2) when the period of
circulation is longer than the working period, but at the same time is a
simple multiple of the working period, so that one period of circulation
is equal to _n_ working periods, in which case _n_ must be a whole
number. In these cases no portion of the successively advanced capital
is set free.

_B._ On the other hand in all cases in which (1) the period of
circulation is longer than the working period without being a simple
multiple of it, and (2) in which the working period is longer than the
circulation period, a portion of the total circulating capital is set
free continually and periodically at the close of each working period,
beginning with the second turnover. This freed capital is equal to that
portion of the total capital which has been advanced for the circulation
period, provided the working period is longer than the period of
circulation; and equal to that portion of the capital which has to fill
up the excess of the circulation period over the working period or over
a multiple of working periods, provided the circulation period is longer
than the working period.

_C._ It follows that for the aggregate social capital, so far as its
circulating part is concerned, the release of capital must be the rule,
while the mere alternation of portions of capital functioning
successively in the production process must be the exception. For the
equality of the working and circulation periods, or the equality of the
period of circulation and a simple multiple of the working period, this
regular proportionality of the two components of the period of turnover
has absolutely nothing to do with the nature of the case and for this
reason it can occur on the whole only as a matter of exception.

A very considerable portion of the social circulating capital, which is
turned over several times a year, will therefore periodically exist in
the form of released capital during the annual turnover cycle.

It is furthermore evident that, all other circumstances being equal, the
magnitude of the released capital grows with the volume of the
labour-process or with the scale of production, hence with the
development of capitalist production in general. In the case cited under
_B_, (2), because the total advanced capital increases; in _B_ (1),
because with the development of capitalist production the length of the
period of circulation grows, hence also the period of turnover in those
cases where the working period is less than the period of circulation,
and there is no regular ratio between the two periods.

In the first case for instance we had to invest £100 per week. This
required £600 for a working period of 6 weeks, £300 for a circulation
period of 3 weeks, totalling £900. In that case £300 are released
continually. On the other hand if £300 are invested weekly, we have
£1,800 for the working period and £900 for the circulation period. Hence
£900 for the circulation period. Hence £900 instead of £300 are
periodically set free.

_D._ A total capital of, say £900 must be divided into two portions, as
above, £600 for the working period and £300 for the period of
circulation. That portion which is really invested in the labour-process
is thus reduced by one-third, from £900 to £600; consequently, the scale
of production is diminished by one-third. On the other hand the £300
function only to make the working period continuous, in order that £100
may be invested every week of the year in the labour-process.

Abstractly speaking, it is all the same whether £600 work during 6 times
8, or 48, weeks (product £4,800) or whether the total capital of £900 is
expended during 6 weeks in the labour-process and then lies idle during
the 3-week period of circulation. In the latter case, it would be
working, in the course of the 48 weeks, 5⅓ times 6, or 32 weeks (product
5⅓ times 900, or £4,800), and lie idle for 16 weeks. But, apart from the
greater spoilage of the fixed capital during the idle 16 weeks and apart
from the appreciation of labour, which must be paid during the entire
year, even if employed only during a part of it, such a regular
interruption of the process of production is altogether irreconcilable
with the operations of modern big industry. This continuity is itself a
productive power of labour.

Now, if we take a closer look at the released, or rather suspended,
capital, we find that a considerable part of it must always be in the
form of money-capital. Let us adhere to our illustration: Working period
— 6 weeks, period of circulation — 3 weeks, investment per week — £100.
In the middle of the second working period, end of the 9th week, £600
return, and only £300 of them must be invested for the remainder of the
working period. At the end of the second working period, £300 are
therefore released. In what state are these £300? We shall assume that ⅓
is invested for wages and ⅔ are for raw and auxiliary materials. Then
£200 of the returned £600 exist in the form of money for wages and £400
in the form of productive supply, in the form of elements of the
constant circulating productive capital. But since only one half of this
productive supply is required for the second half of the second working
period, the other half exists for 3 weeks in the form of a surplus
productive supply, i.e., of a supply exceeding the requirements of one
working period. But the capitalist knows that he needs only one half, or
£200, of this portion (£400) of the returned capital for the current
working period. It will therefore depend on market conditions whether he
will immediately reconvert these £200, in whole or in part, into a
surplus productive supply, or keep them entirely or partially in the
form of money-capital in anticipation of a more favourable market. On
the other hand it goes without saying that the portion to be laid out
for wages (£200) is retained in the form of money. The capitalist cannot
store labour-power in warehouses after he has bought it, as he may do
with the raw material. He must incorporate it in the process of
production and pay for it at the end of the week. At any rate these £100
of the released capital of £300 will therefore have the form of
money-capital set free, i.e., not required for the working period. The
capital released in the form of money-capital must therefore be at least
equal to the variable portion of capital invested in wages. At a
maximum, it may comprise the entire released capital. In reality it
fluctuates constantly between this minimum and maximum.

The money-capital thus released by the mere mechanism of the turnover
movement (together with that freed by the successive reflux of fixed
capital and that required in every labour-process for variable capital)
must play an important role as soon as the credit system develops and
must at the same time form one of the latter’s foundations.

Let us assume that the time of circulation in our illustration is
shortened from 3 to 2 weeks. This is not to be a normal change, but due,
say, to prosperous times, shorter terms of payment, etc. The capital of
£600, which is laid out during the working period, returns one week
earlier than needed. It is therefore released for this week.
Furthermore, in the middle of the working period, as before, £300 are
released (a portion of those £600), but for 4 weeks instead of 3. There
are then, on the money-market £600 for one week and £300 for 4 instead
of 3 weeks. As this concerns not one capitalist alone but many and
occurs in various periods in different businesses, more available
money-capital makes its appearance in the market. If this condition
lasts for some time, production will be expanded wherever feasible.
Capitalists operating on borrowed money will exercise less demand on the
money-market, which eases it as much as increased supply; or finally the
sums which have become superfluous for the mechanism are thrown
definitely on the money-market.

In consequence of the contraction of the time of circulation from 3
weeks to 2, and consequently of the period of turnover from 9 weeks to
8, one-ninth of the total capital advanced becomes superfluous. The
6-week working period can now be kept going as continuously with £800 as
formerly with £900. One portion of the value of the commodity-capital,
equal to £100, once it has been reconverted into money, persists
therefore in the state of money-capital without performing any more
functions as a part of the capital advanced for the process of
production. While the scale of production and other conditions, such as
prices, etc., remain the same, the sum of value of the advanced capital
is reduced from £900 to £800. The remainder of the originally advanced
value amounting to £100 is eliminated in the form of money-capital. As
such it enters the money-market and forms an additional portion of the
capitals functioning here.

This shows the way in which a plethora of money-capital may arise — and
not only in the sense that the supply of money-capital is greater than
the demand; this is always only a relative plethora, which occurs for
instance in the “melancholy period” opening a new cycle after the end of
a crisis. But also in the sense that a definite portion of the
capital-value advanced becomes superfluous for the operation of the
entire process of social reproduction which includes the process of
circulation and is therefore eliminated in the form of money-capital — a
plethora brought about by the mere contraction of the period of
turnover, while the scale of production and prices remain the same. The
amount of money in circulation, whether great or small, did not
influence it in the least.

Let us assume on the contrary that the period of circulation is
prolonged from, say, 3 weeks to 5. In that case at the very next
turnover the reflux of the advanced capital takes place 2 weeks too
late. The last part of the process of production of this working period
cannot be carried on further by the mechanism of the turnover of the
advanced capital itself. Should this condition last any length of time,
a contraction of the process of production, a reduction of its volume,
might take place, just as an extension occurred in the previous case.
But in order to continue the process on the same scale, the advanced
capital would have to be increased by 2/9, or £200, for the entire term
of the prolongation of the circulation period. This additional capital
can be obtained only from the money-market. If the lengthening of the
period of circulation applies to one or several big branches of
business, it may exert pressure on the money-market, unless this effect
is paralysed by some counter-effect. In this case it is likewise evident
and obvious that this pressure, like that plethora before, had nothing
whatever to do with a movement either of prices of the commodities or
the mass of existing circulating medium.

[The preparation of this chapter for publication presented no small
number of difficulties. Firmly grounded as Marx was in algebra, he did
not get the knack of handling figures, particularly commercial
arithmetic, although there exists a thick batch of copybooks containing
numerous examples of all kinds of commercial computations which he had
solved himself. But knowledge of the various methods of calculation and
exercise in daily practical commercial arithmetic are by no means the
same, and consequently Marx got so tangled up in his computations of
turnovers that besides places left uncompleted a number of things were
incorrect and contradictory. In the tables reproduced above I have
preserved only the simplest and arithmetically correct data. My reason
for doing so was mainly the following:

The uncertain results of these painstaking calculations led Marx to
attach unwarranted importance to a circumstance, which in my opinion,
has actually little significance. I refer to what he calls the “release”
of money-capital. The actual state of affairs, based on the above
assumptions, is this:

No matter what may be the ratio between the working period and
circulation time, hence between capital I and capital II, there is
returned to the capitalist, in the form of money, after the end of the
first turnover and thereafter at regular intervals equal to the duration
of one working period, the capital required for one working period,
i.e., a sum equal to capital I.

If the working period is 5 weeks, the circulation time 4 weeks, and
capital I £500, then a sum of money equal to £500 returns each time at
the end of the 9th, 14th, 19th, 24th, 29th week, etc.

If the working period is 6 weeks, the circulation time 3 weeks, and
capital I £600, then £600 return at the end of the 9th, 15th, 21st,
27th, 33rd week, etc.

Finally, if the working period is 4 weeks, the circulation time 5 weeks,
and capital I £400, then £400 are returned at the end of the 9th, 13th,
17th, 21st, 25th week, etc.

Whether any, and if so how much, of this returned money is superfluous
and thus released for the current working period is immaterial. It is
assumed that production continues uninterruptedly on the current scale,
and in order that this may come about money must be available and must
therefore return, whether “released” or not. If production is
interrupted, release stops likewise.

In other words: There is indeed a release of money, a formation
therefore of latent, merely potential, capital in the form of money. But
it takes place under all circumstances and not only under the special
conditions set forth in the text; and it comes about on a larger scale
than that assumed in the text. So far as circulating capital I is
concerned, the industrial capitalist is in the same situation at the end
of each turnover as when he established his business: he has all of it
in one bulk, while he can convert it back into productive capital only
gradually.

The essential point in the text is the proof that on the one hand a
considerable portion of the industrial capital must always be available
in the form of money and that on the other hand a still more
considerable portion must temporarily assume the form of money. The
proof is, if anything, rendered stronger by these additional remarks of
mine. — _F. E._]

V. The Effects of a Change of Prices

We have on the one hand just assumed unaltered prices and an unaltered
scale of production, and a contraction or expansion of the time of
circulation on the other. Now let us suppose on the contrary an
unaltered period of turnover and an unaltered scale of production, and
on the other hand price changes, i.e., rise or fall of prices of raw
materials, auxiliary substances, and labour, or of the two first-named
elements alone. Take it that the price of raw and auxiliary materials,
as well as wages, fall by one half. In that case the capital to be
advanced in our example would be £50 instead of £100 per week, and that
for the 9-week turnover period would be £450 instead of £900. £450 of
the advanced capital-value are eliminated first of all in the form of
money-capital, but the process of production continues on the same
scale, with the same period of turnover, and with the previous division
of the latter. The annual output likewise remains the same but its value
has been cut in half. This change, which is accompanied by a change in
the supply and demand of money-capital, is brought about neither by an
acceleration of the circulation, nor by a change in the quantity of
circulating money. On the contrary. A fall by half in the value, or
price, of the elements of productive capital would first have the effect
of diminishing by half the capital-value to be advanced for the
continuation of Business X on the same scale as before, and hence only
one half of the money would have to be thrown on the market by Business
X, since Business X advances this capital-value first in the form of
money, i.e., as money-capital. The amount of money thrown into
circulation would decrease because the prices of the elements of
production fell. This would be the first effect.

In the second place however one half of the originally advanced
capital-value of £900, or £450, which (a) passed successively through
the forms of money-capital, productive capital, and commodity-capital,
and (b) existed simultaneously and constantly side by side partly in the
form of money-capital, partly in that of productive capital, and partly
in that of commodity-capital, would be eliminated from the circuit of
Business X, and thus come into the money-market as additional
money-capital, affecting it as an additional constituent. These released
£450 act as money-capital, not because they have become superfluous
money for the operation of Business X but because they are a constituent
part of the original capital-value, and hence are intended to function
further as capital and not to be expended as mere means of circulation.
The best method of letting them operate as capital is that of throwing
them as money-capital on the money-market. On the other hand the scale
of production (apart from fixed capital) might be doubled. In that case
a productive process of double the previous volume would be carried on
with the same advanced capital of £900.

If on the other hand the prices of the circulation elements of
productive capital were to increase by one half, £1500 instead of £100
or £1,350 instead of £900 would be required per week. It would take an
additional capital of £450 to carry on the business on the same scale,
and this would exert a _pro tanto_ pressure on the money-market, big or
small depending on its condition. If all the capital available on this
market were then already engaged, there would be increased competition
for available capital. If a portion of it were unemployed, it would _pro
tanto_ be called into action.

But, in the third place, given a certain scale of production, the
turnover velocity and the prices of the elements of the circulating
productive capital remaining the same, the price of the products of
Business X may rise or fall. If the price of the commodities supplied by
Business X falls, the price of its commodity-capital of £600, which it
constantly threw into circulation, drops to, say, £500. Hence one-sixth
of the value of the advanced capital does not return from the process of
circulation. (The surplus-value contained in the commodity-capital is
not considered here.) It is lost in that process. But since the value,
or price, of the elements of production remains the same, this reflux of
£500 suffices only to replace 5/6 of the capital of £600 constantly
engaged in the process of production. It would therefore require an
additional money-capital of £100 to continue production on the same
scale.

Vice versa, if the price of the product of Business X were to rise, then
the price of the £600 commodity-capital would be increased, say, to
£700. One-seventh of this price, or £100, does not originate in the
process of production, is not advanced in this process, but derives from
the process of circulation. But only £600 are needed to replace the
elements of production. Hence, the release of £100.

It does not fall within the scope of the investigation hitherto made to
ascertain why, in the first case, the period of turnover is shortened or
lengthened, and why in the second case the prices of raw materials and
labour, and in the third, the prices of the products supplied, rise or
fall.

But the following does belong in it:

First case: _Unchanged Scale of Production, Unchanged Prices of the Elements of Production and of Products, and a Change in the Period of Circulation and Thus of Turnover._

According to the assumptions of our example, one-ninth less of the total
advanced capital is needed as a result of the contraction of the period
of circulation, so that the total capital is reduced from £900 to £800
and £100 of money-capital is eliminated.

Business X supplies, just as before, the same six weeks’ product of the
same value of £600, and as work continues year in year out without
interruption, it supplies in 51 weeks the same quantity of products,
valued at £5,100. There is, then, no change so far as the quantity and
price of the product thrown into circulation by this business are
concerned, nor in the times when it throws its product on the market.
But £100 are eliminated because due to the contraction of the
circulation period the requirements of the process are satisfied with
only £800 instead of the former £900. The £100 eliminated capital exist
in the form of money-capital. But they do not by any means represent
that portion of the advanced capital which would have to function
constantly in the form of money-capital. Let us assume that 4/5, or
£480, of the advanced circulating capital I of £600 are constantly
invested in productive materials and 1/5, or £120, in wages. Then the
weekly investment in materials of production would be £80 and in wages
£20. Capital II, amounting to £300, should then also be divided into
4/5, or £240, for materials of production and 1/5, or £60, for wages.
The capital invested in wages must always be advanced in the form of
money. As soon as the commodity-product, worth £600, has been
reconverted into the money-form, or sold, £480 of it can be transformed
into materials of production (productive supply), but £120 retain their
money-form in order to serve for the payment of wages for six weeks.
These £120 are the minimum of the returning capital of £600 which must
always be renewed and replaced in the form of money-capital and
therefore must always be kept on hand as that portion of the advanced
capital which functions in the form of money.

Now, if £100 of the £300 periodically released for three weeks, and
likewise divisible into £240 for productive supply and £60 for wages, is
entirely eliminated, completely thrust out of the turnover mechanism, in
the form of money-capital by shortening the circulation time, where does
the money for this money-capital of £100 come from? Only one-fifth of
this amount consists of money-capital periodically set free within the
turnovers. But four-fifths, or £80, are already replaced by an
additional productive supply of the same value. In what manner is this
additional productive supply converted into money, and where does the
money for this conversion come from?

If the abridged period of circulation has become a fact, then only £400
of the above £600, instead of £480, are reconverted into productive
supply. The remainder, £80, is retained in its money-form and
constitutes, together with the above £20 for wages, the £100 of
eliminated capital. Although these £100 come from the sphere of
circulation through the sale of the £600 worth of commodity-capital and
are now withdrawn from it by not being reinvested in wages and elements
of production, it must not be forgotten that, being in the money-form,
they are once more in that form in which they were originally thrown
into circulation. In the beginning £900 were invested in productive
supply and wages. Now only £800 are necessary to carry out the same
productive process. The £100 thus released in money now form a new,
employment-seeking money-capital, a new constituent part of the
money-market. True, they have already previously been periodically in
the form of released money-capital and of additional productive capital,
but these latent states were themselves the requisites for the execution
of the process of production, because they were the requisites for its
continuity. Now they are no longer needed for that purpose and for this
reason form new money-capital and a constituent part of the
money-market, although they by no means form either an additional
element of the available social money-supply (for they existed at the
beginning of the business and were thrown by it into the circulation),
or a newly accumulated hoard.

These £100 are now in actual fact withdrawn from circulation inasmuch as
they are a part of the advanced money-capital that is no longer employed
in the same business. But this withdrawal is possible only because the
conversion of the commodity-capital into money, and of this money into
productive capital, C' — M — C, is accelerated by one week, so that the
circulation of the money operating in this process is likewise hastened.
They have been withdrawn from it because they are no longer needed for
the turnover of capital X.

It has been assumed here that the advanced capital belongs to him who
employs it. Had he borrowed it nothing would be changed. With the
shortening of the time of circulation he would have to borrow only £800
instead of £900. The £100, if returned to the lender, would as before
form £100 of new money-capital, only in the hands of Y instead of X.
Should capitalist X receive £480 worth of materials of production on
credit, so that he has to advance only £210 in money for wages out of
his own pocket, he would now have to procure £80 worth of materials less
on credit and this sum would constitute superfluous commodity-capital
for the capitalist granting the credit, while capitalist X would have
eliminated £20 in money.

The additional supply for production is now reduced by one-third. It
consisted of £240 constituting four-fifths of £300, the additional
capital II, but now it is only £160, i.e., additional supply for 2
instead of 3 weeks. It is now renewed every 2 weeks instead of every 3,
but only for 2 instead of 3 weeks. The purchases, for instance in the
cotton market, are thus more frequent and smaller. The same amount of
cotton is withdrawn from the market, for the quantity of the product
remains the same. But the withdrawals are distributed differently in
time, extending over a longer period. Supposing that it is a question of
3 months or 2. If the annual consumption of cotton amounts to 1,200
bales, the sales in the first case will be:

  ------------ --------------------------------- -----------
  January 1,   300 bales, left in storage        900 bales
  April 1,     300   "       "     "    "        600   "
  July 1,      300   "        "    "    "        300   "
  October 1,   300   "        "    "    "        0   "
  ------------ --------------------------------- -----------

But in the second case:

  ------------------- ----------------- -------------
  January   1, sold   200, in storage   1,000 bales
  March 1,   "        200,   "   "      800   "
  May 1,   "          200,   "   "      600   "
  July 1,   "         200,   "   "      400   "
  September 1,   "    200,   "   "      200   "
  November 1,   "     200,   "   "      0   "
  ------------------- ----------------- -------------

So the money invested in cotton only returns completely one month later,
in November instead of October. If therefore one-ninth of the advanced
capital, or £100, is eliminated in the form of money-capital by the
contraction of the circulation time and thus of the turnover and if
these £100 are composed of £20 worth of periodically superfluous
money-capital for the payment of weekly wages, and of £80 which existed
as periodically superfluous productive supply for one week, then the
diminished superfluous productive supply in the hands of the
manufacturer corresponds, so far as these £80 are concerned, to an
enlarged commodity-supply in the hands of the cotton dealer. The longer
this cotton lies in the latter’s warehouse as a commodity, the less it
lies in the storeroom of the manufacturer as a productive supply.

Hitherto we presupposed that the contraction of the time of circulation
in Business X was due to the fact that X sold his articles quicker,
received his money for them sooner, or, in the event of credit, was
given shorter terms of payment. The contraction was therefore attributed
to a quicker sale of the commodities, to a quicker transformation of
commodity-capital into money-capital, C' — M, the first phase of the
process of circulation. But it might also derive from the second phase,
M — C, and hence from a simultaneous change, be it in the working period
or in the time of circulation of capitals Y, Z, etc., which supply
capitalist X with the productive elements of his circulating capital.

For instance if cotton, coal, etc., with the old methods of transport,
are three weeks in transit from their place of production or storage to
the place of production of capitalist X, then X’s productive supply must
last at least for three weeks, until the arrival of new supplies. So
long as cotton and coal are in transit, they cannot serve as means of
production. They are then rather a subject of labour for the transport
industry and the capital employed in it; they are also commodity-capital
in the process of circulation for the producer of coal or the dealer in
cotton. Suppose improvements in transport reduce the transit to two
weeks. Then the productive supply can be changed from a three-weekly
into a fortnightly supply. This releases the additional advanced capital
£80 set aside for this purpose and likewise the £20 for wages, because
the turned-over capital of £600 returns one week sooner.

On the other hand if for instance the working period of the capital
which supplies the raw materials is cut down (examples of which were
given in the preceding chapters), so that the possibility arises of
renewing the supply of raw materials in less time, then the productive
supply may be reduced and the interval between periods of renewal
shortened.

If, vice versa, the time of circulation, and thus the period of
turnover, are prolonged, then it is necessary to advance additional
capital. This must come out of the pocket of the capitalist himself if
he has any additional capital. But it will then be invested in some form
or other as a part of the money-market. To make it available, it must be
pried loose from its old form. For instance stocks must be sold,
deposits withdrawn, so that in this case too the money-market is
indirectly affected. Or he must borrow it. As for that part of the
additional capital which is needed for wages, it must under normal
conditions always be advanced in the form of money-capital, and for that
purpose the capitalist X exerts his share of direct pressure on the
money-market. But this is indispensable for the part which must be
invested in materials of production only if he must pay for them in
cash. If he can get them on credit, this does not have any direct
influence on the money-market, because the additional capital is then
advanced directly as a productive supply and not in the first instance
as money-capital. But if the lender throws the bill of exchange received
from X directly on the market, discounts it, etc., this would influence
the money-market indirectly, through someone else. If, however, he uses
this note to cover a debt not yet due for instance, this additional
advanced capital does not affect the money-market either directly or
indirectly.

Second Case. _A Change in the Price of Materials of Production, All Other Circumstances Remaining the Same._

We just assumed that the total capital of £900 was four-fifths invested
in materials of production (equalling £720) and one-fifth in wages
(equalling £180).

If the materials of production drop to half, they require for the 6-week
period only £240 instead of £480, and for the additional capital No. II
only £120 instead of £240. Capital I is thus reduced from £600 to £240
plus £120, or £360, and capital II from £300 to £120 plus £60, or £180.
The total capital of £900 is therefore reduced to £360 plus £180, or
£540. A sum of £360 is therefore released.

This eliminated and now unemployed capital, or money-capital, seeking
employment in the money-market, is nothing but a portion of the capital
of £900 originally advanced as money-capital, which, due to the fall in
the prices of the materials of production, into which it is periodically
reconverted, has become superfluous if the business is not to be
expanded but carried on in the same scale. If this fall in prices were
not due to accidental circumstances (a particularly rich harvest,
over-supply, etc.) but to an increase of productive power in the branch
of production which furnishes the raw materials, then this money-capital
would be an absolute addition to the money-market, and to the capital
available in the form of money-capital in general, because it would no
longer constitute an integral part of the capital already invested.

Third Case. _A Change in the Market Price of the Product Itself._

In the case of a fall in prices a portion of the capital is lost, and
must consequently be made good by a new advance of money-capital. This
loss of the seller may be a gain to the buyer. Directly, if the market
price of the product has fallen merely because of an accidental
fluctuation, and afterwards rises once more to its normal level.
Indirectly, if the change of prices is caused by a change of value
reacting on the old product and if this product passes again, as an
element of production, into another sphere of production and there
releases capital _pro tanto_. In either case the capital lost by X, and
for whose replacement he exerts pressure on the money-market, may be
supplied to him by his business friends as new additional capital. All
that takes place then is a transfer.

If, on the contrary, the price of the product rises, a portion of the
capital which was not advanced is taken out of circulation. This is not
an organic part of the capital advanced in the process of production and
unless production is expanded therefore constitutes money-capital
eliminated. As we have assumed that the prices of the elements of the
product were given before it was brought to market as commodity-capital,
a real change of value might have caused the rise of prices since it
acted retroactively, causing a subsequent rise in the price of, say, raw
materials. In that event capitalist X would realise a gain on his
product circulating as commodity-capital and on his available productive
supply. This gain would give him an additional capital, which would now
be needed for the continuation of his business with the new and higher
prices of the elements of production.

Or the rise of prices is but temporary. What capitalist X then needs by
way of additional capital becomes released capital for the other side,
insofar as X’s product forms an element of production for other branches
of business. What the one has lost the other has gained.

Notes

31. The weeks falling within the second year of turnover are put in
parenthesis.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 16: The Turnover of Variable Capital

I. The Annual Rate of Surplus Value

Let us assume a circulating capital of £2,500, four-fifths of which, or
£2,000, are constant capital (materials of production) and one-fifth, or
£500, is variable capital invested in wages.

Let the period of turnover be 5 weeks: the working period 4 weeks, the
period of circulation 1 week. Then capital I is £2,000, consisting of
£1,600 of constant capital and £400 of variable capital; capital II is
£500, £400 of which are constant and £100 variable. In every working
week a capital of £500 is invested. In a year of 50 weeks an annual
product of 50 times 500, or £2,500, is manufactured. Capital I of
£2,000, constantly employed in the working period, is therefore turned
over 12½ times. 12½ times 2,000 makes £25,000. Of these £25,000
four-fifths, or £20,000, are constant capital laid out in means of
production, and one-fifth, or £5,000 is variable capital laid out in
wages. The total capital of £25,000 is thus turned over 25,000/2,500, or
10 times.

The variable circulating capital expended in production can serve afresh
in the process of circulation only to the extent that the product in
which its value is reproduced has been sold, converted from a
commodity-capital into a money-capital, in order to be once more laid
out in payment of labour-power. But the same is true of the constant
circulating capital (materials of production) invested in production,
the value of which reappears in the product as a portion of its value.
What these two portions — the variable and the constant part of the
circulating capital — have in common and what distinguishes them from
the fixed capital is not that the value transferred from them to the
product is circulated by the commodity-capital, i.e., through the
circulation of the product as a commodity. One portion of the value of
the product, and thus of the product circulating as a commodity, of the
commodity-capital, always consists of the wear and tear of the fixed
capital, that is to say, of that portion of the value of the fixed
capital which is transferred to the product during the process of
production. The difference is really this: The fixed capital continues
to function in the process of production in its old use-form for a
longer or shorter cycle of turnover periods of the circulating capital
(equal to constant circulating plus variable circulating capital), while
every single turnover is conditioned on the replacement of the entire
circulating capital passing from the sphere of production — in the form
of commodity-capital — into the sphere of circulation. The constant
circulating and variable circulating capital have the first phase of
circulation, C' — M, in common. In the second phase they separate. The
money into which the commodity is reconverted is in part transformed
into a productive supply (constant circulating capital). Depending on
the different terms of purchase of its constituent parts, one portion of
the money may sooner, another later, be converted from money into
materials of production, but finally it is wholly consumed that way.
Another portion of the money realised by the sale of the commodity is
held in the form of a money-supply, in order to be gradually expended in
the payment of the labour-power incorporated in the process of
production. This part constitutes the variable circulating capital.
Nevertheless the entire replacement of either portion always originates
from the turnover of capital, from its conversion into a product, from a
product into a commodity, from a commodity into money. This is the
reason why, in the preceding chapter, the turnover of the circulating
capital, constant and variable, was treated jointly and separately
without paying any regard to the fixed capital.

In the question which we shall now take up, we must go a step farther
and proceed with the variable portion of the circulating capital as
though it along constituted the circulating capital. In other words, we
leave out of consideration the constant circulating capital which is
turned over together with it.

A sum of £2,500 has been advanced and the value of the annual product is
£25,000. But the variable portion of the circulating capital is £500;
therefore the variable capital contained in £25,000 amounts to 25,000
divided by 5, or £5,000. If we divide these £5,000 by £500, we find the
number of turnovers is 10, just as it is in the case of the total
capital of £2,500.

Here, where it is only a question of the production of surplus-value, it
is absolutely correct to make this average calculation, according to
which the value of the annual product is divided by the value of the
advanced capital and not by the value of that portion of this capital
which is employed constantly in one working period (thus, in the present
case not by 400 but by 500, not by capital I but by capital I plus
capital II). We shall see later that, from another point of view, the
calculation is not quite exact, just as this average calculation
generally is not quite exact. That is to say, it serves well enough for
the practical purposes of the capitalist, but it does not express
exactly or properly all the real circumstances of the turnover.

We have hitherto ignored one part of the value of the commodity-capital,
namely the surplus-value contained in it, which was produced during the
process of production and incorporated in the product. To this we have
now to direct our attention.

Suppose the variable capital of £100 invested weekly produces a
surplus-value of 100%, or £100, then the variable capital of £500
invested over a 5-week turnover period produces £500 of surplus-value,
i.e., one half of the working day consists of surplus-labour.

If £500 of variable capital produce a surplus-value of £500, then £5,000
produce ten times £500, or £5,000 in surplus-value. But the advanced
variable capital amounts to £500. The ratio of the total surplus-value
produced during one year to the sum of value of the advanced variable
capital is what we call the annual rate of surplus-value. In the case at
hand it is 5,000 to 500 or 1,000%. If we analyse this rate more closely,
we find that it is equal to the rate of surplus-value produced by the
advanced variable capital during one period of turnover, multiplied by
the number of turnovers of the variable capital (which coincides with
the number of turnovers of the entire circulating capital).

The variable capital advanced in the case before us for one period of
turnover is £500. The surplus-value produced during this period is
likewise £500. The rate of surplus-value for one period of turnover is
therefore 500s/500v or 100%. This 100%, multiplied by 10, the number of
turnovers in one year, makes 5,000s/500v, or 1,000%.

That refers to the annual rate of surplus-value. As for the amount of
surplus-value obtained during a specified period of turnover, it is
equal to the value of the variable capital advanced during this period,
of £500 in the present case, multiplied by the rate of surplus-value, in
the present case therefore 500 times 100/100, or 500 times 1, or £500.
If the advanced variable capital were £1,500, then with the same rate of
the surplus-value the amount of surplus-value would be 1,500 times
100/100, or £1,500.

We shall apply the term capital A to the variable capital of £500, which
is turned over ten times per year, producing an annual surplus-value of
£5,000 for which, therefore, the yearly rate of surplus-value is 1,000%.

Now let us assume that another variable capital, B, of £5,000, is
advanced for one whole year (i.e., here for 50 weeks), so that it is
turned over only once a year. We assume furthermore that at the end of
the year the product is paid for on the same day that it is finished, so
that the money-capital, into which it is converted, returns on the same
day. The circulation period is then zero, the period of turnover equals
the working period, namely, one year. As in the preceding case there is
to be found in the labour-process each week a variable capital of £100,
or of £5,000 in 50 weeks. Let the rate of surplus-value be the same, or
100%, i.e., let one half of the working-day of the same length consist
of surplus-labour. If we consider 5 weeks, the invested variable capital
is £500, the rate of surplus-value 100% and therefore the amount of
surplus-value produced in 5 weeks £500. The quantity of labour-power
here exploited, and the intensity of its exploitation, are assumed to be
exactly the same as those of capital A.

Each week the invested variable capital of £100 produces a surplus-value
of £100, hence in 50 weeks the invested capital of 50 × 100 = £5,000
produces a surplus-value of £5,000. The amount of surplus-value produced
annually is the same as in the previous case, £5,000, but the yearly
rate of surplus-value is entirely different. It is equal to the
surplus-value produced in one year divided by the advanced variable
capital: 5,000s/5,000v, or 100%, while in the case of capital A it was
1,000%.

In the case of both capitals A and B, we have invested a variable
capital of £100 a week. The degree of self-expansion, or the rate of
surplus-value, is likewise the same, 100%, and so is the magnitude of
the variable capital, £100. The same quantity of labour-power is
exploited, the volume and degree of exploitation are equal in both
cases, the working-days are the same and equally divided into necessary
labour and surplus-labour. The amount of variable capital employed in
the course of the year is £5,000 in either case; it sets the same amount
of labour in motion, and extracts the same amount of surplus-value,
£5,000, from the labour-power set in motion by these two equal capitals.
Nevertheless there is a difference of 900% in the annual rate of
surplus-value of the two capitals A and B.

This phenomenon creates the impression, at all events, that the rate of
surplus-value depends not only on the quantity and intensity of
exploitation of the labour-power set in motion by the variable capital,
but besides on inexplicable influences arising from the process of
circulation. And it has indeed been so interpreted, and has — if not in
this its pure form, then at least in its more complicated and disguised
form, that of the annual rate of profit — completely routed the
Ricardian school since the beginning of the twenties.

The strangeness of this phenomenon disappears at once when we place
capitals A and B in exactly the same conditions, not only seemingly but
actually. These equal conditions exist only when the variable capital B
in its entire volume is expended for the payment of labour-power in the
same period of time as capital A.

In that case the £5,000 of capital B are invested for 5 weeks, £1,000
per week makes an investment of £50,000 per year. The surplus-value is
then likewise £50,000, according to our premises. The turned-over
capital of £50,000 divided by the advanced capital of £5,000 makes the
number of turnovers 10. The rate of surplus-value, 5,000s/5,000v, or
100%, multiplied by the number of turnovers, 10, makes the annual rate
of surplus-value 50,000s/5,000v, or 10/1, or 1,000%. Now the annual rate
of surplus-value are alike for A and B, namely 1,000%, but the amounts
of the surplus-value are £50,000 in the case of B, and £5,000 in the
case of A. The amounts of the surplus-value produced are now in the same
proportion to one another as the advanced capital-values B and A, to
wit: 5,000:500 = 10:1. But capital B has set in motion ten times as much
labour-power as capital A within the same time.

Only the capital actually employed in the labour-power produces
surplus-value and to it apply all laws relating to surplus-value,
including therefore the law according to which the quantity of
surplus-value, its rate being given, is determined by the relative
magnitude of the variable capital. [See Karl Marx, _Capital_, Ch. XI. —
_Ed_.]

The labour-process itself is measured by time. If the length of the
working-day is given (as here, where we assume all conditions relating
to A and B to be equal, in order to elucidate the difference in the
annual rate of surplus-value), the working week consists of a definite
number of working-days. Or we may consider any working period, for
instance this working period of 5 weeks, as one single working-day of,
say, 300 hours, if the working-day has 10 hours and the week 6 days. We
must further multiply this number by the number of labourers who are
employed conjointly every day simultaneously in the same labour-process.
If that number is taken as 10, there will be 60 times 10 or 600 hours in
one week, and a working period of 5 weeks would have 600 times 5, or
3,000 hours. The rate of surplus-value and the length of the working-day
being the same, variable capitals of equal magnitude are therefore
employed, if equal quantities of labour-power (a labour-power of the
same price multiplied by the number of labourers) are set in motion in
the same time.

Let us now return to our original examples. In both cases, A and B,
equal variable capitals of £100 per week are invested every week
throughout the year. The invested variable capitals actually functioning
in the labour-process are therefore equal, but the advanced variable
capitals are very unequal. In the case of A, £500 are advanced for every
5 weeks, of which £100 are employed every week. In the case of B, £5,000
must be advanced for the first 5-week period, of which only £100 per
week, or £500 in 5 weeks, or one-tenth of the advanced capital, is
employed. In the second 5-week period £4,500 must be advanced, but only
£500 of this is employed, etc. The variable capital advanced for a
definite period of time is converted into employed, hence actually
functioning and operative variable capital only to the extent that it
really steps into the sections of that period of time taken up by the
labour-process, to the extent that it really functions in the
labour-process. In the intermediate time, in which a portion of it is
advanced in order to be employed later, this portion is practically
non-existent for the labour-process and has therefore no influence on
the formation of either value or surplus-value. Take for instance
capital A, of £500. It is advanced for 5 weeks, but every week only £100
enter successively into the labour-process. In the first week one-fifth
of this capital is employed; four-fifths are advanced without being
employed, although they must be in stock, and therefore advanced, for
the labour-processes of the following 4 weeks.

The circumstances which differentiate the relation between the advanced
and the employed variable capital affect the production of surplus-value
— the rate of surplus-value being given — only to the extent, and only
by reason of the fact that they differentiate the quantity of variable
capital which can be really employed in a stated period of time, for
instance in one week, 5 weeks, etc. The advanced variable capital
functions as variable capital only to the extent and only during the
time that it is actually employed, and not during the time in which it
remains in stock, is advanced, without being employed. But all the
circumstances which differentiate the relation between the advanced and
the employed variable capital come down to the difference of the periods
of turnover (determined by the difference of either the working period,
or the circulation period, or both). The law of production of
surplus-value states that equal quantities of functioning variable
capital produce equal quantities of surplus-value if the rate of
surplus-value is the same. If then, equal quantities of variable capital
are employed by the capitals A and B in equal periods of time with equal
rates of surplus-value, they must generate equal quantities of
surplus-value in equal periods of time, no matter how different the
ratio of this variable capital employed during a definite period of time
to the variable capital advanced during the same time, and no matter
therefore how different the ratio of the quantities of surplus-value
produced, not to the employed but to the advanced variable capital in
general. The difference of this ratio, far from contradicting the laws
of the production of surplus-value that have been demonstrated, rather
corroborates them and is one of their inevitable consequences.

Let us consider the first 5-week productive period of capital B. At the
end of the fifth week £500 have been employed and consumed. The value of
the product is £1,000, hence 500s/500v = 100%. Just the same as with
capital A. The fact that, in the case of capital A, the surplus-value is
realised together with the advanced capital, while in the case of B it
is not, does not concern us here, where it is only a question of the
production of surplus-value and of its ratio to the variable capital
advanced during its production. But if on the contrary we calculate the
ratio of surplus-value in B, not to that portion of the advanced capital
of £5,000 which has been employed and hence consumed during its
production, but to this total advanced capital itself, we find that it
is 500s/5,000v of 1/10, or 10%. Hence it is 10% for capital B and 100%
for capital A, i.e., ten-fold. If it were said that this difference in
the rate of surplus-value for equal capitals, which have set in motion
equal quantities of labour equally divided at that into paid and unpaid
labour, is contrary to the laws of the production of surplus-value, the
answer would be simple and prompted by a mere glance at the actual
relations: In the case of A, the actual rate of surplus-value is
expressed, i.e., the relation of a surplus-value produced in 5 weeks by
a variable capital of £500, to the variable capital of £500. In the case
of B on the other hand the calculation is of a kind which has nothing to
do either with the production of surplus-value or with the determination
of its corresponding rate of surplus-value. For the £500 of
surplus-value produced by a variable capital of £500 of variable capital
advanced during their production, but with reference to a capital of
£5,000, nine-tenths of which, or £4,500, have nothing whatever to do
with the production of this surplus-value of £500, but are on the
contrary intended to function gradually in the course of the following
45 weeks, so that they do not exist at all so far as the production of
the first 5 weeks is concerned, which alone is at issue in this
instance. Hence in this case the difference in the rates of
surplus-value of A and B presents no problem at all.

Let us now compare the annual rates of surplus-value for capitals B and
A. For capital B it is 500s/500v = 100%; for capital A it is 5,000s/500v
= 1,000%. But the ratio of the rates of surplus-value is the same as
before. There we had

(Rate of Surplus-Value of Capital B) / (Rate of Surplus-Value of Capital
A)
= 10% / 100%

Now we have

(Annual Rate of Surplus-Value of Capital B) / (Annual Rate of
Surplus-Value of Capital A)
= 100% / 1,000%

But 10% : 100% = 100% : 1,000%, so that the proportion is the same.

But now the problem has changed. The annual rate of capital B,
5,000s/5,000v = 100%, offers not the slightest deviation — not even the
semblance of a deviation — from the laws of production known to us and
of the rate of surplus-value corresponding to this production. During
the year 5,000v have been advanced and productively consumed, and they
have produced 5,000s. The rate of surplus-value therefore equals the
above fraction, 5,000s/5,000v = 100%. The annual rate agrees with the
actual rate of surplus-value. In this case it is therefore not capital B
but capital A which presents the anomaly that has to be explained.

We have here the rate of surplus-value 5,000s/500v = 1,000%. But while
in the first case 500s, the product of 5 weeks, was calculated for an
advanced capital of £5,000, nine-tenths of which were not employed by
its production, we have now 5,000s calculated for 500v, i.e., for only
one-tenth of the variable capital actually employed in the production of
5,000s; for the 5,000s are the product of a variable capital of £5,000
productively consumed during 50 weeks, not that of a capital of £500
consumed in one single period of 5 weeks. In the first case the
surplus-value produced in 5 weeks had been calculated for a capital
advanced for 50 weeks, a capital ten times as large as the one consumed
during the 5 weeks. Now the surplus-value produced in 50 weeks is
calculated for a capital advanced for 5 weeks, a capital ten times
smaller than the one consumed in 50 weeks.

Capital A, of £500, is never advanced for more than 5 weeks. At the end
of this time it returns and can renew the same process in the course of
the year ten times, as it makes ten turnovers. Two conclusions follow
from this:

_Firstly_: The capital advanced in the case of A is only five times
larger than that portion of capital which is constantly employed in the
productive process of one week. On the other hand capital B which is
turned over only once in 50 weeks and must therefore be advanced for 50
weeks, is fifty times larger than that one of its portions which can
constantly be employed for one week. The turnover therefore modifies the
relation between the capital advanced during the year for the process of
production and the capital constantly employable for a definite period
of production, say, a week. Here we have, then, the first case, in which
the surplus-value of 5 weeks is not calculated for the capital employed
during these 5 weeks, but for a capital ten times larger, employed for
50 weeks.

_Secondly_: The 5-week period of turnover of capital A comprises only
one-tenth of the year, so that one year contains ten such turnover
periods, in which capital A of £500 is successively re-invested. The
employed capital is here equal to the capital advanced for 5 weeks,
multiplied by the number of periods of turnover per year. The capital
employed during the year is 500 times 10, or £5,000. The capital
advanced during the year is 5,000/10, or £500. Indeed, although the £500
are always re-employed, the sum advanced every 5 weeks never exceeds
these same £500. On the other hand in case of capital B only £500 are
employed during 5 weeks and advanced for these 5 weeks. But as the
period of turnover in this case is 50 weeks, the capital employed in one
year is equal to the capital advanced for 50 weeks and not to that
advanced for every 5 weeks. The annually produced quantity of
surplus-value, given the rate of surplus-value, is however commensurate
with the capital employed during the year, not with the capital advanced
during the year. Hence it is not larger for this capital of £5,000,
which is turned over once a year, than it is for the capital of £500,
which is turned over ten times a year. And it is so big only because the
capital turned over once a year is itself ten times larger than the
capital turned over ten times a year.

The variable capital turned over during one year — hence the portion of
the annual product, or of the annual expenditure equal to that portion —
is the variable capital actually employed, productively consumed, during
that year. It follows therefore that if the variable capital A turned
over annually and the variable capital B turned over annually are equal
and the employed under equal conditions of self-expansion, so that the
rate of surplus-value is the same for both of them, then the quantity of
surplus-value produced annually must likewise be the same for both of
them. Hence the rate of surplus-value calculated for a year must also be
the same, since the amounts of capital employed are the same, so far as
the rate is expressed by (quantity of surplus-value produced annually) /
(variable capital turned over annually). Or, expressed generally:
Whatever the relative magnitude of the turned-over variable capitals,
the rate of the surplus-value produced by them in the course of the year
is determined by the rate of surplus-value at which the respective
capitals have worked in average periods (say, the average of a week or
day).

This is the only consequence of the laws of production of surplus-value
and of the determination of the rate of surplus-value.

Let us see further what is expressed by the ratio

(Capital turned over annually) / (capital advanced)

(taking into account, as we have said before, only the variable
capital). The division shows the number of turnovers made by the capital
advanced in one year.

In the case of capital A we have:

(£5,000 of capital turned over annually) / (£500 of capital advanced)

In the case of capital B we have:

(£5,000 of capital turned over annually) / (£5,000 of capital advanced)

In both ratios the numerator expressed the advanced capital multiplied
by the _number_ of turnovers; in the case of A, 500 times 10; in the
case of B, 5,000 times 1. Or it may be multiplied by the inverted _time_
of turnover calculated for one year. The time of turnover for A is 1/10
of a year; the inverted time of turnover is 10/1 years; hence 500 times
10/1, or 5,000. In the case of B, 5,000 times 1/1, or 5,000. The
denominator expresses the turned-over capital multiplied by the inverted
_number_ of turnovers; in the case of A, 5,000 times 1/10; in the case
of B, 5,000 times 1/1.

The respective quantities of labour (the sum of the paid and unpaid
labour), which are set in motion by the two variable capitals turned
over annually, are equal in this case, because the turned-over capitals
themselves are equal and their rates of self-expansion are likewise
equal.

The ratio of variable capital turned over annually to the variable
capital advanced indicates 1) the ratio of the capital to be advanced to
the variable capital employed during a definite working period. If the
number of turnovers is 10, as in the case of A, and the year assumed to
have 50 weeks, then the period of turnover is 5 weeks. For these 5 weeks
variable capital must be advanced and the capital advanced for 5 weeks
must be 5 times as large as the variable capital employed during one
week. That is to say, only one-fifth of the advanced capital (in this
case £500) can be employed in the course of one week. On the other hand,
in the case of capital B, where the number of turnovers is 1/1, the time
of turnover is 1 year, or 50 weeks. The ratio of the advanced capital to
the capital employed weekly is therefore 50 : 1. If matters were the
same for B as they are for A, then B would have to invest £1,000 per
week instead of £100. 2) It follows that B has employed ten times as
much capital (£5,000) as A to set in motion the same quantity of
variable capital and hence — the rate of surplus-value being given — of
labour (paid and unpaid), and thus to produce also the same quantity of
surplus-value during the year. The real rate of surplus-value expresses
nothing but the ratio of the variable capital employed during a definite
period to the surplus-value produced in the same time; or the quantity
of unpaid labour set in motion by the variable capital employed during
this time. It has absolutely nothing to do with that portion of the
variable capital which is advanced during the time in which it is not
employed. Hence it has likewise nothing to do with the ratio between
that portion of capital which is advanced during a definite period of
time and that portion which is employed during the same period of time —
a ratio that is modified and differentiated for different capitals by
the turnover period.

It follows rather from what has been set forth above that the annual
rate of surplus-value coincides only in one single case with the real
rate of surplus-value which expresses the degree of exploitation of
labour; namely in the case when the advanced capital is turned over only
once a year and the capital advanced is thus equal to the capital turned
over in the course of the year, when therefore the ratio of the quantity
of the surplus-value produced during the year to the capital employed
during the year in this production coincides and is identical with the
ratio of the quantity of surplus-value produced during the year to the
capital advanced during the year.

A) The annual rate of surplus-value is equal to the

(quantity of surplus-value produced during the year) / (variable capital
advanced)

But the quantity of the surplus-value produced during the year is equal
to the real rate of surplus-value multiplied by the variable capital
employed in its production. The capital employed in the production of
the annual quantity of surplus-value is equal to the advanced capital
multiplied by the number of its turnovers, which we shall call _n_.
Formula A is therefore transformed into the following:

B) The annual rate of surplus-value is equal to the

(real rate of surplus-value × variable capital advanced × _n_) /
(variable capital advanced)

For instance, in the case of capital B = 100 × 5,000 × 1 / 5,000 , or
100%.

Only when _n_ is equal to 1, that is, when the variable capital advanced
is turned over only once a year, and hence equal to the capital employed
or turned over during a year, the annual rate of surplus-value is equal
to its real rate.

Let us call the annual rate of surplus-value S', the real rate of
surplus-value s', the advanced variable capital v, the number of
turnovers _n_. Then S' = s'v_n_/v = s'_n_. In other words, S' is equal
to s'_n_, and it is equal to s' only when _n_ = 1, and hence S' = s'
times 1, or s'.

It follows furthermore that the annual rate of surplus-value is always
equal to s'_n_, i.e., to the real rate of surplus-value produced in one
period of turnover by the variable capital consumed during that period,
multiplied by the number of turnovers of this variable capital during
one year, or (what amounts to the same) multiplied by its inverted
_time_ of turnover calculated for one year. (If the variable capital is
turnover over ten times per year, then its time of turnover is 1/10 of a
year; its inverted time of turnover therefore 10/1 or 10.)

It follows furthermore that S' = s' when _n_ is equal to 1. S' is
greater than s' when _n_ is greater than 1; i.e., when the advanced
capital is turned over more than once a year or the turned-over capital
is greater than the capital advanced.

Finally, S' is smaller than s' when _n_ is smaller than 1, that is, when
the capital turned over during the year is only a part of the advanced
capital, so that the period of turnover is longer than one year.

Let us dwell a moment on this last case.

We retain all the premises of our former illustration, except that the
period of turnover is lengthened to 55 weeks. The labour-process
requires a variable capital of £100 per week, hence £5,500 for the
period of turnover, and produces every week 100s; s' is therefore 100%,
as before. The number of turnovers, _n_, is here 50/55 or 10/11, because
the time of turnover is 1 plus 1/10 of the year (of 50 weeks), or 11/10
years.

S' = 100% × 5,500 × 10/11 / 5,500 = 100 × 10/11 = 1000/11 = 90 10/11%.
It is therefore smaller than 100%.

Indeed, if the annual rate of surplus-value were 100%, then during the
year 5,500v would produce 5,500s, whereas 10/11 years are required for
that. The 5,500v produce only 5,000s during one year, therefore the
annual rate of surplus-value is 5,000s/5,500v, or 10/11 or 90 10/11%.

The annual rate of surplus-value, or the comparison between the
surplus-value produced during one year and the variable capital
_advanced_ in general (as distinguished from the variable capital
_turned over_ during the year), is therefore not merely subjective
comparison; the actual movement of the capital itself gives rise to this
contraposition. So far as the owner of capital A is concerned, his
advanced variable capital of £500 has returned to him at the end of the
year, and £5,000 of surplus-value in addition. It is not the quantity of
capital employed by him during the year, but the quantity returning to
him periodically that expresses the magnitude of his advanced capital.
It is immaterial for the present issue whether at the end of the year
the capital exists partly as a productive supply, or partly as money- or
commodity-capital, and in what proportions it may have been divided into
these different parts. So far as the owner of capital B is concerned,
£5,000, his advanced capital, has returned to him besides £5,000 in
surplus-value. For the owner of capital C (the last considered, worth
£5,500) surplus-value to the amount of £5,000 has been produced during
the year (£5,000 invested and rate of surplus-value 100%), but his
advanced capital has not yet returned to him, nor has his produced
surplus-value.

S' = s'_n_ indicates that the rate of surplus-value valid for the
variable capital employed during one period of turnover, to wit,

(quantity of s produced in one turnover period) / (variable capital
employed in one turnover period)

must be multiplied by the number of turnover periods, or of the periods
of reproduction of the advanced variable capital, by the number of
periods in which it renews its circuit.

We have already seen (Buch I, Kap. IV [English edition: Part II. —
_Ed_.]) (The Transformation of Money into Capital), and furthermore
(Buch I, Kap. XXI [English edition: Ch. XXIII. — _Ed_.]) (Simple
Reproduction), that the capital-value is in general advanced, not
expended, as this value, having passed through the various phases of its
circuit, returns to its point of departure, and at that enriched by
surplus-value. This characterises it as advanced. The time that elapses
from the moment of its departure to the moment of its return is the time
for which it was advanced. The entire circular movement described by
capital-value, measured by the time from its advance to its return,
constitutes its turnover, and the duration of this turnover is a period
of turnover. When this period has expired and the circuit is completed,
the same capital-value can renew the same circuit, can therefore expand
anew, can create surplus-value. If the variable capital is turned over
ten times in one year, as in the case of capital A, then the same
advance of capital begets in the course of one year ten times the
quantity of surplus-value that corresponds to one period of turnover.

One must get a clear conception of the nature of this advance from the
standpoint of capitalist society.

Capital A, which is annually turned over ten times, is advanced ten
times during one year. It is advanced anew for every new period of
turnover. But at the same time, during the year A never advances more
than this same capital-value of £500 and in actual fact never disposes
of more than these £500 for the productive process examined by us. As
soon as these £500 have completed one circuit A makes them start anew
the same circuit; by its very nature capital preserves its character of
capital only because it always functions as capital in successive
production processes. It is, moreover, never advanced for more than five
weeks. Should the turnover last longer, it proves inadequate. Should the
turnover be curtailed, a part becomes superfluous. Not ten capitals of
£500 are advanced, but _one_ capital of £500 is advanced ten times at
successive intervals. The annual rate of surplus-value is therefore not
calculated for ten advances of a capital of £500 or for £5,000, but for
one advance of a capital of £500. It is the same as if one shilling
circulates ten times and yet never represents more than one single
shilling in circulation, although it performs the function of 10
shillings. But in the pocket which holds it after each change of hands
it retains the same identical value of one shilling as before.

In the same way capital A indicates at each successive return, and
likewise on its return at the end of the year, that its owner has
operated always with the same capital-value of £500. Hence only £500
return to him each time. His advanced capital is therefore never more
than £500. Hence the advanced capital of £500 forms the denominator of
the fraction which expresses the annual rate of surplus-value. We had
for it the above formula S' = s'v_n_/v = s'_n_. Since the real rate of
surplus-value, s', equals s/v, the quantity of surplus-value divided by
the variable capital which produced it, we may substitute s/v for the
value of s' in s'_n_, and get the other formula S' = s_n_/v.

But by its ten-fold turnover and thus the ten-fold renewal of its
advance, the capital of £500 performs the function of a ten times larger
capital, of a capital of £5,000, just as 500 shillings which circulate
ten times per year perform the same function as 5,000 shillings which
circulate only once.

II. The Turnover of the Individual Variable Capital

“Whatever the form of the process of production in a society, it must be
a continuous process, must continue to go periodically through the same
phases... When viewed therefore as a connected whole and as flowing on
with incessant renewal, every social process of production is, at the
same time, a process of reproduction... As a periodic increment of the
capital advanced, or periodic fruit of capital in process, surplus-value
acquires the form of a _revenue_ flowing out of capital.” (Buch I, Kap.
XXI, pp. 588, 589.) [English edition: pp. 566 and 567. — _Ed_.]

In the case of capital A we have 10 five-week turnover periods. In the
first period of turnover £500 of variable capital are advanced; i.e.,
£100 are weekly converted into labour-power, so that £500 are spent on
labour-power at the end of the first turnover period. These £500,
originally a part of the total capital advanced, have ceased to be
capital. They are paid out in wages. The labourers in their turn pay
them out in the purchase of means of subsistence, consuming means of
subsistence worth £500. A quantity of commodities of that value is
therefore annihilated; (what the labourer may save up in money, etc., is
not capital either). As far as concerns the labourer, this quantity of
commodities has been consumed unproductively, except inasmuch as it
preserves the efficacy of his labour-power, an instrument indispensable
to the capitalist.

In the second place however these £500 have been transformed, for the
capitalist, into labour-power of the same value (or price). Labour-power
is consumed by him productively in the labour-process. At the end of 5
weeks a product valued at £1,000 has been created. Half of this, £500,
is the reproduced value of the variable capital expended in payment of
labour-power. The other half, £500, is newly produced surplus-value. But
the 5-weekly labour-power, through exchange for which a portion of the
capital was converted into variable capital, is likewise expended,
consumed, although productively. The labour which was active yesterday
is not the same that is active today. Its value plus that of
surplus-value created by it exists now as the value of a thing distinct
from labour-power, to wit, of a product. But by converting the product
into money, that portion of its value which is equal to the value of
variable capital advanced can once more be exchanged for labour-power
and thus again function as variable capital. The fact that the same
workmen, i.e., the same bearers of labour-power, are given employment
not only by the reproduced capital-value but also by that which has been
reconverted into the form is immaterial. It is possible for the
capitalist to hire different workmen for the second period of turnover.

In actual fact therefore a capital of £5,000, and not of £500, is
expended successively in wages during the ten periods of turnover of 5
weeks each, and these wages will again be spent by the labourers to buy
means of subsistence. The capital of £5,000 so advanced is consumed. It
ceases to exist. On the other hand labour-power worth £5,000, not £500,
is incorporated successively in the productive process and reproduces
not only its own value of £5,000, but produces over and above that a
surplus-value of £5,000. The variable capital of £500 advanced during
the second period of turnover is not the identical capital of £500 that
had been advanced during the first period of turnover. That has been
consumed, spent in wages. But it is _replaced_ by new variable capital
of £500, which was produced in the first period of turnover in the form
of commodities, and reconverted into money. This new money-capital of
£500 is therefore the money-form of the quantity of commodities newly
produced in the first period of turnover. The fact that an identical sum
of money, £500, is again in the hands of the capitalist, i.e., apart
from the surplus-value, precisely as much money-capital as he had
originally advanced, conceals the circumstance that he is operating with
newly produced capital. (As for the other constituents of value of the
commodity-capital, which replace the constant parts of capital, their
value is not newly produced, but only the form is changed in which this
value exists.)

Let us take the third period of turnover. Here it is evident that the
capital of £500, advanced for a third time, is not an old but a newly
produced capital, for it is the money-form of the quantity of
commodities produced in the second, not the first, period of turnover,
i.e., of that portion of this quantity of commodities whose value is
equal to that of the advanced variable capital. The quantity of
commodities produced in the first period of turnover is sold. A part of
its value equal to the variable portion of the value of the advanced
capital was transformed into the new labour-power of the second period
of turnover; it produced a new quantity of commodities, which were sold
in their turn and a portion of whose value constitutes the capital of
£500 advanced in the third turnover period.

And so forth during the ten periods of turnover. In the course of these,
newly produced quantities of commodities (whose value, inasmuch as it
replaces variable capital, is also newly produced, and does not merely
re-appear as in the case of the constant circulating part of the
capital) are thrown upon the market every 5 weeks, in order to
incorporate ever new labour-power in the process of production.

Therefore what is accomplished by the ten-fold turnover of the advanced
variable capital of £500 is not that this capital of £500 can be
productively consumed ten times, or that a variable capital lasting for
5 weeks can be employed for 50 weeks. Rather, ten times £500 of variable
capital is employed in the 50 weeks, and the capital of £500 always
lasts only for 5 weeks and must be replaced at the end of the 5 weeks by
a newly produced capital of £500. This applies equally to capitals A and
B. But at this point the difference begins.

At the end of the first period of 5 weeks a variable capital of £500 has
been advanced and expended by B as well as A. Both A and B have
converted its value into labour-power and replaced it by that portion of
the value of the product newly created by this labour-power which is
equal to the value of the advanced variable capital of £500. For both B
and A the labour-power has not only replaced the value of the expended
variable capital of £500 by a new value of the same amount, but also
added a surplus-value which, according to our assumption, is of the same
magnitude.

But in the case of B the value-product, which replaces the advanced
variable capital and adds to it a surplus-value, is not in the form in
which it can function anew as productive, or variable, capital. It is in
such a form in the case of A. And up to the end of the year B does not
possess the variable capital expended in the first 5 and every
subsequent 5 weeks (although it has been replaced by newly produced
value plus surplus-value) in the form in which it can again function as
productive, or variable, capital. True, its _value_ is replaced by new
value, hence renewed, but the _form_ of its value (in this case the
absolute form of value, its money-form) is not renewed.

For the second period of 5 weeks (and thus for every succeeding 5 weeks
of the year) another £500 must again be available, the same as for the
first period. Hence, regardless of credit conditions, £5,000 must be
available at the beginning of the year as a latent advanced
money-capital, although they are really expended, turned into
labour-power, only gradually, in the course of the year.

But because in the case of A the circuit, the turnover of the advanced
capital, is consummated, the replacement value after the lapse of the
first 5 weeks is already in the form in which it can set new
labour-power in motion for a term of 5 weeks — in its original form, the
money-form.

In cases of both A and B new labour-power is consumed in the second
5-week period and a new capital of £500 is spent in payment of this
labour-power. The means of subsistence of the labourers, paid with the
first £500, are gone; at all events their value has vanished from the
hands of the capitalist. With the second £500 new labour-power is
bought, new means of subsistence withdrawn from the market. In short, it
is a new capital of £500 that is being expended, not the old. But in the
case of A this new capital of £500 is the money-form of the newly
produced substitute for the value of the formerly expended £500, while
in the case of B, this substitute is in a form in which it cannot
function as variable capital. It is there, but not in the form of
variable capital. For the continuation of the process of production for
the next 5 weeks an additional capital of £500 must therefore be
available and advanced in the here indispensable form of money. Thus,
during 50 weeks, both A and B expend an equal amount of variable
capital, pay for and consume an equal quantity of labour-power. Only, B
must pay for it with an advanced capital equal to its total value of
£5,000, while A pays for it successively with the ever renewed
money-form of the value-substitute, produced every 5 weeks, for the
capital of £500 advanced for every 5 weeks, i.e., never more than that
advanced for the first 5 weeks, viz., £500. These £500 last for the
entire year. It is therefore clear that, the degree of exploitation of
labour and the real rate of surplus-value being the same, the annual
rates (of surplus-value) of A and B must be inversely proportional to
the magnitudes of the variable money-capitals which have to be advanced
in order to set in motion the same amount of labour-power during the
year.

A: 5,000s/500v = 1,000%;  B: 5,000s/5,000v = 100%.

But 500v : 5,000v = 1 : 10 = 100% : 1,000%.

The difference is due to the difference in the periods of turnover,
i.e., the periods in which the value-substitute of the variable capital
employed for a definite time can function anew as capital, hence as new
capital. In the case of B as well as A, there is the same replacement of
value for the variable capital employed during the same periods. There
is also the same increment of surplus-value during the same periods. But
in the case of B, while every 5 weeks there is a replacement of the
value of £500 and a surplus-value of £500, this value-substitute does
not constitute new capital, because it does not exist in the form of
money. In the case of A the old capital-value is not only replaced by a
new one, but is rehabilitated in its money-form, hence replaced as a new
capital capable of performing its function.

The conversion, sooner or later, of the value-substitute into money, and
thus into the form in which variable capital is advanced, is obviously
an immaterial circumstance, so far as the production of surplus-value
itself is concerned. This production depends on the magnitude of
variable capital employed and the degree of exploitation of labour. But
that circumstance modifies the magnitude of the money-capital which must
be advanced in order to set a definite quantum of labour-power in motion
during the year, and therefore it determines the annual rate of
surplus-value.

III. The Turnover of the Variable Capital from the Social Point of View

Let us look at this matter for a moment from the point of view of
society. Let the wages of one labourer be £1 per week, the working-day
10 hours. In case of A as well as B 100 labourers are employed during a
year (£100 for 100 labourers per week, or £500 for 5 weeks, or £5,000
for 50 weeks), and each one of them works 60 hours per week of 6 days.
So 100 labourers work 6,000 hours per week and 300,000 hours in 50
weeks. This labour-power is taken hold of by A and B and therefore
cannot be expended by society for anything else. To this extent the
matter is the same socially with both A and B. Furthermore: In the cases
of both A and B the 100 labourers employed by either side receive a
yearly wage of £5,000 (or, together for the 200 labourers, £10,000) and
withdraw from society means of subsistence to that amount. So far the
matter is therefore socially the same in the case of both A and B. Since
the labourers in either case are paid by the week, they weekly withdraw
their means of subsistence from society and, in either case, throw a
weekly equivalent in money into circulation. But here the difference
begins.

_First_. The money which the A labourer throws into circulation is not
only, as it is for the B labourer, the money-form of the value of his
labour-power (in fact a means of payment for labour already performed);
it is, counting from the second turnover period after the opening of the
business, the money-form _of his own value_ (equal to the price of the
labour-power plus the surplus-value) created during the first period of
turnover, by which his labour is paid during the second period of
turnover. This is not the case with the B labourer. As far as the latter
is concerned, the money is here, true enough, a medium of payment for
work already done by him, but this work done is not paid for with the
value which it itself produced and which was turned into money (not with
the money-form of the value of the labour itself has produced). This
cannot be done until the beginning of the second year, when the B
labourer is paid with the value produced by him in the preceding year
and turned into money.

The shorter the period of turnover of capital — the shorter therefore
the intervals at which it is reproduced throughout the year — the
quicker is the variable portion of the capital, originally advanced by
the capitalist in the form of money, transformed into the money-form of
the value (including, besides, surplus-value) created by the labourer to
replace this variable capital; the shorter is the time for which the
capitalist must advance money out of his own funds, and the smaller is
the capital advanced by him in general in proportion to the given scale
of production; and the greater comparatively is the quantity of
surplus-value which he extracts during the year with a given rate of
surplus-value, because he can buy the labourer so much more frequently
with the money-form of the value created by that labourer and can so
much more frequently set his labour into motion again.

If the scale of production is given, the absolute magnitude of the
advanced variable money-capital (and of the circulating capital in
general) decreased proportionately to the decrease of the turnover
period, while the annual rate of surplus-value increases. If the
magnitude of the advanced capital is given, the scale of production
grows; hence, if the rate of surplus-value is given, the absolute
quantity of surplus-value created in one period of turnover likewise
grows, simultaneously with the rise in the annual rate of surplus-value
effected by the shortening of the periods of reproduction. It generally
follows from the foregoing investigation that the different lengths of
the turnover periods make it necessary for money-capital to be advanced
in very different amounts in order to set in motion the same quantity of
productive circulating capital and the same quantity of labour with the
same degree of exploitation of labour.

_Second_ — and this is interlinked with the first difference — the B and
A labourers pay for the means of subsistence which they buy with the
variable capital that has been transformed in their hands into a medium
of circulation. For instance they not only withdraw wheat from the
market, but they also replace it with an equivalent in money. But since
the money wherewith the B labourer pays for his means of subsistence,
which he withdraws from the market, is not the money-form of a value
produced and thrown by him on the market during the year, as it is in
the case of the A labourer, he supplies the seller of the means of
subsistence with money, but not with commodities — be they means of
production or means of subsistence — which this seller could buy with
the proceeds of the sale, as he can in the case of A. The market is
therefore stripped of labour-power, means of subsistence for this
labour-power, fixed capital in the form of instruments of labour used in
the case of B, and of materials of production, and to replace them an
equivalent in money is thrown on the market; but during the year no
product is thrown on the market with which to replace the material
elements of productive capital withdrawn from it. If we conceive society
as being not capitalistic but communistic, there will be no
money-capital at all in the first place, not the disguises cloaking the
transactions arising on account of it. The question then comes down to
the need of society to calculate beforehand how much labour, means of
production, and means of subsistence it can invest, without detriment,
in such lines of business as for instance the building of railways,
which do not furnish any means of production or subsistence, nor produce
any useful effect for a long time, a year or more, while they extract
labour, means of production and means of subsistence from the total
annual production. In capitalist society however where social reason
always asserts itself only _post festum_ great disturbances may and must
constantly occur. On the one hand pressure is brought to bear on the
money-market, while on the other, an easy money-market calls such
enterprises into being _en masse_, thus creating the very circumstances
which later give rise to pressure on the money-market. Pressure is
brought to bear on the money-market, since large advances of
money-capital are constantly needed here for long periods of time. And
this regardless of the fact that industrialists and merchants throw the
money-capital necessary to carry on their business into speculative
railway schemes; etc., and make it good by borrowing in the
money-market.

On the other hand pressure on society’s available productive capital.
Since elements of productive capital are for ever being withdrawn from
the market and only an equivalent in money is thrown on the market in
their place, the effective demand rises without itself furnishing any
element of supply. Hence a rise in the prices of productive materials as
well as means of subsistence. To this must be added that stock-jobbing
is a regular practice and capital is transferred on a large scale. A
band of speculators, contractors, engineers, lawyers, etc., enrich
themselves. They create a strong demand for articles of consumption on
the market, wages rising at the same time. So far as foodstuffs are
involved, agriculture too is stimulated. But as these foodstuffs cannot
be suddenly increased in the course of the year, their import grows,
just as that of exotic foods in general (coffee, sugar, wine, etc.) and
of articles of luxury. Hence excessive imports and speculation in this
line of the import business. Meanwhile, in those branches of industry in
which production can be rapidly expanded (manufacture proper, mining,
etc.), climbing prices give rise to sudden expansion soon followed by
collapse. The same effect is produced in the labour-market, attracting
great numbers of the latent relative surplus-population, and even of the
employed labourers, to the new lines of business. In general such
large-scale undertakings as railways withdraw a definite quantity of
labour-power from the labour-market, which can come only from such lines
of business as agriculture, etc., where only strong lads are needed.
This still continues even after the new enterprises have become
established lines of business and the migratory working-class needed for
them has already been formed, as for instance in the case of temporary
rise above the average in the scale of railway construction. A portion
of the reserve army of labourers, which keep wages down, is absorbed. A
general rise in wages ensues, even in the hitherto well employed
sections of the labour-market. This lasts until the inevitable crash
again releases the reserve army of labour and wages are once more
depressed to their minimum, and lower.^([32])

Inasmuch as the length, great or small, of the period of turnover
depends on the working period proper, that is, the period necessary to
get the product ready for the market, it is based on the existing
material conditions of production specific for the various investments
of capital. In agriculture they assume more of the character of natural
conditions of production, in manufacture and the greater part of the
mining industry they vary with the social development of the process of
production itself.

Inasmuch as the length of the working period depends on the size of the
supply (the quantitative volume in which the product is generally thrown
upon the market as commodities), it is conventional in character. But
the convention itself has its material basis in the scale of production,
and is therefore accidental only when examined singly.

Finally, inasmuch as the length of the turnover period hinges on that of
the period of circulation, it is partly dependent on the incessant
change of market conditions, the greater or lesser ease of selling, and
the resultant necessity of disposing of part of the product in nearer or
remoter markets. Apart from the volume of the demand in general, the
movement of prices is here of cardinal importance since sales are
intentionally restricted when prices are falling, while production
proceeds; vice versa, production and sales keep pace when prices are
rising or sales can be made in advance. But we must consider the actual
distance of the place of production from the market as the real material
basis.

For instance English cotton goods or yarn are sold to India. Suppose the
exporter himself pays the English cotton manufacturer (the exporter does
so willingly only if the money-market is strong. But when the
manufacturer himself replaces his money-capital by some credit
transaction, things are not so good). The exporter sells his cotton
goods later in the Indian market, from where his advanced capital is
remitted to him. Up to this remittance the case runs the very same
course as when the length of the working period necessitated the advance
of new money-capital to maintain the production process on a given
scale. The money-capital with which the manufacturer pays his labourers
and renews the other elements of his circulating capital is not the
money-form of the yarn produced by him. This cannot be the case until
the value of this yarn has returned to England in the form of money or
products. It is additional money-capital as before. The only difference
is that instead of the manufacturer, it is advanced by the merchant, who
in turn may well have obtained it by means of credit operations.
Similarly, before this money is thrown on the market, or simultaneously
with this, no additional product has been put on the English market that
could be bought with this money and would enter the sphere of productive
or individual consumption. If this situation continues for a rather long
period of time and on a rather large scale, it must have the same effect
as the previously mentioned prolongation of the working period.

Now it may be that in India the yarn is again sold on credit. With this
credit products are bought in India and sent as return shipment to
England or drafts remitted for this amount. If this condition is
protracted, the Indian money-market comes under pressure and the
reaction on England may here produce a crisis. This crisis, in its turn,
even if connected with bullion export to India, calls forth a new crisis
in that country on account of the bankruptcy of English firms and their
Indian branches, which had received credit from Indian banks. Thus a
crisis occurs simultaneously in the market in which the balance of trade
is _favourable_, as well as in the one in which it is _unfavourable_.
This phenomenon may be still more complicated. Assume for instance that
England has sent silver bullion to India but India’s English creditors
are not urgently collecting their debts in that country, and India will
soon after have to ship its silver bullion back to England.

It is possible that the export trade to India and the import trade from
India may approximately balance each other, although the volume of the
import trade (except under special circumstances, such as a scarcity of
cotton, etc.) is determined and stimulated by the export trade. The
balance of trade between England and India may seem equilibrated or may
disclose slight oscillations in either direction. But as soon as the
crisis breaks out in England it turns out that unsold cotton goods are
stored in India (hence have not been transformed from commodity-capital
into money-capital — an over-production to this extent), and that on the
other hand there are stored up in England unsold supplies of Indian
goods, and moreover, a great portion of the sold and consumed supplies
is not yet paid. Hence what appears as a crisis on the money-market is
in reality an expression of abnormal conditions in the very process of
production and reproduction.

_Third_. So far as the employed circulating capital itself (constant and
variable) is concerned, the length of the period of turnover, since it
derives from the working period, makes this difference: In the case of
several turnovers during one year, an element of the variable or
constant circulating capital may be supplied through its own product,
for instance in the production of coal, the ready-made clothes business,
etc. In other cases this cannot occur, at least not within the same
year.

Notes

32. In the manuscript, the following note is here inserted for future
amplification: “Contradiction in the capitalist mode of production: the
labourers as buyers of commodities are important for the market. But as
sellers of their own commodity — labour-power — capitalist society tends
to keep them down to the minimum price.

—Further contradiction: the periods in which capitalist production
exerts all its forces regularly turn out to be periods of
over-production, because production potentials can never be utilised to
such an extent that more value may not only be produced but also
realised; but the sale of commodities, the realisation of
commodity-capital and thus of surplus-value, is limited, not by the
consumer requirements of society in general, but by the consumer
requirements of a society in which the vast majority are always poor and
must always remain poor. However, this pertains to the next part.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 17: The Circulation of Surplus Value

We have just seen that a difference in the period of turnover causes a
difference in the annual rate of surplus-value, even if the mass of the
annually produced surplus-value is the same.

But there are furthermore necessarily differences in the capitalisation
of surplus-value, in _accumulation_, and also in the quantity of
surplus-value produced during the year, while the rate of surplus-value
remains the same.

To begin with, we note that capital A (in the illustration of the
preceding chapter) has a current periodical revenue, so that with the
exception of the period of turnover inaugurating the business, it pays
for its own consumption within the year out of its production of
surplus-value, and need not cover it by advances out of its own funds.
But the latter has to be done in the case of B. While it produces as
much surplus-value in the same intervals of time as A, the surplus-value
is not realised and therefore cannot be consumed either productively or
individually. So far as individual consumption is concerned, the
surplus-value is anticipated. Funds for that purpose must be advanced.

One portion of the productive capital, which it is difficult to classify
namely the additional capital required for the repair and maintenance of
the fixed capital, is now likewise seen in a new light.

In the case of A this portion of capital is not advanced — in full or
for the greater part — at the beginning of production. It need not be
available or even in existence. It comes out of the business itself by a
direct transformation of surplus-value into capital, i.e., by its direct
employment as capital. A part of the surplus-value which is not only
periodically generated but also realised during the year can defray the
expenditures that must be incurred for repairs, etc. A portion of the
capital needed to carry on the business on its original scale is thus
produced in the course of business by the business itself by means of
capitalising part of the surplus-value. This is impossible for capital
B. The portion of capital in question must in his case form a part of
the capital originally advanced. In both cases this portion will figure
in the books of the capitalists as an advanced capital, which it really
is, since according to our assumption it forms a part of the productive
capital required for maintaining the business on a certain scale. But it
makes all the difference in the world out of which funds it is advanced.
In the case of B it is really a part of the capital to be originally
advanced or held available. In the case of A on the other hand it is a
part of the surplus-value used as capital. This last case shows that not
only the accumulated capital but also a portion of the originally
advanced capital may simply be capitalised surplus-value.

As soon as the development of credit interferes, the relation between
originally advanced capital and capitalised surplus-value becomes still
more complicated. For instance from not having sufficient capital of his
own at the very outset for this purpose, A borrows from banker C a
portion of the productive capital with which he starts in business or
continues it during the year. Banker C lends him a sum of money which
consists only of surplus-value deposited with the banker by capitalists
D, E, F, etc. As far as A is concerned there is as yet no question of
accumulated capital. But with regard to D, E, F, etc., A is, in fact,
nothing but an agent capitalising surplus-value appropriated by them.

We have seen (Buch I, Kap. XXII) [English edition: Ch. XXIV. — _Ed_.]
that accumulation, the conversion of surplus-value into capital, is
essentially a process of reproduction on a progressively increasing
scale, whether this expansion is expressed extensively in the form of an
addition of new factories to the old, or intensively by the enlargement
of the existing scale of operation.

The expansion of the scale of production may proceed in small portions,
a part of the surplus-value being used for improvements which either
simply increase the productive power of the labour employed or permit at
the same time of its more intensive exploitation. Or, where the
working-day is not legally limited, an additional expenditure of
circulating capital (in materials of production and wages) suffices to
enhance the production scale without an expansion of the fixed capital,
whose daily time of employment is thus merely lengthened, while its
period of turnover is correspondingly shortened. Or the capitalised
surplus-value may, under favourable market conditions, permit of
speculation in raw materials, operations for which the capital
originally advanced would not have been sufficient, etc.

However it is clear that in cases where the greater number of periods of
turnover brings with it a more frequent realisation of surplus-value
during the year, there will be periods in which there can be neither a
prolongation of the working-day nor an introduction of improvements in
details; on the other hand a proportional expansion of the whole
business, partly by expanding its entire plant, the buildings for
example, partly by enlarging the cultivated areas in agriculture, is
possible only within certain more or less narrow limits and, besides,
requires such a volume of additional capital as can be supplied only by
several years’ accumulation of surplus-value.

Along with the real accumulation or conversion of surplus-value into
productive capital (and a corresponding reproduction on an extended
scale), there is, then, an accumulation of money, a raking together of a
portion of the surplus-value in the form of latent money-capital, which
is not intended to function as additional active capital until later,
when it swells to a certain volume.

That is how the matter looks from the standpoint of the individual
capitalist. But simultaneously with the development of capitalist
production the credit system also develops. The money-capital which the
capitalist cannot as yet employ in his own business is employed by
others, who pay him interest for its use. It serves him as money-capital
in its specific meaning, as a kind of capital distinguished from
productive capital. But it serves as capital in another’s hands. It is
plain that with the more frequent realisation of surplus-value and the
rising scale on which it is produced, there is an increase in the
proportion of new money-capital or money as capital thrown upon the
money-market and then absorbed — at least the greater part of it — by
extended production.

The simplest form in which the additional latent money-capital may be
represented is that of a hoard. It may be that this hoard is additional
gold or silver secured directly or indirectly in exchange with countries
producing precious metals. And only in this manner does the hoarded
money in a country grow absolutely. On the other hand it may be — and is
so in the majority of cases — that this hoard is nothing but money which
has been withdrawn from circulation at home and has assumed the form of
a hoard in the hands of individual capitalists. It is furthermore
possibly that this latent money-capital consists only of tokens of value
— we still ignore credit-money at this point — or of mere claims of
capitalists (titles) against third persons conferred by legal documents.
In all such cases, whatever may be the form of existence of this
additional money-capital, it represents, so far as it is capital _in
spe_, nothing but additional and reserved legal titles of capitalists to
future annual additional social production.

“The mass of real accumulated wealth, in point of magnitude ... is so
utterly insignificant when compared with the powers of production of the
same society in whatever state of civilisation, or even compared with
the actual consumption for even a few years of that society, that the
great attention of legislators and political economists should be
directed to ‘productive powers’ and their future free development, and
not, as hitherto, to the mere accumulated wealth that strikes the eye.
Of what is called accumulated wealth, by far the greater part is only
nominal, consisting not of any real things, ships, houses, cottons,
improvements on land, but of mere demands on the future annual
productive powers of society, engendered and perpetuated by the
expedients or institutions of insecurity ... The use of such articles
(accumulations of physical things or actual wealth) as a mere means of
appropriating to their possessors the wealth to be created by the future
productive powers of society, being that alone of which the natural laws
of distribution would, without force, gradually deprive them, or, if
aided by cooperative labour, would in a very few years deprive them.”
(William Thompson, _An Inquiry into the Principles of the Distribution
of Wealth_, London, 1850, p. 453. This book originally appeared in
1824.)

“It is little thought, by most persons not at all suspected, how very
small a proportion, either in extent or influence, the actual
accumulations of society bear to human productive powers, even to the
ordinary consumption of a few years of a single generation. The reason
is obvious; but the effect very pernicious. The wealth that is annually
consumed, disappearing with its consumption, is seen but for a moment,
and makes no impression but during the act of enjoyment or use. But that
part of wealth which is of slow consumption, furniture, machinery,
buildings, from childhood to old age stand out before the eye, the
durable monuments of human exertion. By means of the possession of this
fixed, permanent, or slowly consumed, part of national wealth, of the
land and materials to work upon, the tools to work with, the houses to
shelter whilst working, the holders of these articles command for their
own benefit the yearly productive powers of all the really efficient
productive labourers of society, though these articles may bear ever so
small a proportion to the recurring products of that labour. The
population of Britain and Ireland being twenty millions, the average
consumption of each individual, man, woman, and child, is probably about
twenty pounds, making four hundred millions of wealth, the product of
labour annually consumed. The whole amount of the accumulated capital of
these countries, it has been estimated, does not exceed twelve hundred
millions, or three times the year’s labour of the community; or, if
equally divided, sixty pounds capital for every individual. ’Tis with
the proportions, rather than with the absolute accurate amount of these
estimated sums, we are concerned. The interest of this capital stock
would support the whole population in the same comfort in which they now
exist, for about two months of one year, the whole accumulated capital
itself would maintain them in idleness (could purchasers be found) for
three years! at the end of which time, without houses, clothes, or food,
they must starve, or become the slaves of those who supported them in
the three years idleness. As three years to the life of one healthy
generation, say forty years, so is the magnitude and importance of the
actual wealth, the accumulated capital of even the wealthiest community,
to the productive powers of only one generation; not of what, under
judicious arrangements of equal security, they might produce,
particularly with the aid of cooperative labour, but of what, under the
defective and depressing expedients of insecurity, they do absolutely
produce!.. The seeming mighty mass of existing capital to maintain and
perpetuate which (or rather the command of the products of yearly labour
which it serves as the means of engrossing) ... in its present state of
forced division, are all the horrible machinery, the vices, crimes, and
miseries of insecurity, sought to be perpetuated. As nothing can be
accumulated without first supplying necessaries, and as the great
current of human inclination is to enjoyment; hence the comparatively
trifling amount of the actual wealth of society at any particular
moment. ’Tis an eternal round of production and consumption. From the
amount of this immense mass of annual consumption and production, the
handful of actual accumulation would hardly be missed; and yet it is to
this handful, and not to the mass of productive powers that attention
has chiefly been directed. This handful, however, having been seized
upon by a few, and been made the instrument of converting to their use
the constantly recurring annual products of the labour of the great
majority of their fellow-creatures; hence, in the opinion of these few,
the paramount importance of such an instrument... About one-third part
of the annual products of the labour of these countries is now
abstracted from the producers, under the name of public burdens, and
unproductively consumed by those who give no equivalent, that is to say,
none satisfactory to the producers... With the accumulated masses,
particularly when held forth in the hands of a few individuals, the
vulgar eye has been always struck. The annually produced and consumed
masses, like the eternal and incalculable waves of a mighty river, roll
on and are lost in the forgotten ocean of consumption. On this eternal
consumption, however, are dependent, not only for almost all
gratifications, but even for existence, the whole human race. The
quantity and distribution of these yearly products ought to be the
paramount objects of consideration. The actual accumulation is
altogether of secondary importance, and derives almost the whole of that
importance from its influence on the distribution of the yearly
productions... Actual accumulations and distributions have been always
considered” (in Thompson’s works) “in reference, and subordinate to
actual accumulations, and to the perpetuating of the existing modes of
distribution. In comparison to the preservation of the actual
distribution, the ever recurring misery of happiness of the whole human
race has been considered as unworthy of regard. To perpetuate the
results of force, fraud, and chance, has been called security; and to
the support of this spurious security, have all the productive powers of
the human race been unrelentingly sacrificed.” (_Ibid_., pp. 440-43.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

For reproduction only two normal cases are possible, apart from
disturbances, which interfere with reproduction even on a fixed scale.

There is either reproduction on a simple scale.

Or there is capitalisation of surplus-value, accumulation.

I. Simple Reproduction

In the case of simple reproduction the surplus-value produced and
realised annually, or periodically, if there are several turnovers
during the year, is consumed individually, that is to say,
unproductively, by its owner, the capitalist.

The circumstance that the value of the product consists in part of
surplus-value and in part of that portion of value which is formed by
the variable capital reproduced in the product plus the constant capital
consumed by it, does not alter anything whatever either in the quantity
or in the value of the total product, which constantly steps into
circulation as commodity-capital and is just as constantly withdrawn
from it, in order to be productively or individually consumed, i.e., to
serve as means of production or consumption. If constant capital is left
aside, only the distribution of the annual product between the labourers
and the capitalists is affected thereby.

Even if simple reproduction is assumed, a portion of the surplus-value
must therefore always exist in the form of money and not of products,
because otherwise it could not be converted for purposes of consumption
from money into products. This conversion of the surplus-value from its
original commodity-form into money must be further analysed at this
place. In order to simplify the matter, we shall presuppose the most
elementary form of the problem, namely the exclusive circulation of
metal coin, of money which is a real equivalent.

According to the laws of the simple circulation of commodities
(developed in Buch I, Kap. III), [English edition: Volume I, Ch. III. —
_Ed_.] the mass of the metal coin existing in a country must not only be
sufficient to circulate the commodities, but must also suffice to meet
the currency fluctuations, which arise partly from fluctuations in the
velocity of the circulation, partly from a change in the prices of
commodities, partly from the various and varying proportions in which
the money functions as a medium of payment or as a medium of circulation
proper. The proportion in which the existing quantity of money is split
into a hoard and money in circulation varies continually, but the total
quantity of money is always equal to the sum of the money hoarded and
the money circulating. This quantity of money (quantity of precious
metal) is a gradually accumulated hoard of society. Since a portion of
this hoard is consumed by wear and tear, it must be replaced annually,
the same as any other product. This takes place in reality by a direct
or indirect exchange of a part of the annual product of a particular
country for the product of countries producing gold and silver. However,
this international character of the transaction conceals its simple
course. In order to reduce the problem to its simplest and most lucid
expression, it must be assumed that the production of gold and silver
takes place in that particular country itself, that therefore the
production of gold and silver constitutes a part of the total social
production within every country.

Apart from the gold and silver produced for articles of luxury, the
minimum of their annual production must be equal to the wear of metal
coin annually occasioned by the circulation of money. Furthermore, if
the sum of the values of the annually produced and circulating quantity
of commodities increases, the annual production of gold and silver must
likewise increase, inasmuch as the increased sum of values of the
circulating commodities and the quantity of money required for their
circulation (and the corresponding formation of a hoard) are not made
good by a greater velocity of money currency and a more comprehensive
function of money as a medium of payment, i.e., by a greater mutual
balancing of purchases and sales without the intervention of actual
money.

A portion of the social labour-power and a portion of the social means
of production must therefore be expended annually in the production of
gold and silver.

The capitalists who are engaged in the production of gold and silver and
who, according to our assumption of simple reproduction, carry on their
production only within the bounds of the annual average wear and tear
and the annual average consumption of gold and silver entailed thereby
throw their surplus-value — which they consume annually, according to
our assumption, without capitalising any of it — directly into
circulation in the money-form, which is its natural form; unlike the
other branches of production, where it is the converted form of the
product.

Furthermore, as far as wages are concerned — the money-form in which the
variable capital is advanced — they are also not replaced by the sale of
the product, by its conversion into money, but by a product itself whose
natural form is from the outset that of money.

Finally the same applies also to that portion of the product of precious
metals which is equal to the value of the periodically consumed constant
capital, both the constant circulating and constant fixed capital
consumed during the year.

Let us consider the circuit, or turnover, of the capital invested in the
production of precious metals first in the form of M — C ... P ... M'.
Since C in M — C consists not only of labour-power and means of
production but also of fixed capital, only a part of whose value is
consumed in P, it is evident that M', the product, is a sum of money
equal to the variable capital laid out in wages plus the circulating
constant capital laid out in means of production plus a portion of the
value equivalent to the worn-out fixed capital plus the surplus-value.
If the sum were smaller, the general value of gold remaining the same,
then the mine would be unproductive or, if this got to be generally the
case, the value of gold compared with the value of commodities that
remains unchanged would subsequently rise; i.e., the prices of
commodities would fall, so that henceforth the amount of money laid out
in M — C would be smaller.

If we consider at first only the circulating portion of capital advanced
in M, the starting-point of M — C ... P ... M', we find that a certain
sum of money is advanced, thrown into circulation for the payment of
labour-power and the purchase of materials of production. But this sum
is not withdrawn from circulation by the circuit of _this_ capital, in
order to be thrown into it anew. The product is money even in its bodily
form; there is no need therefore of transforming it into money by means
of exchange, by a process of circulation. It passes from the process of
production into the sphere of circulation, not in the form of
commodity-capital which has to be reconverted in money-capital, but as
money-capital which is to be reconverted into productive capital, i.e.,
which is to buy fresh labour-power and materials of production. The
money-form of the circulating capital consumed in labour-power and means
of production is replaced, not by the sale of the product, but by the
bodily form of the product itself; hence, not by once more withdrawing
its value from circulation in money-form, but by additional newly
produced money.

Let us suppose that this circulating capital is £500, the period of
turnover 5 weeks, the working period 4 weeks, the period of circulation
only 1 week. From the outset, money for 5 weeks must be partly advanced
for a productive supply, and partly be ready to be paid out gradually in
wages. At the beginning of the 6th week, £400 will have returned and
£100 will have been released. This is constantly repeated. Here, as in
previous cases, £100 will always be found in released form during a
certain time of the turnover. But they consist of additional, newly
produced, money, the same as the other £400. We have in this case 10
turnovers per year and the annual product is £5,000 in gold. (The period
of circulation is not constituted, in this case, by the time required
for the conversion of commodities into money, but by that required for
the conversion of money into the elements of production.)

In the case of every other capital of £500 turned over under the same
conditions, the ever renewed money-form is the converted form of the
commodity-capital produced and thrown into circulation every 4 weeks and
which by its sale — that is to say, by a periodical withdrawal of the
quantity of money it represented when it originally entered into the
process — assumes this money-form anew over and over again. Here, on the
contrary, in every turnover period a new additional £500 in money is
thrown from the process of production itself into circulation, in order
to withdraw from it continually materials of production and
labour-power. This money thrown into circulation is not withdrawn from
it again by the circuit which this capital describes, but is rather
increased by quantities of gold constantly produced anew.

Let us look at the variable portion of this circulating capital, and
assume that it is, as before, £100. Then these £100 would be sufficient
in the ordinary production of these commodities, with 10 turnovers, to
pay continually for the labour-power. Here, in the production of gold,
the same amount is sufficient. But the £100 of the reflux, with which
the labour-power is paid every 5 weeks, are not a converted form of its
product but a portion of this ever renewed product itself. The producer
of gold pays his labourers directly with a portion of the gold they
themselves produced. The £1,000 thus expended annually in labour-power
and thrown by the labourers into circulation do not return therefore via
this circulation to their starting-point.

Furthermore, so far as the fixed capital is concerned, it requires the
investment of a comparatively large money-capital on the original
establishment of the business, and this capital is thus thrown into
circulation. Like all fixed capital it returns only piecemeal in the
course of years. But it returns as a direct portion of the product, of
the gold, not by the sale of the product and its consequent conversion
into money. In other words, it gradually assumes its money-form not by a
withdrawal of money from the circulation but by an accumulation of a
corresponding portion of the product. The money-capital so restored is
not a quantity of money gradually withdrawn from the circulation to
compensate for the sum originally thrown into it for the fixed capital.
It is an additional sum of money.

Finally, as concerns the surplus-value, it is likewise equal to a
certain portion of the new gold product, which is thrown into the
circulation in every new period of turnover in order to be
unproductively expended, according to our assumption, on means of
subsistence and articles of luxury.

But according to our assumption, the entire annual production of gold —
which continually withdraws labour-power and materials of production,
but no money, from the market, while continuously adding fresh
quantities of money to it — merely replaces the money worn out during
the year, hence only keeps intact the quantity of social money which
exists constantly, although in varying portions, in the two forms of
hoarded money and money in circulation.

According to the law of the circulation of commodities, the quantity of
money must be equal to the amount of money required for circulation plus
a certain amount held in the form of a hoard, which increases or
decreases as the circulation contracts or expands, and serves especially
for the formation of the requisite reserve funds of means of payment.
What must be paid in money in so far as there is no balancing of
accounts — is the value of the commodities. The fact that a portion of
this value consists of surplus-value, that is to say, did not cost the
seller of the commodities anything, does not alter the matter in any
way. Let us suppose that the producers are all independent owners of
their means of production, so that circulation takes place between the
immediate producers themselves. Apart from the constant portion of their
capital, their annual value-product might then be divided into two
parts, analogous with capitalist conditions: Part a, replacing only the
necessary means of subsistence, and part b, consumed partly in articles
of luxury, partly for an expansion of production. Part a then represents
the variable capital, part b the surplus-value. But this division would
remain without influence on the magnitude of the sum of money required
for the circulation of their total product. Other circumstances
remaining equal, the value of the circulating mass of commodities would
be the same, and thus also the amount of money required for that value.
They would also have to have the same money-reserves if the turnover
periods are equally divided, i.e., the same portion of their capital
would always have to be held in the form of money, because their
production, according to our assumption, would be commodity production,
the same as before. Hence the fact that a portion of the value of the
commodities consists of surplus-value would change absolutely nothing in
the quantity of the money required for the running of the business.

An opponent of Tooke, who clings to the formula M — C — M', asks him how
the capitalist manages always to withdraw more money from circulation
than he throws into it. Mind you! The question at issue here is not the
_formation_ of surplus-value. This, the only secret, is a matter of
course from the capitalist standpoint. The sum of values employed would
not be capital if it did not enrich itself by means of surplus-value.
But as it is capital by assumption, surplus-value is taken for granted.

The question, then, is not where the surplus-value comes from but whence
the money comes into which it is turned.

But in bourgeois economics, the existence of surplus-value is
self-understood. It is therefore not only assumed but also connected
with the further assumption that a part of the mass of commodities
thrown into circulation is a surplus-product, hence representing a value
which the capitalist did not throw into circulation as part of his
capital; that, consequently, with his product the capitalist throws into
circulation a surplus over and above his capital, and that he withdraws
this surplus from it.

The commodity-capital, which the capitalist throws into circulation, has
a greater value (it is not explained and remains obscure where this
comes from, but the above Political Economy considers it a fact) than
the productive capital which he withdrew from circulation in the form of
labour-power plus means of production. On the basis of this assumption
it is evident why not only capitalist A, but also B, C, D, etc., are
always able to withdraw more value from circulation by the exchange of
their commodities than the value of the capital originally and
repeatedly advanced by them. A, B, C, D, and the rest continuously throw
a greater commodity-value into circulation in the form of
commodity-capital — this operation is as many-sided as the various
independently functioning capitals — than they withdraw from it in the
form of productive capital. Hence they have constantly to divide among
themselves a sum of values (i.e., everyone, on his part, has to withdraw
from circulation a productive capital) equal to the sum of values of the
productive capitals they respectively advanced; and just as constantly
they have to divide among themselves a sum of values which they all,
from all sides, throw into circulation in the form of commodities
representing the respective excesses of the commodity-values above the
values of their elements of production.

But the commodity-capital must be turned into money before its
reconversion into productive capital and before the surplus-value
contained in it is spent. Where does the money for this purpose come
from? This question seems difficult at the first glance and neither
Tooke nor any one else has answered it so far.

Let the circulating capital of £500 advanced in the form of
money-capital, whatever its period of turnover, now stand for the total
circulating capital of society, that is, of the capitalist class. Let
the surplus-value be £100. How can the entire capitalist class manage to
draw continually £600 out of circulation, when it continually throws
only £500 into it?

After the money-capital of £500 has been converted into productive
capital, the latter transforms itself within the process of production
into commodities worth £600 and there are in circulation not only
commodities valued at £500, equal to the money-capital originally
advanced, but also a newly produced surplus-value of £100.

This additional surplus-value of £100 is thrown into circulation in the
form of commodities. No doubt about that. But such an operation does not
by any means furnish the additional money for the circulation of this
additional commodity-value.

It will not do to obviate this difficulty by plausible subterfuges.

For instance: So far as the constant circulating capital is concerned,
it is obvious that not all invest it simultaneously. While capitalist A
sells his commodities, so that his advanced capital assumes the form of
money, there is on the other hand the available money-capital of the
buyer B which assumes the form of his means of production — precisely
what A is producing. By the same act through which A restores the
money-form to his produced commodity-capital, B returns his capital to
its productive form, transforms it from money-form into means of
production and labour-power; the same amount of money functions in the
two-sided process as in every simple purchase C — M. On the other hand
when A reconverts his money into means of production, he buys from C,
and this man pays B with it, etc., and thus the transaction would be
explained. But:

None of the laws established with reference to the quantity of the
circulating money in the circulation of commodities (Buch I, Kap. III),
[English edition: Volume I, Ch. III. — _Ed_.] are changed in any way by
the capitalist character of the process of production.

Hence, when one says that the circulating capital of society to be
advanced in the form of money amounts to £500, one has already taken
into account that this is on the one hand the sum simultaneously
advanced, and that on the other hand it sets in motion more productive
capital than £500 because it serves alternately as the money-form of
various productive capitals. This manner of explanation, then, assumes
the money, whose existence it is called upon to explain, as already
existing.

It might be further said: Capitalist A produces articles which
capitalist B consumes individually, unproductively. B’s money therefore
turns A’s commodity-capital into money and thus the same sum of money
serves to realise B’s surplus-value and A’s circulating constant
capital. But in that case the question that still awaits solution is
assumed still more directly to have been solved, namely: where does B
get the money that makes up his revenue? How did he himself realise this
portion of the surplus-value of his product?

It might also be said that the part of the circulating variable capital
which A steadily advances to his labourers returns to him steadily from
the circulation, and only a varying part of it always stays with him for
the payment of wages. But a certain time elapses between the expenditure
and the reflux, and meanwhile the money paid out for wages might, among
other uses, serve for the realisation of surplus-value.

But we know in the first place that the longer this time the greater
must be the supply of money which capitalist A must keep constantly _in
petto_. In the second place the labourer spends the money, buys
commodities for it and thus converts into money _pro tanto_ the
surplus-value contained in them. Consequently the same money that is
advanced in the form of variable capital serves _pro tanto_ also the
purpose of turning surplus-value into money. Without penetrating any
further into the question at this point, let this suffice: the
consumption of the entire capitalist class and its retainers keeps step
with that of the working-class; hence simultaneously with the money
thrown into circulation by the labourers the capitalists too must throw
money into it, in order to spend their surplus-value as revenue. Hence
money must be withdrawn from circulation for it. This explanation would
serve merely to reduce, but not eliminate, the quantity of money
required.

Finally, it might be said: A large amount of money is constantly thrown
into circulation when fixed capital is first invested, and it is
recovered from the circulation only gradually, piecemeal, after a lapse
of years, by him who threw it into circulation. Cannot this sum suffice
to convert the surplus-value into money?

The answer to this must be that perhaps the sum of £500 (which includes
hoard formation for needed reserve funds) implies its employment as
fixed capital, if not by him who threw it into circulation, then by
somebody else. Besides, it is already assumed in regard to the amount
expended for the procurement of products serving as fixed capital that
the surplus-value contained in them is also paid, and the question is
precisely where this money comes from.

The general reply has already been given: If a mass of commodities worth
x times £1,000 has to circulate, it changes absolutely nothing in the
quantity of the money required for this circulation whether the value of
this mass of commodities has been produced capitalistically or not. _The
problem itself therefore does not exist_. All other conditions being
given, such as velocity of the currency of money, etc., a definite sum
of money is required in order to circulate commodities worth x times
£1,000 quite independently of how much or how little of this value falls
to the share of the direct producers of these commodities. So far as any
problem exists here, it coincides with the general problem: Where does
the money required for the circulation of the commodities of a country
come from?

However, from the point of view of capitalist production, the
_semblance_ of a special problem does indeed exist. In the present case
it is the capitalist who appears as the point of departure, who throws
money into circulation. The money which the labourer expends for the
payment of his means of subsistence existed previously as the money-form
of the variable capital and was therefore thrown originally into
circulation by the capitalist as a means of buying or paying for the
labour-power. The capitalist furthermore throws into circulation the
money which constitutes originally the money-form of his constant, fixed
and circulating, capital; he expends it as a means of purchase or
payment for instruments of labour and materials of production. But
beyond this the capitalist no longer appears as the starting-point of
the quantity of money in circulation. Now, there are only two points of
departure: the capitalist and the labourer. All third categories of
persons must either receive money for their services from these two
classes or, to the extent that they receive it without any services in
return, they are joint owners of the surplus-value in the form of rent,
interest, etc. That the surplus-value does not all stay in the pocket of
the industrial capitalist but must be shared by him with other persons,
has nothing to do with the present question. The question is how he
turns his surplus-value into money, not how the proceeds are later
divided. For our purposes the capitalist may as well still be regarded
as the sole owner of the surplus-value. As for the labourer, it has
already been said that he is but the secondary, while the capitalist is
the primary, starting-point of the money thrown by the labourer into
circulation. The money first advanced as variable capital is going
through its second circulation when the labourer spends it to pay for
means of subsistence.

The capitalist class remains consequently the sole point of departure of
the circulation of money. If they need £400 for the payment of means of
production and £100 for the payment of labour-power, they throw £500
into circulation. But the surplus-value incorporated in the product,
with a rate of surplus-value incorporated in the product, with a rate of
surplus-value of 100%, is equal in value to £100. How can they
continually draw £600 out of circulation, when they continually throw
only £500 into it? Nothing comes from nothing. The capitalist class as a
whole cannot draw out of circulation what was not previously thrown into
it.

We disregard here the fact that the sum of £400 may suffice, when turned
over ten times, to circulate means of production valued at £4,000 and
labour-power valued at £1,000, and that the other £100 may likewise
suffice for the circulation of £1,000 worth of surplus-value. The ratio
of the sum of money to the value of commodities circulated by it is
immaterial here. The problem remains the same. Unless the same pieces of
money circulate several times, a capital of £5,000 must be thrown into
circulation, and £1,000 is required to convert the surplus-value into
money. The question is where this money comes from, whether it is £1,000
or £100. In any event it is in excess of the money-capital thrown into
the circulation.

Indeed, paradoxical as it may appear at first sight, it is the
capitalist class itself that throws the money into circulation which
serves for the realisation of the surplus-value incorporated in the
commodities. But, _nota bene_, it does not throw it into circulation as
advanced money, hence not as capital. It spends it as a means of
purchase for its individual consumption. The money is not therefore
advanced by the capitalist class, although it is the point of departure
of its circulation.

Let us take some individual capitalist who is starting in business, a
farmer for instance. During the first year, he advances a money-capital
of, say, £5,000, paying £4,000 for means of production, and £1,000 for
labour-power. Let the rate of surplus-value be 100%, the amount of
surplus-value appropriated by him £1,000. The above £5,000 comprise all
the money he advances as money-capital. But the man must also live, and
he does not take in any money until the end of the year. Take it that
his consumption amounts to £1,000. These he must have in his possession.
He may say that he has to advance himself these £1,000 during the first
year. But this advance, which here has only a subjective meaning,
denotes nothing else but that he must pay for his individual consumption
during the first year out of his own pocket instead of defraying it out
of the gratuitous production of his labourers. He does not advance this
money as capital. He spends it, pays it out for an equivalent in means
of subsistence which he consumes. This value has been spent by him in
money, thrown into circulation and withdrawn from it in the form of
commodity-values. These commodity-values he has consumed. He has thus
ceased to bear any relation to their value. The money with which he paid
for this value exists now as an element of the circulating money. But he
has withdrawn the value of this money from circulation in the form of
products; and this value is now destroyed together with the products in
which it existed. It’s all gone. But at the end of the year he throws
commodities worth £6,000 into circulation and sells them. By this means
he recovers: 1) his advanced money-capital of £5,000; 2) the realised
surplus-value of £1,000. He has advanced as capital, has thrown into
circulation, £5,000, and he withdraws from it £6,000 — £5,000 of which
cover his capital, and £1,000 his surplus-value. The last £1,000 are
turned into money with the money which he himself has thrown into
circulation, which he did not advance, but spent as a consumer, not as a
capitalist. They now return to him as the money-form of the
surplus-value produced by him. And henceforth this operation is repeated
every year. But beginning with the second year, the £1,000 which he
spends are constantly the converted form, the money-form, of the
surplus-value produced by him. He spends them annually and they return
to him annually.

If his capital were turned over more frequently a year, it would not
alter this state of affairs, but would affect the length of time, and
hence the amount which he would have to throw into circulation for his
individual consumption over and above his advanced money-capital.

This money is not thrown into circulation by the capitalist as capital.
But it is a decided trait of the capitalist to be able to live on means
in his possession until surplus-value begins to return.

In the present case we assumed that the sum of money which the
capitalist throws into circulation to pay for his individual consumption
until the first returns of his capital is exactly equal to the
surplus-value which he produced and hence must turn into money. This is
obviously an arbitrary assumption so far as the individual capitalist is
concerned. But it must be correct when applied to the entire capitalist
class as simple reproduction is assumed. It only expresses the same
thing as the assumption; namely, that the entire surplus-value, and it
alone — hence no fraction of the original capital stock — is consumed
unproductively.

It had been previously assumed that the total production of precious
metals (taken to be equal to £500) sufficed only for the replacement of
the wear and tear of the money.

The capitalists producing gold possess their entire product in gold —
that portion which replaces constant capital as well as that which
replaces variable capital, and also that consisting of surplus-value. A
portion of the social surplus-value therefore consists of gold, and not
of a product which is turned into gold only in the process of
circulation. It consists from the outset of gold and is thrown into
circulation in order to draw products out of it. The same applies here
to wages to variable capital, and to the replacement of the advanced
constant capital. Hence, whereas one part of the capitalist class throws
into circulation commodities greater in value (greater by the amount of
the surplus-value) than the money-capital advanced by them, another part
of the capitalists throws into circulation money of greater value
(greater by the amount of surplus-value) than that of the commodities
which they constantly withdraw from circulation for the production of
gold. Whereas one part of the capitalists constantly pumps more money
out of the circulation than it pours into it, the part that produces
gold constantly pumps more money into it than it takes out in means of
production.

Although a part of this product of £500 in gold is surplus-value of the
gold-producers, the entire sum is, nonetheless, intended only to replace
the money necessary for the circulation of commodities. It is immaterial
for this purpose how much of this gold turns into money the
surplus-value incorporated in the commodities, and how much of it their
other value constituents.

Transferring the production of gold from one country to another produces
no change whatever in the matter. One part of the social labour-power
and the social means of production of country A is converted into a
product, for instance linen, valued at £500, which is exported to
country B in order to buy gold there. The productive capital thus
employed in the country A throws no more commodities — as distinct from
money — upon the market of country A than it would it if were employed
directly in the production of gold. This product of A represents £500 in
gold and enters into the circulation of this country only as money. That
portion of the social surplus-value which is contained in this product
exists for country A directly in the form of money, and never in any
other form. Although for the gold-producing capitalists only a part of
the product represents surplus-value, and another part of the
replacement capital, still the question of how much of this gold,
outside the circulating constant capital, replaces variable capital and
how much of it represents surplus-value depends exclusively on the
respective ratios of wages and surplus-value to the value of the
circulating commodities. The part which forms surplus-value is
distributed among the diverse members of the capitalist class. Although
that part is continually spent by them for individual consumption and
recovered by the sale of new products — it is precisely this purchase
and sale that circulates among them the money required for the
conversion of the surplus-value into money — there is nevertheless a
portion of the social surplus-value, in the form of money, even if in
varying proportions, in the pockets of the capitalists, just as a
portion of the wages stays at least during part of the week in the
pockets of the labourers in the form of money. And this part is not
limited by that part of the money product which originally forms the
surplus-value of the gold-producing capitalists, but, as we have said,
is limited by the proportion in which the above product of £500 is
generally distributed between capitalists and labourers, and in which
the commodity-supply to be circulated consists of surplus-value and the
other constituents of value.

However, that portion of surplus-value which does not exist in other
commodities but alongside of them in the form of money, consists of a
portion of the annually produced gold only to the extent that a portion
of the annual production of gold circulates for the realisation of the
surplus-value. The other portion of money, which is continually in the
hands of the capitalist class in varying portions, as the money-form of
their surplus-value, is not an element of the annually produced gold,
but of the mass of money previously accumulated in the country.

According to our assumption the annual production of gold, £500, just
covers the annual wear of money. If we keep in mind only these £500 and
ignore that portion of the annually produced mass of commodities which
is circulated by means of previously accumulated money, the
surplus-value produced in commodity-form will find in the circulation
process money for its conversion into money for the simple reason that
on the other side surplus-value is annually produced in the form of
gold. The same applies to the other parts of the gold product of £500
which replace the advanced money-capital.

Now, two things are to be noted here.

In the first place, it follows that the surplus-value spent by the
capitalists as money, as well as the variable and other productive
capital advanced by them in money, is actually the product of labourers,
namely of the labourers engaged in the production of gold. They produce
anew not only that portion of the gold product which is “advanced” to
them as wages but also that portion of the gold product in which the
surplus-value of the capitalist gold-producers is directly represented.
Finally, as for that portion of the gold product which replaces only the
constant capital-value advanced for its production, it re-appears in the
form of money (or product in general) only through the annual work of
the labourers. When the business started, it was originally expended by
the capitalist in the form of money, which was not newly produced but
formed a part of the circulating mass of social money. But to the extent
that it is replaced by a new product, by additional gold, it is the
annual product of the labourer. The advance on the part of the
capitalist appears here, too, merely as a form which owes its existence
to the fact that the labourer is neither the owner of his own means of
production nor able to command, during production, the means of
subsistence produced by other labourers.

In the second place however, as far as concerns that mass of money which
exists independently of his annual replacement of £500, partly in the
form of a hoard and partly in the form of circulating money, things must
be, or rather must have been originally with it just as they are
annually with regard to these £500. We shall return to this point at the
close of this sub-section. [See: pp. 347-48 of this book. — _Ed_.] But
before then we wish to make a few additional remarks.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We have seen during our study of the turnover that, other circumstances
remaining equal, changes in the length of the periods of turnover
require changes in the amounts of money-capital, in order to carry on
production on the same scale. The elasticity of the money-circulation
must therefore be sufficient to adapt itself to this alternation of
expansion and contraction.

If we furthermore assume other circumstances as remaining equal —
including the length, intensity, and productivity of the working-day —
but _a different division of the value of the product_ between wages and
surplus-value, so that either the former rises and the latter falls, or
vice versa, the mass of the circulating money is not affected thereby.
This change can take place without any expansion or contraction of the
money currency. Let us consider particularly the case in which there is
a general rise in wages, so that, under the assumptions made, there will
be a general fall in the rate of surplus-value, but besides this, also
according to our assumption, there will be no change in the value of the
circulating mass of commodities. In this case there naturally is an
increase in the money-capital which must be advanced as variable
capital, hence in the amount of money which performs this function. But
the surplus-value, and therefore also the amount of money required for
its realisation, decreases by exactly the same amount by which the
amount of money required for the function of variable capital increases.
The amount of money required for the realisation of the commodity-value
is not affected thereby, any more than this commodity-value itself. The
cost price of the commodity rises for the individual capitalist but its
social price of production remains unchanged. What is changed is the
proportion in which, apart from the constant part of the value, the
price of production of commodities is divided into wages and profit.

But, it is argued, a greater outlay of variable money-capital (the value
of the money is, of course, considered constant) implies a larger amount
of money in the hands of the labourers. This causes a greater demand for
commodities on the part of the labourers. This, in turn, leads to a rise
in the price of commodities.—Or it is said: If wages rise, the
capitalists raise the prices of their commodities.—In either case, the
general rise in wages causes a rise in commodity prices. Hence a greater
amount of money is needed for the circulation of the commodities, no
matter how the rise in prices is explained.

Reply to the first formulation: in consequence of a rise in wages, the
demand of the labourers for the necessities of life will rise
particularly. Their demand for articles of luxury will increase to a
lesser degree, or a demand will develop for things which formerly did
not come within the scope of their consumption. The sudden and
large-scale increase in the demand for the indispensable means of
subsistence will doubtless raise their prices immediately. The
consequence: a greater part of the social capital will be employed in
the production of necessities of life and a smaller in the production of
luxuries, since these fall in price on account of the decrease in
surplus-value and the consequent decrease in the demand of the
capitalists for these articles. On the other hand as the labourers
themselves buy articles of luxury, the rise in their wages does not
promote an increase in the prices of the necessities of life but simply
displaces buyers of luxuries. More luxuries than before are consumed by
labourers, and relatively fewer by capitalists. _Voilà tout_. After some
oscillations the value of the mass of circulating commodities is the
same as before. As for the momentary fluctuations, they will not have
any other effect than to throw unemployed money-capital into domestic
circulation, capital which hitherto sought employment in speculative
deals on the stock-exchange or in foreign countries.

Reply to the second formulation: If it were in the power of the
capitalist producers to raise the prices of their commodities at will,
they could and would do so without a rise in wages. Wages would never
rise if commodity prices fell. The capitalist class would never resist
the TRADES’ UNIONS, if it could always and under all circumstances do
what it is now doing by way of exception, under definite, special, so to
say local, circumstances, to wit, avail itself of every rise in wages in
order to raise prices of commodities much higher yet and thus pocket
greater profits.

The assertion that the capitalists can raise the prices of luxuries,
because the demand for them decreases (in consequence of the reduced
demand of the capitalists whose means of purchasing such articles has
decreased) would be a very unique application of the law of supply and
demand. Since it is not a mere displacement of luxury buyers, a
displacement of capitalists by labourers — and so far as this
displacement does occur, the demand of the labourers does not stimulate
a rise in the prices of necessities, for the labourers cannot spend that
portion of their increased wages for necessities which they spend for
luxuries — the prices of luxuries fall in consequence of reduced demand.
Capital is therefore withdrawn from the production of luxury articles,
until their supply is reduced to dimensions corresponding to their
altered role in the process of social production. With their production
thus reduced, they rise in price — their value otherwise unchanged — to
their normal level. So long as this contraction, or this process of
levelling, lasts and the prices of necessities rise, as much capital is
supplied to the production of the latter as is withdrawn from other
branches of production, until the demand is satisfied. Then the
equilibrium is restored and the end of the whole process is that the
social capital, and therefore also the money-capital, is divided in a
different proportion between the production of the necessities of life
and that of luxury articles.

The entire objection is a bugbear set up by the capitalists and their
economic sycophants.

The facts which serve as the pretext for this bugbear are of three
kinds:

1) It is a general law of money circulation that, other things being
equal, the quantity of money in circulation increases with a rise in the
sum of the prices of circulating commodities, irrespective of whether
this augmentation of the totality of prices applies to the same quantity
of commodities or to a greater quantity. The effect is then confused
with the cause. Wages rise (although the rise is rare, and proportional
only in exceptional cases) with the rising prices of the necessities of
life. Wage advances are the consequence, not the cause, of advances in
the prices of commodities.

2) In the case of a partial, or local, rise of wages — that is, a rise
only in some branches of production — a local rise in the prices of the
products of these branches may follow. But even this depends on many
circumstances. For instance that wages were not abnormally depressed and
that therefore the rate of profit was not abnormally high; that the
market for these goods is not narrowed by the rise in prices (hence a
contraction of their supply previous to raising their prices is not
necessary), etc.

3) In the case of a general rise in wages the price of the produced
commodities rises in branches of industry where the variable capital
preponderates, but falls on the other hand in branches where the
constant, or fixed, capital preponderates.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We found in our study of the simple circulation of commodities (Buch I,
Kap. III, 2) [English edition: Ch. III. — _Ed_.] that, though the
money-form of any definite quantity of commodities is only transient
within the sphere of circulation, still the money transiently in the
hands of one man during the metamorphosis of a certain commodity
necessarily passes into the hands of another, so that in the first
instance commodities are not only exchanged all-sidedly, or replace one
another, but this replacement is promoted and accompanied by an
all-sided precipitation of money. “When one commodity replaces another,
the money-commodity always sticks to the hands of some third person.
Circulation sweats money from every pore.” (Buch I, S. 92.) [English
edition: p. 113. — _Ed_.] The same identical fact is expressed, on the
basis of the capitalist production of commodities, by a portion of
capital constantly existing in the form of money-capital, and a portion
of surplus-value constantly being found in the hands of its owners,
likewise in the form of money.

Apart from this, the _circuit of money_ — that is, the _return_ of money
to its point of departure — being a phase of the turnover of capital, is
a phenomenon entirely differently from, and even the opposite of, the
_currency of money_,^([33]) which expresses its steady departure from
the starting-point by changing hands again and again. (Buch I, S. 94.)
[English edition: pp. 114-15. — _Ed_.] Nevertheless, an accelerated
turnover implies _eo ipso_ an accelerated currency.

First concerning the variable capital: If a certain money-capital of,
say, £500 is turned over the form of variable capital ten times a year,
it is evident that this aliquot part of the quantity of money in
circulation circulates ten times its value, or £5,000. It circulates ten
times a year between the capitalist and the labourer. The labourer is
paid, and pays, ten times a year with the same aliquot part of the
circulating quantity of money. If the same variable capital were turned
over only once a year, the scale of production remaining the same, there
would be only one capital turnover of £5,000.

Furthermore: Let the constant portion of the circulating capital be
equal to £1,000. If the capital is turned over ten times, the capitalist
sells his commodity, and therefore also the constant circulating portion
of its value, ten times a year. The same aliquot part of the circulating
quantity of money (equal to £1,000) passes ten times per annum from the
hands of its owners into those of the capitalist. This money changes
hands ten times. Secondly, the capitalist buys means of production ten
times a year. This again makes ten circulations of money from one hand
into another. With a sum of money amounting to £1,000, the industrial
capitalist sells £10,000 worth of commodities, and again buys £10,000
worth of commodities. By means of 20 circulations of £1,000 in money a
commodity-supply of £20,000 is circulated.

Finally, with an acceleration of the turnover, the portion of money with
realises the surplus-value also circulates faster.

But, conversely, an acceleration of money-circulation does not
necessarily imply a more rapid turnover of capital, and therefore of
money; that is, it does not necessarily imply a contraction and more
rapid renewal of the reproduction process.

A more rapid circulation of money takes place whenever a larger number
of transactions are performed with the same amount of money. This may
also take place under the same periods of capital reproduction as a
result of changes in the technical facilities for the circulation of
money. Furthermore, there may be an increase in the number of
transactions in which money circulates without representing actual
exchanges of commodities (marginal transactions on the stock-exchange,
etc.). On the other hand some circulations of money may be entirely
eliminated, as for instance where the agriculturist is himself a
landowner, there is no circulation of money between the farmer and the
landlord; where the industrial capitalist is himself the owner of the
capital, there is no circulation of money between him and the creditors.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

As for the primitive formation of a money-hoard in a country, and its
appropriation by a few, it is unnecessary to discuss it in detail at
this point.

The capitalist mode of production — its basis being wage-labour, the
payment of the labourer in money, and in general the transformation of
payments in kind into money payments — can assume greater dimensions and
achieve greater perfection only where there is available in the country
a quantity of money sufficient for circulation and the formation of a
hoard (reserve fund, etc.) promoted by it. This is the historical
premise, although it is not to be taken to mean that first a sufficient
hoard is formed and then capitalist production begins. It develops
simultaneously with the development of the conditions necessary for it,
and one of these conditions is a sufficient supply of precious metals.
Hence the increased supply of precious metals since the sixteenth
century is an essential element in the history of the development of
capitalist production. But so far as the necessary further supply of
money material on the basis of capitalist production is concerned, we
see surplus-value incorporated in products thrown into circulation
without the money required for their conversion into money, on the one
hand, and on the other surplus-value in the form of gold without
previous transformation of products into money.

The additional commodities to be converted into money find the necessary
amount of money at hand, because on the other side additional gold (and
silver) intended for conversion into commodities is thrown into
circulation, not by means of exchange, but by production itself.

II. Accumulation and Reproduction on an Extended Scale

Since accumulation takes place in the form of extended reproduction, it
is evident that it does not offer any new problem with regard to
money-circulation.

In the first place, as far as the additional money-capital required for
the functioning of the increasing productive capital is concerned, that
is supplied by the portion of the realised surplus-value thrown into
circulation by the capitalists as money-capital, not as the money-form
of the revenue. The money is already in the hands of the capitalists.
Only its employment is different.

Now however in consequence of the additional productive capital, its
product, an additional mass of commodities is thrown into circulation.
Together with this additional quantity of commodities, a part of the
additional money needed for its realisation is thrown into circulation,
inasmuch as the value of this mass of commodities is equal to that of
the productive capital consumed in their production. This additional
amount of money has been advanced precisely as additional money-capital,
and therefore returns to the capitalist through the turnover of his
capital. Here the same question as above re-appears. Where does the
additional money come from with which to realise the additional
surplus-value now contained in the form of commodities?

The general reply is again the same. The sum total of the prices of the
circulating commodities has been increased, not because the prices of a
given quantity of commodities have risen, but because the mass of
commodities now circulating is greater than that of the previously
circulating commodities, without it being offset by a fall in prices.
The additional money required for the circulation of this greater
quantity of commodities of greater value must be secured either by
greater economy in the use of the circulating quantity of money —
whether by balancing the payments, etc., by measures which accelerate
the circulation of the same coins — or by the transformation of money
from the form of a hoard into that of a circulating medium. The latter
does not only imply that idle money-capital begins to function as a
means of purchase or payment, or that money-capital already functioning
as a reserve fund while performing this function for its owner, actively
circulates for society (as is the case with bank deposits which are
continually lent), thus performing a double function. It also implies
that the stagnating reserve funds of coins are economised.

“In order that money should flow continuously as coin, coin must
constantly coagulate as money. The continual currency of coin depends on
its continual stagnation, in greater or smaller quantities, in reserve
funds of coin which spring up throughout the sphere of circulation and
also necessitate it; the formation, distribution, dissolution, and
re-formation of these reserve funds are constantly alternating, their
existence constantly disappears, their disappearance constantly exists.
Adam Smith expressed this never-ceasing transformation of coin into
money and of money into coin by saying that every owner of commodities
must always keep in supply, aside from the particular commodity which he
sells, a certain quantity of the universal commodity with which he buys.
We saw that in the circulation C — M — C the second member M — C splits
up constantly into a series of purchases which do not take place at once
but at successive intervals of time, so that one part of M is current as
coin while the other rests as money. As a matter of fact money is in
that case only suspended coin and the separate parts of the current mass
of coins continuously appear now in the one form, and now in the other,
alternating constantly. This first transformation of the medium of
circulation into money represents, therefore, but a technical aspect of
money-circulation itself.” (Karl Marx, _Zur Kritik der Politischen
Oekonomie_, 1859, pp. 105, 106.) (“Coin” as distinguished from money is
here employed to indicate money in its function of a mere medium of
circulation in contrast with its other functions.)

When all these measures do not suffice, additional gold must be
produced, or, what amounts to the same, a part of the additional product
exchanged, directly or indirectly, for gold — the product of countries
in which precious metals are mined.

The entire amount of labour-power and social means of production
expended in the annual production of gold and silver intended as
instruments of circulation constitutes a bulky item of the _faux frais_
of the capitalist mode of production, of the production of commodities
in general. It is an equivalent abstraction from social utilisation of
as many additional means of production and consumption as possible,
i.e., of real wealth. To the extent that the costs of this expensive
machinery of circulation are decreased, the given scale of production or
the given degree of its extension remaining constant, the productive
power of social labour is _eo ipso_ increased. Hence, so far as the
expediencies developing with the credit system have this effect, they
increase capitalist wealth directly, either by performing a large
portion of the social production and labour-power without any
intervention of real money, or by raising the functional capacity of the
quantity of money really functioning.

This disposes also of the absurd question whether capitalist production
in its present volume would be possible without the credit system (even
if regarded only from this point of view), that is, with the circulation
of metallic coin alone. Evidently this is not the case. It would rather
have encountered barriers in the volume of production of precious
metals. On the other hand one must not entertain any fantastic illusions
on the productive power of the credit system, so far as it supplies or
sets in motion money-capital. A further analysis of this question is out
of place here.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We have now to investigate the case in which there takes place no real
accumulation, i.e., no direct expansion of the scale of production, but
where a part of the realised surplus-value is accumulated for a longer
or shorter time as a money-reserve fund, in order to be transformed
later into productive capital.

Inasmuch as the money so accumulating is additional money, the matter
needs no explanation. It can only be a portion of the surplus-gold
brought from gold-producing countries. In this connection it must be
noted that the home product, in exchange for which this gold is
imported, is no longer in the country in question. It has been exported
to foreign countries in exchange for gold.

But if we assume that the same amount of money is still in the country
as before, then the accumulated and accumulating money has accrued from
the circulation. Only its function is changed. It has been converted
from money in currency into latent money-capital gradually taking shape.

The money which is accumulated in this case is the money-form of sold
commodities, and moreover of that part of their value which constitutes
surplus-value for their owner. (The credit system is here assumed to be
non-existent.) The capitalist who accumulates this money has sold _pro
tanto_ without buying.

If we look upon this process merely as an individual phenomenon, there
is nothing to explain. A part of the capitalists keeps a portion of the
money realised by the sale of its product without withdrawing products
from the market in return. Another part of them on the other hand
transforms its money wholly into products, with the exception of the
constantly recurring money-capital required for running the business.
One portion of the products thrown upon the market as vehicles of
surplus-value consists of means of production, or of the real elements
of variable capital, the necessary means of subsistence. It can
therefore serve immediately for the expansion of production. For it has
not been premised in the least that one part of the capitalists
accumulates money-capital, while the other consumes its surplus-value
entirely, but only that one part does its accumulating in the shape of
money, forms latent money-capital, while the other part accumulates
genuinely, that is to say, enlarges the scale of production, genuinely
expands its productive capital. The available quantity of money remains
sufficient for the requirements of circulation, even if, alternately,
one part of the capitalists accumulates money, while the other enlarges
the scale of production, and vice versa. Moreover, the accumulation of
money on one side may proceed even without cash money by the mere
accumulation of outstanding claims.

But the difficulty arises when we assume not an individual, but a
general accumulation of money-capital on the part of the capitalist
class. Apart from this class, according to our assumption — the general
and exclusive domination of capitalist production — there is no other
class at all except the working-class. All that the working-class buys
is equal to the sum total of its wages, equal to the sum total of the
variable capital advanced by the entire capitalist class. This money
flows back to the capitalist class by the sale of its product to the
working-class. Its variable capital thus resumes its money-form. Let the
sum total of the variable capital be x times £100, i.e., the sum total
of the variable capital employed, not advanced, during the year. The
question now under consideration is not affected by how much or how
little money, depending on the velocity of the turnover, is needed to
advance this variable capital-value during the year. The capitalist
class buys with these x times £100 of capital a certain amount of
labour-power, or pays wages to a certain number of labourers — first
transaction. The labourers buy with this same sum a certain quantity of
commodities from the capitalists, whereby the sum of x times £100 flows
back into the hands of the capitalists — second transaction. And this is
constantly repeated. This amount of x times £100, therefore, can never
enable the working-class to buy the part of the product which represents
the constant capital, not to mention the part which represents the
surplus-value of the capitalist class. With these x times £100 the
labourers can never buy more than a part of the value of the social
product equal to that part of the value which represents the value of
the advanced variable capital.

Apart from the case in which this universal accumulation of money
expresses nothing but the distribution of the precious metal
additionally introduced, in whatever proportion, among the various
individual capitalists, how is the entire capitalist class then supposed
to accumulate money?

They would all have to sell a portion of their product without buying
anything in return. There is nothing mysterious about the fact that they
all have a certain fund of money which they throw into circulation as a
medium of circulation for their consumption, and a certain portion of
which returns to each one of them from the circulation. But in that case
this money-fund exists precisely as a fund for circulation, as a result
of the conversion of the surplus-value into money, and does not by any
means exist as latent money-capital.

If we view the matter as it takes place in reality, we find that the
latent money-capital, which is accumulated for future use, consists:

1) Of deposits in banks; and it is a comparatively trifling sum which is
really at the disposal of the bank. Money-capital is accumulated here
only nominally. What is actually accumulated is outstanding claims which
can be converted into money (if ever) only because a certain balance
arises between the money withdrawn and the money deposited. It is only a
relatively small sum that the bank holds in its hands in money.

2) Of government securities. These are not capital at all, but merely
outstanding claims on the annual product of the nation.

3) Of stocks. Those which are not fakes are titles of ownership of some
corporative real capital and drafts on the surplus-value accruing
annually from it.

There is no accumulation of money in any of these cases. What appears on
the one side as an accumulation of money-capital appears on the other as
a continual actual expenditure of money. It is immaterial whether the
money is spent by him who owns it, or by others, his debtors.

On the basis of capitalist production the formation of a hoard as such
is never an end in itself but the result either of a stagnation of the
circulation — larger amounts of money than is generally the case
assuming the form of a hoard — or of accumulations necessitated by the
turnover; or, finally, the hoard is merely the creation of money-capital
existing temporarily in latent form and intended to function as
productive capital.

If therefore on the one hand a portion of the surplus-value realised in
money is withdrawn from circulation and accumulated as a hoard, another
part of the surplus-value is at the same time continually converted into
productive capital. With the exception of the distribution of additional
precious metals among the members of the capitalist class, accumulations
in the form of money never takes place simultaneously at all points.

What is true of the portion of the annual product which represents
surplus-value in the form of commodities, is also true of the other
portion of it. A certain sum of money is required for its circulation.
This sum of money belongs to the capitalist class quite as much as the
annually produced quantity of commodities which represents
surplus-value. It is originally thrown into circulation by the
capitalist class itself. It is constantly redistributed among its
members by means of the circulation itself. Just as in the case of
circulation of coin in general, a portion of this sum stagnates at ever
varying points, while another portion continually circulates. Whether a
part of this accumulation is intentional, for the purpose of forming
money-capital, or not, does not alter things.

No notice has been taken here of those adventures of circulation in
which one capitalist grasps a portion of the surplus-value, or even of
the capital, of another, thereby bringing about one-sided accumulation
and centralisation of money-capital as well as of productive capital.
For instance a part of the snatched surplus-value accumulated by A as
money-capital may be a part of the surplus-value of B which does not
return to him.

Notes

33. Although the physiocrats still confuse these two phenomena, they
were the first to emphasise the reflux of money to its starting-point as
the essential form of circulation of capital, as that form of
circulation which promotes reproduction. “Cast a glance at the _Tableau
Économique_ and you will see that the productive class provides the
money with which the other classes buy products from it, and that they
return this money to it when they come back next year to make the same
purchases... You see, then, no other circle here but that of expenditure
followed by reproduction, and of reproduction followed by expenditure, a
circle described by the circulation of money, which measures expenditure
and reproduction.” (Quesnay, _Dialogues sur le Commerce et sur les
Travaux des Artisans_, Daire édition, Physiocrats, I, pp. 208, 209.) “It
is this continual advance and return of capitals which should be called
the circulation of money, this useful and fertile circulation which
gives life to all the labours of society, which maintains the activity
and life of the body politic, and which is quite rightly compared to the
circulation of blood in the animal body.” (Turgot, _Réflexions, etc.,
Oeuvres_, Daire édition, I, p. 45.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents



PART III: THE REPRODUCTION AND CIRCULATION OF THE AGGREGATE SOCIAL CAPITAL


Chapter 18: Introduction

I. The Subject Investigated

The direct process of the production of capital is its labour and
self-expansion process, the process whose result is the
commodity-product and whose compelling motive is the production of
surplus-value.

The process of reproduction of capital comprises this direct process of
production as well as the two phases of the circulation process proper,
i.e., the entire circuit which, as a periodic process — a process which
constantly repeats itself in definite periods — constitutes the turnover
of capital.

Whether we study the circuit in the form of M ... M' or that of P ... P,
the direct process of production P itself always forms but one link in
this circuit. In the one form it appears as a promoter of the process of
circulation; in the other the process of circulation appears as its
promoter. Its continuous renewal, the continuous re-appearance of
capital as productive capital, is in either case determined by its
transformations in the process of circulation. On the other hand the
continuously renewed process of production is the condition of the
transformations which the capital undergoes ever anew in the sphere of
circulation, of its alternate appearance as money-capital and
commodity-capital.

Every individual capital forms, however, but an individualised fraction,
a fraction endowed with individual life, as it were, of the aggregate
social capital, just as every individual capitalist is but an individual
element of the capitalist class. The movement of the social capital
consists of the totality of the movements of its individualised
fractional parts, the turnovers of the individual capitals. Just as the
metamorphosis of the individual commodity is a link in the series of
metamorphoses of the commodity-world — the circulation of commodities —
so the metamorphosis of the individual capital, its turnover, is a link
in the circuit described by social capital.

This total process comprises both the productive consumption (the direct
process of production) together with the conversions of form (materially
considered, exchanges) which bring it about, and the individual
consumption together with the conversions of form or exchanges by which
it is brought about. It includes on the one hand the conversion of
variable capital into labour-power, and therefore the incorporation of
labour-power in the process of capitalist production. Here the labourer
acts as the seller of his commodity, labour-power, and the capitalist as
its buyer. But on the other hand the sale of the commodities embraces
also their purchase by the working-class appears as buyer and the
capitalists as sellers of commodities to the labourers.

The circulation of the commodity-capital includes the circulation of
surplus-value, hence also the purchases and sales by which the
capitalist effect their individual consumption, the consumption of
surplus-value.

The circuit of the individual capitals in their aggregate as social
capital, hence considered in its totality, comprises not only the
circulation of capital but also the general circulation of commodities.
The latter can originally consist of only two components: 1) The circuit
of capital proper and 2) the circuit of the commodities which enter into
individual consumption, consequently of the commodities for which the
labourer expends his wages and the capitalist his surplus-value (or a
part of it). At any rate, the circuit of capital comprises also the
circulation of the surplus-value, since the latter is a part of the
commodity capital, and likewise the conversion of the variable capital
into labour-power, the payment of wages. But the expenditure of this
surplus-value and wages for commodities does not form a link in the
circulation of capital, although at least the expenditure of wages is
essential for this circulation.

In Volume I the process of capitalist production was analysed as an
individual act as well as a process of reproduction: the production of
surplus-value and the production of capital itself. The changes of form
and substance experienced by capital in the sphere of circulation were
assumed without dwelling upon them. It was presupposed that on the one
hand the capitalist sells the product at its value and on the other that
he finds within the sphere of circulation the objective means of
production for restarting or continuing the process. The only act within
the sphere of circulation on which we have dwelt was the purchase and
sale of labour-power as the fundamental condition of capitalist
production.

In the first part of this Book II, the various forms were considered
which capital assumes its circular movement, and the various forms of
this movement itself. The circulation time must now be added to the
working times discussed in Volume I.

In the second Part, the circuit was studied as being periodic, i.e., as
a turnover. It was shown on the one hand in what manner the various
constituents of capital (fixed and circulating) accomplish the circuit
of forms in different periods of time and in different ways; on the
other hand the circumstances were examined by which the different
lengths of the working period and circulation period are conditioned.
The influence was shown which the period of the circuit and the
different proportions of its component parts exert upon the dimensions
of the production process itself and upon the annual rate of
surplus-value. Indeed, while it was the successive forms continually
assumed and discarded by capital in its circuit that were studied in
Part I, it was shown in Part II how a capital of a given magnitude is
simultaneously, though in varying proportions, divided, within this flow
and succession of forms, into different forms: productive capital,
money-capital, and commodity-capital, so that they not only alternate
with one another, but different portions of the total capital-value are
constantly side by side and function in these different states.
Especially money-capital came forward with distinctive features not
shown in Volume I. Certain laws were found according to which diverse
large components of a given capital must be continually advanced and
renewed — depending on the conditions of the turnover — in the form of
money-capital in order to keep a productive capital of a given size
constantly functioning.

But in both the first and the second Parts it was always only a question
of some individual capital, of the movement of some individualised part
of social capital.

However the circuits of the individual capitals intertwine, presuppose
and necessitate one another, and form, precisely in this interlacing,
the movement of the total social capital. Just as in the simple
circulation of commodities the total metamorphosis of a commodity
appeared as a link in the series of metamorphoses of the world of
commodities, so now the metamorphosis of the individual capital appears
as a link in the series of metamorphoses of the social capital. But
while simple commodity circulation by no means necessarily comprises the
circulation of capital — since it may take place on the basis of
non-capitalist production — the circuit of the aggregate social capital,
as was noted, comprises also the commodity circulation lying outside the
circuit of individual capital, i.e., the circulation of commodities
which do not represent capital.

We have now to study the process of circulation (which in its entirety
is a form of the process of reproduction) of the individual capitals as
components of the aggregate social capital, that is to say, the process
of circulation of this aggregate social capital.

II. The Role of Money-Capital

[Although the following belongs in a later section of this Part, we
shall analyse it immediately, namely, the money-capital considered as a
constituent part of the aggregate social capital.]

In the study of the turnover of the individual capital money-capital
revealed two aspects.

In the first place it constitutes the form in which every individual
capital appears upon the scene and opens its process as capital. It
therefore appears as the _primus motor_, lending impetus to the entire
process.

In the second place, that portion of the advanced capital-value which
must be continually advanced and renewed in the form of money differs in
its ratio to the productive capital which it sets in motion, i.e., in
its ratio to the continuous scale of production, depending on the
particular length of the period of turnover and the particular ratio
between its two component parts — the working period and the period of
circulation. But whatever this ratio may be, the portion of the
capital-value in process which can continually function as productive
capital is limited in any event by that portion of the advanced
capital-value which must always exist beside the productive capital in
the form of money. It is here merely a question of the normal turnover,
an abstract average. Additional money-capital required to compensate for
interruptions of the circulation is excepted.

_As to the first point_: commodity production presupposes commodity
circulation, and commodity circulation presupposes the expression of
commodities in money, the circulation of money; the splitting of a
commodity into commodity and money is law of the expression of the
product as a commodity. Similarly the capitalist production of
commodities — whether considered socially or individually — presupposes
capital in the form of money, or money-capital, both as the _primus
motor_ of every incipient business, and as its continual motor. The
circulating capital especially implies that the money-capital acts with
constant repetition at short intervals as a motor. The entire advanced
capital-value, that is to say, all the elements of capital, consisting
of commodities, labour-power, instruments of labour, and materials of
production, must be bought over and over again with money. What is true
here of the individual capital is also true of the social capital, which
functions only in the form of many individual capitals. But as we showed
in Volume I, it does not at all follow from this that capital’s field of
operation, the scale of production, depends — even on a capitalist basis
— for its _absolute_ limits on the amount of functioning money-capital.

Incorporated in capital are elements of production whose expansion
within certain limits is independent of the magnitude of the advanced
money-capital. Though payment of labour-power be the same, it can be
exploited more or less extensively or intensively. If the money-capital
is increased with this greater exploitation (that is, if wages are
raised), it is not increased proportionately, hence not at all _pro
tanto_.

The productively exploited nature-given materials — the soil, the seas,
ores, forests, etc. — which do not constitute elements of capital-value,
are more intensively or extensively exploited with a greater exertion of
the same amount of labour-power, without an increased advance of
money-capital. The real elements of productive capital are thus
multiplied without requiring an additional money-capital. But so far as
such an addition becomes necessary for additional auxiliary materials,
the money-capital in which the capital-value is advanced is not
increased proportionately to the augmented effectiveness of the
productive capital, hence is _pro tanto_ not at all increased.

The same instruments of labour, and thus the same fixed capital, can be
used more effectively by an extension of the time they are daily used
and by a greater intensity of employment, without an additional outlay
of money for fixed capital. There is, in that case, only a more rapid
turnover of the fixed capital, but then the elements of its reproduction
are supplied more rapidly.

Apart from the natural substances, it is possible to incorporate in the
productive process natural forces, which do not cost anything, to act as
agents with more or less heightened effect. The degree of their
effectiveness depends on methods and scientific developments which cost
the capitalist nothing.

The same is true of the social combination of labour-power in the
process of production and of the accumulated skill of the individual
labourers. Carey calculates that the landowner never receives enough,
because he is not paid for all the capital or labour put into the soil
since time immemorial in order to give it its present productivity. (Of
course, no mention is made of the productivity of which the soil is
robbed.) According to that each individual labourer would have to paid
according to the work which it cost the entire human race to evolve a
modern mechanic out of a savage. On the contrary one should think that
if all the unpaid labour put into the soil and converted into money by
the landowner and capitalist is totalled up, all the capital ever
invested in this soil has been paid back over and over again with
usurious interest, so that society has long ago redeemed landed property
over and over again.

True enough, the increase in the productive power of labour, so far as
it does not imply an additional investment of capital-value, augments in
the first instance only the quantity of the product, not its value,
except insofar as it makes it possible to reproduce more constant
capital with the same labour and thus to preserve its value. But it
forms at the same time new material for capital, hence the basis of
increased accumulation of capital.

So far as the organisation of social labour itself, and thus the
increase in the social productive power of labour, requires large-scale
production and therefore the advance of large quantities of
money-capital by individual capitalists, we have shown in Book I [From
Manuscript II. — _F. E._] that this is accomplished in part by the
centralisation of capitals in a few hands, without necessitating an
absolute increase in the magnitude of the functioning capital-values,
and consequently also in the magnitude of the money-capital in which
they are advanced. The magnitude of the individual capitals can increase
by centralisation in the hands of a few without a growth of their social
sum total. It is only a changed distribution of the individual capitals.

Finally, we have shown in the preceding Part that a shortening of the
period of turnover permits of setting in motion either the same
productive capital with less money-capital or more productive capital
with the same money-capital. [English edition: Vol. I, pp. 624-28,
761-64. — _Ed_.]

But evidently all this has nothing to do with the question of
money-capital itself. It shows only that the advanced capital — a given
sum of values consisting in its free form, in its value-form, of a
certain sum of money — includes, after its conversion into productive
capital, productive powers whose limits are not set by the limits of its
value, but which on the contrary may operate within certain bounds with
differing degrees of extensiveness or intensiveness. If the prices of
the elements of production — the means of production and labour-power —
are given, the magnitude of the money-capital required for the purchase
of a definite quantity of these elements of production existing as
commodities is determined. Or the magnitude of value of the capital to
be advanced is determined. But the extent to which this capital acts as
a creator of values and products is elastic and variable.

_As to the second point_: it is self-evident that part of the social
labour and means of production which must be annually expended for the
production or purchase of money in order to replace worn-off coin is
_pro tanto_ a diminution of the volume of social production. But as for
the money-value which functions partly as a medium of circulation,
partly as a hoard, it is simply there, acquired, present alongside the
labour-power, the produced means of production, and the natural sources
of wealth. It cannot be regarded as a limit set to these things. By its
transformation into elements of production, by its exchange with other
nations, the scale of production might be extended. This presupposes,
however, that money plays its role of world-money the same as ever.

To set the productive capital in motion requires more or less
money-capital, depending on the length of the period of turnover. We
have also seen that the division of the period of turnover into working
time and circulation time requires an increase of the capital latent or
suspended in the form of money.

Inasmuch as the period of turnover is determined by the length of the
working period, it is determined, other conditions remaining equal, by
the material nature of the process of production, hence not by the
specific social character of this process of production. However, on the
basis of capitalist production, more extensive operations of
comparatively long duration necessitate large advances of money-capital
for a rather long time. Production in such spheres depends therefore on
the magnitude of the money-capital which the individual capitalist has
at his disposal. This barrier is broken down by the credit system and
the associations connected with it, e.g., the stock companies.
Disturbances in the money-market therefore put such establishments out
of business, while these same establishments, in their turn, produce
disturbances in the money-market.

On the basis of socialised production the scale must be ascertained on
which those operations — which withdraw labour-power and means of
production for a long time without supplying any product as a useful
effect in the interim — can be carried on without injuring branches of
production which not only withdraw labour-power and means of production
continually, or several times a year, but also supply means of
subsistence and of production. Under socialised as well as capitalist
production, the labourers in branches of business with shorter working
periods will as before withdraw products only for a short time without
giving any products in return; while branches of business with long
working periods continually withdraw products for a longer time before
they return anything. This circumstance, then, arises from the material
character of the particular labour-process, not from its social form. In
the case of socialised production the money-capital is eliminated.
Society distributes labour-power and means of production to the
different branches of production. The producers may, for all it matters,
receive paper vouchers entitling them to withdraw from the social
supplies of consumer goods a quantity corresponding to their
labour-time. These vouchers are not money. They do not circulate.

We see that inasmuch as the need for money-capital originates in the
length of the working period, it is conditioned by two things: _First_,
that money in general is the form in which every individual capital
(apart from credit) must make its appearance in order to transform
itself into productive capital; this follows from the nature of
capitalist production and commodity-production in general. _Second_, the
magnitude of the required money advance is due to the circumstance that
labour-power and means of production are continually withdrawn from
society for a comparatively long time without any return to it, during
that period, of products convertible into money. The first condition,
that the capital to be advanced must be advanced in the form of money,
is not eliminated by the form of this money itself, whether it is
metal-money, credit-money, token-money, etc. The second condition is in
no way affected by what money-medium or in what form of production
labour, means of subsistence, and means of production are withdrawn
without the return of some equivalent to the circulation.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 19: ^([35]) Former Presentations of the Subject

I. The Physiocrats

Quesnay’s _Tableau Économique_ shows in a few broad outlines how the
annual result of the national production, representing a definite value,
is distributed by means of the circulation in such a way that, other
things being equal, simple reproduction, i.e., reproduction on the same
scale, can take place. The starting-point of the period of production is
properly the preceding year’s harvest. The innumerable individual acts
of circulation are at once brought together in their characteristic
social mass movement — the circulation between great functionally
determined economic classes of society. We are here interested in the
following: A portion of the total product — being, like every other
portion of it, a use-object, it is a new result of last year’s labour —
is at the same time only the depository of old capital-value
re-appearing in the same bodily form. It does not circulate but remains
in the hands of its producers, the class of farmers, in order to resume
there its service as capital. In this portion of the year’s product, the
constant capital, Quesnay includes impertinent elements, but he strikes
upon the main thing, thanks to the limitations of his horizon, within
which agriculture is the only sphere of investment of human labour
producing surplus-value, hence the only really productive one from the
capitalist point of view. The economic process of reproduction, whatever
may be its specific social character, always becomes intertwined in this
sphere (agriculture) with a natural process of reproduction. The obvious
conditions of the latter throw light on those of the former, and keep
off a confusion of thought which is called forth by the mirage of
circulation.

The label of a system differs from that of other articles, among other
things, by the fact that it cheats not only the buyer but often also the
seller. Quesnay himself and his immediate disciples believed in their
feudal shop-sign. So do our grammarians even this day and hour. But as a
matter of fact the system of the physiocrats is the first systematic
conception of capitalist production. The representative of industrial
capital — the class of tenants — directs the entire economic movement.
Agriculture is carried on capitalistically, that is to say, it is the
enterprise of a capitalist farmer on a large scale; the direct
cultivator of the soil is the wage-labourer. Production creates not only
articles of use but also their value; its compelling motive is the
procurement of surplus-value, whose birth-place is the sphere of
production, not of circulation. Among the three classes which figure as
the vehicles of the social process of reproduction brought about by the
circulation, the immediate exploiter of “productive” labour, the
producer of surplus-value, [Marx analyses Quesnay’s _Tableau Économique_
in greater detail in his _Theories of Surplus-Value_ (see English
edition: Karl Marx, _Theories of Surplus-Value_ [Volume IV of Capital],
Part I, Moscow, 1963, pp. 299-333 and 367-69). — _Ed_.] the capitalist
farmer, is distinguished from those who merely appropriate the
surplus-value.

The capitalist character of the physiocratic system excited opposition
even during its florescence: on the one side it was challenged by
Linguet and Mably, on the other by the champions of the small
freeholders.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Adam Smith’s retrogression ^([36]) in the analysis of the process of
reproduction is so much the more remarkable because he not only
elaborates upon Quesnay’s correct analyses, generalising his “_avances
primitives_” and “_avances annuelles_” for instance and calling them
respectively “fixed” and “circulating” capital ^([37]), but even
relapses in spots entirely into physiocratic errors. For instance in
order to demonstrate that the farmer produces more value than any other
sort of capitalist, he says:

“No equal capital puts into motion a greater quantity of productive
labour than that of the farmer. Not only his labouring servants, but his
labouring cattle are productive labourers.” (Fine compliment for the
labouring servants!) “In agriculture too nature _labours_ along with
man; and though _her labour costs no expense_, its produce has _its
value, as well as that of the most expensive workmen_. The most
important operations of agriculture seem intended not so much to
increase, though they do that too, as to direct the fertility of nature
towards the production of the plants most profitable to man. A field
overgrown with briars and brambles may frequently produce as great a
quantity of vegetables as the best cultivated vineyard or corn field.
Planting and tillage frequently regulate more than they animate the
active fertility of nature; and after all their labour, a great part of
the work always remains to be done by her. The labourers and labouring
cattle (_sic_!), therefore, employed in agriculture, not only occasion,
like the workmen in manufactures, the reproduction of a value equal to
their own consumption, or to the capital which employs them, together
with its owners’ profits; but of a much greater value. Over and above
the capital of the farmer and all its profits, they regularly occasion
the reproduction of the rent of the landlord. This rent may be
considered as the produce of those powers of nature the use of which the
landlord lends to the farmer. It is greater or smaller according to the
supposed extent of those powers, or, in other words, according to the
supposed natural or improved fertility of the land. It is the work of
nature which remains after deducting or compensating everything which
can be regarded as the work of man. It is seldom less than a fourth, and
frequently more than a third of the whole produce. No equal quantity of
productive labour employed in manufactures can ever occasion so great a
reproduction. In them nature does nothing; man does all; and the
reproduction must always be in proportion to the strength of the agents
that occasion it. The capital employed in agriculture, therefore, not
only puts into motion a greater quantity of productive labour than any
equal capital employed in manufactures, but in proportion too to the
quantity of productive labour which it employs, it adds a much greater
value to the annual produce of the land and labour of the country, to
the real wealth and revenue of its inhabitants.” (Book II, Ch. 5, p.
242.)

Adam Smith says in Book II, Ch. 1:

“The whole value of the seed, too, is properly a fixed capital.”

Here, then, capital equals capital-value; it exists in a “fixed” form.

“Though it (the seed) goes backwards and forwards between the ground and
the granary, it never changes masters, and therefore does not properly
circulate. The farmer makes his profit, not by its sale, but by its
increase.” (p. 186.)

The absurdity of the thing lies here in the fact that Smith does not,
like Quesnay before him, see the re-appearance of the value of constant
capital in a renewed form, and hence fails to see an important element
of the process of reproduction, but merely offers one more illustration,
and a wrong one at that, of his distinctions between circulating and
fixed capital. In Smith’s translation of “_avances primitives_” and
“_avances annuelles_” as “fixed capital” and “circulating capital,” the
progress consists in the term “capital,” the concept of which is
generalised, and becomes independent of the special consideration for
the “agricultural” sphere of application of the physiocrats; the
retrogression consists in the fact that “fixed” and “circulating” are
regarded as the overriding distinction, and are so maintained.

II. Adam Smith

1. Smith’s General Points of View

Adam Smith says in Book I, Ch. 6, page 42:

“In every society the price of every commodity finally resolves itself
into some one or other, or all of those three parts (wages, profit,
rent); and in every improved society, all the three enter more or less,
as component parts, into the price of the far greater part of
commodities.” ^([38])

Or, as he continues, page 43:

“Wages, profit, and rent, are the _three original sources_ of all
revenue as well as of _all exchangeable value_.”

Below we shall discuss in greater detail this doctrine of Adam Smith
concerning “the component parts of the price of commodities,” or of “all
exchangeable value.”

He says furthermore:

“Since this is the case, it has been observed, with regard to every
particular commodity, taken separately; it must be so with regard to all
the commodities which compose the _whole annual produce_ of the land and
labour of every country, taken complexly. The _whole price or
exchangeable value_ of that annual produce, must _resolve_ itself into
the same three parts, and _be parcelled out_ among the different
inhabitants of the country, either as the _wages_ of their labour, the
_profits_ of their stock, or the _rent_ of their land. (Book II, Ch. 2,
p. 190.)

After Adam Smith has thus resolved the price of all commodities
individually, as well as “the whole price or exchangeable value ... of
the annual produce of the land and labour of every country,” into wages,
profit and rent, the three sources of revenue for wage-labourers,
capitalists, and landowners, he must needs smuggle in a fourth element
by circuitous route, namely the element of capital. This is accomplished
by drawing a distinction between gross and net revenue:

“The _gross_ revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country
comprehends the _whole annual produce_ of their land and labour; the
_neat_ revenue, what remains free to them _after deducting the expense
of maintaining_; first, their _fixed_; and secondly, their _circulating
capital_; or what, without encroaching upon their capital, they can
place in their stock reserved for immediate consumption, or spend upon
their subsistence, conveniences, and amusements. Their real wealth too
is in proportion, not to their gross, but to their neat revenue.”
(_Ibid_., p. 190.)

On this we comment as follows:

1) Adam Smith expressly deals here only with simple reproduction, not
reproduction on an extended scale, or accumulation. He speaks only of
expenses for “maintaining” the capital in operation. The “neat” income
is equal to that portion of the annual product, whether of society or of
the individual capitalist, which can pass into the “fund for
consumption,” but the size of this fund must not “encroach upon capital”
in operation. One portion of the value of both the individual and the
social product, then, is resolved neither into wages nor into profit nor
into rent, but into capital.

2) Adam Smith flees from his own theory by means of a play upon words,
the distinction between “gross and neat revenue.” The individual
capitalist as well as the entire capitalist class, or the so-called
nation, receive in place of the capital consumed in production a
commodity-product whose value — it can be represented by the
proportional parts of this product — replaces on the one hand the
expended capital-value and thus forms an income, or still more
literally, revenue (_revenue_, pp. of _revenir_ — to come back), but,
_nota bene_, a revenue upon capital, or income upon capital; on the
other hand components of value which are “parcelled out among the
different inhabitants of the country, either as the wages of their
labour, the profits of their stock, or the rent of their land”, a thing
commonly called income. Hence the value of the entire product
constitutes somebody’s income — either of the individual capitalist or
of the whole country, but it is on the one hand an income upon capital,
and on the other a “revenue” different from the latter. Consequently,
the thing which is eliminated in the analysis of the value of the
commodity into its component parts is brought back through a side door —
the ambiguity of the word “revenue.” But only such value constituents of
the product can be “taken in” as already exist in it. If the _capital_
is to come in as revenue, capital must first have been expended.

Adam Smith says furthermore:

“The lowest ordinary rate of profit must always be something more than
what is sufficient to compensate the occasional losses to which every
employment of stock is exposed. It is this surplus only which is neat or
clear profit.”

[What capitalist understands by profit, necessary expenditure of
capital?]

“What is called gross profit comprehends frequently, not only this
surplus, but what is retained for compensating such extraordinary
losses.” (Book I, Ch. 9, p. 72.)

This means nothing else than that a part of the surplus-value,
considered as a part of the gross profit, must form an insurance-fund
for the production. This insurance-fund is created by a portion of the
surplus-labour, which to that extent produces capital directly, that is
to say, the fund intended for reproduction. As regards the expense for
“maintaining” the fixed capital, etc. (see the above quotations), the
replacement of the consumed fixed capital by a new one is not a new
outlay of capital, but only a renewal of the old capital-value in new
form. And as far as the repair of the fixed capital is concerned, which
Adam Smith counts likewise among the costs of maintenance, this expense
goes in with the price of the capital advance. The fact that the
capitalist, instead of having to invest this all at one time invests it
gradually, as required, during the functioning of the capital, and can
invest it out of profits already pocketed, does not change the source of
this profit. The value constituent of which it consists proves only that
the labourer delivers surplus-labour for the insurance-fund as well as
for the repair fund.

Adam Smith then tells us that one should exclude from the net revenue,
i.e., from the revenue in its specific meaning, the entire fixed
capital, and also the entire portion of the circulating capital which is
required for the maintenance and repair of the fixed capital, and for
its renewal, in fact all capital not in a bodily form intended for the
consumption-fund.

“The whole expense of maintaining the fixed capital, must evidently be
excluded from the neat revenue of the society. Neither the materials
necessary for supporting their useful machines and instruments of trade
... nor the produce of the labour necessary for fashioning those
materials into the proper form, can ever make a part of it. The _price_
of that labour may indeed make a part of it; as the workmen so employed
may place the whole value of their wages in their stock reserved for
immediate consumption. But in other sorts of labour, both the _price_
[i.e., the wages paid for this labour] and the _produce_ [in which this
labour is incorporated] go to this stock, the price to that of the
workmen, the produce to that of other people, whose subsistence,
conveniences, and amusements, are augmented by the labour of those
workmen.” (Book II, Ch. 2, pp. 190, 191.)

Adam Smith comes here upon a very important distinction between the
labourers employed in the production of _means of production_ and those
employed in the immediate production of _articles of consumption_. The
value of the commodities produced by the first-named contains a
constituent part which is equal to the sum of the wages, i.e., equal to
the value of the part of capital invested in the purchase of
labour-power. This part of value exists bodily as a certain quota of the
means of production produced by the labourers. The money received by
them as wages is their revenue, but their labour has not produced any
goods which are consumable, either for themselves or for others. Hence
these products are not an element of that part of the annual product
which is intended to form a social consumption-fund, in which alone a
“neat revenue” can be realised. Adam Smith forgets to add here that the
same thing that applies to wages is also true of that constituent of the
value of the means of production which, being surplus-value, forms the
revenues (first and foremost) of the industrial capitalist under the
categories of profit and rent. These value-components likewise exist in
means of production, articles which cannot be consumed. They cannot
raise articles of consumption produced by the second kind of labourers
in a quantity corresponding to their price until they have been
converted into money; only then can they transfer those articles to the
individual consumption-fund of their owners. But so much the more should
Adam Smith have seen that that part of the value of the annually
begotten means of production which is equal to the value of the means of
production functioning within this sphere of production — the means of
production with which means of production are made — hence a portion of
value equal to the value of the constant capital employed here, cannot
possibly be a value constituent forming revenue, not only on account of
the bodily form in which it exists, but also on account of its
functioning as capital.

With regard to the second kind of labourers — who directly produce
articles of consumption — Adam Smith’s definitions are not quite exact.
For he says that in these kinds of labour, both the price of labour and
the product “GO TO” the stock reserved for immediate consumption,

“the _price_” (i.e., the money received in wages) “to that of the
_workmen_, the _produce_ to THAT OF _OTHER PEOPLE_, whose subsistence,
conveniences and amusements, are augmented by the labour of these
workmen.”

But the labourer cannot live on the “_price_” of his labour, the money
in which his wages are paid; he realises this money by buying articles
of consumption with it. These may in part consist of classes of
commodities produced by himself. On the other hand his own product may
be such as goes only into the consumption of the exploiters of labour.

After Adam Smith has thus entirely excluded the fixed capital from the
“net revenue” of a country, he continues:

“But though the whole expense of maintaining the fixed capital is thus
necessarily excluded from the neat revenue of the society, it is not the
same case with that of maintaining the circulating capital. Of the four
parts of which this latter capital is composed, money, provisions,
materials, and finished work, the three last, it has already been
observed, are regularly withdrawn from it, and placed either in the
fixed capital of the society, or in their stock reserved for immediate
consumption. Whatever portion of those consumable goods is not employed
in maintaining the former” [the fixed capital] “goes all to the latter”
[the fund for immediate consumption], “and makes a part of the neat
revenue of the society. The maintenance of those three parts of the
circulating capital, therefore, withdraws no portion of the annual
produce from the neat revenue of the society, besides what is necessary
for maintaining the fixed capital.” Book II, Ch. 2, p. 192.)

It is sheer tautology to say that that portion of the circulating
capital which does not serve for the production of means of production
goes into that of articles of consumption, in other words, into that
part of the annual product which is intended to form society’s
consumption-fund. However, the immediately following passage is
important:

“The circulating capital of a society is in this respect different from
that of an individual. That of an individual is totally excluded from
making any part of his neat revenues, which must consist altogether in
his profits. But though the circulating capital of every individual
makes a part of that of the society to which he belongs, it is not upon
that account totally excluded from making a part likewise of their neat
revenue. Though the whole goods in a merchant’s shop must by no means be
placed in his own stock reserved for immediate consumption, they may in
that of other people, who, from a revenue derived form other funds, may
regularly replace their value to him, together with its profits, without
occasioning any diminution either of his capital or of theirs.”
(_Ibid_.)

And so we learn hear that:

1) Just as the fixed capital, and the circulating capital required for
its reproduction (he forgets the function) and maintenance, are totally
excluded from the _net_ revenue of every individual capitalist, which
can consist only of his profit, so is the circulating capital employed
in the production of articles of consumption. Hence that portion of his
commodity-product which replaces his capital cannot resolve itself into
constituents of value which form any revenue for him.

2) The circulating capital of each individual capitalist constitutes a
part of society’s circulating capital the same as every individual fixed
capital.

3) The circulating capital of society, while representing only the sum
of the individual circulating capitals, has a character different from
that of the circulating capital of every individual capitalist. The
latter circulating capital can never form a part _of his own revenue_;
however a portion of the first-named circulating capital (namely that
consisting of consumable goods) may at the same time form a portion of
the _revenue of society_ or, as he had expressed it above, it must not
necessarily reduce the net revenue of society by a portion of the annual
product. Indeed, that which Adam Smith here calls circulating capital
consists of the annually produced commodity-capital, which is thrown
into circulation annually by the capitalists producing articles of
consumption. This entire annual commodity product of theirs consists of
consumable goods and therefore forms the fund in which the net revenues
of society (including wages) are realised or expended. Instead of
choosing for his illustration the goods in a merchant’s shop, Adam Smith
should have selected the masses of goods stored away in the warehouses
of the industrial capitalists.

Now if Adam Smith had welded together the snatches of thought which
forced themselves upon him at first in the study of the reproduction of
that which he calls fixed, and now of that which he calls circulating
capital, he would have arrived at the following result:

I. The annual product of society consists of two departments: one of
them comprises the means of production, the other the articles of
consumption. Each must be treated separately.

II. The aggregate value of that part of the annual product which
consists of _means of production_ is divided as follows: One portion of
the value represents only the value of the means of production consumed
in the fabrication of these means of production; it is but capital-value
re-appearing in a renewed form; another portion is equal to the value of
the capital laid out in labour-power, or equal to the sum of wages paid
by the capitalists in this sphere of production. Finally, a third
portion of value is the source of profits, including ground-rent, of the
industrial capitalists in this category.

The first constituent part, according to Adam Smith the reproduced
portion of the fixed capital of all the individual capitalists employed
in this first section, is “totally excluded from making any part of the
neat revenue,” either of the individual capitalist or of society. It
always functions as capital, never as revenue. To that extent the “fixed
capital” of every individual capitalist is in no way different from the
fixed capital of society. But the other portions of value of the annual
product of society consisting of means of production — portions of value
which therefore exist in aliquot parts of this aggregate quantity of
means of production — form indeed simultaneously _revenues for all
agents engaged in this production_, wages for the labourers, profits and
ground-rents for the capitalists. But they form _capital_, not revenue,
_for society_, although the annual product of society consists only of
the sums of the products of the individual capitalists who belong to
that society. By nature they are generally fit to function only as means
of production, and even those which, if need be, might be able to
function as articles of consumption are intended for service as raw or
auxiliary materials of new production. But they serve as such — hence as
capital — not in the hands of their producers, but in those of their
users, namely:

III. The capitalists of the second department, the direct producers of
_articles of consumption_. They replace for these capitalists the
capital consumed in the production of articles of consumption (so far as
this capital is not converted into labour-power, and hence is not the
sum of the wages of the labourers of this second department), while this
consumed capital, which now exists in the form of articles of the
consumption in the hands of the capitalist producing them — socially
speaking — in its turn _forms the consumption-fund in which the
capitalists and labourers of the first department realise their
revenue_.

If Adam Smith had continued his analysis to this point, but little would
have been lacking for the solution of the whole problem. He almost hit
the nail on the head, for he had already observed that certain
value-parts of _one_ kind (means of production) of the
commodity-capitals constituting the total annual product of society
indeed form revenue for the individual labourers and capitalists engaged
in their production, but do not form a constituent part of the revenue
of society; while a value-part of the _other_ kind (articles of
consumption), although representing capital-value for its individual
owners, the capitalists engaged in this sphere of investment, is only a
part of the social revenue.

But this much is evident from the foregoing:

_First_: Although the social capital is only equal to the sum of the
individual capitals and for this reason the annual commodity-product (or
commodity-capital) of society is equal to the sum of commodity-products
of these individual capitals; and although therefore the analysis of the
value of the commodities into its component parts, valid for every
individual commodity-capital, must also be valid for the
commodity-capital of all society — and actually proves valid in the end
— the form of appearance which these component parts assume in the
aggregate social process of reproduction is _different_.

_Second_: Even on the basis of simple reproduction there takes place not
merely a production of wages (variable capital) and surplus-value, but
direct production of new constant capital-value, although the
working-day consists of only two parts, one in which the labourer
replaces the variable capital, in fact producing an equivalent for the
purchase of his labour-power, and another in which he produces
surplus-value (profit, rent, etc.).

The daily labour which is expended in the reproduction of means of
production — and whose value is composed of wages and surplus-value —
realises itself in new means of production which replace the constant
part of capital laid out in the production of articles of consumption.

The main difficulties, the greater part of which has been solved in the
preceding text, are not encountered in studying accumulation but simple
reproduction. For this reason, Adam Smith (Book II) and Quesnay
(_Tableau Économique_) before him make simple reproduction their
starting-point, whenever it is a question of the movement of the annual
product of society and its reproduction through circulation.

2. Adam Smith Resolves Exchange Value into v + s

Adam Smith’s dogma that the price, or “EXCHANGEABLE VALUE,” of any
single commodity — and therefore of all commodities in the aggregate
constituting the annual product of society (he rightly assumes
capitalist production everywhere) — is made up of three “COMPONENT
PARTS,” or “RESOLVES ITSELF INTO” wages, profit, and rent, can be
reduced to this: that the commodity-value is equal to v + s, i.e., equal
to the value of the advanced variable capital plus the surplus-value.
And we may undertake this reduction of profit and rent to a common unit
called s with the express permission of Adam Smith, as shown by the
following quotations, in which we at first leave aside all minor points,
i.e., any apparent or real deviation from the dogma that commodity-value
consists exclusively of those elements which we call v + s.

In manufacture:

“The value which the workmen add to the materials ... resolves itself
... into two parts, of which the one pays their wages, the other the
profits of their employer upon the whole stock of materials and wages
which he advanced.” (Book I, Ch. 6, p. 41.)

“Though the manufacturer has his wages advanced to him by his master,
he, in reality, costs him no expense, the value of those wages being
generally RESTORED, together with a profit, in the improved value of the
subject upon which his labour is bestowed.” (Book II, Ch. 3, p. 221.)

That portion of the STOCK which is laid out

“in maintaining productive hands ... after having served in the function
of a capital to him (the employer) ...constitutes a revenue to them”
(the labourers). (Book II, Ch. 3 p. 223.)

Adam Smith says explicitly in the chapter just quoted:

“The whole annual produce of the land and labour of every country ...
NATURALLY divides itself into two parts. One of them, and frequently the
largest, is in the first place, destined for replacing a capital, or for
renewing the provisions, materials, and finished work, which had been
withdrawn from a capital; the other for constituting a revenue either to
the owner of this capital, as the _profit of his stock_; or to some
other person, as the rent of his _land_.” (p. 222.)

Only one part of the capital, so Adam Smith just informed us, forms at
the same time a revenue for somebody, namely that which is invested in
the purchase of productive hands. This portion — the variable capital —
first “serves in the function of a capital” in the hands of its employer
and for him and then it “constitutes a revenue” for the productive
labourer himself. The capitalist transforms a portion of his
capital-value into labour-power and precisely thereby into variable
capital; it is only due to this transformation that not alone this
portion of capital but his entire capital functions as industrial
capital. The labourer — the seller of labour-power — receives its value
in the form of wages. In his hands labour-power is but a saleable
commodity, a commodity by the sale of which he lives, which therefore is
the sole source of his revenue; labour-power functions as a variable
capital only in the hands of its buyer, the capitalist, and the
capitalist advances its purchase price only apparently, since its value
has been previously supplied to him by the labourer.

After Adam Smith has thus shown that the value of a product in
manufacture is equal to v + s (s standing for the profit of the
capitalist), he tells us that in agriculture the labourers besides

“the reproduction of a value equal to their own consumption, or to the
[variable] capital which employs them, together with its owners’ profits
...” — furthermore, “over and above the capital of the farmer and all
its _profits_ regularly occasion the reproduction of the _rent_ of the
landlord.” (Book II, Ch. 5, p. 243.)

The fact that the rent passes into the hands of the landlord is wholly
immaterial for the question under consideration. Before it can pass into
his hands, it must be in those of the farmer, i.e., of the industrial
capitalist. It must form a component part of the value of the product
before it becomes a revenue for anyone. Rent as well as profit are
therefore, according to Adam Smith himself, but component parts of
surplus-value and these the productive labourer reproduces continually
together with his own wages, i.e., with the value of the variable
capital. Hence rent and profit are parts of the surplus-value s, and
thus, with Adam Smith, the price of all commodities resolves itself into
v + s.

The dogma that the price of all commodities (hence also of the annual
commodity-product) resolves itself into wages plus profit plus
ground-rent, assumes even in the intermittent esoteric constituents of
Smith’s work the form that the value of every commodity, hence also that
of society’s annual commodity-product, is equal to v + s, or equal to
the capital-value laid out in labour-power and continually reproduced by
the labourers, plus the surplus-value added by the labourers through
their work.

This final result of Adam Smith reveals to us at the same time — see
further down — the source of his one-sided analysis of the component
parts into which the value of a commodity resolves sources of revenue
for different classes engaged in production has nothing to do with the
determination of the magnitude of each of these component parts and of
the sum of their values.

All kinds of _quid pro quo_’s are jumbled together when Adam Smith says:

“Wages, profit, and rent, are the three original sources of all revenue
as well as of all exchangeable value. All other revenue is ultimately
derived from some one or other of these.” (Book I, Ch. 6, p. 48.)

1) All member of society not directly engaged in reproduction, with or
without labour, can obtain their share of the annual commodity-product —
in other words, their articles of consumption — primarily out of the
hands of those classes to which the product first accrues — productive
labourers, industrial capitalists, and landlords. To that extent their
revenues are materially derived from wages (of the productive
labourers), profit, and rent, and appear therefore as derivative
vis-à-vis those primary revenues. But on the other hand the recipients
of these revenues, derived in this sense, draw them by virtue of their
social functions — as a king, priest, professor, prostitute, soldier,
etc., and they may, therefore, regard these functions as the original
sources of their revenue.

2) — and here Adam Smith’s ridiculous blunder reaches its climax. After
starting by correctly defining the component parts of the value of the
commodities and the sum of the value-product incorporated in them, and
then demonstrating how these component parts form so many different
sources of revenue, ^([39]) after thus deriving the revenues from the
value, he proceeds in the opposite direction — and this remains the
predominant conception with him — and turns the revenues from “COMPONENT
PARTS” into “_original sources_ of all exchangeable value,” thereby
throwing the doors wide open to vulgar economy. (See our Roscher. [Marx
has in mind W. Roscher”s _System der Vokswirtschaft. Band I: Die
Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie_. Dritte, vermehrte und verbesserte
Auflage. Stuttgart und Augsburg, 1858. — _Ed_.] )

3. The Constant Part of Capital

Let us now see how Adam Smith tries to spirit the constant part of the
capital-value away from the commodity-value.

“In the price of corn, for example, one part pays the rent of the
landlord.”

The origin of this constituent of value has no more to do with the
circumstance that it is paid to the landlord and forms a revenue for him
in the shape of rent than the origin of the other constituents of value
has to do with the fact that as profit and wages they form sources of
revenue.

“Another [portion] pays the wages or maintenance of the labourers” [“and
labouring cattle,” he adds] “employed in producing it, and the third
pays the profit of the farmer. These three parts seem” [they seem
indeed] “either immediately or ultimately to make up the whole price of
corn.” ^([40])

This entire price, i.e., the determination of its magnitude, is
absolutely independent of its distribution among three kinds of people.

“A fourth part, it may perhaps be thought, is necessary for replacing
the stock of the farmer, or for compensating the wear and tear of his
labouring cattle, and other instruments of husbandry. But it must be
considered that the price of any instrument of husbandry, such as a
labouring horse, is itself made up of the same three parts: the rent of
the land upon which he is reared, the labour of tending and rearing him,
and the profits of the farmer who advances both the rent of this land,
and the wages of this labour. Though the price of the corn, therefore,
may pay the price as well as the maintenance of the horse, the whole
price still resolves itself either immediately or ultimately into the
same three parts of rent, labour” (he means wages), “and profit.” (Book
I, Ch. 6, p. 42.)

This is verbatim all that Adam Smith has to say in support of his
astonishing doctrine. His proof consists simply in the repetition of the
same assertion. He admits, for instance, that the price of corn does not
only consist of v + s, but also of the price of the means of production
consumed in the production of corn, hence of a capital-value not
invested in labour-power by the farmer. But, he says, the prices of all
these means of production resolve themselves into v + s, the same as the
price of corn. He forgets, however, to add: and, moreover, into the
prices of the means of production consumed in their own creation. He
refers us from one branch of production to another, and from that to a
third. The contention that the entire price of commodities resolves
itself “immediately” or “ULTIMATELY” into v + s would not be a hollow
subterfuge only if he were able to demonstrate that the commodities
whose price resolves itself immediately into c (price of consumed means
of production) + v + s, are ultimately compensated by commodities which
completely replace those “consumed means of production,” and which are
themselves produced by the mere outlay of variable capital, i.e., by a
mere investment of capital in labour-power. The price of these last
commodity-products would then be immediately v + s. Consequently the
price of the former, c + v + s, where c stands for the constant part of
capital, would also be ultimately resolvable into v + s. Adam Smith
himself did not believe that he had furnished such a proof by his
example of the collectors of SCOTCH PEBBLES, who, according to him 1) do
not generate surplus-value of any description, but produce only their
own wages, and 2) do not employ any means of production (they do,
however, employ them, such as baskets, sacks, and other containers for
carrying the pebbles).

We have already seen above that Adam Smith himself later on overthrows
his own theory, without however being conscious of his contradictions.
But their source is to be found precisely in his scientific premises.
The capital converted into labour produces a greater value than its own.
How? Says Adam Smith: by the labourers imparting during the process of
production to the things on which they work a value which forms not only
an equivalent for their own purchase price, but also a surplus-value
(profit and rent) apportioned not to them but to their employers. That
is all they accomplish, and all they can accomplish. And what is true of
the industrial labour of one day is true of the labour set in motion by
the entire capitalist class during one year. Hence the aggregate mass of
the annual value produced by society can resolve itself only into v + s,
into an equivalent by which the labourers replace the capital-value
expended for the purchase of their own labour-power, and into an
additional value which they must deliver over and above this to their
employers. But these two elements of commodity-value form at the same
time sources of revenue for the various classes engaged in reproduction:
the first is the source of wages, the revenue of the labourers; the
second that of surplus-value, a portion of which is retained by the
industrial capitalist in the form of profit, while another is given up
by him as rent, the revenue of the landlord. Where, then, should another
portion of value come from, when the annual value-product contains no
other elements than v + s? We are proceeding here from simple
reproduction. Since the entire quantity of annual labour resolves itself
into labour needed for the reproduction of the capital-value laid out in
labour-power, and into labour needed for the creation of surplus-value,
where should the labour for the production of a capital-value not laid
out in labour-power come from?

The case is as follows:

1) Adam Smith determines the value of a commodity by the amount of
labour which the wage-labourer adds to the subject of labour. He calls
it literally “materials,” since he is dealing with manufacture, which
itself is working up products of labour. But this does not alter the
matter. The value which the labourer adds to a thing (and this “ADDS” is
the expression of Adam Smith) is entirely independent of whether or not
this object to which value is added had itself any value _before_ this
addition. The labourer therefore produces a value in the form of a
commodity. This, according to Adam Smith, is partly an equivalent for
his wages, and this part, then, is determined by the magnitude of value
of his wages; depending on that magnitude he has to add labour in order
to produce or reproduce a value equal to that of his wages. On the other
hand the labourer adds more labour over and above the limit so drawn,
and this creates surplus-value for the capitalist employing him. Whether
this surplus-value remains entirely in the hands of the capitalist or
parts of it are yielded by him to third persons, does not in the least
alter either the qualitative (that is at all surplus-value) or the
quantitative (magnitude) determination of the surplus-value added by the
wage-labourer. It is value the same as any other portion of the value of
the product, but it differs in that the labourer has not received any
equivalent for it, nor will receive any later on, in that, on the
contrary, this value is appropriated by the capitalist without any
equivalent. The total value of a commodity is determined by the quantity
of labour expended by the labourer in its production; one portion of
this total value is determined by the fact that it is equal to the value
of the wages, i.e., an equivalent for them. The second part, the
surplus-value, is, therefore, necessarily likewise determined as equal
to the total value of the product minus that part of its value which is
equivalent to the wages; hence equal to the excess of the value produced
in the making of the commodity over that part of the value contained in
it which is an equivalent for his wages.

2) That which is true of a commodity produced in some individual
industrial establishment by any individual labourer is true of the
annual product of all branches of business as a whole. That which is
true of the day’s work of some individual productive labourer is true of
the year’s work set in motion by the entire class of productive
labourers. It “fixes” (Adam Smith’s expression) in the annual product of
a total value determined by the quantity of the annual labour expended,
and this total value resolves itself into one portion determined by that
part of the annual labour wherewith the working-class creates an
equivalent of its annual wages, in fact, these wages themselves; and
into another portion determined by the additional annual labour by which
the labourer creates surplus-value for the capitalist class. The annual
value-product contained in the annual product consists therefore of but
two elements: namely, the equivalent of the annual wages received by the
working-class, and the surplus-value annually provided for the
capitalist class. Now, the annual wages are the revenue of the
working-class, and the annual quantity of surplus-value the revenue of
the capitalist class; hence both of them represent the relative shares
in the annual fund for consumption (this view is correct when describing
simple reproduction) and are realised in it. There is, then, no room
left anywhere for the constant capital-value, for the reproduction of
the capital functioning in the form of means of production. And Adam
Smith states explicitly in the introduction to his work that all
portions of the value of commodities which serve as revenue coincide
with the annual product of labour intended for the social fund for
consumption:

“To explain in what has consisted the revenue of the great body of the
people, or what has been the nature of those funds, which, in different
ages and nations, have supplied their annual consumption, is the object
of these first Four Books.” (p. 12.)

And in the very first sentence of the introduction we read:

“The annual labour of every nation is the fund, which originally
supplies it with all the necessaries and conveniences of life which it
annually consumes, and which consists always either in the immediate
produced of that labour, or in what is purchased with that produce from
other nations.” (p. 11.)

Now Adam Smith’s first mistake consists in equating the _value_ of the
_annual product_ to the _newly produced annual value_. The latter is
_only_ the product of labour of the past year, the former includes
besides all elements of value consumed in the making of the annual
product, but which _were produced in the preceding and partly even
earlier years_: means of production whose value merely _re-appears_ —
which, as far as their value is concerned, have been neither produced
nor reproduced by the labour expended in the past year. By this
confusion Adam Smith spirits away the constant portion of the value of
the annual product. This confusion rests on another error in his
fundamental conception: He does not distinguish the two-fold nature of
labour itself: of labour which creates value by expending labour-power,
and of labour as concrete, useful work, which creates articles of use
(use-values). The total quantity of the commodities fabricated annually,
in other words, the _total annual product_ is the product of the
_useful_ labour active during the past year; it is only due to the fact
that socially employed labour was spent in a ramified system of useful
kinds of labour that all these commodities exist; it is due to this fact
alone that the value of the means of production consumed in the
production of commodities and reappearing in a new bodily form is
preserved in their total value. The total _annual product_, then, is the
result of the _useful_ labour expended during the year; but only a part
of the _value_ of the annual _product_ has been created during the year;
this portion is the annual _value-product_, in which the quantity of
labour set in motion during the year is represented.

Hence, if Adam Smith says in the passage just cited:

“The annual labour of every nation is the fund which originally supplies
it with all the necessaries and conveniences of life which it annually
consumes, etc.,”

he takes the one-sided standpoint of solely useful labour, which has
indeed given all these means of subsistence their consumable form. But
he forgets that this was impossible without the assistance of
instruments and subjects of labour supplied by former years, and that,
therefore, the “annual labour,” while it created value, did not create
all the value of the products fabricated by it; that the value newly
produced is smaller than the value of the product.

While we cannot reproach Adam Smith for going in this analysis no
farther than all his successors (although a step in the right direction
could already be discerned among the physiocrats), he subsequently gets
lost in a chaos and this mainly because his “esoteric” conception of the
value of commodities in general is constantly contravened by exoteric
conceptions, which on the whole prevail with him, and yet his scientific
instinct permits the esoteric standpoint to re-appear from time to time.

4. Capital and Revenue in Adam Smith

That portion of the value of every commodity (and therefore also of the
annual product) which is but an equivalent of the wages, is equal to the
capital advanced by the capitalist for labour-power; i.e., is equal to
the variable portion of the total capital advanced. The capitalist
recovers this portion of the total capital through a portion of the
newly produced value of the commodities supplied by the wage-labourers.
Whether the variable capital is advanced in the sense that the
capitalist pays the labourer in money for his share in a product which
is not yet ready for sale or which, though ready, has not yet been sold
by the capitalist, or whether he pays him with money already obtained by
the sale of commodities previously supplied by the labourer, or whether
he has drawn this money in advance by means of credit — in all these
cases the capitalist expends variable capital, which passes into the
hands of the labourers in the form of money, and on the other hand he
possesses the equivalent of this capital-value in that portion of the
value of his commodities in which the labourer has produced anew his
share of its total value, in other words, in which he has produced the
value of his own wages. Instead of giving him this portion of the value
in the bodily form of his own product, the capitalist pays it to him in
money. For the capitalist the variable portion of his advanced
capital-value now exists in the form of commodities, while the labourer
has received the equivalent for his sold labour-power in the form of
money.

Now while that portion of the capital advanced by the capitalist, which
has been converted by the purchase of labour-power into variable
capital, functions in the process of production itself as operative
labour-power and by the expenditure of this power is produced anew as a
new value, in the form of commodities, i.e., is reproduced — hence a
reproduction, or new production, of advanced capital-value — the
labourer spends the value, or price, of his sold labour-power on means
of subsistence, on means for the reproduction of his labour-power. An
amount of money equal to the variable capital forms his income, hence
his revenue, which lasts only so long as he can sell his labour-power to
the capitalist.

The commodity of the wage-labourer — his labour power — serves as a
commodity only to the extent that it is incorporated in the capital of
the capitalist, acts as capital; on the other hand the capital expended
by the capitalist as money-capital in the purchase of labour-power
functions as a revenue in the hands of the seller of labour-power, the
wage labourer.

Various processes of circulation and production intermingle here, which
Adam Smith does not distinguish.

_First_: Acts pertaining to the process of _circulation_. The labourer
sells his commodity — labour-power — to the capitalist; the money with
which the capitalist buys it is from his point of view money invested
for the production of surplus-value, hence money-capital; it is not
spent but advanced. (This is the real meaning of “advance” — the
_avance_ of the physiocrats — no matter where the capitalist gets the
money. Every value which the capitalist pays out for the purposes of the
productive process is advanced from his point of view, regardless of
whether this takes place before or _post festum_; it is advanced to the
process of production itself.) The same takes place here as in every
other sale of commodities: The seller gives away a use-value (in this
case his labour-power) and receives its value (realises its price) in
money; the buyer gives away his money and receives in return the
commodity itself — in this case labour-power.

_Second_: In the process of _production_ the purchased labour-power now
forms a part of the functioning capital, and the labourer himself serves
here merely as a special bodily form of this capital, distinguished from
its elements existing in the bodily form of means of production. During
the process, by expending his labour-power, the labourer adds value to
the means of production which he converts into products equal to the
value of his labour-power (exclusive of surplus-value); he therefore
reproduces for the capitalist in the form of commodities that portion of
his capital which has been, or has to be, advanced by him for wages,
produces for him an equivalent of the latter; hence he reproduces for
the capitalist that capital which the latter can “advance” once more for
the purchase of labour-power.

_Third_: In the sale of a commodity one portion of its selling price
replaces the variable capital advanced by the capitalist, whereby on the
one hand he is enabled anew to buy labour-power, and the labourer on the
other to sell it anew.

In all purchases and sales of commodities — so far as only these
transactions are under discussion — it is quite immaterial what becomes
of the proceeds the seller receives for his commodities, and what
becomes of the bought articles of use in the hands of the buyer. Hence,
so far as the mere process of circulation is concerned, it is quite
immaterial that the labour-power bought by the capitalist reproduces
capital-value for him, and that on the other hand the money received by
the labourer as the purchase-price of his labour-power constitutes his
revenue. The magnitude of value of the labourer’s article of commerce,
his labour-power, is not affected either by its forming “revenue” for
him or by the fact that the use of this article of commerce by the buyer
reproduces capital-value for this buyer.

Since the value of labour-power — i.e., the adequate selling price of
this commodity — is determined by the quantity of labour required for
its reproduction, and this quantity of labour itself is here determined
by that needed for the production of the necessary means of subsistence
of the labourer, hence for the maintenance of his existence, the wages
become the revenue on which the labourer has to live.

It is entirely wrong, when Adam Smith says (p. 223):

“_That portion of the stock_ which is laid out in maintaining productive
hands ... after having served in the function of a capital to him [the
capitalist] ... constitutes a revenue to them” [the labourers].

The _money_ with which the capitalist pays for the labour-power
purchased by him “serves in the function of a capital to him,” since he
thereby incorporates labour-power in the material constituents of his
capital and thus enables his capital to function altogether as
productive capital. We must make this distinction: The labour-power is a
_commodity_, not capital, in the hands of the labourer, and it
constitutes for him a revenue so long as he can continuously repeat its
sale; it functions as capital _after_ its sale, in the hands of the
capitalist, during the process of production itself. That which here
serves twice is labour-power: as a commodity which is sold at its value,
in the hands of the labourer; as a power-producing value and use-value,
in the hands of the capitalist who has bought it. But the labourer does
not receive the money from the capitalist until after he has given him
the use of his labour-power, after it has already been realised in the
value of the product of labour. The capitalist possesses this value
before he pays for it. Hence it is not the money which functions twice:
first, as the money-form of the variable capital, and then as wages. On
the contrary it is labour-power which has functioned twice: first, as a
_commodity_ in the sale of labour-power (in stipulating the amount of
wages to be paid, money acts merely as an ideal measure of value and
need not even be in the hands of the capitalist); secondly, in the
process of production, in which it functions as _capital_, i.e., as an
element, in the hands of the capitalist, creating use-value and value.
Labour-power already supplied, in the form of commodities, the
equivalent which is to be paid to the labourer, before it is paid by the
capitalist to the labourer in money-form. Hence the labourer himself
creates the fund out of which the capitalist pays him. But this is not
all.

The money which the labourer receives is spent by him in order to
preserve his labour-power, or — viewing the capitalist class and the
working-class in their totality — in order to preserve for the
capitalist the instrument by means of which alone he can remain a
capitalist.

Thus the continuous purchase and sale of labour-power perpetuates on the
one hand labour-power as an element of capital, by virtue of which the
latter appears as the creator of commodities, articles of use having
value, by virtue of which, furthermore, that portion of capital which
buys labour-power is continually restored by labour-power’s own product,
and consequently the labourer himself constantly creates the fund of
capital out of which he is paid. On the other hand the constant sale of
labour-power becomes the source, ever renewing itself, of the
maintenance of the labourer and hence his labour-power appears as that
faculty through which he secures the revenue by which he lives. Revenue
in this case signifies nothing else than a appropriation of values
effected by ever repeated sales of a commodity (labour-power), these
values serving only for the continual reproduction of the commodity to
be sold. And to this extent Smith is right when he says that the portion
of the value of the product created by the labourer himself for which
the capitalist pays him an equivalent in the form of wages, becomes the
source of revenue for the labourer. But this does not alter the nature
or magnitude of this portion of the value of the commodity any more than
the value of the means of production is changed by the fact that they
function as capital-values, or the nature and magnitude of a straight
line are changed by the fact that it serves as the base of some triangle
or as the diameter of some ellipse. The value of labour-power remains
quite as independently definite as that of those means of production.
This portion of the value of a commodity neither _consists of_ revenue
as an independent factor constituting this value-part nor does it
_resolve itself_ into revenue. While this new value constantly
reproduced by the labourer constitutes a source of revenue for him, his
revenue conversely is not a constituent of the new value produced by
him. The magnitude of the share paid to him of the new value created by
him determines the value-magnitude of his revenue, not vice versa. The
fact that this part of the newly created value forms a revenue for him,
indicates merely what becomes of it, shows the character of its
application, and has no more to do with its formation than with that of
any other value. If my receipts are ten shillings a week that changes
nothing in the _nature_ of the value of the ten shillings, nor in the
_magnitude_ of their value. As in the case of every other commodity so
in that of labour-power its value is determined by the amount of this
labour is necessary for its reproduction; that the amount of this labour
is determined by the value of the labourer’s necessary means of
subsistence, hence is equal to the labour required for the reproduction
of the very conditions of his life — that is peculiar for this commodity
(labour-power), but no more peculiar than the fact that the value of
labouring cattle is determined by the value of the means of subsistence
necessary for its maintenance, i.e., by the amount of human labour
necessary to produce these means of subsistence.

But it is this category of “revenue” which is to blame for all the
harmful confusion in Adam Smith. The various kinds of revenue form with
him the “COMPONENT PARTS” of the annually produced, newly created
commodity-value, while, vice versa, the two parts into which this
commodity-value resolves itself _for the capitalist_ — the equivalent of
his variable capital advanced in the form of money when purchasing
labour, and the other portion of the value, the surplus- value, which
likewise belongs to him but did not cost him anything — form sources of
revenue. The equivalent of the variable capital is advanced again for
labour-power and to that extent forms a revenue for the labourer in the
shape of wages; since the other portion, the surplus-value, does not
serve to replace any advance of capital for the capitalist, it may be
spent by him in articles of consumption (both necessities and luxuries)
or consumed as revenue instead of forming capital-value of any
description. Commodity-value itself is the preliminary condition of this
revenue and its component parts differ, from the point of view of the
capitalist, only to the extent that they constitute either an equivalent
for an excess _over_ the variable capital-value advanced by him. Both of
them consist of nothing but labour-power expended during the production
of commodities, rendered fluent in labour. They consist of outlay, not
income or revenue — of outlay of labour.

In accordance with the _quid pro quo_, by which the revenue becomes the
source of commodity-value instead of the commodity-value being the
source of revenue, the value of commodities new has the appearance of
being “composed” of the various kinds of revenue; these revenues are
determined independently of one another, and the total value of
commodities is determined by the addition of the values of these
revenues. But now the question is how to determine the value of each of
these revenues which are supposed to form commodity-value. In the case
of wages it can be done, for wages represent the value of their
commodity, labour-power, and this value is determinable (the same as
that of all other commodities) by the labour required for the
reproduction of this commodity. But surplus-value, or, as Adam Smith has
it, its two forms, profit and rent, how are they determined? Here Adam
Smith has but empty phrases to offer. At one time he represents wages
and surplus-value (or wages and profit) as component parts of the value,
or price, of commodities; at another, and almost in the same breath, as
parts into which the price of commodities “RESOLVES ITSELF”; but this
means on the contrary that the commodity-value is the thing given first
and that different parts of this given value fall in the form of
different revenues to the share of different persons engaged in the
productive process. This is by no means identical with the notion that
value is “composed” of these three “component parts.” If I determine the
lengths of three different straight lines independently, and then form
out of these three lines as “component parts” a fourth straight line
equal to their sum, it is by no means the same procedure as when I have
some given straight line before me and for some purpose divide it,
“resolve” it, so to say, into three different parts. In the first case,
the length of the line changes throughout with the lengths of the three
lines whose sum it is; in the second case, the lengths of the three
parts of the line are from the outset limited by the fact that they are
parts of a line of given length.

As a matter of fact, if we adhere to that part of Smith’s exposition
which is correct, namely, that _the value newly created by the annual
labour_ and contained in the annual social commodity-product (the same
as in every individual commodity, or every daily, weekly, etc., product)
is equal to the value of the variable capital advanced (i.e., to the
value-part intended to purchase new labour-power) plus the surplus-value
which the capitalist can realise in means of his individual consumption
— simple reproduction being assumed and other circumstances remaining
the same; if we furthermore keep in mind that Adam Smith lumps together
labour, so far as it creates value and is an expenditure of
labour-power, and labour, so far as it creates use value, i.e., is
expended in a useful, appropriate manner — then the entire conception
amounts to this: The value of every commodity is the product of labour;
hence this is also true of the value of the product of the annual labour
or of the value of society’s annual commodity-product. But since all
labour resolves itself 1) into necessary labour-time, in which the
labourer reproduces merely an equivalent for the capital advanced in the
purchase of his labour-power, and 2) into surplus-labour, by which he
supplies the capitalist with a value for which the latter does not give
any equivalent, hence surplus-value, it follows that all commodity value
can resolve itself only into these two component parts, so that
ultimately it forms a revenue for the working-class in the form of
wages, and for the capitalist class in the form of surplus-value. As for
the constant capital-value, i.e., the value of the means of production
consumed in the creation of the annual product, it cannot be explained
how this value gets into that of the new product (except for the phrase
that the capitalist charges the buyer with it in the sale of his goods),
but ULTIMATELY, since the means of production are themselves products of
labour, this portion of value can, in turn, consist only of an
equivalent of the variable capital and of surplus-value, of a product of
necessary labour and of surplus-labour. The fact that the values of
these means of production function in the hands of their employers as
capital-values does not prevent them from having “originally,” in the
hands of others if we go to the bottom of the matter — even though at
some previous time — resolved themselves into the same two portions of
value, hence into two different sources of revenue.

One point herein is correct: that the matter presents itself differently
in the movement of social capital, i.e., of the totality of individual
capitals, from the way it presents itself for each individual capital
considered separately, hence from the standpoint of each individual
capitalist. For the latter the value of commodities resolves itself into
1) a constant element (a fourth one, as Adam Smith says), and 2) the sum
of wages and surplus-value, or wages, profit and rent. But from the
point of view of society the fourth element of Adam Smith, the constant
capital-value, disappears.

5. Recapitulation

The absurd formula that the three revenues, wages, profit and rent, form
the three “component parts” of the value of commodities originates with
Adam Smith from the more plausible idea that the value of commodities
“RESOLVES ITSELF” into these three component parts. This is likewise
incorrect, even granted that the value of commodities is divisible only
into an equivalent of the consumed labour-power and the surplus-value
created by it. But the mistake rests here too on a deeper, a true
foundation. Capitalist production is based on the fact that the
productive labourer sells his own labour-power, as his commodity, to the
capitalist, in whose hands it then functions merely as an element of his
productive capital. This transaction, which pertains to circulation —
the sale and purchase of labour-power — not only inaugurates the process
of production, but also determines implicitly its specific character.
The production of a use-value, and even that of a commodity (for this
can be carried on also by independent productive labourers), is here
only a means of producing absolute and relative surplus-value for a
capitalist. For this reason we have seen in the analysis of the process
of production that the production of absolute and relative surplus-value
determines 1) the duration of the daily labour-process and 2) the entire
social and technical configuration of the capitalist process of
production. Within this process there is realised the distinction
between the mere conservation of value (of the constant capital-value),
the actual reproduction of advanced value (equivalent of labour-power),
and the production of surplus-value, i.e., of value for which the
capitalist has neither advanced an equivalent previously nor will
advance one _post festum_.

The appropriation of surplus-value — a value in excess of the equivalent
of the value advanced by the capitalist — although inaugurated by the
purchase and sale of labour-power, is an act performed within the
process of production itself, and forms an essential element of it.

The introductory act, which constitutes an act of circulation — the
purchase and sale of labour-power — itself rests on a distribution of
the _elements_ of production which preceded and presupposed the
distribution of the social _products_, namely on the separation of
labour-power as a commodity of the labourer from the means of production
as the property of non-labourers.

However this appropriation of surplus-value, or this separation of the
production of value into a reproduction of advanced value and a
production of new value (surplus-value) which does not replace any
equivalent, does not alter in any way the substance of value itself or
the nature of the production of value. The substance of value is and
remains nothing but expended labour-power — labour independent of the
specific, useful character of this expenditure. A serf for instance
expends his labour-power for six days, labours for six days, and the
fact of this expenditure as such is not altered by the circumstance that
he may be working three days for himself, on his own field, and three
days for his lord, on the field of the latter. Both his voluntary labour
for himself and his forced labour for his lord are equally labour; so
far as this labour is considered with reference to the values, or to the
useful articles created by it, there is no difference in his six days of
labour. The difference refers merely to the different conditions by
which the expenditure of his labour-power during both halves of his
labour-time of six days is called forth. The same applies to the
necessary and surplus-labour of the wage-labourer.

The process of production expires in the commodity. The fact that
labour-power was expended in its fabrication now appears as a material
property of the commodity, as the property of possessing value. The
magnitude of this value is measured by the amount of labour expended;
the value of a commodity resolves itself into nothing else besides and
is not composed of anything else. If I have drawn a straight line of
definite length, I have, to start with, “produced” a straight line
(true, only symbolically, as I know beforehand) by resort to the art of
drawing, which is practised in accordance with certain rules (laws)
independent of myself. If I divide this line into three sections (which
may correspond to a certain problem), every one of these sections
remains a straight line, and the entire line, whose sections they are,
does not resolve itself by this division into anything different from a
straight line, for instance into some kind of curve. Neither can I
divide a line of a given length in such a way that the sum of its parts
is greater than the undivided line itself; hence the length of the
undivided line is not determined by any arbitrarily fixed lengths of its
parts. Vice versa, the relative lengths of these parts are limited from
the outset by the size of the line whose parts they are.

In this a commodity produced by a capitalist does not differ in any way
from that produced by an independent labourer or by communities of
working-people or by slaves. But in the present case the entire product
of labour, as well as its entire value, belongs to the capitalist. Like
every other producer he has to convert his commodity by sale into money
before he can manipulate it further; he must convert it into the form of
the universal equivalent.

Let us examine the commodity-product before it is converted into money.
It belongs wholly to the capitalist. On the other hand as a useful
product of labour, a use-value, it is entirely the product of a past
labour-process. Not so its value. One portion of this value is but the
value of the means of production expended in the production of this
commodity and re-appearing in a new form. This value has not been
produced during the process of production of this commodity, for the
means of production possessed this value before the process of
production, independently of it; they entered into this process as the
vehicles of this value; it is only its form of appearance that has been
renewed and altered. This portion of the value of the commodity
constitutes for the capitalist an equivalent of the portion of the
constant capital-value advanced and consumed in the production of the
commodity. It existed previously in the form of means of production; it
exists now as a component part of the value of the newly produced
commodity. As soon as this commodity has been turned into money, the
value now existing in the form of money must be reconverted into means
of production, into its original form determined by the process of
production and its function in it. Nothing is altered in the character
of the value of a commodity by the function of this value as capital.

A second portion of the value of a commodity is the value of the
labour-power which the wage-worker sells to the capitalist. It is
determined, the same as that of the means of production, independently
of the process of production into which labour-power is to enter, and it
is fixed in an act of circulation, the purchase and sale of
labour-power, before the latter enters the process of production. By
means of his function — the expenditure of labour-power — the
wage-labourer produces a commodity-value equal to the value which the
capitalist has to pay him for the use of his labour-power. He gives this
value to the capitalist in the form of a commodity and is paid for it by
him in money. That this portion of the commodity-value is for the
capitalist but an equivalent for the variable capital which he has to
advance in wages does not alter in any way the fact that it is a
commodity-value newly created during the process of production and
consisting of nothing but what surplus-value consists of, namely, past
expenditure of labour-power. Nor is this truth affected by the fact that
the value of the labour-power paid by the capitalist to the labourer in
the form of wages and assumes the form of a revenue for the labourer,
and that not only labour-power is continually reproduced thereby but
also the class of wage-labourers as such, and thus the basis of the
entire capitalist production.

However, the sum of these two portions of value does not comprise the
whole of commodity-value. There remains an excess over both of them —
the surplus-value. This, like the portion of value which replaces the
variable capital advanced in wages, is a value newly created by the
labourer during the process of production — congealed labour. But it
does not cost the owner of the entire product, the capitalist, anything.
This circumstance actually permits the capitalist to consume the
surplus-value entirely as revenue, unless he has to surrender parts of
it to other participants — such as ground-rent to the landlord, in which
case such portions constitute a revenue of such third persons. This same
circumstance was the compelling motive that induced our capitalist to
engage at all in the manufacture of commodities. But neither his
original benevolent intention of snatching surplus-value, nor its
subsequent expenditure as revenue by him or others affects the
surplus-value as such. They do not impair the fact that it is congealed
unpaid labour, nor the magnitude of this surplus-value, which is
determined by entirely different conditions.

However, if Adam Smith wanted to occupy himself, as he did, with the
role of the various parts of this value in the total process of
reproduction, even while he was investigating the value of commodities,
it would be evident that while some particular parts function as
revenue, others function just as continually as capital — and
consequently, according to his logic, should have been designated as
constituent parts of the commodity-value, or parts into which this value
resolves itself.

Adam Smith identifies the production of commodities in general with
capitalist commodity production; the means of production are to him from
the outset “capital,” labour is from the outset wage-labour, and
therefore

“the number of useful and productive labourers ... is everywhere in
proportion TO THE QUANTITY OF CAPITAL STOCK WHICH EMPLOYED IN SETTING
THEM TO WORK.” (Introduction, p. 12.)

In short, the various factors of the labour-process — both objective and
personal — appear from the first with the masks characteristic of the
period of capitalist production. The analysis of the value of
commodities therefore coincides directly with the consideration of the
extent to which this value is on the one hand a mere equivalent of
capital laid out, and on the other, to what extent it forms “free”
value, value not replacing any advanced capital-value, or surplus-value.
Compared from this point of view, parts of commodity-value thus
transform themselves imperceptibly into its independent “component
parts,” and finally into the “sources of all value.” A further
conclusion is that commodity-value is composed of, or “resolves itself”
into, revenues of various kinds, so that the revenues do not consist of
commodity-values but the commodity-value consists of “revenues.” As
little, however, as the nature of a commodity-value as such, or of money
as such, is changed through their functioning as capital-value, just so
little is the nature of a commodity-value as capital-value, just so
little is the nature of a commodity-value changed on account of its
functioning later as a revenue for some particular person. The commodity
with which Adam Smith has to deal is from the outset commodity-capital
(which comprises surplus-value in addition to the capital-value consumed
in the production of the commodity); it is therefore a commodity
produced capitalistically, the result of the capitalist process of
production. It would have been necessary, then, to analyse first this
process, and also the process of self-expansion and of the formation of
value, which it includes. Since this process is in its turn premised by
the circulation of commodities, its description requires also a
preliminary and independent analysis of the commodity. However, even
where Adam Smith at times hits “esoterically” upon the correct thing he
always takes into consideration the formation of value only as
incidental to the analysis of commodities, i.e., to the analysis of
commodity-capital.

III. Later Economists ^([41])

Ricardo reproduces the theory of Adam Smith almost verbatim:

“It must be understood that all the productions of a country are
consumed; but it makes the greatest difference imaginable whether they
are consumed by those who reproduced, or by those who do not reproduce
another value. When we say that revenue is saved, and added to capital,
what we mean is, that the portion of revenue, so said to be added to the
capital, is consumed by productive instead of unproductive labourers.”
(_Principles_, p. 163.)

In fact Ricardo fully accepted the theory of Adam Smith concerning the
resolution of the price of commodities into wages and surplus-value (or
variable capital and surplus-value). The points of dispute with him are
1) the component parts of the surplus-value: he eliminates ground-rent
as an essential element of it; 2) Ricardo _splits_ the price of the
commodity into these component parts. The magnitude of value is, then,
the _prius_. The sum of component parts is assumed as a given magnitude,
it is the starting point, while Adam Smith frequently acts to the
contrary, against his own better judgement, by subsequently deducing the
magnitude of value of the commodity through the sum of the component
parts.

Ramsay makes the following remark against Ricardo:

“... He seems always to consider the whole produce as divided between
wages and profits, forgetting the part necessary for replacing fixed
capital.” (_An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth_, Edinburgh, 1836, p.
174.)

By fixed capital Ramsay means the same thing that I mean by constant
capital:

“Fixed capital exists in a form in which, though assisting to raise the
future commodity, it does not maintain labourers.” (_Ibid_., p. 59.)

Adam Smith opposed the necessary conclusion of his resolution of the
value of commodities, and therefore also of the value of the social
annual product into wages and surplus-value and therefore into mere
revenue — the conclusion that in this event the entire annual product
might be consumed. It is never the original thinkers that draw the
absurd conclusions. They leave that to the Says and MacCullochs.

Say, indeed, settles the matter easy enough. That which is an advance of
capital for one, is or was a revenue and net product for another. The
difference between the gross and the net product is purely subjective,
and

“thus the total value of all products, has been distributed in society
as revenue.” (Say, _Traitè d’Economie Politique_, 1817, II, p. 64.) “The
total value of every product is composed of the profits of the
landowners, the capitalists, and those who ply industrial trades” [wages
figure here as _profits des industrieux_!] “who have contributed towards
its production. This makes the revenue of society equal to the _gross
value produced_, not equal to the net products of the soil, as was
believed by the sect of the economists” [the physiocrats]. (p. 63.)

Among others, Proudhon has appropriated this discovery of Say.

Storch, who likewise accepts Adam Smith’s doctrine in principle, finds
however that Say’s practical application of it does not hold water.

“If it is admitted that the revenue of a nation is equal to its gross
product, i.e., that no capital” [it should say: no constant capital] “is
to be deducted, then it must also be admitted that this nation may
consume unproductively the entire value of its annual product without
the least detriment to its future revenue.... The products which
represent the” [constant] “capital of a nation are not consumable.”
(Storch, _Considérations sur la nature du revenu national_, Paris, 1824,
pp. 147, 150.)

However, Storch forgot to tell us how the existence of this constant
portion of capital harmonises with the Smithian analysis of prices
accepted by him, according to which the value of commodities contains
only wages and surplus-value, but no part of any constant capital. He
realises only through Say that this analysis of prices leads to absurd
results, and his own last word on the subject is

“that it is impossible to resolve the necessary price into its simplest
elements.” (_Cours d’Économie Politique_, Petersburg, 1815, II, p. 141.)

Sismondi, who occupies himself particularly with the relation of capital
to revenue, and in actual fact makes the peculiar formulation of this
relation the _differentia specifica_ of his _Nouveaux Principes_, did
not say _one_ scientific word, did not contribute one iota to the
clarification of the problem.

Barton, Ramsay, and Cherbuliez attempt to go beyond the formulation of
Adam Smith. They founder because they pose the problem one-sidedly from
the outset by failing to make clear the distinction between constant and
variable capital-value and between fixed and circulating capital.

John Stuart Mill likewise reproduces, with his usual pomposity, the
doctrine handed down by Adam Smith to his followers. As a result, the
Smithian confusion of thought persists to this hour and his dogma is one
of the orthodox articles of faith of Political Economy.

Notes

35. Beginning of Manuscript VIII. — _F. E._

36. _Kapital_, Band I, 2. Ausgabe, S. 612, Note 32. [Eng. ed., Moscow,
1954, p. 591, Note 1.]

37. Some physiocrats had paved the way for him even here, especially
Turgot. The latter uses the term capital for _avances_ more frequently
than Quesnay and the other physiocrats and identifies still more the
_avances_, or _capitaux_, of the manufacturers with those of the
farmers. For instance: “Like these (the entrepreneurs-manufacturers),
they (_les fermiers_, i.e., the capitalist farmers) must receive in
addition to returning capitals, etc.” (Turgot, _Oeuvres_, Daire edition,
Paris, 1844, Vol. I, p. 40.)

38. In order that the reader may not misconstrue the meaning of the
phrase “the price of the far greater part of commodities,” the following
shows how Adam Smith himself explains this term. For instance, no rent
enters into the price of sea fish, only wages and profit, only wages
enter into the price of Scotch pebbles. He says: “In some parts of
Scotland a few poor people make a trade of gathering, along the
sea-shore, those little variegated stones commonly known by the name of
Scotch pebbles. The price which is paid to them by the stone-cutter is
altogether the wages of their labour; neither rent nor profit makes any
part of it.”

39. I reproduce this sentence verbatim from the manuscript, although it
seems to contradict, in its present context, both what precedes and
immediately follow. This apparent contradiction is resolved further down
in No. 4: Capital and Revenue in Adam Smith. — _F. E._

40. We ignore the fact that Adam Smith was here particularly unfortunate
in the choice of his example. The value of the corn resolves itself into
wages, profit, and rent only because the food consumed by the labouring
cattle is depicted as wages of the labouring cattle, and the labouring
cattle as wage-labourers, so that the wage-labourer on his part is also
depicted as labouring cattle. (Added from the Manuscript II. — _F. E._)

41. From here to the end of the chapter, a supplement from Manuscript
II. — _F. E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 20: Simple Reproduction - Part 1

I. The Formulation of the Question

If we study the annual function of social capital — hence of the total
capital of which the individual capitals form only fractional parts,
whose movement is their individual movement and simultaneously
integrating link in the movement of the total capital — and its results,
i.e., if we study the commodity-product furnished by society during the
year, then it must become apparent how the process of reproduction of
the social capital takes place, what characteristics distinguish this
process of reproduction from the process of reproduction of an
individual capital, and what characteristics are common to both. The
annual product includes those portions of the social product which
replace capital, namely social reproduction, as well as those which go
to the consumption-fund, those which are consumed by labourers and
capitalists, hence both productive and individual consumption. It
comprises also the reproduction (i.e., maintenance) of the capitalist
class and the working-class, and thus the reproduction of the capitalist
character of the entire process of production.

It is evidently the circulation formula

C' — {

M — C ... P... C'

 

m — c

which we have to analyse, and consumption necessarily plays a role in
it; for the point of departure, C' = C + c, the commodity-capital
embraces both the constant and variable capital-value, and the
surplus-value. Its movement therefore includes both individual and
productive consumption. In the circuits M — C ... P... C'— M' and P ...
C'— M'— C ... P, the movement of the _capital_ is the starting and
finishing point. And of course this includes consumption, for the
commodity, the product, must be sold. When this has assumedly been done
it is immaterial for the movement of the individual capital what becomes
of the commodities subsequently. On the other hand in the movement of C'
... C' the conditions of social reproduction are discernible precisely
from the fact that it must be shown what becomes of every portion of
value of this total product, C'. In this case the total process of
reproduction includes the process of consumption brought about by the
circulation quite as much as the process of reproduction of the capital
itself.

For our present purpose this process of reproduction must be studied
from the point of view of the replacement of the value as well as the
substance of the individual component parts of C'. We cannot rest
content any longer, as we did in the analysis of the value of the
product of the individual capital, with the _assumption_ that the
individual capitalist can first convert the component parts of his
capital into money by the sale of his commodities, and then reconvert
them into productive capital by renewed purchase of the elements of
production in the commodity-market. Inasmuch as those elements of
production are by nature material, they represent as much a constituent
of the social capital as the individual finished product, which is
exchanged for them and replaced by them. Contrariwise the movement of
that portion of the social commodity-product which is consumed by the
labourer in expending his wages, and by the capitalist in expending his
surplus-value, not only forms an integral part of the movement of the
total product but intermingles with the movements of the individual
capitals, and therefore this process cannot be explained by merely
assuming it.

The question that confronts us directly is this: How is the _capital_
consumed in production replaced in value out of the annual product and
how does the movement of this replacement intertwine with the
consumption of the surplus-value by the capitalists and of the wages by
the labourers? It is then first a matter of reproduction on a simple
scale. It is furthermore assumed that products are exchanged at their
values and also that there is no revolution in the values of the
component parts of productive capital. The fact that prices diverge from
values cannot, however, exert any influence on the movements of the
social capital. On the whole, there is the same exchange of the same
quantities of products, although the individual capitalists are involved
in value-relations no longer proportional to their respective advances
and to the quantities of surplus-value produced singly by every one of
them. As for revolutions in value, they do not alter anything in the
relations between the value-components of the total annual product,
provided they are universally and evenly distributed. To the extent
however that they are partially and unevenly distributed, they represent
disturbances which, in the _first_ place, can be understood as such only
as far as they are regarded as _divergences_ from unchanged
value-relations, but in the _second_ place, once there is proof of the
law according to which one portion of the value of the annual product
replaces constant, and another portion variable capital, a revolution
either in the value of the constant or that of the variable capital
would not alter anything in this law. It would change merely the
relative magnitudes of the portions of value which function in the one
or the other capacity, because other values would have taken the places
of the original ones.

So long as we looked upon the production of value and the value of the
product of capital individually, the bodily form of the commodities
produced was wholly immaterial for the analysis, whether it was
machines, for instance, corn, or looking glasses. It was always but a
matter of illustration, and any branch of production could have served
that purpose equally well. What we dealt with was the immediate process
of production itself, which presents itself at every point as the
process of some individual capital. So far as the reproduction of
capital was concerned, it was sufficient to assume that that portion of
the product in commodities which represents capital-value finds an
opportunity in the sphere of circulation to reconvert itself into its
elements of production and thus into its form of productive capital;
just as it sufficed to assume that both the labourer and the capitalist
find in the market those commodities on which they spend their wages and
the surplus-value. This merely formal manner of presentation is no
longer adequate in the study of the total social capital and of the
value of its products. The reconversion of one portion of the value of
the product into capital and the passing of another portion into the
individual consumption of the capitalist as well as the working-class
form a movement within the value of the product itself in which the
result of the aggregate capital finds expression; and this movement is
not only a replacement of value, but also a replacement in material and
is therefore as much bound up with the relative proportions of the
value-components of the total social product as with their use-value,
their material shape. Simple reproduction, reproduction on the same
scale, appears as an abstraction, inasmuch as on the one hand the
absence of all accumulation or reproduction on an extended scale is a
strange assumption in capitalist conditions, and on the other hand
conditions of production do not remain exactly the same in different
years (and this is assumed). The assumption is that a social capital of
a given magnitude produces the same quantity of commodity-value this
year as last, and supplies the same quantum of wants, although the forms
of the commodities may change in the process of reproduction. However,
as far as accumulation does take place, simple reproduction is always a
part of it, and can therefore be studied by itself, and is an actual
factor of accumulation. The value of the annual product may decrease,
although the quantity of use-values may remain the same; or the value
may remain the same although the quantity of the use-values may
decrease; or the quantity of value and of the reproduced use-values may
decrease simultaneously. All this amounts to reproduction taking place
either under more favourable conditions than before or under more
difficult ones, which may result in imperfect — defective —
reproduction. All this can refer only to the quantitative aspect of the
various elements of reproduction, not to the role which they play as
reproducing capital or as a reproduced revenue in the entire process.

II. The Two Departments of Social Production

The total product, and therefore the total production, of society may be
divided into two major departments:

I. _Means of Production_, commodities having a form in which they must,
or at least may, pass into productive consumption.

II. _Articles of Consumption_, commodities having a form in which they
pass into the individual consumption of the capitalist and the
working-class.

All the various branches of production pertaining to each of these two
departments form one single great branch of production, that of the
means of production in the one case, and that of articles of consumption
in the other. The aggregate capital employed in each of these two
branches of production constitutes a separate large department of the
social capital.

In each department the capital consists of two parts:

1) _Variable Capital_. This capital, so far as its _value_ is concerned,
is equal to the value of the social labour-power employed in this branch
of production; in other words, it is equal to the sum of the wages paid
for this labour-power. So far as its substance is concerned, it consists
of the labour-power in action, i.e., of the living labour set in motion
by this capital-value.

2) _Constant Capital_. This is the value of all the means of production
employed for productive purposes in this branch. These, again, are
divided into _fixed capital_, such as machines, instruments of labour,
buildings, labouring animals, etc., and _circulating_ constant capital,
such as materials of production: raw and auxiliary materials,
semi-finished products, etc.

The value of the total annual product created with the aid of this
capital in each of the two departments consists of one portion which
represents the constant capital c consumed in the process of production
and only transferred to the product in accordance with its value, and of
another portion added by the entire labour of the year. This latter
portion is divided in turn into the replacement of the advanced variable
capital v and the excess over and above it, which forms the
surplus-value s. And just as the value of every individual commodity,
that of the entire annual product of each department consists of
c + v + s.

Portion c of the value, representing the constant capital _consumed_ in
production, does not coincide with the value of the constant capital
_employed_ in production. True, the materials of production are entirely
consumed and their values completely transferred to the product. But
only a portion of the employed _fixed_ capital is wholly consumed and
its value thus transferred to the product. Another part of the fixed
capital, such as machines, buildings, etc., continues to exist and
function the same as before, though depreciated to the extent of the
annual wear and tear. This persistent portion of the fixed capital does
not exist for us, when we consider the value of the product. It is a
portion of the capital-value, which exists independently and alongside
of this newly produced commodity-value. This was shown previously in the
analysis of the value of the product of individual capital (Vol. I, Ch.
VIII.). However, for the present we must leave aside the method of
analysis employed there. We saw in the study of the value of the product
of individual capital that the value of which the fixed capital was
shorn through wear and tear is transferred to the product created during
the time of wear, irrespective of whether or not any portion of this
fixed capital is replaced in kind during this time out of the value thus
transferred. At this point in the study of the total social product and
of its value, however, we are compelled, at least for the present, to
leave out of account that portion of value which is transferred from the
fixed capital to the annual product by wear and tear, unless fixed
capital is replaced in kind during the year. In one of the following
sections of this chapter we shall discuss this point in particular.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We shall base our study of simple reproduction on the following scheme,
in which c stands for constant capital, v for variable capital, and s
for surplus-value, assuming the rate of surplus-value s/v to be 100 per
cent. The figures may indicate millions of marks, francs, or pounds
sterling.

I. Production of Means of Production:
Capital. . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) = 5,000
Commodity-Product . . . 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v), + 1,000_(s) = 6,000,

existing in means of production.

II. Production of Articles of Consumption:
Capital . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) = 2,500
Commodity-Product . . 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 3,000,

existing in articles of consumption.

Recapitulation: Total annual commodity-product:
I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) = 6,000 means of production
II. 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 3,000 articles of consumption.

Total value 9,000, exclusive of the fixed capital persisting in its
natural form, according to our assumption.

If we were now to examine the transformations necessary on the basis of
simple reproduction, where the entire surplus-value is unproductively
consumed, and leave aside for the present the money-circulation that
brings them about, we should obtain at the outset three great points of
support.

1) The 500_(v), representing wages of the labourers, and 500_(s),
representing surplus-value of the capitalists, in department II, must be
spent for articles of consumption. But their value exists in articles of
consumption worth 1,000, held by the capitalists of department II, which
replace the advanced 500_(v) and represent the 500_(s). Consequently the
wages and surplus-value of department II are exchanged within this
department for products of this same department. Thereby articles of
consumption to the amount of (500_(v) + 500_(s)) II = 1,000, drop out of
the total product.

2) The 1,000_(v) plus 1,000_(s) of department I must likewise be spent
for articles of consumption; in other words, for products of department
II. Hence they must be exchanged for the remainder of this product equal
to the constant capital part, 2,000_(c). Department II receives in
return an equal quantity of means of production, the product of I, in
which the value of 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) of I is incorporated. Thereby
2,000 II_(c) and (1,000_(v) +1,000_(s)) I drop out of the calculation.

3) There still remain 4,000 I_(c). These consist of means of production
which can be used only in department I to replace its consumed constant
capital, and are therefore disposed of by mutual exchange between the
individual capitalists of I, just as the (500_(v) + 500_(s)) II by an
exchange between the labourers and capitalists, or between the
individual capitalists of II.

Let this serve for the moment to facilitate the understanding of what
follows.

III. Exchange between the Two Departments I_((v + s)) versus II_(c)

We begin with the great exchange between the two classes. (1,000_(v) +
1,000_(s)) I — these values consisting, in the hands of their producers,
of means of production in their natural form, are exchanged for 2,000
II_(c), for values consisting of articles of consumption in their bodily
form. The capitalist class of II thereby reconverts its constant capital
of 2,000 from the form of articles of consumption into that of means of
production of articles of consumption, into a form in which it can once
more function as a factor of the labour-process and for purposes of
self-expansion of value as constant capital-value. On the other hand the
equivalent of the labour-power of I (1,000_(v)) and the surplus-value of
the capitalists of I (1,000_(s)) are realised thereby in articles of
consumption; both of them are converted from their bodily form of means
of production into a bodily form in which they can be consumed as
revenue.

Now, this mutual exchange is accomplished by means of a circulation of
money, which promotes it just as much as it renders its understanding
difficult, but which is of decisive importance because the variable
portion of capital must ever resume the form of money, as money-capital
converting itself from the form of money into labour-power. The variable
capital must be advanced in the form of money in all branches of
production carried on at the entire periphery of society simultaneously
alongside each other, regardless of whether they belong to category I or
II. The capitalist buys the labour-power before it enters into the
process of production, but pays for it only at stipulated times, after
it has been expended in the production of use-values. He owns, together
with the remainder of the value of the product, also that portion of it
which is only an equivalent for the money expended in the payment of
labour-power, that portion of the value of the product which represents
variable capital. In this portion of value the labourer has already
supplied the capitalist with the equivalent of his wages. But it is the
reconversion of commodities into money, their sale, which restores to
the capitalist his variable capital in the form of money-capital, which
he may advance once more for the purchase of labour-power.

In department I, then, the aggregate capitalist has paid £1,000 (I say £
solely to indicate that it is value in the _form of money_), equal to
1,000_(v), to the labourers for the value of product I already existing
as the v-portion, i.e., of the means of production created by them. With
these £1,000 the labourers buy articles of consumption of the same value
from capitalists II, thereby converting one half of the constant capital
II into money; capitalists II, in their turn, buy with these £1,000
means of production, valued at 1,000, from capitalists I; thereby, as
far as the latter are concerned, the variable capital-value equal to
1,000_(v), which, being part of their product, existed in the bodily
form of means of production, is thus reconverted into money and can now
function anew in the hands of capitalists I as money-capital, which is
transformed into labour-power, hence into the most essential element of
productive capital. In this way their variable capital flows back to
them in the form of money, as a result of the realisation of some of
their commodity-capital.

As for the money required to exchange the s-portion of commodity-capital
I for the second half of constant capital II, it may be advanced in
various ways. In reality this circulation embraces innumerable separate
purchases and sales by the individual capitalists of both categories,
the money coming in any event from these capitalists, since we have
already accounted for the money put into circulation by the labourers. A
capitalist of category II can buy, with the money-capital he has besides
his productive capital, means of production from capitalists of category
I, and, vice versa, a capitalist of category I can buy, with money-funds
assigned for personal and not for capital expenditure, articles of
consumption from capitalists of category II. A certain supply of money,
to be used either for the advancement of capital or for the expenditure
of revenue must under all circumstances be assumed to exist beside the
productive capital in the hands of the capitalists, as we have shown
above in parts I and II. Let us assume — the proportion is wholly
immaterial for our purpose — that one half of the money is advanced by
capitalists II in the purchase of means of production for the
replacement of their constant capital, while the other half is spent by
capitalists I for articles of consumption. In that case department II
advances £500 for the purchase of means of production from department I,
thereby replacing (inclusive of the above £1,000 coming from the
labourers of department I) three-quarters of its constant capital in
kind, with the £500 so obtained department I buys articles of
consumption from II, thereby completing for one half of the s-portion of
its commodity-capital the circulation c — m — c, and thus realising its
product in the consumption-fund. By means of this second process the
£500 return to the hands of II as money-capital existing beside its
productive capital. On the other hand I expends money to the amount of
£500 for the purchase of II’s articles of consumption in anticipation of
the sale of that half of the s-portion of its commodity-capital which is
still lying in store as product. With the same £500 II buys from I means
of production, thereby replacing in kind its entire constant capital
(1,000 + 500 + 500 = 2,000) while I realises its entire surplus-value in
articles of consumption. On the whole, the entire exchange of
commodities in the amount of £4,000 would be effected with a
money-circulation of £2,000 which amount is attained only because the
entire annual product is described as exchanged in bulk, in a few large
lots. The important point here is that II has not only reconverted its
constant capital reproduced in the form of articles of consumption, into
the form of means of production, but has besides recovered the £500
which it had advanced to the circulation for the purchase of means of
production; and that, similarly, I again possesses not only its variable
capital, which it had reproduced in the form of means of production, in
money-form, as money-capital once more directly convertible into
labour-power, but also the £500 expended in the purchase of articles of
consumption in anticipation of the sale of the s-portion of its capital.
These £500 flow back to it not because of the expenditure incurred, but
because of the subsequent sale of a part of its commodity-product
incorporating one half of its surplus-value.

In both cases it is not only that the constant capital of II is
reconverted from the form of a product into the bodily form of means of
production, in which alone it can function as capital; and likewise it
is not only that the variable portion of the capital of I is converted
into its money-form, and the surplus-value portion of the means of
production of I into its consumable form, the form in which it can be
used as revenue. It is also that the £500 of money-capital, advanced by
II in the purchase of means of production prior to selling the
corresponding compensating portion of the value of its constant capital
– existing in the form of means of consumption – flow back to II; and
furthermore back to I flow the £500 which were expended _anticipando_ by
it for the purchase of articles of consumption. If the money advanced by
II at the expense of the constant portion of its commodity-product, and
by I at the expense of the surplus-value portion of its
commodity-product, flows back to them, this is solely because the one
class of capitalists throws £500 into circulation over and above the
constant capital existing in the form of commodities in II, and the
other class a like amount over and above the surplus-value existing in
the form of commodities in I. In the last analysis the two departments
have mutually paid one another in full by the exchange of equivalents in
the shape of their respective commodities. The money thrown into
circulation by them in excess of the values of their commodities, as a
means of effecting the exchange of these commodities, returns to each
one of them out of the circulation in proportion to the quota which each
of the two had thrown into circulation. Neither has grown a farthing
richer thereby. I possessed a constant capital of 2,000 in the form of
articles of consumption plus 500 in money; now it possesses 2,000 in
means of production plus 500 in money, the same as before; in the same
way I possesses, as before, a surplus-value of 1,000 (consisting of
commodities, means of production, now converted into a consumption-fund)
plus 500 in money. The general conclusion is this: Of the money which
the industrial capitalists throw into circulation to accomplish their
own commodity circulation, whether at the expense of the constant part
of the commodity-value or at the expense of the surplus-value existing
in the commodities to the extent that it is laid out as revenue, as much
returns into the hands of the respective capitalists as was advanced by
them for the money-circulation.

As for the reconversion of the variable capital of class I into the form
of money, this capital, after the capitalists of I invested it in wages,
exists for them first in the form of commodities in which the labourers
delivered it to them. They paid this capital in the form of money to
these labourers as the price of their labour-power. To this extent the
capitalists have paid for that constituent part of the value of their
commodity-product which is equal to the variable capital expended in the
form of money. They are, for this reason, the owners of this portion of
the commodity-product as well. But that part of the working-class which
is employed by them does not buy the means of production created by it;
these labourers buy articles of consumption produced by II. Hence the
variable capital advanced by the capitalists of I in the payment of
labour-power does not return to them directly. It passes by means of
purchases made by the labourers into the hands of the capitalist
producers of the commodities necessary for and within the reach of
working folks; in other words, it passes into the hands of capitalists
II. And not until these expend the money in the purchase of means of
production does it return by this circuitous route into the hands of
capitalists I. It follows that, on the basis of simple reproduction, the
sum of the values of v + s of the commodity-capital of I (and therefore
a corresponding proportional part of the total commodity-product of I)
must be equal to the constant capital II_(c), which is likewise taken as
a proportional part of the total commodity-product of department II; or
I_((v + s)) = II_(c).

IV. Exchange within Department II. Necessities of Life and Articles of Luxury

Of the value of the commodity-product of department II there still
remain to be studied the constituents v plus s. This analysis has
nothing to do with the most important question which occupies our
attention here, namely to what extent the division of the value of every
individual capitalist commodity-product into c + v + s — even if brought
about by different forms of appearance — applies also to the value of
the total annual product. This question finds its answers on the one
hand in the exchange of I_((v + s)) for II_(c), and on the other hand in
the investigation, to be made later, of the reproduction of I in the
annual product of I. Since II_((v + s)) exists in the bodily form of
articles of consumption; since the variable capital advanced to the
labourers in payment of their labour-power must generally speaking be
spent by them for articles of consumption; and since the s-portion of
the value of commodities, on the assumption of simple reproduction, is
practically spent as revenue for articles of consumption, it is _prima
facie_ evident that the labourers II buy back, with the wages received
from the capitalists II, a portion of their own product, corresponding
to the amount of the money-value received as wages. Thereby the
capitalist class II reconverts the money-capital advanced by it in the
payment of labour-power into the form of money. It is quite the same as
if it had paid the labourers in mere value tokens. As soon as the
labourers would realise these value tokens by the purchase of a part of
the commodities produced by them but belonging to the capitalists, these
tokens would return into the hands of the capitalists. Only, these
tokens do not merely represent value but possess it, in golden or silver
embodiment. We shall analyse in greater detail later on this sort of
reflux of variable capital advanced in the form of money by means of a
process in which the working-class appears as the purchaser and the
capitalist class as the seller. Here however a different point is at
issue, which must be discussed in connection with this return of the
variable capital to its point of departure.

Category II of the annual production of commodities consists of a great
variety of branches of production, which may, however, be divided into
two great sub-divisions by their products.

a) Articles of consumption, which enter into the consumption of the
working-class, and, to the extent that they are necessities of life —
even if frequently different in quality and value from those of the
labourers — also form a portion of the consumption of the capitalist
class. For our purposes we may call this entire sub-division consumer
_necessities_, regardless of whether such a product as tobacco is really
a consumer necessity from the physiological point of view. It suffices
that it is habitually such.

b) Articles of _luxury_, which enter into the consumption of only the
capitalist class and can therefore be exchanged only for spent
surplus-value, which never falls to the share of the labourer.

As far as the first category is concerned it is obvious that the
variable capital advanced in the production of the commodities belonging
in it must flow back in money-form directly to that portion of the
capitalist class II (i.e., the capitalists IIa) who have produced these
necessities of life. They sell them to their own labourers to the amount
of the variable capital paid to them in wages. This reflux is _direct_
so far as this entire sub-division a of capitalist class I is concerned,
no matter how numerous the transactions may be between the capitalists
of the various pertinent branches of industry, by means of which the
returning variable capital is distributed _pro rata_. These are
processes of circulation, whose means of circulation are supplied
directly by the money expended by the labourers. It is different,
however, with sub-division IIb. The entire portion of the value produced
in this sub-division, IIb_((v + s)), exists in the bodily form of
articles of luxury, i.e., articles which the labouring class can buy no
more than it can buy commodity-value I existing in the form of means of
production, notwithstanding the fact that both the articles of luxury
and the means of production are the products of these labourers.

Hence the reflux by which the variable capital advanced in this
subdivision returns to the capitalist producers in its money-form cannot
be direct but must be mediated, as in the case of I_(v).

Let us assume for instance that v = 500 and s = 500, as they did in the
case of the entire class II; but that the variable capital and the
corresponding surplus-value are distributed as follows:

Sub-division a, Necessities of Life: v = 400; s = 400; hence a quantity
of commodities in consumer necessities of the value of 400 v + 400_(s) =
800, or IIa (400_(v) + 400_(s)).

Sub-division b, Articles of Luxury: of the value of 100 v + l00 s = 200,
or IIb (L00_(v) + 100_(s)).

The labourers of IIb have received 100 in money as payment for their
labour-power, or say £100. With this money they buy articles of
consumption from capitalists IIa to the same amount. This class of
capitalists buys with the same money £100 worth of the IIb commodities,
and in this way the variable capital of capitalists IIb flows back to
them in the form of money.

In IIa there are available once more 400_(v) in money, in the hands of
the capitalists, obtained by exchange with their own labourers. Besides,
a fourth of the part of the product representing surplus-value has been
transferred to the labourers of IIb, and in exchange IIb (100_(v)) have
been received in the form of articles of luxury.

Now, assuming that the capitalists of IIa and IIb divide the expenditure
of their revenue in the same proportion between necessities of life and
luxuries — three-fifths for necessities for instance and two-fifths for
luxuries — the capitalists of sub-class IIa will spend three-fifths of
their revenue from surplus-value, amounting to 400_(s), or 240, for
their own products, necessities of life, and two-fifths, or 160, for
articles of luxury. The capitalists of sub-class IIb will divide their
surplus-value of 100_(s) in the same way: three-fifths, or 60, for
necessities, and two-fifths, or 40, for articles of luxury, the latter
being produced and exchanged in their own sub-class.

The 160 in articles of luxury received by (IIa)_(s) pass into the hands
of the IIa capitalists in the following manner: As we have seen, 100 of
the (IIa) 400_(s) were exchanged in the form of necessities of life for
an equal amount of (IIb)_(v), which exists as articles of luxury, and
another 60, consisting of necessities of life, for (IIb) 60_(s),
consisting of luxuries. The total calculation then stands as follows:

IIa: 400_(v) + 400_(s); IIb: 100_(v) + 100_(s)

1) 400_(v) (a) are consumed by the labourers of IIa, a part of whose
product (necessities of life) they form. The labourers buy them from the
capitalist producers of their own sub-division. These capitalists
thereby recover £400 in money, which is the value of their variable
capital of 400 paid by them to these same labourers as wages. They can
now once more buy labour-power with it.

2) A part of the 400_(s) (a), equal to the 100_(v) (b), one-fourth of
the surplus-value (a), is realised in luxuries in the following way: The
labourers (b) received from the capitalists of their sub-division (b)
£100 in wages. With this amount they buy one-fourth of the surplus-value
(a), i.e., commodities consisting of necessities of life. With this
money the capitalists of (a) buy articles of luxury to the same amount,
which equals 100_(v) (b), or one half of the entire output of luxuries.
In this way the b capitalists get back their variable capital in the
form of money and are enabled to resume reproduction by again purchasing
labour-power, since the entire constant capital of the whole category II
has already been replaced by the exchange of I_((v + s)) for II_(c). The
labour-power of the luxury workers is therefore saleable anew only
because the part of their own product created as an equivalent for their
wages is drawn by capitalists IIa into their consumption-fund, is turned
into money. (The same applies to the sale of the labour-power of I,
since the II for which I_((v + s)) is exchanged, consists of both
articles of luxury and necessities of life, and that which is renewed by
means of I_((v + s)) constitutes the means of production of both
luxuries and necessities.)

3) We now come to the exchange between a and b, which is merely exchange
between the capitalists of the two sub-divisions. So far we have
disposed of the variable capital (400_(v)) and part of the surplus-value
(100_(s)) in a, and the variable capital (100_(v)) in b. We have
furthermore assumed that the average proportion of the expenditure of
the capitalist revenue was in both classes two-fifths for luxuries and
three-fifths for necessities. Apart from the 100 already expended for
luxuries, the entire subdivision a still has to be allotted 60 for
luxuries, and b has proportionately to be allotted 40.

(IIa)_(s) is then divided into 240 for necessities and 160 for luxuries,
or 240 + 160 = 400, (IIa).

(IIb)_(s) is divided into 60 for necessities and 40 for luxuries;
60 + 40 = 100, (IIb). The last 40 are consumed by this class out of its
own product (two-fifths of its surplus-value); the 60 in necessities are
obtained by this class through the exchange of 60 of its surplus-value
for 60, (a).

We have, then, for the entire capitalist class II the following (v plus
s in sub-division [a] consisting of necessities, in [b] of luxuries):
IIa (400_(v) + 400_(s)) + IIb (100_(v) + 100_(s)) = 1,000; by this
movement there is thus realised: 500_(v) (a + b) [realised in 400_(v)
(a) and 100_(s) (a)] + 500_(s) (a + b) [realised in 300_(s)
(a) + 100_(v) (b) + 100_(s) (b)] =1,000. For a and b, each considered by
itself, we obtain the following realisation:

a) v / ( 400_(v)(a) )   +   s / (240_(s)(a) + 100_(s)(a) + 60_(s)(b)) =
800

b) v / ( 100_(s)(a) )   +   s / (60_(s)(a) + 40_(s)(a) + ...) = (200 /
1000)

If, for the sake of simplicity, we assume the same proportion between
the variable and constant capital (which, by the way, is not at all
necessary), we obtain for 400_(v) (a) a constant capital of 1,600, and
for 100_(v) (b) a constant capital of 400. We then have the following
two subdivisions, a and b, in II:

IIa) 1,600_(c) + 400_(v) + 400_(s) = 2,400
IIb) 400_(c) + 100_(v) + 100_(s) = 600

adding up to

2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 3,000

Accordingly, 1,600 of the 2,000 II_(c) in articles of consumption, which
are exchanged for 2,000 I_((v + s)), are exchanged for means of
production of necessities of life and 400 for means of production of
luxurites.

The 2,000 I_((v + s)) would therefore break up into (800_(v) + 800_(s))
I for a, equal to 1,600 means of production of necessities of life, and
(200_(v) + 200_(s)) I for b, equal to 400 means of production of
luxuries.

A considerable part of the instruments of labour as such, as well as of
the raw and auxiliary materials, etc., is the same for both departments.
But so far as the exchange of the various portions of value of the total
product I_((v + s)) is concerned, such a division would be wholly
immaterial. Both the above 800_(v) of I and the 200_(v) of I are
realised because the wages are spent for articles of consumption 1,000
II_(c); hence the money-capital advanced for this purpose is distributed
evenly on its return among the capitalist producers of I, their advanced
variable capital is replaced _pro rata_ in money. On the other hand, so
far as the realisation of the 1,000 I_(s) is concerned, the capitalists
will here likewise draw uniformly (in proportion to the magnitude of
their s) 600 IIa and 400 IIb in means of consumption out of the entire
second half of II_(c), equal to 1,000; consequently those who replace
the constant capital of IIa will draw.

480 (three-fifths) out of 600_(c) (IIa) and 320 (two-fifths) out of
400_(c) (IIb), a total of 800; those who replace the constant capital of
IIb will draw.

120 (three-fifths) out of 600_(c) (IIa) and 80 (two-fifths) out of
400_(c) (IIb), which equals 200. Grand total, 1,000.

What is arbitrary here is the ratio of the variable to the constant
capital of both I and II and so is the identity of this ratio for I and
II and their sub-divisions. As for this identity, it has been assumed
here merely for the sake of simplification, and it would not alter in
any way the conditions of the problem and its solution if we were to
assume different proportions. However, the necessary result of all this,
on the assumption of simple reproduction, is the following.

1) That the new value created by the labour of one year (divisible into
v + s) in the bodily form of means of production is equal to the value
of the constant capital c contained in the value of the product created
by the other part of the annual labour and reproduced in the form of
articles of consumption. If it were smaller than II_(c), it would be
impossible for II to replace its constant capital entirely; if it were
greater, a surplus would remain unused. In either case, the assumption
of simple reproduction would be violated.

2) That in the case of annual product which is reproduced in the form of
articles of consumption, the variable capital v advanced in the form of
money can be realised by its recipients, inasmuch as they are labourers
producing luxuries, only in that portion of the necessities of life
which embodies for their capitalist producers _prima facie_ their
surplus-value; hence that v, laid out in the production of luxuries, is
equal in value to a corresponding portion of s produced in the form of
necessities of life, and hence must be smaller than the whole of this s,
namely (IIa)_(s), and that the variable capital advanced by the
capitalist producers of luxuries returns to them in the form of money
only by means of the realisation of that v in this portion of s. This
phenomenon is quite analogous to the realisation of I_((v + s)) in
II_(c), except that in the second case (IIb)_(v) realizes itself in a
_part_ of (IIa)_(s) of the same value. These proportions remain
qualitatively determinant in every distribution of the total annual
product, since it actually enters into the process of the annual
reproduction brought about by circulation. I_((v + s)) can be realised
only in II_(c), just as II_(c) can only be renewed in function as a
component part of productive capital by means of this realisation; in
the same way, (IIb)_(v) can be realised only in a portion of (IIa)_(s)
and (IIb)_(v) can only thus be reconverted into the form of
money-capital. It goes without saying that this applies only to the
extent that it all is really a result of the process of reproduction
itself, i.e., to the extent that the capitalists of IIb, for instance,
do not obtain money-capital for v on credit from others. Quantitatively
however the exchanges of the various portions of the annual product can
take place in the proportions indicated above only so long as the scale
and value-relations in production remain stationary and so long as these
strict relations are not altered by foreign commerce.

Now, if we were to say after the manner of Adam Smith that I_((v + s))
resolve themselves into II_(c), and II_(c) resolves itself into
I_((v + s)), or, as he used to say more frequently and still more
absurdly, I_((v + s)) constitute component parts of the price (or “value
in exchange,” as he has it) of II and II constitutes the entire
component part of the value of I_((v + s)), then one could and should
likewise say that (IIb)_(v) resolves itself into (IIa)_(s), or (IIa)_(s)
into (IIb)_(v), or (IIb)_(v) forms a component part of the surplus-value
of IIa, and, vice versa, the surplus-value thus resolves itself into
wages, or into variable capital, and the variable capital forms a
“component part” of the surplus-value. This absurdity is indeed found in
Adam Smith, since with him wages are determined by the value of the
necessities of life, and these commodity-values in their turn by the
value of the wages (variable capital) and surplus-value contained in
them. He is so absorbed in the fractional parts into which the
value-product of one working-day is divided on the basis of capitalism —
namely into v plus s — that he quite forgets that it is immaterial in
simple commodity exchange whether the equivalents existing in various
bodily forms consist of paid or unpaid labour, since their production
costs in either case the same amount of labour; and that it is also
immaterial whether the commodity of A is a means of production and that
of B an article of consumption and whether one commodity has to serve as
a component part of capital after its sale while another passes into the
consumption-fund and, _secundum_ Adam, is consumed as revenue. The use
to which the individual buyer puts his commodity does not come within
the scope of commodity-exchange, the sphere of circulation, and does not
affect the value of the commodity. This is in no wise altered by the
fact that in the analysis of the circulation of the total annual social
product, the definite use for which it is intended, the factor of
consumption of the various component parts of that product, must be
taken into consideration.

In the exchange established above of (IIb)_(v) for a portion of
(IIa)_(s) of the same value, and in the further exchanges between (IIa),
and (IIb), it is by no means assumed that either the individual
capitalists of IIa and IIb or their respective totalities divide their
surplus-value in the same proportion between necessary articles of
consumption and articles of luxury. The one may spend more on this
consumption, the other more on that. On the basis of simple reproduction
it is merely assumed that a sum of values equal to the entire
surplus-value is realised in the consumption-fund. The limits are thus
given. Within each department the one may spend more in a, the other in
b. But this may compensate itself mutually, so that the capitalist
groups of a and b, taken as a whole, each participate in the same
proportion in both. The value-relations — the proportional shares of the
two kinds of producers, a and b in the total value of product II —
consequently also a definite quantitative relation between the branches
of production supplying those products — are however necessarily given
in each concrete case; only the proportion chosen as an illustration is
a hypothetical one. It would not alter the qualitative aspects if
another illustration were selected; only the quantitative determinations
would be altered. But if on account of any circumstances there arises an
actual change in the relative magnitude of a and b, the conditions of
simple reproduction would also change accordingly.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Since (IIb)_(v) is realised in an equivalent part of (IIa)_(s), it
follows that in proportion as the luxury part of the annual product
grows, as therefore an increasing share of the labour-power is absorbed
in the production of luxuries, the reconversion of the variable capital
advanced in (IIb)_(v) into money-capital functioning anew as the
money-form of the variable capital, and thereby the existence and
reproduction of the part of the working-class employed in IIb — the
supply to them of consumer necessities — depends upon the prodigality of
the capitalist class, upon the exchange of a considerable portion of
their surplus-value for articles of luxury.

Every crisis at once lessens the consumption of luxuries. It retards,
delays the reconversion of (IIb)_(v) into money-capital, permitting it
only partially and thus throwing a certain number of the labourers
employed in the production of luxuries out of work, while on the other
hand it thus clogs the sale of consumer necessities and reduces it. And
this without mentioning the unproductive labourers who are dismissed at
the same time, labourers who receive for their services a portion of the
capitalists’ luxury expense fund (these labourers are themselves _pro
tanto_ luxuries), and who take part to a very considerable extent in the
consumption of the necessities of life, etc. The reverse takes place in
periods of prosperity, particularly during the times of bogus
prosperity, in which the relative value of money, expressed in
commodities, decreases also for other reasons (without any actual
revolution in values), so that the prices of commodities rise
independently of their own values. It is not alone the consumption of
necessities of life which increases. The working-class (now actively
reinforced by its entire reserve army) also enjoys momentarily articles
of luxury ordinarily beyond its reach, and those articles which at other
times constitute for the greater part consumer “necessities” only for
the capitalist class. This on its part calls forth a rise in prices.

It is sheer tautology to say that crises are caused by the scarcity of
effective consumption, or of effective consumers. The capitalist system
does not know any other modes of consumption than effective ones, except
that of _sub forma pauperis_ or of the swindler. That commodities are
unsaleable means only that no effective purchasers have been found for
them, i.e., consumers (since commodities are bought in the final
analysis for productive or individual consumption). But if one were to
attempt to give this tautology the semblance of a profounder
justification by saying that the working-class receives too small a
portion of its own product and the evil would be remedied as soon as it
receives a larger share of it and its wages increase in consequence, one
could only remark that crises are always prepared by precisely a period
in which wages rise generally and the working-class actually gets a
larger share of that part of the annual product which is intended for
consumption. From the point of view of these advocates of sound and
“simple” (!) common sense, such a period should rather remove the
crisis. It appears, then, that capitalist production comprises
conditions independent of good or bad will, conditions which permit the
working-class to enjoy that relative prosperity only momentarily, and at
that always only as the harbinger of a coming crisis. [_Ad notam_ for
possible followers of the Rodbertian theory of crises.—F.E.]

We saw a while ago that the proportion between the production of
consumer necessities and that of luxuries requires the division of
II_((v + s)) between IIa and IIb, and thus of II_(c) between (IIa)_(c)
and (IIb)_(c). Hence this division affects the character and the
quantitative relations of production to their very roots, and is an
essential determining factor of its general structure.

Simple reproduction is essentially directed toward consumption as an
end, although the grabbing of surplus-value appears as the compelling
motive of the individual capitalists; but surplus-value, whatever its
relative magnitude may be, is after all supposed to serve here only for
the individual consumption of the capitalist.

As simple reproduction is a part, and the most important one at that, of
all annual reproduction on an extended scale, this motive remains as an
accompaniment of and contrast to the self-enrichment motive as such. In
reality the matter is more complicated, because PARTNERS in the loot —
the surplus-value of the capitalist — figure as consumers independent of
him.

V. The Mediation of Exchange by the Circulation of Money

So far as we have analysed circulation up to the present, it proceeded
between the various classes of producers as indicated in the following
scheme:

1) Between class I and class II:
                I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)
                II. . . 2,000_(c) . . . . . + 500_(v) + 500 _(s).

This disposes of the circulation of II_(c), equal to 2,000, which is
exchanged for I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)).

Leaving aside for the present the 4,000 I_(c) there still remains the
circulation of v + s within class II. Now II_((v + s)) is divided
between the sub-classes IIa and IIb in the following manner:

2) II. 500_(v) + 500_(s) = a (400_(v) + 400_(s)) + b
(100_(v) + 100_(s)).

The 400_(v) (a) circulates within its own sub-class; the labourers paid
with it buy from their employers, the capitalists IIa, necessary means
of subsistence produced by themselves.

Since the capitalists of both sub-classes spend three-fifths of their
surplus-value in products of IIa (necessities) and two-fifths in
products of IIb (luxuries), the three-fifths of the surplus-value of a,
or 240, are consumed within the sub-class IIa itself; likewise,
two-fifths of the surplus-value of b (produced and existing in the form
of articles of luxury), within the sub-class IIb.

There remains to be exchanged between IIa and IIb: On the side of IIa:
160_(s);

On the side of IIb: 100_(v) + 60_(s). These cancel each other. With
their 100, received in the form of money wages, the labourers of IIb buy
necessities of life in that amount from IIa. The IIb capitalists
likewise buy necessities from IIa to the amount of three-fifths of their
surplus-value, or 60. The IIa capitalists thus obtain the money required
for investing, as above assumed, two-fifths of their surplus-value, or
160_(s), in luxuries produced by IIb (100, held by the IIb capitalists
as a product replacing the wages paid by them, and 60_(s)). The scheme
for this is therefore:

  ------- ---- ---------------------------------- ------------------ --------------- --
  3) II   a.   // 400_(v) // + // 240_(s) // +          160s                         
          b.   . . . . . . . . . . . .            100_(v) + 60_(s)    + //40_(s)//   
  ------- ---- ---------------------------------- ------------------ --------------- --

the bracketed items circulating and being consumed only within their own
sub-class.

The direct reflux of the money-capital advanced in variable capital,
which takes place only in the case of the capitalist department IIa
which produces necessities of life, is but an expression, modified by
special conditions, of the previously mentioned general law that money
advanced to the circulation by producers of commodities returns to them
in the normal course of commodity circulation. From this it incidentally
follows that if any money-capitalist at all stands behind the producer
of commodities and advances to the industrial capitalist money-capital
(in the strictest meaning of the word, i.e., capital-value in the form
of money), the real point of reflux for this money is the pocket of this
money-capitalist. Thus the mass of the circulating money belongs to that
department of money-capital which is organised and concentrated in the
form of banks, etc., although the money circulates more or less through
all hands. The way in which this department advances its capital
necessitates the continual final reflux to it in the form of money,
although this is once again brought about by the reconversion of the
industrial capital into money-capital.

The circulation of commodities always requires two things: Commodities
which are thrown into circulation and money which is likewise thrown
into it. “The process of circulation ... does not, like direct barter of
products, become extinguished upon the use-values changing places and
hands. The money does not vanish on dropping out of the circuit of the
metamorphosis of a given commodity. It is constantly being precipitated
into new places in the arena of circulation vacated by other
commodities,” etc. (Vol. I, Ch. III.).

For instance in the circulation between II_(c) and I_((v + s)) we
assumed that II had advanced £500 in money for it. In the innumerable
processes of circulation, into which the circulation between large
social groups of producers resolves itself, representatives of the
various groups will at various times be the first to appear as buyers,
and hence throw money into circulation. Quite apart from particular
circumstances, this is necessitated by the difference, if nothing else,
in the periods of production, and thus of the turnovers, of the various
commodity-capitals. So with these £500 II buys from I means of
production of the same value and I buys from II articles of consumption
valued at £500. Hence the money flows back to II, but this department
does not in any way grow richer by this reflux. It had first thrown £500
in money into circulation and drew commodities of the same value out of
it; then it sells £500 worth of commodities and draws the same amount of
money out of circulation; thus the £500 flow back to it. As a matter of
fact, II has thrown into circulation £500 in money and £500 in
commodities, which is equal to £1,000. It draws out of the circulation
£500 in commodities and £500 in money. The circulation requires for the
handling of £500 in I commodities and £500 in II commodities only £500
in money; hence whoever advanced the money in the purchase of
commodities from other producers recovers it when selling his own.
Consequently if I had at first bought commodities from II for £500, and
later sold to II commodities of the value of £500, these £500 would have
returned to I instead of to II.

In class I the money invested in wages, i.e., the variable capital
advanced in the form of money, does not return directly in this form but
indirectly, by a detour. But in II the £500 of wages return directly
from the labourers to the capitalists, and this return is always direct
in the case where purchase and sale take place repeatedly between the
same persons in such a way that they are acting alternately as buyers
and sellers of commodities. The capitalist of II pays for the
labour-power in money; he thereby incorporates labour-power in his
capital and assumes the role of an industrial capitalist in relation to
his labourers as wage-earners, but does so only by means of this act of
circulation, which is for him merely a conversion of money-capital into
productive capital. Thereupon the labourer, who in the first instance
was a seller, a dealer in his own labour-power, appears in the second
instance as a buyer, a possessor of money, in relation to the
capitalist, who now acts as a seller of commodities. In this way the
capitalist recovers the money invested by him in wages. As the sale of
these commodities does not imply cheating, etc., but is an exchange of
equivalents in commodities and money, it is not a process by which the
capitalist enriches himself. He does not pay the labourer twice, first
in money and then in commodities. His money returns to him as soon as
the labourer exchanges it for his commodities.

However, the money-capital converted into variable capital, i.e., the
money advanced for wages, plays a prominent role in the circulation of
money itself, since the labourers must live from hand to mouth and
cannot give the industrial capitalists credit for any length of time.
For this reason variable capital must be advanced in the form of money
simultaneously at innumerable territorially different points in society
at certain short intervals, such as a week, etc.—in periods of time that
repeat themselves rather quickly (and the shorter these periods, the
smaller relatively is the total amount of money thrown at one time into
circulation through this channel) — whatever the various periods of
turnover of the capitals in the different branches of industry. In every
country with a capitalist production the money-capital so advanced
constitutes a relatively decisive share of the total circulation, the
more so as the same money, before its reflux to its point of departure,
passes through the most diverse channels and functions as a medium of
circulation for countless other businesses.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Now let us consider the circulation between I_((v + s)) and II from a
different angle.

Capitalists I advance £1,000 in the payment of wages. With this money
the labourers buy £1,000 worth of means of subsistence from capitalists
II. These in turn buy for the same money means of production from
capitalists I. Capitalists I thus get back their variable capital in the
form of money, while capitalists II have reconverted one half of their
constant capital from the form of commodity-capital into that of
productive capital. Capitalists II advance another £500 in money to get
means of production from I. The capitalists I spend this money on
articles of consumption from II. These £500 thus return to capitalists
II. They advance this amount again in order to reconvert the last
quarter of their constant capital, converted into commodities, into its
productive bodily form. This money flows back to I and once more
withdraws articles of consumption of the same amount from II. Thus the
£500 return to II. The capitalists II are now as before in possession of
£500 in money and £2,000 in constant capital, the latter having been
newly converted from the form of commodity-capital into that of
productive capital. By means of £1,500 a quantity of commodities worth
£5,000 has been circulated. Namely: 1) I pays £1,000 to his labourers
for their labour-power of the same value; 2) With these same £1,000 the
labourers buy means of subsistence from II; 3) With the same money II
buys means of production from I, thereby restoring to I variable capital
to the amount of £1,000 in the form of money; 4) II buys £500 worth of
means of production from I; 5) With the same £500 I buys articles of
consumption from II; 6) With the same £500 II buys means of production
from I; 7) With the same £500 I buys means of subsistence from II. Thus
£500 have returned to II, which had thrown them into circulation besides
its £2,000 in commodities and for which it did not withdraw from
circulation any equivalent in commodities.

The exchange therefore takes the following course:

1) I pays £1,000 in money for labour-power, hence for commodities equal
to £1,000.

2) The labourers buy with their wages amounting in money to £1,000
articles of consumption from II; hence commodities equal to £1,000.

3) With the £1,000 received from the labourers II buys means of
production of the same value from I; hence commodities equal to £1,000.

In this way the £l.000 have returned to I as the money-form of its
variable capital.

4) II buys £500 worth of means of production from I, hence commodities
equal to £500.

5) With the same £500 I buys articles of consumption from II; hence
commodities equal to £500.

6) With the same £500 II buys means of production from I; hence
commodities equal to £500.

7) With the same £500 I buys articles of consumption from II; hence
commodities equal to £500.

Total amount of commodity-values exchanged: £5,000.

The £500 advanced by II for the purchase have returned to it.

The result is as follows:

1) I possesses variable capital in the form of money to the amount of
£1,000, which it originally advanced to the circulation. It furthermore
expended £1,000 for its individual consumption, in the shape of its own
products; i.e., it has spent the money which it had received for the
sale of means of production to the amount of £1,000.

On the other hand the bodily form into which the variable capital
existing in the form of money must be transformed, i.e., labour-power,
has been maintained, reproduced and again made available by consumption
as the sole article of trade of its owners, which they must sell in
order to live. The relation of wage-labourers and capitalists has
likewise been reproduced.

2) The constant capital of II is replaced in kind, and the £500 advanced
by the same II to the circulation have returned to it. As for the
labourers I, the circulation is the simple one of C—M—C:C'
(labour-power) —M² (£1,000, money-form of variable capital I) —C³
(necessities of life to the amount of £1,000); these £1,000 convert into
money to the same amount of value the constant capital II existing in
the form of commodities, of means of subsistence.

As for the capitalists II, the process is C— M, the transformation of a
portion of their commodity-product into the money-form, from which it is
reconverted into the constituents of productive capital, namely into a
portion of the means of production required by them. In the money
advance (£500) made by capitalists II for the purchase of the other
parts of the means of production, the money-form of that portion of II
which exists as yet in the form of commodities (articles of consumption)
is anticipated; in the act M — C, in which II buys with M, and C is sold
by I, the money (II) is converted into a portion of the productive
capital, while C (I) passes through the act C — M, changes into money,
which however does not represent any component part of capital-value for
I, but surplus-value converted into money and expended solely for
articles of consumption.

In the circuit M — C ... P ... C' — M', the first act, M — C, is that of
one capitalist, the last, C' — M' (or part of it), is that of another;
whether the C, by which M is converted into productive capital,
represents a component of constant capital, of variable capital, or
surplus-value for the seller of C (who exchanges this C for money), is
wholly immaterial for the commodity circulation itself.

Class I, so far as concerns the component v + s of its
commodity-product, draws more money out of the circulation than it has
thrown in. In the first place, the £1,000 of variable capital return to
it; in the second place, it sells means of production worth £500 (see
above, exchange No. 4); one half of its surplus-value is thus turned
into money; then (exchange No. 6) it sells once more £500 worth of means
of production, the second half of its surplus-value, and thus the entire
surplus-value is withdrawn from circulation in the shape of money. Hence
in succession: 1) variable capital reconverted into money, equal to
£1,000; 2) one half of the surplus-value turned into money, equal to
£500; 3) the other half of the surplus-value, equal to £500; altogether
1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) turned into money, equal to £2,000. Although I
threw only £1,000 into circulation (aside from those exchanges which
promote the reproduction of I and which we shall have to analyse later),
it has withdrawn double that amount from it. Of course s passes into
other hands, (II), as soon as it has been converted into money, by being
spent for articles of consumption. The capitalists of I withdrew only as
much in money as they threw into it in value in the form of commodities;
the fact that this value is surplus-value, i.e., that it does not cost
the capitalists anything, does not alter the value of these commodities
in any way; so far as the exchange of values in commodity circulation is
concerned, that fact is of no consequence at all. The existence of
surplus-value in money is of course transient, the same as all other
forms which the advanced capital assumes in its metamorphoses. It lasts
no longer than the interval between the conversion of commodities I into
money and the subsequent conversion of the money I into commodities II.

If the turnovers had been assumed to be shorter — or, from the point of
view of the simple circulation of commodities, the circulation of money
more rapid — even less money would be ample to circulate the exchanged
commodity-values; the amount is always determined — if the number of
successive exchanges is given — by the sum of the prices, or the sum of
values, of the circulating commodities. It is immaterial in what
proportion this sum of values consists of surplus-value on the one hand,
and of capital-value on the other.

If the wages of I, in our illustration, were paid four times per year,
we should have 4 times 250, or 1,000. Hence £250 in money would suffice
for the circulation I_(v) — ½ II_(c), and for that between the variable
capital I_(v) and the labour-power I. Likewise, if the circulation
between I and II were to take place in four turnovers, it would require
only £250, or in the aggregate a sum of money, or a money-capital, of
£500 for the circulation of commodities amounting to £5,000. In that
case the surplus-value would be converted into money four times
successively, one-quarter each time, instead of twice successively, one
half each time.

If I instead of II should act as buyer in exchange No. 4 and expend £500
for articles of consumption of the same value, II would buy means of
production with the same £500 in exchange No. 5; 6) I buys articles of
consumption with the same £500; 7) II buys means of production with the
same £500 so that the £500 finally return to I, the same as before to
II. The surplus-value is here converted into money by means of the money
spent by the capitalist producers themselves for their individual
consumption. This money represents the anticipated revenue, the
anticipated receipts from the surplus-value contained in the commodities
still to be sold. The surplus-value is not converted into money by the
reflux of the £500; for aside from £1,000 in the form of commodities
I_(v), I threw £500 in money into circulation at the close of exchange
No. 4, and this was additional money, so far as we know, and not the
proceeds from the sale of commodities. If this money flows back to I, I
merely gets back its additional money, and does not thereby convert its
surplus-value into money. The conversion of the surplus-value I into
money takes place only by the sale of the commodities I_(s), in which it
is incorporated, and lasts each time only until the money obtained by
the sale of the commodities is expended anew in the purchase of articles
of consumption.

With additional money (£500) I buys articles of consumption from II;
this money was spent by I, which holds its equivalent in II commodities;
the money returns for the first time by the purchase from I by II of
commodities to the amount of £500; in other words, it returns as the
equivalent of the commodities sold by I, but these commodities do not
cost I anything, they constitute surplus-value for I, and _thus the
money thrown into circulation by this very department turns its own
surplus-value into money_. On buying for the second time (No. 6) I has
likewise obtained its equivalent in II commodities. Take it, now, that
II does not buy (No. 7) means of production from I. In that case I would
have actually paid £1,000 for articles of consumption, thereby consuming
its entire surplus-value as revenue; namely, 500 in its own I
commodities (means of production) and 500 in money: on the other hand,
it would still have £500 in its own commodities (means of production) in
stock, and would have got rid of £500 in money.

On the contrary II would have reconverted three-fourths of its constant
capital from the form of commodity-capital into that of productive
capital; but one-fourth (£500) would be held by it in the form of
money-capital, actually in the form of idle money, or of money which has
suspended its function and is held in abeyance. Should this state of
affairs last for any length of time, II would have to cut down its scale
of reproduction by one-fourth.

However the 500 in means of production, which I has on its hands, are
not surplus-value existing in the form of commodities; they occupy the
place of the £500 advanced in money, which I possessed aside from its
£1,000 of surplus-value in commodity-form. In the form of money, they
are always convertible; as commodities they are momentarily unsaleable.
So much is evident: that simple reproduction — in which every element of
productive capital must be replaced in both II and I — remains possible
in this case only if the 500 golden birds, which I first sent flying,
return to it.

If a capitalist (we have only industrial capitalists still to deal with
here, who are the representatives of all others) spends money for
articles of consumption, he is through with it, it goes the way of all
flesh. It can flow back to him only if he fishes it out of circulation
in exchange for commodities, i.e., for his commodity-capital. As the
value of his entire annual commodity-product (his commodity-capital), so
that of every one of its elements, i.e., the value of every individual
commodity, is divisible, as far as he is concerned, into constant
capital-value, variable capital-value, and surplus-value. The conversion
into money of every individual commodity (as elements constituting the
commodity-product) is consequently at the same time such a conversion of
a certain portion of the surplus-value contained in the entire
commodity-product. In this case, then, it is literally true that the
capitalist himself threw the money into circulation — when he spent it
on articles of consumption — by which his surplus-value is converted
into money, or realised. Of course it is not a question of the identical
coins but of a certain amount of hard cash equal to the one (or to a
portion of the one) which he had previously thrown into circulation to
satisfy his personal wants.

In practice this occurs in two ways. If the business has just been
opened, in the current year, it will take quite a while, at least a few
months, before the capitalist is able to use any portion of the receipts
of his business for his personal consumption. But for all that he does
not suspend his consumption for a single moment. He advances to himself
(immaterial whether out of his own pocket or by means of credit from the
pocket of somebody else) money in anticipation of surplus-value still to
be snatched by him; but in doing so he also advances a circulating
medium for the realisation of surplus-value to be realised later. If, on
the contrary, the business has been running regularly for a longer
period payments and receipts are distributed over different terms
throughout the year. But one thing continues uninterruptedly, namely,
the consumption of the capitalist, which anticipates, and whose volume
is computed on a definite proportion of, the customary or estimated
revenue. With every portion of commodities sold, a portion of the
surplus-value to be produced annually is also realised. But if during
the entire year only as much of the produced commodities is sold as is
required to replace the constant and variable capital-values contained
in them, or if prices were to fall to such an extent that only the
advanced capital-value contained in the entire annual commodity-product
should be realised on its sale, then the anticipatory character of the
expenditure of money in expectation of future surplus-value would be
clearly revealed. If our capitalist fails, his creditors and the court
investigate whether his anticipated private expenditures were in proper
proportion to the volume of his business and to the receipt of
surplus-value usually or normally corresponding to it.

So far as the entire capitalist class is concerned, the proposition that
it must itself throw into circulation the money required for the
realisation of its surplus-value (correspondingly also for the
circulation of its capital, constant and variable) not only fails to
appear paradoxical, but stands forth as a necessary condition of the
entire mechanism. For there are here only two classes: the working-class
disposing only of its labour-power, and the capitalist class, which has
a monopoly of the social means of production and money. It would rather
be a paradox if the working-class were to advance in the first instance
from its own resources the money required for the realisation of the
surplus-value contained in the commodities. But the individual
capitalist makes this advance only by acting as a buyer, _expending_
money in the purchase of articles of consumption or _advancing_ money in
the purchase of elements of his productive capital, whether of
labour-power or means of production. He never parts with his money
unless he gets an equivalent for it. He advances money to the
circulation only in the same way as he advances commodities to it. He
acts in both instances as the initial point of their circulation.

The actual process is obscured by two circumstances:

1) The appearance in the process of circulation of industrial capital of
_merchant’s capital_ (the first form of which is always money, since the
merchant as such does not create any “product” or “commodity”) and of
_money-capital_ as an object of manipulation by a special kind of
capitalists.

2) The division of surplus-value – which must always be first in the
hands of the industrial capitalist – into various categories, as
vehicles of which there appear, aside from the industrial capitalist,
the landlord (for ground-rent), the usurer (for interest), etc.,
furthermore the government and its employees, rentiers, etc. These
gentry appear as buyers vis-à-vis the industrial capitalist and to that
extent as converters of his commodities into money; they too throw
“money” _pro parte_ into the circulation and he gets it from them. But
it is always forgotten from what source they derived it originally, and
continue deriving it ever anew.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 20: Simple Reproduction - Part 2

VI. The Constant Capital of Department I

It remains for us to analyse the constant capital of department I,
amounting to 4,000_(c). This value is equal to the value — appearing
anew in the commodity-product I — of the means of production consumed in
the creation of this quantity of commodities. This re-appearing value,
which was not produced in the process of production of I, but entered
into it during the preceding year as constant value, as the given value
of its means of production, exists now in the entire part of commodity
mass I not absorbed by category II. And the value of this quantity of
commodities thus left in the hands of the I capitalists equals
two-thirds of the value of their entire annual commodity-product. In the
case of the individual capitalist producing some particular means of
production we could say: He sells his commodity-product; he converts it
into money. By converting it into money he has also reconverted into
money the constant portion of the value of his product. With this
portion of value converted into money he then buys his means of
production once more from other sellers of commodities or transforms the
constant portion of the value of his product into a bodily form in which
it can resume its function of productive constant capital. But now this
assumption becomes impossible. The capitalist class of I comprises the
totality of the capitalists producing means of production. Besides, the
commodity-product of 4,000, which is left on their hands, is a portion
of the social product which cannot be exchanged for any other, because
no such other portion of the annual product remains. With the exception
of these 4,000, all the remainder has been disposed of. One portion has
been absorbed by the social consumption-fund, and another portion has to
replace the constant capital of department II, which has already
exchanged everything it could dispose of in an exchange with department
I.

The difficulty is solved very easily if we remember that the entire
commodity-product I in its bodily form consists of means of production,
i.e., of the material elements of the constant capital itself. We meet
here the same phenomenon which we witnessed before under II, only in a
different aspect. In the case of II the entire commodity-product
consisted of articles of consumption. Hence one portion of it, measured
by the wages plus surplus-value contained in this product, could be
consumed by its own producers. Here, in the case of I, the entire
product consists of means of production, of buildings, machinery,
vessels, raw and auxiliary materials, etc. One portion of them, namely
that replacing the constant capital employed in this sphere, can
therefore immediately function anew in its bodily form as a component of
the productive capital: So far as it goes into circulation, it
circulates within class I. In II a part of the commodity-product is
individually consumed in kind by its own producers while in I a portion
of the product is productively consumed in kind by its capitalist
producers.

In the part of the commodity-product I equal to 4,000_(c) the
capital-value consumed in this category re-appears, and does so in a
bodily form in which it can immediately resume its function of
productive constant capital. In II that portion of the commodity-product
of 3,000 whose value is equal to the wages plus the surplus-value (equal
to 1,000) passes directly into the individual consumption of the
capitalists and labourers of II, while on the other hand the constant
capital-value of this commodity-product (equal to 2,000) cannot re-enter
the productive consumption of the II capitalists but must be replaced by
exchange with I.

In I, on the contrary, that portion of its commodity-product of 6,000
whose value is equal to the wages plus the surplus-value (equal to
2,000) does not pass into the individual consumption of its producers,
and cannot do so on account of its bodily form. It must first be
exchanged with II. Contrariwise the constant portion of the value of
this product, equal to 4,000, exists in a bodily form in which — taking
the capitalist class I as a whole — it can immediately resume its
function of constant capital of that class. In other words, the entire
product of department I consists of use-values which, on account of
their bodily form, can under a capitalist mode of production serve only
as elements of constant capital. Hence one-third (2,000) of this product
of 6,000 replaces the constant capital of department II, and the other
two thirds the constant capital of department I.

The constant capital I consists of a great number of different groups of
capital invested in the various branches of production of means of
production, so much in iron works, so much in coal-mines, etc. Every one
of these groups of capital, or every one of these social group capitals,
is in its turn composed of a larger or smaller number of independently
functioning individual capitals. In the first place, the capital of
society, for instance 7,500 (which may mean millions, etc.) is composed
of various groups of capital; the social capital of 7,500 is divided
into separate parts, every one of which is invested in a special branch
of production; each portion of the social capital-value invested in some
particular branch of production consists, so far as its bodily form is
concerned, partly of means of production required in that particular
sphere of production, partly of the labour-power needed in that business
and trained accordingly, variously modified by division of labour,
according to the specific kind of labour to be performed in each
individual sphere of production. Each portion of social capital invested
in any particular branch of production in its turn consists of the sum
of the individual capitals invested in it and functioning independently.
This patently applies to both departments, I as well as II.

As for the constant capital-value re-appearing in I in the form of its
commodity-product, it re-enters in part as means of production into the
particular sphere of production (or even into the individual business)
from which it emerges as product; for instance corn into the production
of corn, coal into the production of coal, iron in the form of machines
into the production of iron, etc.

However since the partial products constituting the constant
capital-value I do not return directly to their particular or individual
sphere of production, they merely change their place. They pass in their
bodily form to some other sphere of production of department I, while
the product of other spheres of production of department I replaces them
in kind. It is merely a change of place of these products. All of them
re-enter as factors replacing constant capital in I, only instead of the
same group of I they enter another. Since an exchange takes place here
between the individual capitalist of I, it is an exchange of one bodily
form of constant capital for another bodily form of constant capital, of
one kind of means of production for other kinds of means of production.
It is an exchange of the different individual parts of constant capital
I among themselves. Products which do not serve directly as means of
production in their own sphere are transferred from their place of
production to another and thus mutually replace one another. In other
words (similarly to what we saw in the case of the surplus-value II),
every capitalist I draws from this quantity of commodities,
proportionally to his share in the constant capital of 4,000, the means
of production required by him. If production were socialised instead of
capitalistic, these products of department I would evidently just as
regularly be redistributed as means of production to the various
branches of this department, for purposes of reproduction, one portion
remaining directly in that sphere of production from which it emerged as
a product, another passing over to other places of production, thereby
giving rise to a constant to-and-fro movement between the various places
of production in this department.

VII. Variable Capital and Surplus-Value in Both Departments

The total value of the annually produced articles of consumption is thus
equal to the variable capital-value II reproduced during the year plus
the newly produced surplus-value II (i.e., equal to the value produced
by II during the year) plus the variable capital-value I reproduced
during the year and the newly produced surplus-value I (i.e., plus the
value created by I during the year).

On the assumption of simple reproduction the total value of the annually
produced articles of consumption is therefore equal to the annual
value-product, i.e., equal to the total value produced during the year
by social labour, and this must be so, because in simple reproduction
this entire value is consumed.

The total social working-day is divided into two parts: 1) Necessary
labour which creates in the course of the year a value of 1,500_(v); 2)
surplus-labour, which creates an additional value, or surplus-value, of
1,500_(s). The sum of these values, 3,000, is equal to the value of the
annually produced articles of consumption — 3,000. The total value of
the articles of consumption produced during the year is therefore equal
to the total value produced by the total social working-day during the
year, equal to the value of the social variable capital plus the social
surplus-value, equal to the total new product of the year.

But we know that although these two magnitudes of value are equal the
total value of commodities II, the articles of consumption, is not
produced in this department of social production. They are equal because
the constant capital-value re-appearing in II is equal to the value
newly produced by I (value of variable capital plus surplus-value);
therefore I_((v\ +\ s)) can buy the part of the product of II which
represents the constant capital-value for its producers (in department
II). This shows, then, why the value of the product of capitalists II,
from the point of view of society, may be resolved into v + s although
for these capitalists it is divided into c + v + s. This is so only
because II_(c) is here equal to I_((v\ +\ s)), and because these two
components of the social product interchange their bodily forms by
exchange, so that after this transformation II exists once more in means
of production and I_((v\ +\ s)) in articles of consumption.

And it is this circumstance which induced Adam Smith to maintain that
the value of the annual product resolves itself into v + s. This is true
1) only for that part of the annual product which consists of articles
of consumption; and 2) it is not true in the sense that this total value
is produced in II and that the value of its product is equal to the
value of the variable capital advanced in II plus the surplus-value
produced in II. It is true only in the sense that II_((c\ +\ v\ +\ s))
is equal to II_((v\ +\ s)) + I_((v\ +\ s)), or because II is equal to
I_((v\ +\ s)).

It follows furthermore:

The social working-day (i.e., the labour expended by the entire
working-class during the whole year), like every individual working-day,
breaks up into only two parts, namely into necessary labour and
surplus-labour, and the value produced by this working-day consequently
likewise resolves itself into only two parts, namely into the value of
the variable capital, or that portion of the value with which the
labourer buys the means of his own reproduction, and the surplus-value
which the capitalist may spend for his own individual consumption.
Nevertheless, from the point of view of society, one part of the social
working-day is spent exclusively on the _production of new constant
capital_, namely of products exclusively intended to function as means
of production in the labour-process and hence as constant capital in the
accompanying process of self-expansion of value. According to our
assumption the total social working-day presents itself as a money-value
of 3,000, only one-third of which, or 1,000, is produced in department
II which manufactures articles of consumption, that is, the commodities
in which the entire value of the variable capital and the entire
surplus-value of society are ultimately realised. Thus, according to
this assumption, two-thirds of the social working-day are employed in
the production of new constant capital. Although from the standpoint of
the individual capitalists and labourers of department I these
two-thirds of the social working-day serve merely for the production of
variable capital-value plus surplus-value, the same as the last third of
the social working-day in department II, still from the point of view of
society and likewise of the use-value of the product, these two-thirds
of the social working-day produce only replacement of constant capital
in the process of productive consumption or already so consumed. Also
when viewed individually these two-thirds of the working-day, while
producing a total value equal only to the value of the variable capital
plus surplus-value for the producer, nevertheless do not produce any
use-values of a kind on which wages or surplus-value could be expended;
for their products are means of production.

It must be noted in the first place that no portion of the social
working-day, whether in I or in II, serves for the production of the
value of the constant capital employed and functioning in these two
great spheres of production. They produce only additional value, 2,000
I_((v\ +\ s)) + 1,000 II_((v\ +\ s)), in addition to the value of the
constant capital equal to 4,000 I_(c) + 2,000 II_(c). The new value
produced in the form of means of production is not yet constant capital.
It merely is intended to function as such in the future.

The entire product of II — the articles of consumption — viewed
concretely as a use-value, in its bodily form, is a product of the
one-third of the social working-day spent by II. It is the product of
labour in its concrete form — such as the labour of weaving, baking,
etc., performed in this department — the product of this labour,
inasmuch as it functions as the subjective element of the
labour-process. As to the constant portion of the value of this product
II, it re-appears only in a new use-value, in a new bodily form, the
form of articles of consumption, while it existed previously in the form
of means of production. Its value has been transferred by the
labour-process from its old bodily form to its new bodily form. But the
_value_ of these two-thirds of the product-value, equal to 2,000, has
not been produced in this year’s self-expansion process of II.

Just as from the point of view of the labour-process, the product of II
is the result of newly functioning living labour and of the assumed
means of production assigned to it, in which that labour materialises
itself as in its objective conditions, so, from the point of view of the
process of self-expansion, the value of the product of II, equal to
3,000, is composed of a new value (500_(v) + 500_(s) = 1,000) produced
by the newly added one-third of the social working-day and of a constant
value in which are embodied two-thirds of a past social working-day that
had elapsed before the present process of production of II here under
consideration. This portion of the value of the II product finds
expression in a portion of the product itself. It exists in a quantity
of articles of consumption worth 2,000, or two-thirds of a social
working-day. This is the new use-form in which this value-portion
re-appears. The exchange of part of the articles of consumption equal to
2,000 II_(c) for means of production of I equal to I (1,000_(v) +
l,000_(s)) thus really represents an exchange of two-thirds of an
aggregate working-day — which do not constitute any portion of this
year’s labour, and elapsed before this year — for two-thirds of the
working-day newly added this year. Two-thirds of this year’s social
working-day could not be employed in the production of constant capital
and at the same time constitute variable capital-value plus
surplus-value for their own producers unless they were to be exchanged
for a portion of the value of the annually consumed articles of
consumption, in which are incorporated two-thirds of a working-day spent
and realised before this year. It is an exchange of two-thirds of this
year’s working-day for two-thirds of a working-day spent before this
year, an exchange of this year’s labour-time for last year’s. This
explains the riddle of how the value-product of an entire social
working-day can resolve itself into variable capital-value plus
surplus-value, although two-thirds of this working-day were not expended
in the production of articles in which variable capital or surplus-value
can be realised, but rather in the production of means of production for
the replacement of the capital consumed during the year. The explanation
is simply that two-thirds of the value of the product of II, in which
the capitalists and labourers of I realise the variable capital-value
plus surplus-value produced by them (and which constitute two-ninths of
the value of the entire annual product), are, so far as their value is
concerned, the product of two-thirds of a social working-day of a year
prior to the current one.

The sum of the social product I and II — means of production and
articles of consumption — is indeed, viewed from the standpoint of their
use-value, in their concrete, bodily form, the product of this year’s
labour, but only to the extent that this labour itself is regarded as
useful and concrete and not as an expenditure of labour-power, as
value-creating labour. And even the first is true only in the sense that
the means of production have transformed themselves into new products,
into this year’s products solely by dint of the living labour added on
to them, operating on them. On the contrary, this year’s labour could
not have transformed itself into products without means of production
independent of it, without instruments of labour and materials of
production.

VIII. The Constant Capital in Both Departments

The analysis of the total value of the product of 9,000, and of the
categories into which it is divided, does not present any greater
difficulty than that of the value produced by an individual capital. On
the contrary, they are identical.

The entire annual social product here contains three social
working-days, each of one year. The value expressed by each one of these
working-days is 3,000, so that the value expressed by the total product
is equal to 3 × 3,000, or 9,000.

Furthermore the following portions of this working time have elapsed
_prior_ to the one-year process of production, the product of which we
are now analysing: In department I four-thirds of a working-day (with a
product worth 4,000), and in department II two-thirds of a working-day
(with a product worth 2,000), making a total of two social working-days
with a product worth 6,000. For this reason 4,000 I_(c) + 2,000 II_(c) =
6,000_(c) figure as the value of the means of production, or the
constant capital-value re-appearing in the total value of the social
product. Furthermore one-third of the social working-day of one year
newly added in department I is necessary labour, or labour replacing the
value of the variable capital of 1,000 I and paying the price of the
labour employed by I. In the same way one-sixth of a social working-day
in II is necessary labour with a value of 500. Hence 1,000 I_(v) + 500
II_(v) = 1,500_(v), expressing the value of one half of the social
working-day, is the value-expression of the first half of the aggregate
working-day added this year and consisting of necessary labour.

Finally, in department I one-third of the aggregate working-day, with a
product worth 1,000, is surplus-labour, and in department II one-sixth
of the working-day, with a product worth 500, is surplus-labour.

Together they constitute the other half of the added aggregate
working-day. Hence the total surplus-value produced is equal to l,000
I_(s) + 500 II_(s), or 1,500_(s).

Thus:

The constant capital portion of the value of the social product (c):
Two working-days expended prior to the process of
production; expression of value = 6,000.

Necessary labour (v) expended during the year:
One half of a working-day expended on the annual
production; expression of value 1,500.

Surplus-labour (s) expended during the year:
One half of a working-day expended on the annual
production; expression of value = 1,500.

Value produced by annual labour (v + s) = 3,000.
Total value of product (c + v + s) = 9,000.

The difficulty, then, does not consist in the analysis of the _value_ of
the social product itself. It arises in the comparison of the component
parts of the value of the social product with its _material_
constituents.

The constant, merely re-appearing portion of value is equal to the value
of that part of this product which consists of means of _production_ and
is incorporated in that part.

The new value-product of the year, equal to v + s, is equal to the value
of that part of this product which consists of _articles of consumption_
and is incorporated in it.

But with exceptions of no consequence here, means of production and
articles of consumption are wholly different kinds of commodities,
products of entirely different bodily or use-forms, and, therefore,
products of wholly different classes of concrete labour. The labour
which employs machinery in the production of means of subsistence is
vastly different from the labour which makes machinery. The entire
aggregate annual working-day, whose value-expression is 3,000, seems
spent in the production of articles of consumption equal to 3,000, in
which no constant portion of value re-appears, since these 3,000, equal
to 1,500_(v) + 1,500_(s), resolve themselves only into variable
capital-value and surplus-value. On the other hand the constant
capital-value of 6,000 re-appears in a class of products quite different
from articles of consumption, namely in means of production, while as a
matter of fact no part of the social working-day seems spent in the
production of these new products. It seems rather that the entire
working-day consists only of classes of labour which do not result in
means of production but in articles of consumption. This mystery has
already been cleared up. The value-product of the year’s labour is equal
to the value of the products of department II, to the total value of the
newly produced articles of consumption. But the value of these products
is greater by two-thirds than that portion of the annual labour which
has been expended in the sphere of production of articles of consumption
(department II). Only one-third of the annual labour has been expended
in their production. Two-thirds of this annual labour have been expended
in the production of means of production, that is to say, in department
I. The value-product created during this time in I, equal to the
variable capital-value plus surplus-value produced in I, is equal to the
constant-capital-value of II re-appearing in articles of consumption of
II. Hence they may be mutually exchanged and replaced in kind. The total
value of the articles of consumption of II is therefore equal to the sum
of the new value-product of I and II, or II_((c\ +\ v\ +\ s)) equal to
I_((v\ +\ s)) + II_((v\ +\ s)), hence equal to the sum of the new values
produced by the year’s labour in the form of v plus s.

On the other hand the total value of the means of production (I) is
equal to the sum of the constant capital-value re-appearing in the form
of means of production (I) and in that of articles of consumption (II);
in other words, equal to the sum of the constant capital-value
re-appearing in the total product of society. This total value is equal
in terms of value to four-thirds of a working-day preceding the process
of production of I and two-thirds of a working-day preceding the process
of production of II, in all equal to two aggregate working-days.

The difficulty with the annual social product arises therefore from the
fact that the constant portion of value is represented by a wholly
different class of products — means of production — than the new value v
+ s added to this constant portion of value and represented by articles
of consumption. Thus the appearance is created, so far as value is
concerned, that two-thirds of the consumed mass of products are found
again in a new form as new product, without any labour having been
expended by society in their production. This is not so in the case of
an individual capital. Every individual capitalist employs some
particular concrete kind of labour, which transforms the means of
production peculiar to it into a product. Let for instance the
capitalist be a machine-builder, the constant capital expended during
the year 6,000_(c), the variable 1,500_(v), the surplus-value 1,500_(s),
the product 9,000, the product, say, 18 machines of 500 each. The entire
product here exists in the same form, that of machines. (If he produces
various kinds, each kind is calculated separately.) The entire
commodity-product is the result of the labour expended during the year
in machine-building; it is a combination of the same concrete kind of
labour with the same means of production. The various portions of the
value of the product therefore present themselves in the same bodily
form: 12 machines embody 6,000_(c), 3 machines 1,500_(v), 3 machines
1,500_(s). In the present case it is evident that the value of the 12
machines is equal to 6,000_(c), not because there is incorporated in
these 12 machines only labour performed previously to the manufacture of
these machines and not labour expended on building them. The value of
the means of production for 18 machines did not of itself become
transformed into 12 machines but the value of these 12 machines
(consisting itself of 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) is equal to the
total value of the constant capital contained in the 18 machines. The
machine-manufacturer must therefore sell 12 of the 18 machines in order
to replace his expended constant capital, which he requires for the
reproduction of 18 new machines. On the contrary, the thing would be
inexplicable if in spite of the fact that the labour expended was
employed solely in the manufacture of machines, the result were to be:
On the one hand 6 machines equal to 1,500_(v) + 1,500_(s), on the other
iron, copper, screws, belts, etc., of a value amounting to 6,000_(c),
i.e., the means of production of the machines in their bodily form,
which, as we know, the individual machine-building capitalist does not
produce himself but must replace by way of the process of circulation.
And yet it seems at first glance that the reproduction of the annual
product of society takes place in this absurd way.

The product of an individual capital, i.e., of every fraction of the
social capital endowed with a life of its own and functioning
independently, has a bodily form of one kind or another. The only
condition is that this product must really have a use-form, a use-value,
which gives it the imprint of a member of the world of commodities
capable of circulation. It is immaterial and accidental whether or not
it can re-enter as a means of production into the same process of
production from which it emerged as a product; in other words, whether
the portion of its value representing the constant part of the capital
has a bodily form in which it can actually function again as constant
capital. If not, this portion of the value of the product is reconverted
into the form of its material elements of production by means of sale
and purchase and thus the constant capital is reproduced in the bodily
form capable of functioning.

It is different with the product of the aggregate social capital. All
the material elements of reproduction must in their bodily form
constitute parts of this product. The consumed constant part of capital
can be replaced by the aggregate production only to the extent that the
entire constant part of the capital reappearing in the product
re-appears in the bodily form of new means of production which can
really function as constant capital. Hence, simple reproduction being
assumed, the value of that portion of the product which consists of
means of production must be equal to the constant portion of the value
of social capital.

Furthermore: Considered individually, the capitalist produces in the
value of his product by means of the newly added labour only his
variable capital plus surplus-value, while the constant part of the
value is transferred to the product owing to the concrete character of
the newly added labour.

Considered socially that portion of the social working-day which
produces means of production, hence adding new value to them as well as
transferring to them the value of the means of production consumed in
their manufacture, creates nothing but new _constant capital_ intended
to replace that consumed in the shape of old means of production in both
departments I and II. It creates only product intended for productive
consumption. The entire value of this product, then, is only value which
can function anew as constant capital, which can only buy back constant
capital in its bodily form, and which, for this reason, resolves itself,
considered socially, neither into variable capital nor surplus-value. On
the other hand that part of the social working-day which produces
articles of consumption does not create any portion of the social
replacement capital. It creates only products intended, in their bodily
form, to realise the value of the variable capital and surplus-value of
I and II.

Speaking of the point of view of society, and therefore considering the
aggregate product of society, which comprises both the reproduction of
social capital and individual consumption, we must not lapse into the
manner copied by Proudhon from bourgeois economy and look upon this
matter as though a society with a capitalist mode of production, if
viewed _en bloc_, as a totality, would lose this its specific historical
and economic character. No, on the contrary. We have, in that case, to
deal with the aggregate capitalist. The aggregate capital appears as the
capital stock of all individual capitalists combined. This joint-stock
company has in common with many other stock companies that everyone
knows what he puts in, but not what he will get out of it.

IX. A Retrospect to Adam Smith, Storch, and Ramsay

The aggregate value of the social product amounts to 9,000, equal to
6,000_(c) + 1,500_(c) + 1,500_(s), i.e., 6,000 reproduce the value of
the means of production and 3,000 that of the articles of consumption.
The value of the social revenue (v + s) amounts therefore to only
one-third of the value of the aggregate product, and the totality of
consumers, labourers as well as capitalists, can draw commodities,
products out of the total social product and incorporate them in their
consumption-fund only to the amount of this one-third. On the other hand
6,000, or two-thirds, of the value of the product, are the value of the
constant capital which must be replaced in kind. Means of production to
this amount must therefore again be incorporated in the production-fund.
Storch recognised this as essential without being able to prove it:

“It is clear that the value of the annual product is divided partly into
capital and partly into profits, and that each one of these portions of
the value of the annual product is regularly employed in buying the
products which the nation needs both for the maintenance of its capital
and for replenishing its consumption-fund... . The products which
constitute the _capital_ of a nation _are not to be consumed_.” (Storch,
_Considèrations sur la nature du revenu national Paris_, 1824, pp.
134-35, 150.)

Adam Smith, however, has promulgated this astounding dogma, which is
believed to this day, not only in the previously mentioned form,
according to which the entire value of the social product resolves
itself into revenue, into wages plus surplus-value, or, as he expresses
it, into wages plus profit (interest) plus ground-rent, but also in the
still more popular form, according to which the _consumers_ must
“ULTIMATELY” pay to the producers the _entire value of the product_.
This is to this day one of the best-established commonplaces, or rather
eternal truths, of the so-called science of political economy. This is
illustrated in the following plausible manner: Take any article, for
instance a linen shirt. First, the spinner of linen yarn has to pay the
flax-grower the entire value of the flax, i.e., the value of flax-seed,
fertilisers, labouring cattle feed, etc., plus that part of the value
which the fixed capital, such as buildings, agricultural implements,
etc., of the flax-grower gives up to the product; the wages paid in the
production of the flax; the surplus-value (profit, ground-rent) embodied
in the flax; finally the carriage costs of the flax from its place of
production to the spinnery. Next, the weaver has to reimburse the
spinner of the linen yarn not only for the price of the flax, but also
for that portion of the value of machinery, buildings, etc., in short of
the fixed capital, which is transferred to the flax; furthermore, all
the auxiliary materials consumed in the spinning process, the wages of
the spinners, the surplus-value, etc., and so the thing goes on with the
bleacher, the transportation costs of the finished linen, and finally
the shirtmaker, who has to pay the entire price of all preceding
producers, who supplied him only with his raw material. In his hands a
further addition of value takes place, partly through the value of
constant capital consumed in the manufacture of shirts in the shape of
instruments of labour, auxiliary materials, etc., and partly through the
labour expended, which adds the value of the shirtmakers’ wages plus the
surplus-value of the shirt manufacturer. Now let this entire product in
shirts cost ultimately £100 and let this be the aliquot part of the
value of the total annual product expended by society on shirts. The
consumers of the shirts pay these £100, i.e., the value of all the means
of production contained in the shirts, and of the wages plus
surplus-value of the flax-grower, spinner, weaver, bleacher, shirt
manufacturer, and all carriers. This is absolutely correct. Indeed,
every child can see that. But then it says: that’s how matters stand
with regard to the value of all other commodities. It should say: That’s
how matters stand with regard to the value of _all articles of
consumption_, with regard to the value of that portion of the social
product which passes into the consumption-fund, i.e., with regard to
that portion of the value of the social product which can be expended as
revenue. True enough, the sum of the values of all these commodities is
equal to the value of all the means of production (constant portions of
capital) used up in them plus the value created by the labour last added
(wages plus surplus-value). Hence the totality of the consumers can pay
for this entire sum of values because, although the value of each
individual commodity is made up of c + v + s, nevertheless the sum of
the values of all commodities passing into the consumption-fund, taken
at its maximum, can be equal only to that portion of the value of the
social product which resolves itself into v + s, in other words, equal
to that value which the labour expended during the year has added to the
existing means of production — i.e., to the value of the constant
capital. As for the value of the constant capital, we have seen that it
is replaced out of the mass of social products in a two-fold way. First,
through an exchange by capitalists II, who produce articles of
consumption, with capitalists I, who produce the means of production for
them. And here is the source of the saying that what is capital for the
one is revenue for the other. But this is not the actual state of
affairs. The 2,000 II_(c) existing in the shape of articles of
consumption worth 2,000 constitute a constant capital-value for the
capitalist class of II. They therefore cannot consume this value
themselves, although the product in accordance with its bodily form is
intended for consumption. On the other hand, the 2,000 I_((v\ +\ s)) are
wages plus surplus-value produced by capitalist and working-class I.
They exist in the bodily form of means of production, of things in which
their own value cannot be consumed. We have here, then, a sum of values
to the amount of 4,000, one half of which, before and after the
exchange, replaces only constant capital, while the other half forms
only revenue.

In the second place the constant capital of department I is replaced in
kind, partly by exchange among capitalists I, partly by replacement in
kind in each individual business.

The phrase that the value of the entire annual product must ultimately
be paid by the consumer would be correct only if consumer were taken to
comprise two vastly different kinds: individual consumers and productive
consumers. However that one portion of the product must be consumed
_productively_ means nothing but that it must _function as capital_ and
not be _consumed as revenue_.

If we divide the value of the aggregate product, equal to 9,000, into
6,000_(c) + l,500_(v) + 1,500_(s) and look upon the 3,000_((v\ +\ s))
only in its quality of revenue, then, on the contrary, the variable
capital seems to disappear and capital, socially speaking, to consist
only of constant capital. For that which appeared originally as
1,500_(v) has resolved itself into a portion of the social revenue, into
wages, the revenue of the working-class, and its character of capital
has thus vanished. This conclusion is actually drawn by Ramsay.
According to him, capital, socially considered, consists only of fixed
capital, but by fixed capital be means the constant capital, that
quantity of values which consists of means of production, whether these
means of production are instruments or materials of labour, such as raw
materials, semi-finished products, auxiliary materials, etc. He calls
the variable capital circulating capital:

“Circulating capital consists exclusively of subsistence and other
necessaries advanced to the workmen, previous to the completion of the
produce of their labour... Fixed capital alone, not circulating, is
properly speaking a source of national wealth... Circulating capital is
not an immediate agent in production, nor even essential to it at all,
but merely a convenience rendered necessary by the deplorable poverty of
the mass of the people... Fixed capital alone constitutes an element of
cost of production in a national point of view.” (Ramsay, l.c., pp. 23
to 26, _passim._)

Ramsay defines fixed capital, by which he means constant capital, more
closely in the following words:

“On the length of time during which any portion of the product of that
labour” (namely LABOUR BESTOWED ON ANY COMMODITY) “has existed as fixed
capital; that is, in a form in which, though assisting to raise the
future commodity, _it does not maintain labourers_.” Ibid., p. 59.)

Here we see once more the calamity Adam Smith brings on by submerging
the distinction between constant and variable capital in that between
fixed capital and circulating capital. Ramsay’s constant capital
consists of instruments of labour, his circulating capital of means of
subsistence. Both of them are commodities of a given value. The one can
no more create surplus-value than the other.

X. Capital and Revenue: Variable Capital and Wages

The entire annual reproduction, the entire product of a year is the
product of the useful labour of that year. But the value of this total
product is greater than that portion of the value in which the annual
labour, the labour-power expended during the current year, is
incorporated. The _value-product_ of this year, the value newly created
during this period in the form of commodities, is smaller than the
_value of the product_, the aggregate value of the mass of commodities
fabricated during the entire year. The difference obtained by deducting
from the total value of the annual product that value which was added to
it by the labour of the current year, is not really reproduced value but
only value re-appearing in a new form of existence. It is value
transferred to the annual product from value existing prior to it, which
may be of an earlier or later date, according to the durability of the
components of the constant capital which have participated in that
year’s social labour-process, a value which may originate from the value
of means of production which came into the world the previous year or in
a number of years even previous to that. It is by all means a value
transferred from means of production of former years to the product of
the current year.

Take our scheme. We have, after the exchange of the elements hitherto
considered between I and II, and within II.

1) 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) (the latter 2,000 realised in
articles of consumption of II_(c)) = 6,000.

II) 2,000_(c) (reproduced by exchange with I_((v\ +\ s)) + 500_(v) +
500_(s) = 3,000.

Sum of values = 9,000.

Value newly produced during the year is contained only in v and s. The
sum of the value-product of this year is therefore equal to the sum of v
+ s, or 2,000 I_((v\ +\ s)) + 1,000 II_((v\ +\ s)) = 3,000. All
remaining value-parts of the product of this year are merely value
transferred from the value of earlier means of production consumed in
the annual production. The current annual labour has not produced any
value other than that of 3,000. That represents its entire annual
value-product.

Now, as we have seen, the 2,000 I_((v\ +\ s)) replace for class II its
2,000 II_(c) in the bodily form of means of production. Two-thirds of
the annual labour, then, expended in category I, have newly produced
constant capital II, both its entire value and its bodily form. From the
standpoint of society, two-thirds of the labour expended during the year
have created new constant capital-value realised in the bodily form
appropriate for department II. Thus the greater portion of the annual
labour of society has been spent in the production of new constant
capital (capital-value existing in the form of means of production) in
order to replace the value of the constant capital expended in the
production of articles of consumption. What distinguishes capitalist
society in this case from the savage is not, as Senior^([1]) thinks, the
privilege and peculiarity of the savage to expend his labour at times in
a way that does not procure him any products resolvable (exchangeable)
into revenue, i.e., into articles of consumption. No, the distinction
consists in the following.

a) Capitalist society employs more of its available annual labour in the
production of means of production (ergo, of constant capital) which are
not resolvable into revenue in the form of wages or surplus-value, but
can function only as capital.

b) When a savage makes bows, arrows, stone hammers, axes, baskets, etc.,
he knows very well that he did not spend the time so employed in the
production of articles of consumption, but that he has thus stocked up
the means of production he needs, and nothing else. Furthermore, a
savage commits a grave economic sin by his utter indifference to waste
of time, and, as Tylor^([2]) tells us, takes sometimes a whole month to
make one arrow.

The current conception whereby some political economists seek to
extricate themselves from the theoretical difficulty, i.e., the
understanding of the real interconnections — that what is capital to one
is revenue to another, and vice versa — is only partially correct and
becomes utterly wrong (harbours therefore a complete misunderstanding of
the entire process of exchange taking place in annual reproduction,
hence also a misunderstanding of the actual basis of the partially
correct) as soon as the character of universality is attributed to it.

We now summarise the actual relations on which the partial correctness
of this conception rests, and in doing so the wrong conception of these
relations will come to the surface.

1) The variable capital functions as capital in the hands of the
capitalist and as revenue in the hands of the wage-worker.

The variable capital exists at first in the hands of the capitalist as
_money-capital_; and it performs the function of _money-capital_, by his
buying labour-power with it. So long as it persists in his hands in the
form of money, it is nothing but a given value existing in the form of
money; hence a constant and not a variable magnitude. It is a variable
capital only potentially, owing to its convertibility into labour-power.
It becomes real variable capital only after divesting itself of its
money-form, after being converted into labour-power functioning as a
component part of productive capital in the capitalist process.

_Money_, which first functioned as the money-form of the variable
capital for the capitalist, now functions in the hands of the labourer
as the money-form of his wages, which he exchanges for means of
subsistence; i.e., as the money-form of _revenue_ derived from the
constantly repeated sale of his labour-power.

We have here but the simple fact that the money of the buyer, in this
case the capitalist, passes from his hands into those of the seller, in
this case the seller of labour-power, the labourer. It is not a case of
the variable _capital_ functioning in a dual capacity, as capital for
the capitalist and as revenue for the labourer. It is the same _money_
which exists first in the hands of the capitalist as the money-form of
his variable capital, hence as potential variable capital, and which
serves in the hands of the labourer as an equivalent for sold
labour-power as soon as the capitalist converts it into labour-power.
But the fact that the same money serves another useful purpose in the
hands of the seller than in those of the buyer is a phenomenon peculiar
to the purchase and sale of all commodities.

Apologetic economists present the matter in a wrong light, as is best
seen if we keep our eyes fixed exclusively, without taking for the time
being any notice of what follows, on the act of circulation M — L (equal
to M — C), the conversion of money into labour-power on the part of the
capitalist buyer, which is L — M (equal to C — M), the conversion of the
commodity labour-power into money on the part of the seller, the
labourer. They say: Here the same money realises two capitals; the buyer
— the capitalist — converts his money-capital into living labour-power,
which he incorporates in his productive capital; on the other hand the
seller, the labourer, converts his commodity, labour-power, into money,
which he spends as revenue, and this enables him to keep on reselling
his labour-power and thereby to maintain it. His labour-power, then,
represents his capital in commodity-form, which yields him a continuous
revenue. Labour-power is indeed his property (ever self-renewing,
reproductive), not his capital. It is the only commodity which he can
and must sell continually in order to live, and which acts as capital
(variable) only in the hands of the buyer, the capitalist. The fact that
a man is continually compelled to sell his labour-power, i.e., himself,
to another man proves, according to those economists, that he is a
capitalist, because he constantly has “commodities” (himself) for sale.
In that sense a slave is also a capitalist, although he is sold by
another once and for all as a commodity; for it is in the nature of this
commodity, a labouring slave, that its buyer does not only make it work
anew every day, but also provides it with the means of subsistence that
enable it to work ever anew. (Compare on this point Sismondi and Say in
the letters to Malthus.^([3]) )

2) And so, in the exchange of 1,000 I_(v) + 1,000 I_(s) for 2,000
II_(c), what is constant capital for some (2,000 II_(c)) becomes
variable capital and surplus-value, hence generally revenue, for the
others; and what is variable capital and surplus-value (2,000
I_((v\ +\ s))), hence generally revenue for some becomes constant
capital for the others.

Let us first look at the exchange of I_(v) for II_(c), beginning with
the point of view of the labourer.

The collective labourer of I has sold his labour-power to the collective
capitalist of I for 1,000; he receives this value in money, paid in the
form of wages. With this money he buys from II articles of consumption
for the same amount of value. Capitalist II confronts him only as a
seller of commodities, and nothing else, even if the labourer buys from
his own capitalist, as he does for instance in the exchange of 500
II_(v), as we have seen above (Part IV, present chapter). The form of
circulation through which his commodity, labour-power, passes, is that
of the simple circulation of commodities for the mere satisfaction of
needs, for the purpose of consumption: C (labour-power) — M — C
(articles of consumption, commodities II). The result of this act of
circulation is that the labourer maintains himself as labour-power for
capitalist I, and in order to continue maintaining himself as such he
must continually renew the process L(C) — M — C. His wages are realised
in articles of consumption, they are spent as revenue, and, taking the
working-class as a whole, are spent again and again as revenue.

Now let us look at the same exchange of I_(v) for II_(c), from the point
of view of the capitalist. The entire commodity-product of II consists
of articles of consumption, hence of things intended to enter into
annual consumption, hence to serve in the realisation of revenue for
someone, in the present case for the collective labourer I. But for the
collective capitalist II one portion of his commodity-product, equal to
2,000, is now the form of the constant capital-value of his productive
capital converted into commodities. This productive capital must be
reconverted from this commodity-form into its bodily form, in which it
may act again as the constant portion of a productive capital. What
capitalist II has accomplished so far is that he has reconverted by
means of sales to labourers I one half (equal to 1,000) of his constant
capital-value, which had been reproduced in the shape of commodities
(articles of consumption), into the form of money. Hence it is not the
variable capital I_(v), which has been converted into this first half of
the constant capital-value II_(c), but simply the money which functioned
for I as money-capital in the exchange for labour-power and thus came
into the possession of the seller of labour-power, to whom it does not
represent capital but revenue in the form of money, i.e., it is spent as
a means of purchase of articles of consumption. Meanwhile, the money
amounting to 1,000, which has come into the hands of the II capitalists
from labourers of I, cannot function as the constant element of
productive capital II. It is only as yet the money-form of his
commodity-capital to be commuted into fixed or circulating constituents
of constant capital. So II buys with the money received from the
labourers of I, the buyers of its commodities, means of production from
I to the amount of 1,000. In this way the constant capital-value II is
renewed to the extent of one half of its total amount in its bodily
form, in which it can function once more as an element of productive
capital II. The circulation in this instance took the course C — M — C:
articles of consumption worth 1,000 — money to the amount of 1,000 —
means of production worth 1,000.

But C — M — C represents here the movement of capital. C, when sold to
the labourers, is converted into M, and this M is converted into means
of production. It is the reconversion of commodities into the material
elements of which this commodity is made. On the other hand just as
capitalist II acts vis-à-vis I only as a buyer of commodities, so
capitalist I acts only as a seller of commodities vis-à-vis II. I
originally bought labour-power worth 1,000 with 1,000 in money intended
to function as variable capital. It has therefore received an equivalent
for the 1,000_(v) which it expended in money-form. This money now
belongs to the labourer who spends it in purchases from II. I cannot get
back this money, which thus found its way into the II treasury unless it
fishes its way out of it again by the sale of commodities of the same
value.

I first had a definite sum of money amounting to 1,000 destined to
function as variable capital. The money functions as such by its
conversion into labour-power of the same value. But the labourer
supplied it as a result of the process of production with a quantity of
commodities (means of production) worth 6,000, of which one-sixth, or
1,000, are equivalent to the variable portion of capital advanced in
money. The variable capital-value functions no more as variable capital
now in its commodity-form than it did before in its form of money. It
can do so only after its conversion into living labour-power, and only
so long as this labour-power functions in the process of production. As
money the variable capital-value was only potential variable capital.
But it had a form in which it was directly convertible into
labour-power. As a commodity the same variable capital-value is still
potential money-value, it is restored to its original money-form only by
the sale of the commodities, and therefore by II buying for 1,000
commodities from I. The movement of the circulation is here as follows:
1,000_(v) (money) — labour-power worth 1,000 — 1,000 in commodities
(equivalent of the variable capital) — 1,000_(v) (money); hence M — C...
C — M (equal to M — L ... C — M). The process of production intervening
between C ... C does not itself belong in the sphere of circulation. It
does not figure in the mutual exchange of the various elements of the
annual reproduction, although this exchange includes the reproduction of
all the elements of productive capital, the constant elements as well as
the variable element (labour-power). All the participants in this
exchange appear either as buyers or sellers or both. The labourers
appear only as buyers of commodities, the capitalists alternately as
buyers and sellers, and within certain limits either only as buyers of
commodities or only as sellers of commodities.

Result: I possesses once more the variable value-constituent of its
capital in the form of money, from which alone it is directly
convertible into labour-power, i.e., it once more possesses the variable
capital-value in the sole form in which it can really be advanced as a
variable element of its productive capital. On the other hand the
labourer must again act as a seller of commodities, of his labour-power,
before he can act again as a buyer of commodities.

So far as the variable capital of category II (500 II_(v)) is concerned,
the process of circulation between the capitalists and labourers of the
same class of production takes place directly, since we look upon it as
taking place between the collective capitalist II and the collective
labourer II.

The collective capitalist II advances 500_(v) for the purchase of
labour-power of the same value. In this case the collective capitalist
is a buyer, the collective labourer a seller. Thereupon the labourer
appears with the proceeds of the sale of his labour-power to act as a
buyer of a part of the commodities produced by himself. Here the
capitalist is therefore a seller. The labourer has replaced to the
capitalist the money paid in the purchase of his labour-power by means
of a portion of commodity-capital II produced, namely 500_(v) in
commodities. The capitalist now holds in the form of commodities the
same v which he had in the form of money before its conversion into
labour-power, while the labourer on the other hand has realised the
value of his labour-power in money and now, in his turn, realises this
money by spending it as his revenue to defray his consumption in the
purchase of part of the articles of consumption produced by himself. It
is an exchange of the revenue of the labourer in money for a portion of
commodities he has himself reproduced, namely 500_(v) of the capitalist.
In this way this money returns to capitalist II as the money-form of his
variable capital. An equivalent value of revenue in the form of money
here replaces variable capital-value in the form of commodities.

The capitalist does not increase his wealth by taking away again the
money paid by him to the labourer in the purchase of labour-power when
he sells him an equivalent quantity of commodities. He would indeed be
paying the labourer twice if he were to pay him first 500 in the
purchase of his labour-power, and then in addition give him gratis a
quantity of commodities worth 500, which the labourers produced for him.
Vice versa, if the labourer were to produce for him nothing but an
equivalent in commodities worth 500 for the price of his labour-power of
500, the capitalist would be no better off after the transaction than
before. But the labourer has reproduced a product of 3,000. He has
preserved the constant portion of the value of the product, i.e., the
value of the means of production used up in it to the amount of 2,000 by
converting them into a new product. He has furthermore added to this
given value a value of 1,000_((v\ +\ s)). (The idea that the capitalist
grows richer in the sense that he wins a surplus-value by the reflux of
the 500 in money is developed by Destutt de Tracy, as shown in detail in
section XIII of this chapter.)

Through the purchase of 500 worth of articles of consumption by labourer
II, capitalist II recovers the value of 500 II_(v) — which he just
possessed in commodities — in money, the form in which he advanced it
originally. The immediate result of this transaction, as of any other
sale of commodities, is the conversion of a given value from the form of
commodities into that of money. Nor is there anything special in the
reflux thus effected of the money to its point of departure. If
capitalist II had bought, with 500 in money, commodities from capitalist
I, and then in turn sold to capitalist I commodities to the amount of
500, 500 would have likewise returned to him in money. This sum of 500
in money would merely have served for the circulation of a quantity of
commodities (1,000), and according to the general law previously
expounded, the money would have returned to the one who put it into
circulation for the purpose of exchanging this quantity of commodities.

But the 500 in money which flowed back to capitalist II are at one and
the same time renewed potential variable capital in money-form. Why is
this so? Money, and therefore money-capital, is potential variable
capital only because and to the extent that it is convertible into
labour-power. The return of £500 in money to capitalist II is
accompanied by the return of labour-power II to the market. The return
of both of these at opposite poles — hence also the re-appearance of 500
in money not only as money but also as variable capital in the form of
money — is conditional on one and the same process. The money equal to
500 returns to capitalist II because he sold to labourers II articles of
consumption amounting to 500, i.e., because the labourer spends his
wages to maintain himself and his family and thus his labour-power. In
order to be able to live on and act again as a buyer of commodities he
must again sell his labour-power. The return of 500 in money to
capitalist II is therefore at the same time a return, or an abiding, of
the labour-power in the capacity of a commodity purchasable with 500 in
money, and thereby a return of 500 in money as potential variable
capital.

As for category IIb, which produces articles of luxury, the case with v
— (IIb)_(v) — is the same as with I_(v). The money, which renews for
capitalists IIb their variable capital in the form of money, flows back
to them in a round-about way through capitalists IIa. But it
nevertheless makes a difference whether the labourers buy their means of
subsistence directly from the capitalist producers to whom they sell
their labour-power or whether they buy them from capitalists of another
category, through whose agency the money returns to the former only by a
circuitous route. Since the working-class lives from hand to mouth, it
buys as long as it has the means to buy. It is different with the
capitalists, as for instance in the exchange of 1,000 II_(c) for 1,000
I_(v). The capitalist does not live from hand to mouth. His compelling
motive is the utmost self-expansion of his capital. Now, if
circumstances of any description seem to promise greater advantages to
capitalist II in case he holds on to his money, or to part of it at
least, for a while, instead of immediately renewing his constant
capital, then the return of 1,000 II_(c) (in money) to I is delayed; and
so is the restoration of 1,000_(v) to the form of money, and capitalist
I can continue his business on the same scale only if he disposes of
reserve money; and, generally speaking, reserve capital in the form of
money is necessary to be able to work without interruption, regardless
of the rapid or slow reflux of the variable capital-value in money.

If the exchange of the various elements of the current annual
reproduction is to be investigated, so are the results of the labour of
the preceding year, of the labour of the year that has already come to a
close. The process of production which resulted in this yearly product
lies behind us; it is a thing of the past, incorporated in its product,
and so much the more is this the case with the process of circulation,
which precedes the process of production or runs parallel with it, the
conversion of potential into real variable capital, i.e., the sale and
purchase of labour-power. The labour-market is no longer a part of the
commodity-market, such as we have here before us. The labourer has here
not only already sold his labour-power, but besides the surplus-value
also supplied an equivalent of the price of his labour-power in the
shape of commodities. He has furthermore pocketed his wages and figures
during the exchange only as a buyer of commodities (articles of
consumption). On the other hand the annual product must contain all the
elements of reproduction, restore all the elements of productive
capital, above all its most important element, the variable capital. And
we have seen indeed that the result of the exchange in regard to the
variable capital is this: By spending his wages and consuming the
purchased commodities, the labourer as a buyer of commodities maintains
and reproduces his labour-power, this being the only commodity which he
has to sell. Just as the money advanced by the capitalist in the
purchase of his labour-power returns to him, so labour-power returns to
the labour-market in its capacity of a commodity exchangeable for money.
The result in the special case of 1,000 I_(v) is that the capitalists of
I hold 1,000_(v) in money and the labourers of I offer them 1,000 in
labour-power, so that the entire process of reproduction of I can be
renewed. This is one result of the process of exchange.

On the other hand the expenditure of the wages of the labourers of I
relieved II of articles of consumption to the amount of 1,000_(c), thus
transforming them from the commodity-form into the money-form.
Department II reconverted them into the bodily form of its constant
capital by purchasing from I commodities equal to 1,000_(v) and thus
restoring to I in money-form the value of its variable capital. The
variable capital of I passes through three metamorphoses, which do not
appear at all in the exchange of the annual product or do so only
suggestively.

1) The first form is 1,000 I_(v) in money, which is converted into
labour-power of the same value. This conversion does not itself appear
in the exchange of commodities between I and II, but its result is seen
in the fact that working-class I confronts commodity seller II with
1,000 in money, just as working-class II with 500 in money confronts
commodity seller of 500 II_(v) in commodity-form.

2) The second form, the only one in which variable capital actually
varies, functions as variable capital, where value-creating force
appears in the place of given value exchanged for it; it belongs
exclusively to the process of production which is behind us.

3) The third form, in which the variable capital has justified itself as
such in the result of the process of production, is the annual
value-product, which in the case of I is equal to 1,000_(v) plus
l,000_(s), or 2,000 I_((v\ +\ s)). In the place of its original value of
1,000 in money we have a value of double this amount, or 2,000, in
commodities. The variable capital-value of 1,000 in commodities is
therefore only one half of the value produced by the variable capital as
an element of the productive capital. The 1,000 I_(v) in commodities are
an exact equivalent of the 1,000 in money originally advanced by I and
intended to be the variable part of the aggregate capital. But in the
form of commodities they are money only potentially (they do not become
so actually until they are sold), and still less directly are they
variable money-capital. They eventually become variable money-capital by
the sale of the commodity 1,000 I_(v) to II_(c), and by the early
re-appearance of labour-power as a purchasable commodity, as a material
for which 1,000 in money may be exchanged.

During all these transformations capitalist I continually holds the
variable capital in his hands; 1) to start with as money-capital; 2)
then as an element of his productive capital; 3) still later as a
portion of the value of his commodity-capital, hence in the form of
commodity-value; 4) finally once more in money which is again confronted
by the labour-power for which it can be exchanged. During the
labour-process the capitalist is in possession of the variable capital
as active value-creating labour-power, but not as a value of a given
magnitude. But since he never pays the labourer until his power has
acted for a certain length of time, he already has in hand the value
created by that power to replace itself plus the surplus-value before he
pays him.

_As the variable capital always stays in the hands of the capitalist in
some form or other, it cannot be claimed in any way that it converts
itself into revenue for anyone_. On the contrary, 1,000 I_(v) in
commodities converts itself into money by its sale to II half of whose
constant capital it replaces in kind.

What resolves itself into revenue is not variable capital I, or
1,000_(v) in money. This money has ceased to function as the money-form
of variable capital I as soon as it is converted into labour-power, just
as the money of any other buyer of commodities has ceased to represent
anything belonging to him as soon as he has exchanged it for commodities
of still other sellers. The conversions which the money received in
wages goes through in the hands of the working-class are not conversions
of variable capital, but of the value of their labour-power converted
into money; just as the conversion of the value (2,000 I_((v\ +\ s)))
created by the labourer is only the conversion of a commodity belonging
to the capitalist, which does not concern the labourer. However, the
capitalist, and still more his theoretical interpreter, the political
economist, can rid himself only with the greatest difficulty of the idea
that the money paid to the labourer is still his, the capitalist’s. If
the capitalist is a producer of gold, then the variable portion of value
— i.e., the equivalent in commodities which replaces for him the
purchasing price of the labour — appears itself directly in the form of
money and can therefore function anew as variable money-capital without
the circuitous route of a reflux. But so far as labourer II is concerned
— aside from the labourer who produces articles of luxury — 500 v exists
in commodities intended for the consumption of the labourer which he,
considered as the collective labourer, buys directly again from the same
collective capitalist to whom he sold his labour-power. The variable
portion of capital-value II, so far as its bodily form is concerned,
consists of articles of consumption intended mostly for consumption by
the working-class. But it is not the variable capital which is spent in
this form by the labourer, it is the wages, the money of the labourer,
which precisely by its realisation in these articles of consumption
restores to the capitalist the variable capital 500 II_(v) in its
money-form. The variable capital II_(v) is reproduced in articles of
consumption, the same as the constant capital 2,000 II_(c). The one
resolves itself no more into revenue than the other does. In either case
it is the wages which resolve themselves into revenue.

However it is a momentous fact in the exchange of the annual product
that by the expenditure of the wages as revenue there is restored to the
form of money-capital in the one case 1,000 II_(c), likewise, by this
circuitous route, 1,000 I_(v) and ditto 500 II_(v), hence constant and
variable capital. (In the case of the variable capital partly by means
of a direct and partly by means of an indirect reflux.)

Notes

1. “When the savage makes bows, he exercises an industry, but he does
not practise abstinence.” (Senior, _Principes fondamentaux de l’Économie
Politique,_ trad. Arrivabene, Paris, 1836, pp. 342-43.) “The more
society progresses, the more abstinence is demanded.” (Ibid., p. 312).
(Cf. _Capital_, Ch. XXIV, 3.]

2. E.B. Tylor, _Researches into the Early History of Mankind,_ etc.,
London, 1865, pp. 198-99.

3. Marx has in mind J. B. Say’s _Lettres à M. Malthus sur différents
sujets d’économie politique, notamment sur les causes de la stagnation
générale du commerce,_ Paris, 1820. — Ed.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 20: Simple Reproduction - Part 3

XI. Replacement of the Fixed Capital

In the analysis of the exchanges of the annual reproduction the
following presents great difficulty. If we take the simplest form in
which the matter may be presented, we get:
I) 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + l,000_(s) +
II) 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 9,000.
This resolves itself finally into:
4,000 I_(c) + 2,000 II_(c) + 1,000 I_(v) + 500 II_(v) + l,000 I_(s) +
500 II_(s)
= 6,000_(c) + 1,500_(v) + 1,500_(s) = 9,000

One portion of the value of the constant capital, which consists of
instruments of labour in the strict meaning of the term (as a distinct
section of the means of production) is transferred from the instruments
of labour to the product of labour (the commodity); these instruments of
labour continue to function as elements of the productive capital, doing
so in their old bodily form. It is their wear and tear, the depreciation
gradually experienced by them during their continual functioning for a
definite period which re-appears as an element of value of the
commodities produced by means of them, which is transferred from the
instrument of labour to the product of labour. With regard to the annual
reproduction therefore only such component parts of fixed capital will
from the first be given consideration as last longer than a year. If
they are completely worn out within the year they must be completely
replaced and renewed by the annual reproduction, and the point at issue
does not concern them at all. It may happen in the case of machines and
other more durable forms of fixed capital — and it frequently does
happen — that certain parts of them must be replaced lock, stock and
barrel within one year, although the building or machine in its entirety
lasts much longer. These parts belong in one category with the elements
of fixed capital which are to be replaced within one year.

This element of the value of commodities must not be confused with the
costs of repair. If a commodity is sold, this value-element is turned
into money, the same as all others. But after it has been turned into
money, its difference from the other elements of value becomes apparent.
The raw and auxiliary materials consumed in the production of
commodities must be replaced in kind in order that the reproduction of
commodities may begin (or that the process of production of commodities
in general may be continuous). The labour-power spent on them must also
be renewed by fresh labour-power. Consequently the money realised on the
commodities must be continually reconverted into these elements of the
productive capital, from the money-form into the commodity-form. It does
not alter the matter if raw and auxiliary materials for instance are
bought at certain intervals in larger quantities — so that they
constitute productive supplies — and need not be bought anew during
certain periods; and therefore — as long as they last — the money coming
in through the sale of commodities, inasmuch as it is meant for this
purpose, may accumulate and this portion of constant capital thus
appears temporarily as money-capital whose active function has been
suspended. It is not a revenue-capital; it is productive capital
suspended in the form of money. The renewal of the means of production
must go on all the time, although the form of this renewal — with
reference to the circulation — may vary. The new purchases, the
circulation operation by which they are renewed or replaced, may take
place at more or at less prolonged intervals: then a large amount may be
invested at one stroke, compensated by a corresponding productive
supply. Or the intervals between purchases may be small: then follows a
rapid succession of money expenditures in small doses, of small
productive supplies. This does not alter the matter itself. The same
applies to labour-power. Where production is carried on continuously
throughout the year on the same scale — continuous replacement of
consumed labour-power by new. Where work is seasonable, or different
portions of labour are applied at different periods, as in agriculture —
corresponding purchases of labour-power, now in small, now in large
amounts. But the money proceeds realised from the sale of commodities,
so far as they turn into money that part of the commodity-value which is
equal to the wear and tear of fixed capital, are not re-converted into
that component part of the productive capital whose diminution in value
they cover. They settle down beside the productive capital and persist
in the form of money. This precipitation of money is repeated, until the
period of reproduction consisting of great or small numbers of years has
elapsed, during which the fixed element of constant capital continues to
function in the process of production in its old bodily form. As soon as
the fixed element, such as buildings, machinery, etc., has been worn
out, and can no longer function in the process of production, its value
exists alongside it fully replaced by money, by the sum of money
precipitations, the values which had been gradually transferred from the
fixed capital to the commodities in whose production it participated and
which had assumed the form of money as a result of the sale of these
commodities. This money then serves to replace the fixed capital (or its
elements, since its various elements have different durabilities) in
kind and thus really to renew this component part of the productive
capital. This money is therefore the money-form of a part of the
constant capital-value, namely of its fixed part. The formation of this
hoard is thus itself an element of the capitalist process of
reproduction; it is the reproduction and storing up — in the form of
money — of the value of fixed capital, or its several elements, until
the fixed capital has ceased to live and in consequence has given off
its full value to the commodities produced and must now be replaced in
kind. But this money loses only its form of a hoard and hence resumes
its activity in the process of reproduction of capital brought about by
the circulation as soon as it is reconverted into new elements of fixed
capital to replace those that died off.

Just as simple commodity circulation is in no way identical with a bare
exchange of products, the conversion of the annual commodity-product can
in no way resolve itself into a mere unmediated mutual exchange of its
various components. Money plays a specific role in it, which finds
expression particularly in the manner in which the value of the fixed
capital is reproduced. (How different the matter would present itself if
production were collective and no longer possessed the form of commodity
production is left to a later analysis.)

Should we now return to our fundamental scheme, we shall get the
following for class II: 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s). All the articles
of consumption produced in the course of the year are in that case equal
in value to 3,000; and every one of the different commodity elements in
the total sum of the commodities is composed, so far as its value is
concerned, of ⅔_(c) + 1/6_(v) + 1/6_(s), or, in percentages, 66⅔_(c) +
16⅔_(v) + 16⅔_(s). The various kinds of commodities of class II may
contain different proportions of constant capital. Likewise the fixed
portion of the constant capital may be different. The duration of the
parts of the fixed capital and hence the annual wear and tear, or that
portion of value which they transfer _pro rata_ to the commodities in
the production of which they participate, may also differ. But that is
immaterial here. As to the process of social reproduction, it is only a
question of exchange between classes II and I. These two classes here
confront each other only in their social, mass relations. Therefore the
proportional magnitude of part c of the value of commodity-product II
(the only one of consequence in the question now being discussed) gives
the average proportion if all the branches of production classed under
II are embraced.

Every kind of commodity (and they are largely the same kinds) whose
aggregate value is classed under 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) is
therefore equal in value to 66⅔%_(c) + 16⅔%_(v) + 16⅔%_(s). This applies
to every 100 of the commodities, whether classed under c, v or s.

The commodities in which the 2,000_(c) are incorporated may be further
divided, in value, into:
1) 1,333⅓_(c) + 333⅓_(v) + 333⅓_(s) = 2,000_(c);
similarly 500_(v) may be divided into:
2) 333⅓_(c) + 83⅓_(v) + 83⅓_(s) = 500_(v);
and finally 500_(s) may be divided into:
3) 333⅓_(c) + 83⅓_(v) + 83⅓_(s) = 500_(s)

Now, if we add the c’s in 1), 2), and 3) we get 1,333⅓_(c) + 333⅓_(c) +
333⅓_(c) = 2,000. Furthermore 333⅓_(v) + 83⅓_(v) + 83⅓_(v) = 500.

And the same in the case of s. The addition gives the same total value
of 3,000, as above.

The entire constant capital-value contained in the commodity mass II
representing a value of 3,000 is therefore comprised in 2,000_(c), and
neither 500_(v) nor 500_(s) hold an atom of it. The same is true of v
and s respectively.

In other words, the entire share of commodity mass II that represents
constant capital-value and therefore is reconvertible either into its
bodily or its money-form, exists in 2,000_(c). Everything referring to
the exchange of the constant value of commodities II is therefore
confined to the movement of 2,000 II_(c). And this exchange can be made
only with I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)).

Similarly, as regards class I, everything that bears in the exchange of
the constant capital-value of that class is to be confined to a
consideration of 4,000 I_(c).

1. Replacement of the Wear and Tear Portion of the Value in the Form of Money

Now, if to start with we take

I. 4,000_(c) +

1,000v + 1,000_(s)

II. . . . . . . .

2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s),

 

 

the exchange of the commodities 2,000 II_(c) for commodities of the same
value I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) would presuppose that the entire 2,000
II_(c) are reconverted in kind into the natural elements of the constant
capital of II, produced by I. But the commodity-value of 2,000, in which
the latter exists, contains an element making good the depreciation in
value of the fixed capital, which is not to be replaced immediately in
kind but converted into money, which gradually accumulates into a sum
total until the time for the renewal of the fixed capital in its bodily
form arrives. Every year registers the demise of fixed capital which
must be replaced in this or that individual business, or in this or that
branch of industry. In the case of one and the same individual capital,
this or that portion of its fixed capital must be replaced, since its
different parts have different durabilities. On examining annual
reproduction, even on a simple scale, i.e., disregarding all
accumulation, we do not begin _ab ovo_. The year which we study is one
in the course of many; it is not the first year after the birth of
capitalist production. The various capitals invested in the manifold
lines of production of class II therefore differ in age. Just as people
functioning in these lines of production die annually, so a host of
fixed capitals expire annually and must be renewed in kind out of the
accumulated money-fund. Therefore the exchange of 2,000 II_(c) for 2,000
I_((v\ +\ s)) includes a conversion of 2,000 II_(c) from its
commodity-form (articles of consumption) into natural elements which
consist not only of raw and auxiliary materials but also of natural
elements of fixed capital, such as machinery, tools, buildings, etc. The
wear and tear, which must be replaced in money in the value of 2,000
II_(c), therefore by no means corresponds to the amount of the
functioning fixed capital, since a portion of this must be replaced in
kind every year. But this assumes that the money necessary for this
replacement was accumulated in former years by the capitalists of class
II. However that very condition holds good in the same measure for the
current year as for the preceding ones.

In the exchange between I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) and 2,000 II_(c) it
must be first noted that the sum of values I_((v\ +\ s)) does not
contain any constant element of value, hence also no element of value to
replace wear and tear, i.e., value that has been transmitted from the
fixed component of the constant capital to the commodities in whose
bodily form v + s exist. On the other hand this element exists in
II_(c), and it is precisely a part of this value-element that owes its
existence to fixed capital which is not to be converted immediately from
the money-form into its bodily form, but has first to persist in the
form of money. The exchange between I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) and 2,000
II_(c), therefore, at once presents the difficulty that the means of
production of I, in whose bodily form the 2,000_((v\ +\ s)) exist, are
to be exchanged to the full value of 2,000 for an equivalent in articles
of consumption II, while on the other hand the 2,000 II_(c) of articles
of consumption cannot be exchanged at their full value for means of
production I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) because an aliquot part of their
value — equal to the wear and tear, or the value depreciation of the
fixed capital that is to be replaced — must first be precipitated in the
form of money that will not function any more as a medium of circulation
during the current period of annual reproduction, which alone we are
examining. But the money paying for this element of wear and tear
incorporated in the commodity-value 2,000 II_(c) can come only from
department I, since II cannot pay for itself but effects payment
precisely by selling its goods, and since presumably I_((v\ +\ s)) buys
the whole of the commodities 2,000 II_(c). Hence class I must by means
of this purchase convert that wear and tear into money for II. But
according to the law previously evolved, money advanced to the
circulation returns to the capitalist producer who later on throws an
equal amount of commodities into circulation. It is evident that in
buying II_(c), I cannot give II commodities worth 2,000 and a surplus
amount of money on top of that once and for all (without any return of
the same by way of the operation of exchange). Otherwise I would buy the
commodity mass II above its value. If II actually exchanges its
2,000_(c) for I (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)), it has no further claims on I,
and the money circulating in this exchange returns to either I or II,
depending on which of them threw it into circulation, i.e., which of
them acted first as buyer. At the same time II would have reconverted
the entire value of its commodity-capital into the bodily form of means
of production, while our assumption is that after its sale it would not
reconvert an aliquot portion of it during the current period of annual
reproduction from money into the bodily form of fixed components of its
constant capital. A money balance in favour of II could arise only if it
sold 2,000 worth to I and bought less than 2,000 from I, say only 1,800.
In that case I would have to make good the debit balance by 200 in
money, which would not flow back to it, because it would not have
withdrawn from circulation the money it had advanced to it by throwing
into it commodities equal to 200. In such an event we would have a
money-fund for II, placed to the credit of the wear and tear of its
fixed capital. But then we would have an over-production of means of
production in the amount of 200 on the other side, the side of I, and
the basis of our scheme would be destroyed, namely reproduction on the
same scale, where complete proportionality between the various systems
of production is assumed. We would only have done away with one
difficulty in order to create another one much worse.

As this problem offers peculiar difficulties and has hitherto not been
treated at all by the political economists, we shall examine _seriatim_
all possible (at least seemingly possible) solutions, or rather
formulations of the problem.

In the first place, we have just assumed that II sells commodities of
the value of 2,000 to I, but buys from it only 1,800 worth. The
commodity-value 2,000 II_(c) contains 200 for replacement of wear and
tear, which must be stored up in the form of money. The value of 2,000
II_(c) would thus be divided into 1,800, to be exchanged for means of
production I, and 200, to replace wear and tear, which are to be kept in
the form of money (after the sale of the 2,000_(c) to I). Expressed in
terms of value, 2,000 II_(c) equals 1,800_(c) + 200_(c)(d), this d
standing for _déchet_. [_Wear and tear. — Ed._]

We would then have to study
Exchange I. 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)
II. 1,800_(c) + 200_(c)(d).
I buys with £1,000, which has gone to the labourers in wages for their
labour-power, 1,000 II_(c) of articles of consumption. II buys with the
same £1,000 means of production 1,000 I_(v). Capitalists I thus recover
their variable capital in the form of money and can employ it next year
in the purchase of labour power to the same amount, i.e., they can
replace the variable portion of their productive capital in kind.

Furthermore, II buys with advanced £400 means of production I_(s), and
I_(s) buys with the same £400 articles of consumption II_(c). The £400
advanced to the circulation by the capitalists of II have thus returned
to them, but only as an equivalent for sold commodities. I now buys
articles of consumption for advanced £400; II buys from I £400 worth of
means of production, whereupon these £400 flow back to I. So far, then,
the account is as follows:

I throws into circulation l,000_(v) + 800_(s) in commodities; it
furthermore throws into circulation, in money, £1,000 in wages and £400
for exchange with II. After the exchange has been made, I has 1,000_(v)
in money, 800_(s) exchanged for 800 II_(c) (articles of consumption) and
£400 in money.

II throws into circulation 1,800_(c) in commodities (articles of
consumption) and £400 in money. On the completion of the exchange it has
1,800 in commodities I (means of production) and £400 in money.

There still remain, on the side of I, 200_(s) (in means of production)
and, on the side of II, 200_(c)(d) (in articles of consumption).

According to our assumption I buys with £200 the articles of consumption
c (d) of the value of 200. But II holds on to these £200 since 200 c (d)
represent wear and tear, and are not to be immediately reconverted into
means of production. Therefore 200 I_(s) cannot be sold. One-fifth of
the surplus-value I to be replaced cannot be realised, or converted,
from its bodily form of means of production into that of articles of
consumption.

This not only contradicts our assumption of reproduction on a simple
scale; it is by itself not a hypothesis which would explain the
transformation of 200_(c)(d) into money. It means rather that it cannot
be explained. Since it cannot be demonstrated in what manner 200_(c)(d)
can be converted into money, it is assumed that I is obliging enough to
do the conversion just because it is not able to convert its own
remainder of 200_(s) into money. To conceive this as a normal operation
of the exchange mechanism is tantamount to the notion that £200 fall
every year from the clouds in order regularly to convert 200_(c)(d) into
money.

But the absurdity of such a hypothesis does not strike one at once if
I_(s), instead of appearing, as it does in this case, in its primitive
mode of existence — namely as a component part of the value of means of
production, hence as a component part of the value of commodities which
their capitalist producers must convert into money by sale — appears in
the hands of the partners of the capitalists, for instance as
ground-rent in the hands of landowners or as interest in the bands of
moneylenders. But if that portion of the surplus-value of commodities
which the industrial capitalist has to yield as ground-rent or interest
to other co-owners of the surplus-value cannot be realised for a long
time by the sale of the commodities, then there is also an end to the
payment of rent and interest, and the landowners or recipients of
interest cannot therefore serve as _dei ex machina_ to convert at
pleasure definite portions of the annual reproduction into money by
spending rent and interest. The same is true of the expenditures of all
so-called unproductive labourers — government officials, physicians,
lawyers, etc., and others who as members of the “general public” “serve”
the political economists by explaining what they left unexplained.

Nor does it improve matters if instead of direct exchange between I and
II — between the two major departments of capitalist producers — the
merchant is drawn in as mediator and helps to overcome all difficulties
with his “money.” In the present case for instance 200 I_(s) must be
definitively disposed of to the industrial capitalists of II. It may
pass through the hands of a number of merchants, but the last of them
will find himself, according to the hypothesis, in the same predicament,
vis- à-vis II, in which the capitalist producers of I were at the
outset, i.e., they cannot sell the 200 I_(s) to II. And this stalled
purchase sum cannot renew the same process with I.

We see here that, aside from our real purpose, it is absolutely
necessary to view the process of reproduction in its basic form — in
which obscuring minor circumstances have been eliminated — in order to
get rid of the false subterfuges which furnish the semblance of
“scientific” analysis when the process of social reproduction is
immediately made the subject of the analysis in its complicated concrete
form.

The law that when reproduction proceeds normally (whether it be on a
simple or on an extended scale) the money advanced by the capitalist
producer to the circulation must return to its point of departure
(whether the money is his own or borrowed) excludes once and for all the
hypothesis that 200 II_(c)(d) is converted into money by means of money
advanced by I.

2. Replacement of Fixed Capital in Kind

Having disposed of the hypothesis considered above, only such
possibilities remain as, besides replacing the wear-and-tear portion in
money, include also the replacement in kind of the wholly defunct fixed
capital.

We assumed hitherto

a) that £1,000 paid in wages by I are spent by the labourers for II_(c)
to the same amount, i.e., that they buy articles of consumption with
them. It is merely a statement of fact that these £1,000 are advanced by
I in money. Wages must be paid in money by the respective capitalist
producers. This money is then spent by the labourers for articles of
consumption and serves the sellers of the articles of consumption as a
medium of circulation in the conversion of their constant capital from
commodity-capital into productive capital. True, it passes through many
channels (shopkeepers, house owners, tax collectors, unproductive
labourers, such as physicians, etc., who are needed by the labourer
himself) and hence it flows only in part directly from the hands of
labourers I into those of capitalist class II. Its flow may be retarded
more or less and the capitalist may therefore require a new
money-reserve. All this does not come under consideration in this basic
form.

b) We assumed that at one time I advances another £400 in money for
purchases from II and that this money returns to it, while at some other
time II advances £400 for purchases from I and likewise recovers this
money. This assumption must be made, for it would be arbitrary to
presuppose the contrary, that capitalist class I or II should
one-sidedly advance to the circulation of the money necessary for the
exchange of their commodities. Since we have shown under subtitle 1 that
one should reject as absurd the hypothesis that I would throw additional
money into the circulation in order to turn 200 II_(c)(d) into money, it
would appear that there was left only the seemingly still more absurd
hypothesis that II itself was throwing the money into circulation, by
which that constituent portion of the value of its commodities is
converted into money which has to compensate the wear and tear of its
fixed capital. For instance that portion of value which is lost by the
spinning-machine of Mr. X in the process of production re-appears as a
portion of the value of the yarn. The loss which his spinning-machine
suffers in value, i.e., in wear and tear, on the one hand, should
accumulate in his hands as money on the other. Now supposing that X buys
£200 worth of cotton from Y and thus advances to the circulation £200 in
money. Y then buys from him £200 worth of yarn, and these £200 now serve
X as a fund to compensate the wear and tear of his machine. The thing
would simply come down to this — that X, aside from his production, its
product, and the sale of this product, keeps £200 _in petto_ to make
good to himself the depreciation of his spinning-machine, i.e., that in
addition to losing £200 through the depreciation of his machine, he must
also put up another £200 in money every year out of his own pocket in
order to be able eventually to buy a new spinning-machine.

But the absurdity is only apparent. Class II consists of capitalists
whose fixed capital is in the most diverse stages of its reproduction.
In the case of some of them it has arrived at the stage where it must be
entirely replaced in kind. In the case of the others it is more or less
remote from that stage. All the members of the latter group have this in
common, that their fixed capital is not actually reproduced, i.e., is
not renewed _in natura_ by a new specimen of the same kind, but that its
value is successively accumulated in money. The first group is in quite
the same (or almost the same, it does not matter here) position as when
it started in business, when it came on the market with its
money-capital in order to convert it into constant (fixed and
circulating) capital on the one hand and into labour-power, into
variable capital, on the other. They have once more to advance this
money-capital to the circulation, i.e., the value of constant fixed
capital as well as that of the circulating and variable capital.

Hence, if we assume that half of the £400 thrown into circulation by
capitalist class II for exchange with I comes from those capitalists of
II who have to renew not only by means of their commodities their means
of production pertaining to the circulating capital, but also, by means
of their money, their fixed capital in kind, while the other half of
capitalists II replaces in kind with its money only the circulating
portion of its constant capital, but does not renew in kind its fixed
capital, then there is no contradiction in the statement that these
returning £400 (returning as soon as I buys articles of consumption for
it) are variously distributed among these two sections of II. They
return to class II, but they do not come back into the same hands and
are distributed variously within this class, passing from one of its
sections to another.

One section of II has, besides the part of the means of production
covered in the long run by its commodities, converted £200 in money into
new elements of fixed capital in kind. As was the case at the start of
the business the money thus spent returns to this section from the
circulation only gradually over a number of years as the wear-and-tear
portion of the value of the commodities to be produced by this fixed
capital.

The other section of II however did not get any commodities from I for
£200. But I pays it with the money which the first section of II spent
for elements of its fixed capital. The first section of II has its fixed
capital-value once more in renewed bodily form, while the second section
is still engaged in accumulating it in money-form for the subsequent
replacement of its fixed capital in kind.

The basis on which we now have to proceed after the previous exchanges
is the remainder of the commodities still to be exchanged by both sides:
400_(s) on the part of I, and 400_(c) on the part of II. ^([44]) We
assume that II advances 400 in money for the exchange of these
commodities amounting to 800. One half of the 400 (equal to 200) must be
laid out under all circumstances by that section of II_(c) which has
accumulated 200 in money as the wear-and-tear value and which has to
reconvert this money into the bodily form of its fixed capital.

Just as constant capital-value, variable capital-value, and
surplus-value — into which the value of commodity-capital II as well as
I is divisible — may be represented by special proportional shares of
commodities II and I respectively, so may, within the value of the
constant capital itself, that portion of the value which is not yet to
be converted into the bodily form of the fixed capital, but is rather to
be accumulated for the time being in the form of money. A certain
quantity of commodities II (in the present case therefore one half of
the remainder, or 200) is here only a vehicle of this wear-and-tear
value, which has to be precipitated in money by means of exchange. (The
first section of capitalists II, which renews fixed capital in kind, may
already have realised in this way — with the wear-and-tear part of the
mass of commodities of which here only the rest still figures — a part
of its wear-and-tear value, but it still has to realise 200 in money.)

As for the second half (equal to 200) of the £400 thrown into
circulation by II in this final operation, it buys circulating
components of constant capital from I. A portion of these £200 may be
thrown into circulation by both sections of II, or only by the one which
does not renew its fixed component of value in kind.

With these £400 there is thus extracted from I: 1) commodities amounting
to £200, consisting only of elements of fixed capital; 2) commodities
amounting to £200, replacing only natural elements of the circulating
portion of the constant capital of II. So I has sold its entire annual
product, so far as it is to be sold to II; but the value of one-fifth of
it, £400, is now held by I in the form of money. This money however is
surplus-value converted into money which must be spent as revenue for
articles of consumption. Thus I buys with its £400 II’s entire
commodity-value equal to 400; hence this money flows back to II by
setting its commodities in motion.

We shall now suppose three cases, in which we shall call the section of
capitalists II which replaces its fixed capital in kind “section 1,” and
that section which stores up depreciation-value from fixed capital in
money-form, “section 2.” The three cases are the following: a) that a
share of the 400 still existing with II as a remnant in the shape of
commodities must replace certain shares of the circulating parts of the
constant capital for sections 1 and 2 (say, one half for each); b) that
section 1 has already sold all its commodities, while section 2 still
has to sell 400; c) that section 2 has sold all but the 200 which are
the bearers of the depreciation value.

Then we have the following distributions:

a) Of the commodity-value 400_(c), still in the hands of II, section 1
holds 100 and section 2 — 300; 200 out of the 300 represent
depreciation. In that case section 1 originally laid out 300 of the £400
in money now returned by I to get commodities from II, namely 200 in
money, for which it secured elements of fixed capital in kind from I,
and 100 in money for the promotion of its exchange of commodities with
I. Section 2 on the other hand advanced only ¼ of the 400, i.e., 100,
likewise for the promotion of its commodity-exchange with I.

Section 1, then, advanced 300, and section 2 — 100 of the 400 in money.

Of these 400 there return however:

To section 1 — 100 i.e., only one-third of the money advanced by it. But
it has in place of the other ⅔ a renewed fixed capital to the value of
200. Section l has given money to I for this element of fixed capital to
the value of 200, but no subsequent commodities. So far as the 200 in
money are concerned, section 1 confronts department I only as buyer, but
not later on as seller. This money cannot therefore return to section 1;
otherwise it would have received the elements of fixed capital from I as
a gift.

With reference to the last third of the money advanced by it, section 1
first acted as a buyer of circulating constituent parts of its constant
capital. With the same money I buys from it the remainder of its
commodities worth 100. This money, then, flows back to it (section 1 of
department II) because it acts as a vendor of commodities directly after
having acted as a buyer. If this money did not return, then II (section
1) would have given to I, for commodities amounting to 100, first 100 in
money, and then into the bargain, 100 in commodities, i.e., II would
have given away its commodities to I as a present.

On the other hand section 2, which laid out 100 in money receives back
300 in money: 100 because first as a buyer it threw 100 in money into
circulation, and receives them back as a seller; 200, because it
functions only as a seller of commodities to that amount, but not as a
buyer. Hence the money cannot flow back to I. The fixed capital
depreciation is thus balanced by the money thrown into circulation by II
(section 1) in the purchase of elements of fixed capital. But it reaches
the hands of section 2 not as money of section 1, but as money belonging
to class I.

b) On this assumption the remainder of II is so distributed that section
1 has 200 in money and section 2 has 400 in commodities.

Section 1 has sold all of its commodities, but 200 in money are a
transformed shape of the fixed component part of its constant capital
which it has to renew in kind. Hence it acts here only as a buyer and
receives instead of its money commodity I to the same value in natural
elements of its fixed capital. Section 2 has to throw only £200 into
circulation, as a maximum (if I does not advance any money for
commodity-exchange between I and II), since for half of its
commodity-value it is only a seller to I, not a buyer from I.

There return to section 2 from the circulation £400: 200, because it has
advanced them as a buyer and receives them back as a seller of 200 in
commodities; 200, because it sells commodities to the value of 200 to I
without obtaining an equivalent in commodities from I.

c) Section 1 has 200 in money and 200 in commodities. Section 2 has 200
c (d) in commodities.

On this supposition section 2 does not have any advance to make in
money, because vis-à-vis I it no longer acts at all as buyer but only as
seller, hence has to wait until someone buys from it.

Section 1 advances £400 in money: 200 for mutual commodity-exchange with
I, 200 as mere buyer from I. With the last £200 in money it purchases
the elements of fixed capital.

With £200 in money I buys from section 1 commodities for 200, so that
the latter thus recovers the £200 in money it had advanced for this
commodity-exchange. And I buys with the other £200, which it has
likewise received from section 1, commodities to the value of 200 from
section 2, whereby the latter’s wear and tear of fixed capital is
precipitated in the form of money.

The matter is not altered in the least if it is assumed that, in case
c), class I instead of II (section 1) advances the 200 in money to
promote the exchange of the existing commodities. If I buys in that
event first 200 in commodities from II, section 2, on the assumption
that this section has only this commodity remnant left to sell — then
the £200 do not return to I, since II, section 2, does not act again as
buyer. But II, section 1, has in that case £200 in money to spend in
buying and 200 in commodities for exchange purposes, thus making a total
of 400 for trading with I, £200 in money then return to I from II,
section 1. If I again lays them out in the purchase of 200 in
commodities from II, section 1, they return to I as soon as II, section
1, takes the second half of the 400 in commodities off I’s hands.
Section 1 (II) has spent £200 in money as a mere buyer of elements of
fixed capital; they therefore do not return to it, but serve to turn the
200_(c), the commodity remnant of II, section 2, into money, while the
£200, the money laid out by I for the exchange of commodities, return to
I via II, section 1, not via II, section 2. In the place of its
commodities of 400 there has returned to it a commodity equivalent
amounting to 400; the £200 in money advanced by it for the exchange of
800 in commodities have likewise returned to it. Everything is therefore
all right.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The difficulty encountered in the exchange

[equation]

was reduced to the difficulty on exchanging remainders:
I. ............400_(s).
II. (1) 200 in money + 200_(c) in commodities + (2) 200_(c) in
commodities. Or, to make the matter still clearer:
I. 200_(s) + 200_(s).
II. (1) 200 in money + 200_(c) in commodities + (2) 200_(c) in
commodities.

Since in II, section 1, 200_(c) in commodities are exchanged for 200
I_(s) (in commodities) and since all the money circulating in this
exchange of 400 in commodities between I and II returns to him who
advanced it, I or II, this money, being an element of the exchange
between I and II, is actually not an element of the problem which is
troubling us here. Or, to present it differently: Supposing in the
exchange between 200 I_(s) (commodities) and 200 II_(c) (commodities of
II, section 1) the money functions as a means of payment, not as a means
of purchase and therefore also not as a “medium of circulation,” in the
strictest sense of the words. It is then clear, since the commodities
200 I_(s) and 200 II_(c) (section 1) are equal in magnitude of value,
that means of production worth 200 are exchanged for articles of
consumption worth 200, that money functions here only ideally, and that
neither side really has to throw any money into the circulation for the
payment of any balance. Hence the problem presents itself in its pure
form only when we strike off on both sides, I and II, the commodities
200 I_(s) and their equivalent, the commodities 200 II_(c) (section 1).

After the elimination of these two amounts of commodities of equal value
(I and II), which balance each other, there is left for exchange a
remainder in which the problem evinces its pure form, namely,

I. 200_(s) in commodities.

II. (1) 200_(c) in money plus (2) 200_(c) in commodities.

It is evident here that II, section 1, buys with 200 in money the
component parts of its fixed capital, 200 I_(s). The fixed capital of
II, section 1, is thereby renewed in kind and the surplus-value of I,
worth 200, is converted from the commodity-form (means of production,
or, more precisely, elements of fixed capital) into the money-form. With
this money I buys articles of consumption from II, section 2, and the
result for II is that for section I a fixed component part of its
constant capital has been renewed in kind, and that for section 2
another component part (which compensates for the depreciation of its
fixed capital) has been precipitated in money-form. And this continues
every year until this last component part, too, has to be renewed in
kind.

The condition precedent is here evidently that this fixed component part
of constant capital II, which is reconverted into money to the full
extent of its value and therefore must be renewed in kind each year
(section 1), should be equal to the annual depreciation of the other
fixed component part of constant capital II, which continues to function
in its old bodily form and whose wear and tear, depreciation in value,
which it transfers to the commodities in whose production it is engaged,
is first to be compensated in money. Such a balance would seem to be a
law of reproduction on the same scale. This is equivalent to saying that
in class I, which puts out the means of production, the proportional
division of labour must remain unchanged, since it produces on the one
hand circulating and on the other fixed component parts of the constant
capital of department II.

Before we analyse this more closely we must see what turn the matter
takes if the remainder of II_(c) (1) is not equal to the remainder of
II_(c) (2), and may be larger or smaller. Let us study the two cases one
after the other.

First Case

I. 200_(s).

II. (1) 220_(c) (in money) plus (2) 200_(c) (in commodities).

In this case II_(c) (1) buys with £200 in money the commodities 200
I_(s), and I buys with the same money the commodities 200 II_(c) (2),
i.e., that portion of the fixed capital which is to be precipitated in
money. This portion is thus converted into money. But 20 II_(c) (1) in
money cannot be reconverted into fixed capital in kind.

It seems this misfortune can be remedied by setting the remainder of
I_(s) at 220 instead of at 200, so that only 1,780 instead of 1,800 of
the 2,000 I would be disposed of by former exchange. We should then
have:

I. 220_(s).

II. (1) 220_(c) (in money) plus (2) 200_(c) (in commodities).

II_(c), section 1, buys with £220 in money the 220 I_(s) and I buys then
with £200 the 200 II_(c) (2) in commodities. But now £20 in money remain
on the side of I, a portion of surplus-value which it can hold on to
only in the form of money, without being able to spend it for articles
of consumption. The difficulty is thus merely transferred from II_(c),
section 1, to I_(s).

Let us now assume on the other hand that II_(c), section 1, is smaller
than II_(c), section 2: then we have the

Second Case

I. 200_(s) (in commodities).

I. (1) 180_(c) (in money) plus (2) 200_(c) (in commodities).

With £180 in money II (section 1) buys commodities, 180 I_(s). With this
money I buys commodities of the same value from II (section 2), hence
180 II_(c) (2). There remain 20 I_(s) unsaleable on one side, and also
20 II_(c) (2) on the other — commodities worth 40, not convertible into
money.

It would not help us to make the remainder of I equal to 180. True, no
surplus would then be left in 1, but now as before a surplus of 20 would
remain in II_(c) (section 2), unsaleable, inconvertible into money. In
the first case, where II (1) is greater than II (2), there remains on
the side of II_(c) (1) a surplus in money-form not reconvertible into
fixed capital; or, if the remainder I_(s) is assumed to be equal to
II_(c) (1), there remains on the side of I_(s) the same surplus in
money-form, not convertible into articles of consumption.

In the second case, where II_(c) (1) is smaller than II_(c) (2), there
remains a money deficit on the side of 200 I_(s) and II_(c) (2), and an
equal surplus of commodities on both sides, or, if the remainder of
I_(s) is assumed to be equal to II_(c) (1), there remains a money
deficit and a surplus of commodities on the side of II_(c) (2).

If we assume the remainders of I, always to be equal to II_(c) (1) —
since production is determined by orders and reproduction is not altered
in any way if one year there is a greater output of fixed component
parts and the next a greater output of circulating component part of
constant capitals II and I — then in the first case I_(s) can be
reconverted into articles of consumption only if I buys with it a
portion of the surplus-value of II and II accumulates it in money
instead of consuming it; and in the second case matters can be remedied
only if I spends the money itself, an assumption we have already
rejected.

If II_(c) (1) is greater than II_(c) (2), foreign commodities must be
imported to realise the money-surplus in I_(s). If, conversely, II_(c)
(1) is smaller than II_(c) (2), commodities II (articles of consumption)
will have to be exported to realise the depreciation part of II_(c) in
means of production. Consequently in either case foreign trade is
necessary.

Even granted that for a study of reproduction on an unchanging scale it
is to be supposed that the productivity of all lines of industry, hence
also the proportional value-relations of their commodities, remain
constant, the two last-named cases, in which II_(c) (1) is either
greater or smaller than II_(c) (2), will nevertheless always be of
interest for production on an enlarged scale where these cases may
infallibly be encountered.

3. Results

The following is to be noted with reference to replacement of fixed
capital:

If — all other things, and not only the scale of production, but above
all the productivity of labour, remaining the same — a greater part of
the fixed element of II_(c) expires than did the year before, and hence
a greater part must be renewed in kind, then that part of the fixed
capital which is as yet only on the way to its demise and is to be
replaced meanwhile in money until its day of expiry, must shrink in the
same proportion, inasmuch as it was assumed that the sum (and the sum of
the value) of the fixed part of capital functioning in II remains the
same. This however brings with it the following circumstances. _First_:
If the greater part of commodity-capital I consists of elements of the
fixed capital of II_(c), then a correspondingly smaller portion consists
of circulating component parts of II_(c), because the total production
of I for II_(c) remains unchanged. If one of these parts increases the
other decreases, and vice versa. On the other hand the total production
of class II also retains the same volume. But how is this possible if
its raw materials, semi-finished products, and auxiliary materials
(i.e., the circulating elements of constant capital II) decrease?
_Second_: the greater part of fixed capital II_(c), restored in its
money-form, flows to I to be reconverted from its money-form into its
bodily form. So there is a greater flow of money to I, aside from the
money circulating between I and II merely for the exchange of their
commodities; more money which is not instrumental in effecting mutual
commodity exchange, but acts only one-sidedly in the function of a means
of purchase. But then the mass of commodities of II_(c), which is the
bearer of the wear-and-tear equivalent — and thus the mass of
commodities II that must only be exchanged for money I and not for
commodities I — would also shrink proportionately. More money would have
flown from II to I as mere means of purchase, and there would be fewer
commodities II in relation to which I would have to function as a mere
buyer. A greater portion of I_(s) — for I_(v) is already converted into
commodities II — would not therefore be convertible into commodities II,
but would persist in the form of money.

The opposite case, in which the reproduction of demises of fixed capital
II in a certain year is less and on the contrary the depreciation part
greater, needs no further discussion.

There would be a crisis — a crisis of over-production — in spite of
reproduction on an unchanging scale.

In short, if under simple reproduction and other unchanged conditions —
particularly under unchanged productive power, total volume and
intensity of labour — no constant proportion is assumed between expiring
fixed capital (to be renewed) and fixed capital still continuing to
function in its old bodily form (merely adding to the products value in
compensation of its depreciation), then, in the one case the mass of
circulating component parts to be reproduced would remain the same while
the mass of fixed component parts to be reproduced would be increased.
Therefore the total production I would have to grow or, even aside from
money-relations, there would be a deficit in reproduction.

In the other case, if the size of fixed capital II to be reproduced in
kind should proportionately decrease and hence the component part of
fixed capital II, which must now be replaced only in money, should
increase in the same ratio, then the quantity of the circulating
component parts of constant capital II reproduced by I would remain
unchanged, while that of the fixed component parts to be reproduced
would decrease. Hence either decrease in aggregate production of I, or
surplus (as previously deficit) and surplus that is not to be converted
into money.

True, the same labour can, in the first case, turn out a greater product
through increasing productivity, extension or intensity, and the deficit
could thus be covered in that case. But such a change would not take
place without a shifting of capital and labour from one line of
production of I to another, and every such shift would call forth
momentary disturbances. Furthermore (in so far as extension and
intensification of labour would mount), I would have for exchange more
of its own value for less of II’s value. Hence there would be a
depreciation of the product of I.

The reverse would take place in the second case, where I must curtail
its production, which implies a crisis for its labourers and
capitalists, or produce a surplus, which again spells crisis. Such
surplus is not an evil in itself, but an advantage; however it is an
evil under capitalist production.

Foreign trade could help out in either case: in the first case in order
to convert commodities I held in the form of money into articles of
consumption, and in the second case to dispose of the commodity surplus.
But since foreign trade does not merely replace certain elements (also
with regard to value), it only transfers the contradictions to a wider
sphere and gives them greater latitude.

Once the capitalist form of reproduction is abolished, it is only a
matter of the volume of the expiring portion — expiring and therefore to
be reproduced in kind — of fixed capital (the capital which in our
illustration functions in the production of articles of consumption)
varying in various successive years. If it is very large in a certain
year (in excess of the average mortality, as is the case with human
beings), then it is certainly so much smaller in the next year. The
quantity of raw materials, semi-finished products, and auxiliary
materials required for the annual production of the articles of
consumption — provided other things remain equal — does not decrease in
consequence. Hence the aggregate production of means of production would
have to increase in the one case and decrease in the other. This can be
remedied only by a continuous relative over-production. There must be on
the one hand a certain quantity of fixed capital produced in excess of
that which is directly required; on the other hand, and particularly,
there must be a supply of raw materials, etc., in excess of the direct
annual requirements (this applies especially to means of subsistence).
This sort of over-production is tantamount to control by society over
the material means of its own reproduction. But within capitalist
society it is an element of anarchy.

This illustration of fixed capital, on the basis of an unchanged scale
of reproduction, is striking. A disproportion of the production of fixed
and circulating capital is one of the favourite arguments of the
economists in explaining crises. That such a disproportion can and must
arise even when the fixed capital is merely preserved, that it can and
must do so on the assumption of ideal normal production on the basis of
simple reproduction of the already functioning social capital is
something new to them.

Notes

44. These figures again do not coincide with those previously assumed.
But this is immaterial since it is merely a question of proportions. —
_F.E_.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 20: Simple Reproduction - Part 4

XII. The Reproduction of the Money Material

One factor has so far been entirely disregarded, namely the annual
reproduction of gold and silver. As mere material for articles of
luxury, gilding, etc., there is as little occasion for special mention
of them as there is of mentioning any other products. But they play an
important role as money material and hence as potential money. For the
sake of simplicity we here regard only gold as material for money.

According to older data the entire annual production of gold amounted to
800,000-900,000 lbs., equal roundly to 1,100 or 1,250 million marks. But
according to Soetbeers it amounted to only 170,675 kilograms, valued at
roundly 476 million marks, based on the average for 1871 to 1875. Of
this amount Australia supplied roundly 167, the United States 166, and
Russia 93 million marks. The remainder is distributed over various
countries in amounts of less than 10 million marks each. During the same
period, the annual production of silver amounted to somewhat less than 2
million kilograms, valued at 354½ million marks. Of this amount, Mexico
supplied roundly 108, the United States 102, South America 67, Germany
26 million, etc.

Among the countries with predominantly capitalist production only the
United States is a producer of gold and silver. The capitalist countries
of Europe obtain almost all their gold, and by far the greater part of
their silver, from Australia, the United States, Mexico, South America,
and Russia.

But we take it that the gold mines are in a country with capitalist
production whose annual reproduction we are here analysing, and for the
following reasons:

Capitalist production does not exist at all without foreign commerce.
But when one assumes normal annual reproduction on a given scale one
also assumes that foreign commerce only replaces home products by
articles of other use or bodily form, without affecting value-relations,
hence without affecting either the value-relations in which the two
categories “means of production” and “articles of consumption” mutually
exchange, or the relations between constant capital, variable capital,
and surplus-value, into which the value of the product of each of these
categories may be divided. The involvement of foreign commerce in
analysing the annually reproduced value of products can therefore only
confuse without contributing any new element of the problem, or of its
solution. For this reason it must be entirely discarded. And
consequently gold too is to be treated here as a direct element of
annual reproduction and not as a commodity element imported from abroad
by means of exchange.

The production of gold, like that of metals generally, belongs in class
I, the category which embraces the production of means of production.
Supposing the annual production of gold is equal to 30 (for
convenience’s sake; actually the figure is much too high compared to the
other figures of our scheme). Let this value be divisible into 20_(c) +
5_(v) + 5_(s); 20_(c) is to be exchanged for other elements of I_(c) and
this is to be studied later; but the 5_(v) + 5_(s) (I) are to be
exchanged for elements of II_(c), i.e., articles of consumption.

As for the 5_(v), every gold-producing establishment begins by buying
labour-power. This is done not with gold produced by this particular
enterprise, but with a portion of the money-supply in the land. The
labourers buy with this 5_(v) articles of consumption from II, and that
buys with this money means of production from I. Let II buy gold from I
to the amount of 2 as commodity material, etc. (component part of its
constant capital), then 2_(v) flow back to gold producers I in money
which has already belonged to the circulation. If II does not buy any
more material from I, then I buys from II by throwing its gold into
circulation as money, since gold can buy any commodity. The difference
is only that I does not act here as a seller, but only as a buyer. Gold
miners I can always get rid of their commodity; it is always in a
directly exchangeable form.

Let us assume that some producer of yarn has paid 5_(v) to his
labourers, who create for him in return — aside from the surplus-value —
a yarn product equal to 5. For 5 the labourers buy from II_(c), and the
latter buys yarn from I for 5 in money, and thus 5 flows back in money
to the spinner of yarn. Now in the case assumed I g (as we shall
designate the producers of gold) advances to its labourers 5_(v) in
money which previously belonged to the circulation. The labourers spend
it for articles of consumption, but only 2 of the 5 return from II to I
g. However I g can begin the process of reproduction anew, just as well
as the producer of yarn. For his labourers have supplied him with 5 in
gold, 2 of which he sold and 3 of which he still has, so that he has but
to coin ^([45]) them, or turn them into bank-notes to have his entire
variable capital again directly in his hands in money-form, without the
further intervention of II.

Even this first process of annual reproduction has wrought a change in
the quantity of money actually or virtually belonging to the
circulation. We assumed that II_(c) bought 2_(v) (I g) as material, and
that I g has again laid out 3 — as the money-form of its variable
capital — within II. Hence 3 of the mass of money supplied by the new
gold production remained within II and did not return to I. According to
our assumption II has satisfied its requirements in gold material. The 3
remain in its hands as a gold hoard. Since they cannot constitute any
element of its constant capital, and since II had previously enough
money-capital for the purchase of labour-power; since furthermore these
additional 3 g, with the exception of the depreciation element, have no
function to perform within II_(c), for a portion of which they were
exchanged (they could only serve to cover the depreciation element _pro
tanto_, if II_(c) (1) should be smaller than II_(c) (2), which would be
accidental); on the other hand, however, namely with the exception of
the depreciation element, the entire commodity-product II_(c), must be
exchanged for means of production I_((v\ +\ s)) — this money must be
transferred in its entirety from II_(c) to II_(s), no matter whether it
exists in necessities of life or articles of luxury, and vice versa
corresponding commodity-value must be transferred from II_(s) to II_(c).
Result: A portion of the surplus-value is stored up as a money-hoard.

In the second year of reproduction, provided the same proportion of
annually produced gold continues to be used as material, 2 will again
flow back to I g, and 3 will be replaced in kind, i.e., will be released
again in II as a hoard, etc.

With reference to the variable capital in general: The capitalist I g,
like every other capitalist, must continually advance this capital in
money for the purchase of labour-power. But so far as this v is
concerned, it is not he but his labourers who have to buy from II. It
can therefore never happen that he should act as a buyer, throwing gold
into II without the initiative of II. But to the extent that II buys
material from him, and must convert constant capital II c into gold
material, a portion of (I g)_(v) flows back to him from II in the same
way that it does to other capitalists of I. And so far as this is not
the case, he replaces his v in gold directly from his product. But to
the extent that the v advanced in money does not flow back to him from
II, a portion of the already available means of circulation (received
from I and not returned to I) is converted in II into a hoard and for
that reason a portion of its surplus-value is not expended for articles
of consumption. Since new gold-mines are continually opened or old ones
re-opened, a certain portion of the money to be laid out by I g in v is
always part of the money existing prior to the new gold production; it
is thrown by I g through its labourers into II, and unless it returns
from II to I g it forms there an element of hoard formation.

But as for (I g)_(s), I g can always act here as buyer. He throws his s
in the shape of gold into circulation and withdraws from it in return
articles of consumption II_(c). In II the gold is used in part as
material, and thus functions as a real element of the constant
constituent portion c of the productive capital. When this is not the
case it becomes once more an element of hoard formation as a part of
II_(s) persisting in the form of money. We see, then, aside from I_(c)
which we reserve for a later analysis, ^([46]) that even simple
reproduction, excluding accumulation proper, namely reproduction on an
extended scale, necessarily includes the storing up, or hoarding, of
money. And as this is annually repeated, it explains the assumption from
which we started in the analysis of capitalist production, namely, that
at the beginning of the reproduction a supply of money corresponding to
the exchange of commodities is in the hands of capitalist classes I and
II. Such an accumulation takes place even after deducting the amount of
gold being lost through the depreciation of money in circulation.

It goes without saying that the more advanced capitalist production, the
more money is accumulated in all hands, and therefore the smaller the
quantity annually added to this hoard by the production of new gold,
although the absolute quantity thus added may be considerable. We revert
once more in general terms to the objection raised against Tooke; how is
it possible that every capitalist draws a surplus-value in money out of
the annual product, i.e., draws more money out of the circulation than
he throws into it, since in the long run the capitalist class itself
must be regarded as the source of all the money thrown into circulation?

We reply by summarising the ideas developed previously (in Chapter
XVII):

1) The only assumption essential here, namely, that in general there is
money enough for the exchange of the various elements of the mass of the
annual reproduction, is not affected in any way by the fact that a
portion of the commodity-value consists of surplus-value. Supposing that
the entire production belonged to the labourers themselves and that
their surplus-labour were therefore only surplus-labour for themselves,
not for the capitalists, then the quantity of circulating
commodity-values would be the same and, other things being equal, would
require the same amount of money for their circulation. The question in
either case is therefore only: Where does the money come from to make
possible the exchange of this total of commodity-values? It is not at
all: where does the money come from to turn the surplus-value into
money? It is true, to revert to it once more, that every individual
commodity consists of c + v + s, and the circulation of the entire
quantity of commodities therefore requires on the one hand a definite
sum of money for the circulation of the capital c + v and on the other
hand another sum for the circulation of the revenue of the capitalists,
the surplus-value s. For the individual capitalist, as well as for the
entire capitalist class; the money in which they advance capital is
different from the money in which they spend their revenue. Where does
the latter money come from? Simply from the mass of money in the hands
of the capitalist class, hence by and large from the total mass of money
in society, a portion of which circulates the revenue of the
capitalists. We have seen above that every capitalist establishing a new
business recoups the money which he spent for his maintenance in
articles of consumption as money serving to convert his surplus-value
into money, once his business is fairly under way. But generally
speaking the whole difficulty has two sources:

In the first place, if we analyse only the circulation and the turnover
of capital, thus regarding the capitalist merely as a personification of
capital, not as a capitalist consumer and man about town, we see indeed
that he is continually throwing surplus-value into circulation as a
component part of his commodity-capital, but we never see money as a
form of revenue in his hands. We never see him throwing money into
circulation for the consumption of his surplus-value.

In the second place, if the capitalist class throws a certain amount of
money into circulation in the shape of revenue, it looks as if it were
paying an equivalent for this portion of the total annual product, and
this portion thereby ceases to represent surplus-value. But the
surplus-product in which the surplus-value is represented does not cost
the capitalist class anything. As a class, the capitalists possess and
enjoy it gratuitously, and the circulation of money cannot alter this
fact. The alteration brought about by this circulation consists merely
in the fact that every capitalist, instead of consuming his
surplus-product in kind, a thing which is generally impossible, draws
commodities of all sorts up to the amount of the surplus-value he has
appropriated out of the general stock of the annual surplus-product of
society and appropriates them. But the mechanism of the circulation has
shown that while the capitalist class throws money into circulation for
the purpose of spending its revenue, it also withdraws this money from
the circulation, and can continue the same process over and over again;
so that, considered as a class, capitalists remain as before in
possession of the amount of money necessary for the conversion of
surplus-value into money. Hence, if the capitalist not only withdraws
his surplus-value from the commodity-market in the form of commodities
for his consumption-fund, but at the same time gets back the money with
which he has paid for these commodities, he has evidently withdrawn the
commodities from circulation without paying an equivalent for them. They
do not cost him anything, although he pays money for them. If I buy
commodities for one pound sterling and the seller of the commodities
gives me the pound back for surplus-product which I got for nothing, it
is obvious that I received the commodities gratis. The constant
repetition of this operation does not alter the fact that I constantly
withdraw commodities and constantly remain in possession of the pound,
although I part with it temporarily to purchase commodities. The
capitalist constantly gets this money back as a money equivalent of
surplus-value that has not cost him anything.

We have seen that with Adam Smith the entire value of the social product
resolves itself into revenue, into v + s, so that the constant
capital-value is set down as zero. It follows necessarily that the money
required for the circulation of the yearly revenue must also suffice for
the circulation of the entire annual product, that therefore in our
illustration the money required for the circulation of the articles of
consumption worth 3,000 also suffices for the circulation of the entire
annual product worth 9,000. This is indeed the opinion of Adam Smith,
and it is repeated by Th. Tooke. This erroneous conception of the ratio
of the quantity of money required for the realisation of revenue to the
quantity of money required to circulate the entire social product is the
necessary result of the uncomprehended, thoughtlessly conceived manner
in which the various elements of material and value of the total annual
product are reproduced and annually replaced. It has therefore already
been refuted.

Let us listen to Smith and Tooke themselves.

Smith says in Book II, Ch. 2:

“The circulation of every country may be considered as divided into two
different branches: the circulation of the dealers with one another, and
the circulation between the dealers and the consumers. Though the same
pieces of money, whether paper or metal, may be employed sometimes in
the one circulation and sometimes in the other; yet as both are
constantly going on at the same time, each requires a certain stock of
money of one kind or another, to carry it on. The value of the goods
circulated between the different dealers, never can exceed the value of
those circulated between the dealers and the consumers; whatever is
bought by the dealers, being ultimately destined to be sold to the
consumers. The circulation between the dealers, as it is carried on by
wholesale, requires generally a pretty large sum for every particular
transaction. That between the dealers and the consumers, on the
contrary, as it is generally carried on by retail, frequently requires
but very small ones, a shilling, or even a halfpenny, being often
sufficient. But small sums circulate much faster than large ones...
Though the annual purchases of all the consumers, therefore, are at
least” [this “at least” is rich] “equal in value to those of all the
dealers, they can generally be transacted with a much smaller quantity
of money;” etc.

Th. Tooke remarks to this passage from Adam Smith (in _An Inquiry into
the Currency Principle_, London, 1844, pp. 34 to 36 _passim_):

“There can be no doubt that the distinction here made is substantially
correct ... the interchange between dealers and consumers including the
payment of wages, which constitute the PRINCIPAL MEANS of the
consumers... All the transactions between dealers and dealers, by which
are to be understood all sales from the producer or importer, through
all the stages of intermediate processes of manufacture or otherwise to
the retail dealer or the exporting merchant, are resolvable into
movements or transfers of capital. Now transfers of capital do not
necessarily suppose, nor do actually as a matter of fact entail, in the
great majority of transactions, a passing of money, that is, bank-notes
or coin — I mean bodily, and not by fiction — at the time of transfer...
The total amount of the transactions between dealers and dealers must,
in the last resort, be determined and limited by the amount of those
between dealers and consumers.”

If this last sentence stood by itself, one might think Tooke simply
stated the fact that there was a ratio between the exchanges among
dealers and those among dealers and consumers, in other words, between
the value of the total annual revenue and the value of the capital with
which it is produced. But this is not the case. He explicitly endorses
the view of Adam Smith. A special criticism of his theory of circulation
is therefore superfluous.

2) Every industrial capital, on beginning its career, throws at one
fling money into circulation for its entire fixed constituent part,
which it recovers but gradually, in the course of years, by the sale of
its annual products. Thus it throws at first more money into circulation
than it draws from it. This is repeated at every renewal of the entire
capital in kind. It is repeated every year for a certain number of
enterprises whose fixed capital is to be renewed in kind. It is repeated
piecemeal at every repair, every only partial renewal of the fixed
capital. While, then, on the one hand more money is withdrawn from
circulation than is thrown into it, the opposite takes place on the
other hand.

In all lines of industry whose production period — as distinguished from
its working period — extends over a long term, money is continually
thrown into circulation during this period by the capitalist producers,
partly in payment for labour-power employed, partly in the purchase of
means of production to be consumed. Means of production are thus
directly withdrawn from the commodity-market, and articles of
consumption, partly indirectly, by the labourers spending their wages,
and partly directly, by the capitalists, who do not by any means suspend
their consumption, although they do not simultaneously throw any
equivalent in commodities on the market. During this period the money
thrown by them into circulation serves to convert commodity value,
including the surplus-value embodied in it, into money. This factor
becomes very important in an advanced stage of capitalist production in
the case of long-drawn out enterprises, such as are undertaken by stock
companies, etc., for instance the construction of railways, canals,
docks, large municipal buildings, iron shipbuilding, large-scale
drainage of land, etc.

3) While the other capitalists, aside from the investment in fixed
capital, draw more money out of the circulation than they threw into it
on purchasing the labour-power and the circulating elements, the gold-
and silver-producing capitalists throw only money into the circulation,
aside from the precious metal which serves as raw material, while they
withdraw only commodities from it. The constant capital, with the
exception of the depreciated portion, the greater portion of the
variable capital and the entire surplus-value, save the hoard which may
be accumulating in their own hands, are all thrown into circulation as
money.

4) On the one hand all kinds of things circulate as commodities which
were not produced during the given year, such as land lots, houses,
etc.; furthermore goods whose period of production exceeds one year,
such as cattle, timber, wine, etc. For this and other phenomena it is
important to establish that aside from the quantity of money required
for the immediate circulation there is always a certain quantity in a
latent non-functioning state which may start functioning if the impulse
is given. Furthermore, the value of such products circulates often
piecemeal and gradually, like the value of houses in the rents over a
number of years.

On the other hand not all movements of the process of reproduction are
effected through the circulation of money. The entire process of
production, once its elements have been procured, is excluded from
circulation. All products which the producer himself consumes directly,
whether individually or productively, are also excluded. Under this head
comes also the feeding of agricultural labourers in kind.

Therefore the quantity of money which circulates the annual product,
exists in society, having been gradually accumulated. It does not belong
to the value produced during the given year, except perhaps the gold
used to make good the loss of depreciated coins.

This exposition presupposes the exclusive circulation of precious metals
as money, and in this circulation the simplest form of cash purchases
and sales; although money can function also as a means of payment, and
has actually done so in the course of history, even on the basis of
circulating plain metal coin, and though a credit system and certain
aspects of its mechanism have developed upon that basis. This assumption
is not made from mere considerations of method, although these are
important enough, as demonstrated by the fact that Tooke and his school,
as well as their opponents, were continually compelled in their
controversies concerning the circulation of bank-notes to revert to the
hypothesis of a purely metallic circulation. They were forced to do so
_post festum_ and did so very superficially, which was unavoidable,
because the point of departure in their analysis thus played merely the
role of an incidental point.

But the simplest study of money — circulation presented in its
_primitive_ form — and this is here an immanent element of the process
of annual reproduction — demonstrates:

a) Advanced capitalist production, and hence the domination of the wage
system, being assumed, money-capital obviously plays a prominent role,
since it is the form in which the variable capital is advanced. In step
with the development of the wage system, all products are transformed
into commodities and must therefore — with a few important exceptions —
pass in their entirety through the transformation into money as one
phase of their movement. The quantity of circulating money must suffice
for this conversion of commodities into money, and the greater part of
this mass is furnished in the form of wages, of the money advanced by
the industrial capitalists as the money-form of the variable capital in
payment for labour-power, and which functions in the hands of the
labourers, generally speaking, only as a medium of circulation (means of
purchase). It is quite the opposite of natural economy such as is
predominant under every form of bondage (including serfdom), and still
more so in more or less primitive communities, whether or not they are
attended by conditions of bondage or slavery.

In the slave system, the money-capital invested in the purchase of
labour-power plays the role of the money-form of the fixed capital,
which is but gradually replaced as the active period of the slave’s life
expires. Among the Athenians therefore, the gain realised by a slave
owner directly through the industrial employment of his slave, or
indirectly by hiring him out to other industrial employers (e.g., for
mining), was regarded merely as interest (plus depreciation allowance)
on the advanced money-capital, just as the industrial capitalist under
capitalist production places a portion of the surplus-value plus the
depreciation of his fixed capital to the account of interest and
replacement of his fixed capital. This is also the rule with capitalists
offering fixed capital (houses, machinery, etc.) for rent. Mere
household slaves, whether they perform necessary services or are kept as
luxuries for show, are not considered here. They correspond to the
modern servant class. But the slave system too — so long as it is the
dominant form of productive labour in agriculture, manufacture,
navigation, etc., as it was in the advanced states of Greece and Rome —
preserves an element of natural economy. The slave market maintains its
supply of the commodity labour-power by war, piracy, etc., and this
rapine is not promoted by a process of circulation, but by the actual
appropriation of the labour-power of others by direct physical
compulsion. Even in the United States, after the conversion of the
buffer territory between the wage-labour states of the North and the
slavery states of the South into a slave-breeding region for the South,
where the slave thrown on the market thus became himself an element of
the annual reproduction, this did not suffice for a long time, so that
the African slave trade was continued as long as possible to satisfy the
market.

b) The fluxes and refluxes of money taking place spontaneously on the
basis of capitalist production in the exchange of the annual products;
the one-time advances of fixed capitals to the full extent of their
value and the successive extraction of this value from the circulation
in the course of years, in other words, their gradual reconstitution in
money-form by the annual formation of hoards, a hoarding which is
essentially different from the parallel accumulation of hoards based on
the annual production of new gold; the different lengths of time for
which, depending on the duration of the production period of the
commodities, money must be advanced, and consequently always hoarded
anew before it can be recovered from the circulation by the sale of the
commodities; the different lengths of time for which money must be
advanced, if only resulting from the different distances of the places
of production from their markets; furthermore the differences in the
magnitude and period of the reflux according to the condition or
relative size of the productive supplies in the various lines of
business and in the individual businesses of the same line, and hence
the lengths of periods for which the elements of constant capital are
bought, and all this during the year of reproduction — all these
different aspects of spontaneous movement had only to be noted, and made
conspicuous, through experience, in order to give rise to a methodical
use of the mechanical appliances of the credit system and to a real
fishing out of available loanable capitals.

To this must be added the difference between those lines of business
whose production proceeds under otherwise normal conditions continuously
on the same scale, and those which apply varying quantities of
labour-power in different periods of the year, such as agriculture.

XIII. Destutt De Tracy’s Theory of Reproduction

Let us illustrate the confused and at the same time boastful
thoughtlessness of political economists analysing social reproduction,
with the example of the great logician Destutt de Tracy (Vol. 1, Ch. V,
Note), whom even Ricardo took seriously and called a VERY DISTINGUISHED
WRITER. (_Principles_, p. 333.)

This “distinguished writer” gives the following explanations concerning
the entire process of social reproduction and circulation:

“I shall be asked how these industrial entrepreneurs can make such large
profits and out of whom they can draw them. I reply that they do so by
selling everything which they produce for more than it has cost to
produce; and that they sell:

“1) to one another for the entire portion of their consumption intended
for the satisfaction of their needs, which they pay with a portion of
their profits;

“2) to the wage-labourers, both those whom they pay and those whom the
idle capitalists pay; from these wage-labourers they thus extract their
entire wages except perhaps their small savings;

“3) to the idle capitalists who pay them with the portion of their
revenue which they have not yet given to the wage-labourers employed by
them directly; so that the entire rent which they pay them annually
flows back to them in this way or the other.” (Destutt de Tracy, _Traité
de la volonté et de ses effets,_ Paris, 1826, p. 239.)

In other words, the capitalists enrich themselves by mutually getting
the best of one another in the exchange of that portion of their
surplus-value which they set apart for their individual consumption or
consume as revenue. For instance, if this portion of their surplus-value
or of their profits is equal to £400, this sum of £400 is supposed to
grow to, say, £500 by each stockholder of the £400 selling his share to
another 25 per cent in excess. But since all do the same, the result
will be the same as if they had sold to one another at the real values.
They merely need £500 in money for the circulation of commodities worth
£400, and this would seem to be rather a method of impoverishing than of
enriching themselves since it compels them to keep a large portion of
their total wealth unproductively in the useless form of circulation
media. The whole thing boils down to this, that despite the all-round
nominal rise in the price of their commodities the capitalist class has
only £400 worth of commodities to divide among themselves for their
individual consumption, but that they do one another the favour of
circulating £400 worth of commodities by means of a quantity of money
which is required to circulate £500 worth of commodities.

And this quite aside from the fact that a “portion of their profits,”
and therefore in general a supply of commodities in which there exist
profits, is here assumed. But Destutt undertook precisely to tell us
where those profits come from. The quantity of money required to
circulate the profit is a very subordinate question. The quantity of
commodities in which the profit is represented seems to have its origin
in the circumstance that the capitalists not only sell these commodities
to one another, although even this much is quite fine and profound, but
sell them to one another at prices which are too high. So we now know
one source of the enrichment of the capitalists. It is on a par with the
secret of the “Entspektor Bräsig"” ^([47]) that the great poverty is due
to the great “_pauvreté_.”

2) The same capitalists furthermore sell

“to the wage-labourers, both those whom they pay and those whom the idle
capitalists pay; from these wage-labourers they thus recover their
entire wages, except perhaps their small savings.”

According to Monsieur Destutt, then, the reflux of the money-capital,
the form in which the capitalists have advanced wages to the labourers,
is the second source of the enrichment of these capitalists. If
therefore the capitalists paid for instance £100 to their labourers as
wages and if these same labourers then buy from the same capitalists
commodities of this same value, of £100, so that the sum of £100 which
the capitalists had advanced as buyers of labour-power returns to the
capitalists when they sell to the labourers £100 worth of commodities,
the capitalists _get richer_ thereby. It would appear to anyone endowed
with ordinary common sense that they only find themselves once more in
possession of their £100, which they owned before this procedure. At the
beginning of the procedure they have £100 in money. For these £100 they
buy labour-power. The labour bought produces for these £100 in money
commodities of a value which, so far as we now know, amounts to £100. By
selling the £100 worth of commodities to their labourers the capitalists
recover £100 in money. The capitalists then have once more £100 in
money, and the labourers have £100 worth of commodities which they have
themselves produced. It is hard to understand how that can make the
capitalists any richer. If the £100 in money did not flow back to them
they would first have to pay to the labourers £100 in money for their
labour and secondly to give them the product of this labour, £100 worth
of articles of consumption, for nothing. The reflux of this money might
therefore at best explain why the capitalists do not get poorer by this
transaction, but by no means why they get richer by it.

To be sure it is another question how the capitalists came into
possession of the £100 and why the labourers, instead of producing
commodities for their own account, are compelled to exchange their
labour-power for these £100. But this, for a thinker of Destutt’s
calibre, is self-explanatory.

Destutt himself is not quite satisfied with the solution. After all, he
did not tell us that one gets richer by spending a sum of money, a
hundred pounds, and then taking in again a sum of money amounting to
£100; hence, by the reflux of £100 in money, which merely shows why the
£100 in money do not get lost. He tells us that the capitalists get
richer

“by selling everything which they produce for more than it has cost to
produce.”

Consequently the capitalists must get richer also in their transactions
with the labourers by selling to them too dear. Very well!

“They pay wages ... and all this flows back to them through the
expenditures of all these people who pay them more” [for the products]
“than they cost them [the capitalists] in wages.” (Ibid., p. 240.)

In other words, the capitalists pay £100 in wages to the labourers, and
then they sell to these labourers their own product at £120, so that
they not only recover their £100 but also gain £20? That is impossible.
The labourers can pay only with the money which they have received in
the form of wages. If they get £100 in wages from the capitalists they
can buy only £100 worth, not £120 worth. So this will not work. But
there is still another way. The labourers buy from the capitalists
commodities for £100, but actually receive commodities worth only £80.
Then they are absolutely cheated out of £20. And the capitalist has
absolutely gained £20, because he actually paid for the labour-power 20
per cent less than its value, or cut nominal wages 20 per cent by a
circuitous route.

The capitalist class would accomplish the same end if it paid the
labourers at the start only £80 in wages and afterwards gave them for
these £80 in money actually £80 worth of commodities. This seems to be
the normal way, considering the class of capitalists as a whole, for
according to Monsieur Destutt himself the labouring class must receive a
“sufficient wage” (p. 219), since their wages must at least be adequate
to maintain their existence and capacity to work,“"to procure the barest
subsistence.” (p. 180). If the labourers do not receive such sufficient
wages, that means, according to the same Destutt, “the death of
industry” (p. 208), which does not seem therefore to be a way in which
the capitalists can get richer. But whatever may be the scale of wages
paid by the capitalists to the working-class, they have a definite
value, e.g., £80. If the capitalist class pays the labourers £80, then
it has to supply them with commodities worth £80 for these £80 and the
reflux of the £80 does not enrich it. If it pays them £100 in money, and
sells them £80 worth of commodities for £100 it pays them in money 25
per cent more than their normal wage and supplies them in return with 25
per cent less in commodities.

In other words, the fund from which the capitalist class in general
derives its profits is supposedly made up of deductions from the normal
wages by paying less than its value for labour-power, i.e., less than
the value of the means of subsistence required for their normal
reproduction as wage-labourers. If therefore normal wages were paid,
which is supposed to be the case according to Destutt, there could be no
profit fund for either the industrial or the idle capitalists.

Hence Destutt should have reduced the entire secret of how the
capitalist class gets richer to the following: by a deduction from
wages. In that case the other surplus-value funds, which he mentions
under 1) and 3), would not exist.

Hence in all countries, in which the money wages of the labourers should
be reduced to the value of the articles of consumption necessary for
their subsistence as a class, there would be no consumption-fund and no
accumulation-fund for the capitalists, and hence also no existence-fund
for the capitalist class, and hence also no capitalist class. And,
according to Destutt, this should be the case in all wealthy and
developed countries with an old civilisation, for in them,

“in our ancient societies, the fund for the maintenance of
wage-labourers is ... an almost constant magnitude.” (Ibid., p. 202.)

Even with a deduction from the wages, the capitalist does not enrich
himself by first paying the labourer £100 in money and then supplying
him with £80 worth of commodities for these £100, thus actually
circulating £80 worth of commodities by means of £100, an excess of 25
per cent. The capitalist gets richer by appropriating, besides the
surplus-value — that portion of the product in which surplus-value is
represented — 25 per cent of that portion of the product which the
labourer should receive in the form of wages. The capitalist class would
not gain anything by the silly method Destutt conceived. It pays £100 in
wages and gives back to the labourer for these £100 £80 worth of his own
product. But in the next transaction it must again advance £100 for the
same procedure. It would thus be indulging in the useless sport of
advancing £100 in money and giving in exchange £80 in commodities,
instead of advancing £80 in money and supplying in exchange for it £80
in commodities. That is to say, it would be continually advancing to no
purpose a money-capital which is 25 per cent in excess of that required
for the circulation of its variable capital, which is a very peculiar
method of getting rich.

3) Finally the capitalist class sells

“to the idle capitalists, who pay them with the portion of their revenue
which they have not yet given to the wage-labourers employed by them
directly; so that the entire rent, which they pay them (the idle ones)
annually, flows back to them in this way or the other.”

We have seen above that the industrial capitalists

“pay with a portion of their profits the entire portion of their
consumption intended for the satisfaction of their needs.”

Take it, then, that their profits are equal to £200. And let them use
up, say, £100 of this in their individual consumption. But the other
half, or £100, does not belong to them; it belongs to the idle
capitalists, i.e., to those who receive the ground-rent, and to
capitalists who lend money on interest. So they have to pay £100 to
these gentry. Let us assume that these gentry need £80 of this money for
their individual consumption, and £20 for the hire of servants, etc.
With those £80 they buy articles of consumption from the industrial
capitalists. Thus while these capitalists part with commodities to the
value of £80, they receive back £80 in money, or four-fifths of the £100
paid by them to the idle capitalists under the name of rent, interest,
etc.

Furthermore the servant class, the direct wage-labourers of the idle
capitalists, have received £20 from their masters. These servants
likewise buy articles of consumption from the industrial capitalists to
the amount of £20. In this way, while parting with commodities worth
£20, these capitalists have £20 in money flow back to them, the last
fifth of the £100 which they paid to the idle capitalists for rent,
interest, etc. At the close of the transaction the industrial
capitalists have recovered in money the £100 which they remitted to the
idle capitalists in payment of rent, interest, etc. But one half of
their surplus-product, equal to £100, passed meanwhile from their hands
into the consumption-fund of the idle capitalists.

It is evidently quite superfluous for the question now under discussion
to bring in somehow or other the division of the £100 between the idle
capitalists and their direct wage-labourers. The matter is simple: their
rent, interest, in short, their share in the surplus-value equal to
£200, is paid to them by the industrial capitalists in money to the
amount of £100. With these £100 they buy directly or indirectly articles
of consumption from the industrial capitalists. Thus they pay back to
them the £100 in money and take from them articles of consumption worth
£100.

This completes the reflux of the £100 paid by the industrial capitalists
in money to the idle capitalists. Is this reflux of money a means of
enriching the industrial capitalists, as Destutt imagines? Before the
transaction they had a sum of values amounting to £200, 100 being money
and 100 articles of consumption. After the transaction they have only
one half of the original sum of values. They have once more the £100 in
money, but they have lost the £100 in articles of consumption which have
passed into the hands of the idle capitalists. Hence they are poorer by
£100 instead of richer by £100. If instead of taking the circuitous
route of first paying out £100 in money and then receiving this £100 in
money back in payment of articles of consumption worth £100, they had
paid rent, interest, etc., directly in the bodily form of their
products, there would be no £100 in money flowing back to them from the
circulation, because they would not have thrown that amount of money
into the circulation. _Via_ payment in kind the matter would simply have
taken this course: they would keep one half of the surplus-product worth
£200 for themselves and give the other half to the idle capitalists
without any equivalent in return. Even Destutt would not have been
tempted to declare this a means of getting richer. Of course the land
and capital borrowed by the industrial capitalists from the idle
capitalists and for which they have to pay a portion of their
surplus-value in the form of ground-rent, interest, etc., are profitable
for them, for this constitutes one of the conditions of production of
commodities in general and of that portion of the product which
constitutes surplus-product or in which surplus-value is represented.
This profit accrues from the use of the borrowed land and capital, not
from the price paid for them. This price rather constitutes a deduction
from it. Otherwise one would have to contend that the industrial
capitalists would not get richer but poorer, if they were able to keep
the other half of their surplus-value for themselves instead of having
to give it away. This is the confusion which results from mixing up such
phenomena of circulation as a reflux of money with the distribution of
the product, which is merely promoted by these phenomena of circulation.

And yet the same Destutt is shrewd enough to remark:

“Whence come the revenues of these idle gentry? Do the revenues not come
out of the rent paid to them out of their profits by those who put the
capitals of the former to work, i.e., by those who pay with the funds of
the former a labour which produces more than it costs, in a word, the
industrial capitalists? It is always necessary to hark back to them to
find the source of all wealth. It is they who in reality feed the
wage-labourers employed by the former.” (p. 246.)

So now the payment of this rent, etc., is a deduction from the profit of
the industrial capitalists. Before it was a means wherewith they could
enrich themselves.

But at least one consolation is left to our Destutt. These good
industrialists handle the idle capitalists the same way they have been
handling one another and the labourers. They sell them all commodities
too dear, for instance, by 20 per cent. Now there are two possibilities.
The idle capitalists either have other money resources aside from the
£100 which they receive annually from the industrial capitalists, or
they have not. In the first case the industrial capitalists sell them
commodities worth £100 at a price of, say, £120. Consequently on selling
their commodities they recover not only the £100 paid to the idlers but
£20 besides, which constitute really new value for them. How does the
account look now? They have given away £100 in commodities for nothing,
because the £100 in money that they were paid in part for their
commodities were their own money. Thus their own commodities have been
paid with their own money. Hence they have lost £100. But they have also
received an excess of £20 in the price of their commodities over and
above their value, which makes £20 to the good. Balance this against the
loss of £100, and you still have a loss of £80. Never a plus, always a
minus. The cheating practised against the idle capitalists has reduced
the loss of the industrial capitalists, but for all that it has not
transformed a diminution of their wealth into a means of enrichment. But
this method cannot go on indefinitely, for the idle capitalists cannot
possibly pay year after year £120 in money if they take in only £100 in
money year after year.

There remains the other approach: The industrial capitalists sell
commodities worth £80 in exchange for the £100 in money they paid to the
idle capitalists. In this case, the same as before, they still give away
£80 for nothing, in the form of rent, interest, etc. By this fraudulent
means the industrial capitalists have reduced their tribute to the
idlers, but it still exists nevertheless and the idlers are in a
position — according to the same theory proclaiming that prices depend
on the good will of the sellers — to demand in the future £120 instead
of £100, as formerly, for rent, interest, etc., on their land and
capital.

This brilliant analysis is quite worthy of that deep thinker who copies
on the one hand from Adam Smith that

“labour is the source of all wealth” (p. 242)

that the industrial capitalists

“employ their capital to pay for labour that reproduces it with a
profit” (p. 246)

and who concludes on the other hand that these industrial capitalists

“feed all the other people, are the only ones who increase the public
wealth, and create all our means of enjoyment” (p. 242)

that it is not the capitalists who are fed by the labourers, but the
labourers who are fed by the capitalists, for the brilliant reason that
the money with which the labourers are paid does not remain in their
hands, but continually returns to the capitalists in payment of the
commodities produced by the labourers.

“All they do is receive with one hand and return with the other. Their
consumption must therefore be regarded as engendered by those who hire
them.” (p. 235.)

After this exhaustive analysis of social reproduction and consumption,
as being brought about by the circulation of money, Destutt continues:

“This is what perfects this _perpetuum mobile_ of wealth, a movement
which, though badly understood” (_mal connu_, I should say so!), “has
justly been named circulation. For it is indeed a circuit and always
returns to its point of departure. This is the point where production is
consummated.” (pp. 239 and 240.)

Destutt, that very distinguished writer, _membre de l’Institut de France
et de la Société Philosophique de Philadelphie,_ and in fact to a
certain extent a luminary among the vulgar economists, finally requests
his readers to admire the wonderful lucidity with which he has presented
the course of social process, the flood of light which he has poured
over the matter, and is even condescending enough to communicate to his
readers, where all this light comes from. This must be read in the
original:

“It will be noted, I hope, how much this manner of viewing the
consummation of our wealth is in accord with all we have been saying
concerning its production and distribution, and at the same time how
much light it throws on the entire course of society. Whence this accord
and this lucidity? From the fact that we have met truth face to face.
This recalls the effect of those mirrors in which things are reflected
accurately and in their true proportions when correctly focussed, but in
which everything appears confused and disjointed when one is too close
or too far away from them.” (pp. 242 and 243.)

Voilà le crétinisme bourgeois dans toute sa béatitude! [There you have
the bourgeois idiocy in all its beatitude!]

Notes

45. “A considerable quantity of GOLD BULLION ... is taken direct to the
mint at San Francisco by the owners.” _Reports of H. M. Secretaries of
Embassy and Legation_, 1879, Part III, p. 337.

46. The study of the exchange of newly produced gold within the constant
capital of department I is not contained in the manuscript. — _F.E._

47. A character in a number of works by the German humorist Fritz Reuter
(1810-74). — _Ed._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 21: Accumulation and Reproduction on an Extended Scale - Part 1

It has been shown in Book I how accumulation works in the case of the
individual capitalist. By the conversion of the commodity-capital into
money the surplus-product, in which the surplus-value is represented, is
also turned into money. The capitalist reconverts the so metamorphosed
surplus-value into additional natural elements of his productive
capital. In the next cycle of production the increased capital furnishes
an increased product. But what happens in the case of the individual
capital must also show in the annual reproduction as a whole, just as we
have seen it happen on analysing simple reproduction, namely, that the
successive precipitation – in the case of individual capital – of its
used-up fixed component parts in money which is being hoarded, also
finds expression in the annual reproduction of society. If a certain
individual capital is equal to 400 c + l00 v, and the annual
surplus-value is equal to 100, then the commodity-product amounts to 400
c + 100 v + 100 s. These 600 are converted into money. Of this money,
again, 400 c are converted into the natural form of constant capital,
100 v into labour-power, and – provided the entire surplus-value is
being accumulated – 100 s are converted besides into additional constant
capital by transformation into natural elements of the productive
capital. It is assumed in this case: 1) that this amount is sufficient
under the given technical conditions either to expand the functioning
constant capital or to establish a new industrial business. But it may
also happen that surplus-value must be converted into money and this
money hoarded for a much longer time before this process, i.e., before
real accumulation, expansion of production, can take place; 2) that
production on an extended scale has actually been in process previously.
For in order that the money (the surplus-value hoarded in money-form)
may be converted into elements of productive capital, one must be able
to buy these elements on the market as commodities. It makes no
difference if they are not bought as finished products but made to
order. They are not paid for until they are in existence and at any rate
not until actual reproduction on an extended scale, an expansion of
hitherto normal production, has taken place so far as they are
concerned. They had to exist potentially, i.e., in their elements, as it
requires only the impulse of an order, that is, the purchase of
commodities before they actually exist and their anticipated sale, for
their production really to take place. The money on the one side then
calls forth extended reproduction on the other, because the possibility
of it exists without money. For money in itself is not an element of
real reproduction.

For instance capitalist A, who sells during one year or during a number
of years certain quantities of commodities successively produced by him,
thereby converts into money also that portion of the commodities which
is the vehicle of surplus-value – the surplus-product – or in other
words the very surplus-value produced by him in commodity-form,
accumulates it gradually, and thus forms for himself new potential
money-capital – potential because of its capacity and mission to be
converted into elements of productive capital. But in actual fact he
only engages in simple hoarding, which is not an element of actual
reproduction. His activity at first consists only in successively
withdrawing circulating money out of the circulation. Of course it is
not impossible that the circulating money thus kept under lock and key
by him was itself, before it entered into circulation, a portion of some
other hoard. This hoard of A, which is potentially new money-capital, is
not additional social wealth, any more than it would be if it were spent
in articles of consumption. But money withdrawn from circulation, which
therefore previously existed in circulation, may have been stored up at
some prior time as a component part of a hoard, may have been the
money-form of wages, may have converted means of production or other
commodities into money or may have circulated portions of constant
capital or the revenue of some capitalist. It is no more new wealth than
money, considered from the standpoint of the simple circulation of
commodities, is the vehicle not only of its actual value but also of its
ten-fold value, because it was turned over ten times a day, realised ten
different commodity-values. The commodities exist without it, and it
itself remains what it is (or becomes even less by depreciation) whether
in one turnover or in ten. Only in the production of gold – inasmuch as
the gold product contains a surplus-product, a depository of
surplus-value – is new wealth (potential money) created, and it
increases the money material of new potential money-capitals only so far
as the entire money-product enters into circulation.

Although this surplus-value hoarded in the form of money is not
additional new social wealth, it represents new potential money-capital,
on account of the function for which it is hoarded. (We shall see later
that new money-capital may arise also in a way other than the gradual
conversion of surplus-value into money.)

Money is withdrawn from circulation and stored up as a hoard by selling
commodities without subsequent buying. If this operation is therefore
conceived as a general process, it seems inexplicable where the buyers
are to come from, since in that process everybody would want to sell in
order to hoard, and none would want to buy. And it must be conceived
generally, since every individual capital may be in the process of
accumulation.

If we were to conceive the process of circulation between the various
parts of the annual reproduction as taking place in a straight
line-which would be wrong as it always consists with a few exceptions of
mutually opposite movements-then we should have to start from the
producer of gold (or silver) who buys without selling, and to assume
that all others sell to him. In that case the entire yearly social
surplus-product (the bearer of the entire surplus-value) would pass into
his hands, and all the other capitalists would distribute among
themselves pro rata his surplus-product, which naturally exists in the
form of money, the natural embodiment in gold of his surplus-value. For
that portion of the product of the gold producer which has to make good
his active capital is already tied up and disposed of. The surplus-value
of the gold producer, created in the form of gold, would then be the
sole fund from which all other capitalists would draw the material for
the conversion of their annual surplus-product into money. The magnitude
of its value would then have to be equal to the entire annual
surplus-value of society, which must first assume the guise of a hoard.
Absurd as these assumptions would be, they would do nothing more than
explain the possibility of a universal simultaneous formation of a
hoard, and would not get reproduction itself one step further, except on
the part of the gold producer.

Before we resolve this seeming difficulty we must distinguish between
the accumulation in department I (production of means of production) and
in department II (production of articles of consumption). We shall start
with I.

I. Accumulation in Department I

1. The Formation of a Hoard

It is evident that both the investments of capital in the numerous lines
of industry constituting class I and the different individual
investments of capital within each of these lines of industry, according
to their age, i.e., the space of time during which they already have
functioned, quite aside from their volumes, technical conditions, market
conditions, etc., are in different stages of the process of successive
transformation from surplus-value into potential money-capital, whether
this money-capital is to serve for the expansion of the active capital
or for the establishment of new industrial enterprises – the two forms
of expansion of production. One part of the capitalists is continually
converting its potential money-capital, grown to an appropriate size,
into productive capital, i.e., with the money hoarded by the conversion
of surplus-value into money they buy means of production, additional
elements of constant capital. Another part of the capitalists is
meanwhile still engaged in hoarding its potential money-capital.
Capitalists belonging to these two categories confront each other: some
as buyers, the others as sellers, and each one of the two exclusively in
one of these roles.

For instance, let A sell 600 (equal to 400 c + 100 v + 100 s ) to B (who
may represent more than one buyer). A sells 600 in commodities for 600
in money, of which 100 are surplus-value which he withdraws from
circulation and hoards in the form of money. But these 100 in money are
but the money-form of the surplus-product, which was the bearer of a
value of 100. The formation of a hoard is no production at all, hence
not an increment of production, either. The action of the capitalist
consists here merely in withdrawing from circulation the 100 in money he
grabbed by the sale of his surplus-product, holding on to it and
impounding it. This operation is carried on not alone by A, but at
numerous points along the periphery of circulation by other capitalists,
A', A'', A''', all of them working with equal zeal at this sort of hoard
formation. These numerous points at which money is withdrawn from
circulation and accumulated in numerous individual hoards or potential
money-capitals appear as so many obstacles to circulation, because they
immobilise the money and deprive it of its capacity to circulate for a
certain length of time. But it must be borne in mind that hoarding takes
place in the simple circulation of commodities long before this is based
on capitalist commodity production. The quantity of money existing in
society is always greater than the part of it in actual circulation,
although this swells or subsides according to circumstances. We find
here again the same hoards, and the same formation of hoards, but now as
an element immanent in the capitalist process of production.

One can understand the pleasure experienced when all these potential
capitals within the credit system, by their concentration in the hands
of banks, etc., become disposable, "loanable capital," money-capital,
which indeed is no longer passive and music of the future, but active
capital growing rank.

However, A accomplishes the formation of a hoard only to the extent that
he acts only as a seller, so far as his surplus-product is concerned,
and not afterward as a buyer. His successive production of
surplus-products, the vehicles of his surplus-value to be converted into
money, is therefore the premise of his forming a hoard. In the present
case, where we are examining only the circulation within category I, the
bodily form of the surplus-product, as that of the total product of
which it is a part, is the bodily form of an element of constant capital
I, that is to say, it belongs in the category of means of production
creating means of production. We shall see presently what becomes of it,
what function it performs, in the hands of buyers B, B', B'', etc.

It must be noted at this point first and foremost that although
withdrawing money to the amount of his surplus-value from circulation
and hoarding it, A on the other hand throws commodities into it without
withdrawing other commodities in return. The capitalists B, B', B'',
etc., are thereby enabled to throw money into circulation and withdraw
only commodities from it. In the present case these commodities,
according to their bodily form and their destination, enter into the
constant capital of B, B', etc., as fixed or circulating element. We
shall hear more about this anon when we deal with the buyer of the
surplus-product, with B, B', etc.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Let us note by the way: Once more we find here, as we did in the case of
simple reproduction, that the exchange of the various component parts of
the annual product, i.e., their circulation (which must comprise at the
same time the reproduction of the capital, and indeed its restoration in
its various determinations, such as constant, variable, fixed,
circulating, money- and commodity-capital) does not by any means
presuppose mere purchase of commodities supplemented by a subsequent
sale, or a sale supplemented by a subsequent purchase, so that there
would actually be a bare exchange of commodity for commodity, as
Political Economy assumes, especially the free-trade school since the
physiocrats and Adam Smith. We know that the fixed capital, once the
expenditure for it is made, is not replaced during the entire period of
its function, but continues to act in its old form, while its value is
gradually precipitated in the form of money. Now we have seen that the
periodical renewal of fixed capital II (the entire capital-value II
being converted into elements worth I_((v+s)) ) presupposes on the one
hand the mere purchase of the fixed part of II c, reconverted from the
form of money into its bodily form, to which corresponds the mere sale
of I s ; and presupposes on the other hand the mere sale on the part of
II c, the sale of its fixed (depreciation) part of the value
precipitated in money, to which corresponds the mere purchase of I,. In
order that the exchange may take place normally in this case, it must be
assumed that the mere purchase on the part of II c is equal in magnitude
of value to the mere sale on the part of II c, and that in the same way
the mere sale of I s to II c, section 1, is equal to its mere purchase
from II c, section 2. Otherwise simple reproduction is disturbed. Mere
purchase here must be offset by a mere sale there. It must likewise be
assumed in this case that the mere sale of that portion of I s which
forms the hoards of A, A', A'' is balanced by the mere purchase of that
portion of I s which converts the hoards of B, B', and B'' into elements
of additional productive capital.

So far as the balance is restored by the fact that the buyer acts later
on as a seller to the same amount of value, and vice versa, the money
returns to the side that advanced it on purchasing, and which sold
before it bought again. But the actual balance, so far as the exchange
of commodities itself, the exchange of the various portions of the
annual product is concerned, demands that the values of the commodities
exchanged for one another be equal.

But inasmuch as only one-sided exchanges are made, a number of mere
purchases on the one hand, a number of mere sales on the other – and we
have seen that the normal exchange of the annual product on the basis of
capitalism necessitates such one-sided metamorphoses – the balance can
be maintained only on the assumption that in amount the value of the
one-sided purchases and that of the one-sided sales tally. The fact that
the production of commodities is the general form of capitalist
production implies the role which money is playing in it not only as a
medium of circulation, but also as money-capital, and engenders certain
conditions of normal exchange peculiar to this mode of production and
therefore of the normal course of reproduction, whether it be on a
simple or on an extended scale – conditions which change into so many
conditions of abnormal movement, into so many possibilities of crises,
since a balance is itself an accident owing to the spontaneous nature of
this production.

We have also seen that in the exchange of I v for a corresponding amount
of value of II c, there takes place in the end, precisely for II c, a
replacement of commodities II by an equivalent commodity-value I, that
therefore on the part of aggregate capitalist II the sale of his own
commodities is subsequently supplemented by the purchase of commodities
from I of the same amount of value. This replacement takes place. But
what does not take place is an exchange between capitalists I and II of
their respective goods. II sells its commodities to working-class I. The
latter confronts it one-sidedly, as a buyer of commodities, and it
confronts that class one-sidedly as a seller of commodities. With the
money proceeds so obtained II c confronts aggregate capitalist I
one-sidedly as a buyer of commodities, and aggregate capitalist I
confronts it one-sidedly as a seller of commodities up to the amount of
I v. It is only by means of this sale of commodities that I finally
reproduces its variable capital in the form of money-capital. If capital
I faces that of II one-sidedly as a seller of commodities to the amount
of I v, it faces working-class I as a buyer of commodities purchasing
their labour-power. And if working-class I faces capitalist II
one-sidedly as a buyer of commodities (namely, as a buyer of means of
subsistence), it faces capitalist I one-sidedly as a seller of
commodities, namely, as a seller of its labour-power.

The constant supply of labour-power on the part of working-class I, the
reconversion of a portion of commodity-capital I into the money-form of
variable capital, the replacement of a portion of commodity-capital II
by natural elements of constant capital II c – all these necessary
premises demand one another, but they are brought about by a very
complicated process, including three processes of circulation which
occur independently of one another but intermingle. This process is so
complicated that it offers ever so many occasions for running
abnormally.

2. The Additional Constant Capital

The surplus-product, the bearer of surplus-value, does not cost its
appropriators, capitalists I, anything. They are by no manner of means
obliged to advance any money or commodities in order to obtain it. Even
among the physiocrats an advance was the general form of value embodied
in elements of productive capital. Hence what capitalists I advance is
nothing but their constant and variable capital. The labourer not only
preserves by his labour their constant capital; he not only replaces the
value of their variable capital by a corresponding newly created portion
of value in the form of commodities; by his surplus-labour he supplies
them with a surplus-value existing in the form of surplus-product. By
the successive sale of this surplus-product they form a hoard,
additional potential money-capital. In the case under consideration,
this surplus-product consists from the outset of means of production of
means of production. It is only when it reaches the hands of B, B', B'',
etc. (I) that this surplus-product functions as additional constant
capital. But it is this _virtualiter_ even before it is sold, even in
the hands of the accumulators of hoards, A, A', A'' (I). If we consider
merely the amount of value of the reproduction on the part of I, we are
still moving within the bounds of simple reproduction, for no additional
capital has been set in motion to create this _virtualiter_ additional
constant capital (the surplus-product), nor has any greater amount of
surplus-labour been expended than that on the basis of simple
reproduction. The difference is here only in the form of the
surplus-labour performed, in the concrete nature of its particular
useful character. It has been expended in means of production for I c
instead of II c, in means of production of means of production instead
of means of production of articles of consumption. In the case of simple
reproduction it was assumed that the entire surplus-value I is spent as
revenue, hence in commodities II. Hence the surplus-value consisted only
of such means of production as have to replace constant capital II in
its bodily form. In order that the transition from simple to extended
reproduction may take place, production in department I must be in a
position to fabricate fewer elements of constant capital for II and so
many the more for I. This transition, which does not always take place
without difficulties, is facilitated by the fact that some of the
products of I may serve as means of production in either department.

It follows, then, that, considering the matter merely from the angle of
volume of values, the material substratum of extended reproduction is
produced within simple reproduction. It is simply surplus-labour of
working-class I expended directly in the production of means of
production, in the creation of virtual additional capital I. The
formation of virtual additional money-capital on the part of A, A' and
A'' (1) – by the successive sale of their surplus-product which was
formed without any capitalist expenditure of money – is therefore simply
the money-form of additionally produced means of production 1.

Consequently production of virtual additional capital expresses in our
case (we shall see that it may also be formed in a quite different way)
nothing but a phenomenon of the process of production itself,
production, in a particular form, of elements of productive capital.

The production of additional virtual money-capital on a large scale, at
numerous points of the periphery of circulation, is therefore but a
result and expression of multifarious production of virtually additional
productive capital, whose rise does not itself require additional
expenditure of money on the part of the industrial capitalist. The
successive transformation of this virtually additional productive
capital into virtual money-capital (hoard) on the part of A, A', A'',
etc. (I), occasioned by the successive sale of their surplus-product –
hence by repeated one-sided sale of commodities without a supplementing
purchase – is accomplished by a repeated withdrawal of money from
circulation and a corresponding formation of a hoard. Except in the case
where the buyer is a gold producer, this hoarding does not in any way
imply additional wealth in precious metals, but only a change in the
function of money previously circulating. A while ago it functioned as a
medium of circulation, now it functions as a hoard, as virtually new
money-capital in the process of formation. Thus the formation of
additional money-capital and the quantity of the precious metals
existing in a country are not in any causal relation to each other.

Hence it follows furthermore: The greater the productive capital already
functioning in a country (including the labour-power, the producer of
the surplus-product, incorporated in it), the more developed the
productive power of labour and thereby also the technical means for the
rapid expansion of the production of means of production – the greater
therefore the quantity of the surplus-product both as to its value and
as to the quantity of use-values in which it is represented – so much
the greater is

1) the virtually additional productive capital in the form of
surplus-product in the hands of A, A', A'', etc., and

2) the quantity of this surplus-product transformed into money, and
hence that of the virtually additional money-capital in the hands of A,
A', A''. The fact that Fullarton for instance does not want to hear of
over-production in the ordinary sense but only of the over-production of
capital, meaning money-capital, again shows how extremely little of the
mechanism of their own system even the best bourgeois economists
understand.

Whereas the surplus-product, directly produced and appropriated by the
capitalists A, A', A'' (I), is the real basis of the accumulation of
capital, i.e., of extended reproduction, although it does not actually
function in this capacity until it reaches the hands of B, B', B'', etc.
(I), it is on the contrary absolutely unproductive in its chrysalis
stage of money – as a hoard and virtual money-capital in process of
gradual formation – runs parallel with the process of production in this
form, but lies outside of it. It is a dead weight of capitalist
production. The eagerness to utilise this surplus-value accumulating as
virtual money-capital for the purpose of deriving profits or revenue
from it finds its object accomplished in the credit system and "papers."
Money-capital thereby gains in another form an enormous influence on the
course and the stupendous development of the capitalist system of
production. The surplus-product converted into virtual money-capital
will grow so much more in volume, the greater was the total amount of
already functioning capital whose functioning brought it into being.
With the absolute increase of the volume of the annually reproduced
virtual money-capital its segmentation also becomes easier, so that it
is more rapidly invested in any particular business, either in the hands
of the same capitalist or in those of others (for instance members of
the family, in the case of a partition of inherited property, etc.). By
segmentation of money-capital is meant here that it is wholly detached
from the parent stock in order to be invested as a new money-capital in
a new and independent business.

While the sellers of the surplus-product, A, A', A'', etc. (I), have
obtained it as a direct outcome of the process of production, which does
not envisage any additional acts of circulation except the advance of
constant and variable capital required also in simple reproduction; and
while they thereby construct the real basis for reproduction on an
extended scale, and in actual fact manufacture virtually additional
capital, the attitude of B, B', B'', etc. (I), is different. 1) Not
until it reaches the hands of B, B', B'', etc. (I), will the
surplus-product of A, A', A'', etc., actually function as additional
constant capital (we leave out of consideration for the present the
other element of productive capital, the additional labour-power, in
other words, the additional variable capital).

2) In order that that surplus-product may reach their hands an act of
circulation is wanted – they must buy it.

In regard to point 1 it should be noted here that a large portion of the
surplus-product (virtually additional constant capital), although
produced by A, A', A'' (I) in a given year, may not function as
industrial capital in the hands of B, B', B'' (I) until the following
year or still later. With reference to point 2, the question arises:
Whence comes the money needed for the process of circulation?

Since the products created by B, B', B'', etc. (I), re-enter in kind
into their own process, it goes without saying that _pro tanto_ a
portion of their own surplus-product is transferred directly (without
any intervention of circulation) to their productive capital and becomes
an additional element of constant capital. And pro tanto they do not
effect the conversion of the surplus-product of A, A', etc. (I), into
money. Aside from this, where does the money come from? We know that B,
B', B'', etc. (I) have formed their hoard in the same way as A, A',
etc., by the sale of their respective surplus-products. Now they have
arrived at the point where their hoarded, only virtual, money-capital is
to function effectively as additional money-capital. But this is merely
going round in circles. The question still remains: Where does the money
come from which the B's (I) before withdrew from circulation and
accumulated? We know from the analysis of simple reproduction that
capitalists I and II must have a certain amount of money at hand in
order to be able to exchange their surplus-product. In that case the
money which served only as revenue to be spent for articles of
consumption returned to the capitalists in the same measure in which
they had advanced it for the exchange of their respective commodities.
Here the same money re-appears, but performing a different function. The
A's and B's (I) supply one another alternately with the money for
converting surplus-product into additional virtual money-capital, and
throw the newly formed money-capital alternately back into circulation
as a means of purchase. The only assumption made in this case is that
the amount of money in the country in question (the velocity of
circulation, etc., being constant) should suffice for both the active
circulation and the reserve hoard. As we have seen this is the same
assumption as had to be made in the case of the simple circulation of
commodities. Only the function of the hoards is different in the present
case. Furthermore, the available amount of money must be larger, first,
because under capitalist production all the products (with the exception
of newly produced precious metals and the few products consumed by the
producer himself) are created as commodities and must therefore pass
through the pupation stage of money; secondly, because on a capitalist
basis the quantity of the commodity-capital and the magnitude of its
value is not only absolutely greater but also grows with incomparably
greater rapidity; thirdly, because an ever expanding variable capital
must always be converted into money-capital; fourthly, because the
formation of new money-capitals keeps pace with the extension of
production, so that the material for corresponding hoard formation must
be available.

This is generally true of the first phase of capitalist production, in
which even the credit system is mostly accompanied by metallic
circulation, and it applies to the most developed phase of the credit
system as well, to the extent that metallic circulation remains its
basis. On the one hand an additional production of precious metals,
being alternately abundant or scarce, may here exert a disturbing
influence on the prices of commodities not only at long, but also at
very short intervals. On the other hand the entire credit mechanism is
continually occupied in reducing the actual metallic circulation to a
relatively more and more decreasing minimum by means of sundry
operations, methods, and technical devices. The artificiality of the
entire machinery and the possibility of disturbing its normal course
increase to the same extent.

The different B's, B''s, B'''s, etc. (I), whose virtual new
money-capital enters upon its function as active capital, may have to
buy their products (portions of their surplus-product) from one another,
or to sell them to one another. Pro tanto the money advanced by them for
the circulation of their surplus-product flows back under normal
conditions to the different B's in the same proportion in which they had
advanced it for the circulation of their respective commodities. If the
money circulates as a means of payment, then only balances are to be
squared so far as the mutual purchases and sales do not cover one
another. But it is important first and foremost to assume here, as
everywhere, metallic circulation in its simplest, most primitive form,
because then the flux and reflux, the squaring of balances, in short all
elements appearing under the credit system as consciously regulated
processes present themselves as existing independently of the credit
system, and the matter appears in primitive form instead of the later,
reflected form.

3. The Additional Variable Capital

Hitherto we have been dealing only with additional constant capital. Now
we must direct our attention to a consideration of the additional
variable capital.

We have explained at great length in Book I that labour-power is always
available under the capitalist system of production, and that more
labour can be rendered fluent, if necessary, without increasing the
number of labourers or the quantity of labour-power employed. We
therefore need not go into this any further, but shall rather assume
that the portion of the newly created money-capital capable of being
converted into variable capital will always find at hand the
labour-power into which it is to transform itself. It has also been
explained in Book I that a given capital may expand its volume of
production within certain limits without any accumulation. But here we
are dealing with the accumulation of capital in its specific meaning, so
that the expansion of production implies the conversion of surplus-value
into additional capital, and thus also an expansion of the capital
forming the basis of production.

The gold producer can accumulate a portion of his golden surplus- value
as virtual money-capital. As soon as it becomes sufficient in amount, he
can transform it directly into new variable capital, without first
having to sell his surplus-product. He can likewise convert it into
elements of the constant capital. But in the latter case he must find at
hand the material elements of his constant capital. It is immaterial
whether, as was assumed in our presentation hitherto, each producer
works to stock up and then brings his finished product to the market or
fills orders. The actual expansion of production, i.e., the
surplus-product, is assumed in either case, in the one case as actually
available, in the other as virtually available, capable of delivery.

II. Accumulation in Department II

We have hitherto assumed that A, A', A'' (I) sell their surplus-product
to B, B', B'', etc., who belong to the same department I. But supposing
A (I) converts his surplus-product into money by selling it to one B in
department II. This can be done only by A (I) selling means of
production to B (II) without subsequently buying articles of
consumption, i.e., only by a one-sided sale on A's part. Now whereas II
c cannot be converted from the commodity-capital form into the bodily
form of productive constant capital unless not only I but also at least
a portion of I, is exchanged for a portion of II c, which II exists in
the form of articles of consumption; but now A converts his I into money
by not making this exchange but rather withdrawing from circulation the
money obtained from II on the sale of his I s instead of exchanging it
in the purchase of articles of consumption II c – then what we have on
the part of A (I) is indeed a formation of additional virtual
money-capital, but on the other hand a portion of the constant capital
of B (II) of equal magnitude of value is tied up in the form of
commodity-capital, unable to transform itself into the bodily form of
productive, constant capital. In other words, a portion of the
commodities of B (II), and indeed primo facie a portion without the sale
of which he cannot reconvert his constant capital entirely into its
productive form, has become unsaleable. As far as this portion is
concerned there is therefore an over-production, which, likewise as far
as the same portion is concerned, clogs reproduction, even on the same
scale.

In this case the additional virtual money-capital on the side of A (I)
is indeed a moneyed form of surplus-product (surplus-value), but the
surplus-product (surplus-value) considered as such is here a phenomenon
of simple reproduction, not yet of reproduction on an extended scale.
I_((v+s)) for which this is true at all events of one portion of s, must
ultimately be exchanged for II c, in order that the reproduction of II c
may take place on the same scale. By the sale of his surplus-product to
B(II), A(I) has supplied to the latter a corresponding portion of the
value of constant capital in its bodily form. But at the same time he
has rendered an equivalent portion of the commodities of B (II)
unsaleable by withdrawing the money from circulation – by failing to
complement his sale through subsequent purchase. Hence, if we survey the
entire social reproduction, which comprises the capitalists of both I
and II, the conversion of the surplus-product of A (I) into virtual
money-capital expresses the impossibility of reconverting
commodity-capital of B (II) representing an equal amount of value into
productive (constant) capital; hence not virtual production on an
extended scale but an obstruction of simple reproduction, and so a
deficit in simple reproduction. As the formation and sale of the
surplus-product of A (I) are normal phenomena of simple reproduction, we
have here even on the basis of simple reproduction the following
interdependent phenomena: Formation of virtual additional money-capital
in class I (hence under-consumption from the view-point of II); piling
up of commodity-supplies in class II which cannot be reconverted into
productive capital (hence relative over-production in II); surplus of
money-capital in I and reproduction deficit in II.

Without pausing any longer at this point, we simply remark that we had
assumed in the analysis of simple reproduction that the entire
surplus-value of I and II is spent as revenue. As a matter of fact
however one portion of the surplus-value is spent as revenue, and the
other is converted into capital. Actual accumulation can take place only
on this assumption. That accumulation should take place at the expense
of consumption is, couched in such general terms, an illusion
contradicting the nature of capitalist production. For it takes for
granted that the aim and compelling motive of capitalist production is
consumption, and not the snatching of surplus-value and its
capitalisation, i.e., accumulation.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Let us now take a closer look at the accumulation in department II.

The first difficulty with reference to II c, i.e., its reconversion from
a component part of commodity-capital II into the bodily form of
constant capital II, concerns simple reproduction. Let us take the
former scheme: (1,000 v + 1,000 s) I are exchanged for 2,000 II c.

Now, if for instance one half of the surplus-product of I, hence 1,000/2
s or 500 I s is reincorporated in department I as constant capital, then
this portion of the surplus-product, being detained in I, cannot replace
any part of II c. Instead of being converted into articles of
consumption (and here in this section of the circulation between I and
II the exchange is actually mutual, that is, there is a double change of
position of the commodities, unlike the replacement of 1,000 II c by
1,000 I v effected by the labourers of I), it is made to serve as an
additional means of production in I itself. It cannot perform this
function simultaneously in I and II. The capitalist cannot spend the
value of his surplus-product for articles of consumption and at the same
time consume the surplus-product itself productively, i.e., incorporate
it in his productive capital. Instead of 2,000 I_((v+s)), only 1,500,
namely (1,000 v + 500 s) I, are therefore exchangeable for 2,000 II c ;
500 II c cannot be reconverted from the commodity-form into productive
(constant) capital

II. Hence there would be an over-production in II, exactly equal in
volume to the expansion of production in I. This over-production in II
might react to such an extent on I that even the reflux of the 1,000
spent by the labourers of I for articles of consumption of II might take
place but partially, so that these 1,000 would not return to the hands
of capitalists I in the form of variable money-capital. These
capitalists would thus find themselves hampered even in reproduction on
an unchanging scale, and this by the bare attempt to expand it. And in
this connection it must be taken into consideration that in I only
simple reproduction had actually taken place and that its elements, as
represented in our scheme, are only differently grouped with a view to
expansion in the future, say, next year.

One might attempt to circumvent this difficulty in the following way:
Far from being over-production, the 500 II c which are kept in stock by
the capitalists and cannot be immediately converted into productive
capital represent, on the contrary, a necessary element of reproduction,
which we have so far neglected. We have seen that a money-supply must be
accumulated at many points, hence money must be withdrawn from
circulation, partly for the purpose of making it possible to form new
money-capital in I, and partly to hold fast temporarily the value of the
gradually depreciating fixed capital in the form of money. But since we
placed all money and commodities from the very start exclusively into
the hands of capitalists I and II when we drew up our scheme and since
neither merchants, nor money-changers, nor bankers, nor merely consuming
and not directly producing classes exist here, it follows that the
constant formation of commodity stores in the hands of their respective
producers is here indispensable to keep the machinery of reproduction
going. The 500 II c held in stock by capitalists II therefore represent
the commodity-supply of articles of consumption which ensures the
continuity of the process of consumption implied in reproduction, here
meaning the passage of one year to the next. The consumption-fund, which
is as yet in the hands of its sellers who are at the same time its
producers, cannot fall one year to the point of zero in order to begin
the next with zero, any more than such a thing can take place in the
transition from today to tomorrow. Since such supplies of commodities
must constantly be built up anew, though varying in volume, our
capitalist producers II must have a reserve money-capital, which enables
them to continue their process of production although one portion of
their productive capital is temporarily tied up in the shape of
commodities. Our assumption is that they combine the whole business of
trading with that of producing. Hence they must also have at their
disposal the additional money-capital, which is in the hands of the
merchants when the individual functions in the process of reproduction
are separated and distributed among the various kinds of capitalists.

To this one may object:

1) That the forming of such supplies and the necessity of doing so
applies to all capitalists, those of I as well as of II. Considered as
mere sellers of commodities, they differ only in that they sell
different kinds of commodities. A supply of commodities II implies a
previous supply of commodities I. If we neglect this supply on one side,
we must also do so on the other. But if we take them into account on
both sides, the problem is not altered in any way.

2) Just as a certain year closes on the part of II with a supply of
commodities for the following year, so it was opened with a supply of
commodities on the same part, taken over from the preceding year. In an
analysis of annual reproduction, reduced to its most abstract form, we
must therefore strike it out in both cases. If we leave to the given
year its entire production, including the commodity-supply to be yielded
up for next year, and simultaneously take from it the supply of
commodities transferred to it from the preceding year, we have before us
the actual aggregate product of an average year as the subject of our
analysis.

3) The simple circumstance that in the analysis of simple reproduction
we did not stumble across the difficulty which is now to be surmounted
proves that we are confronted by a specific phenomenon due solely to the
different grouping (with reference to reproduction) of elements I, a
changed grouping without which reproduction on an extended scale cannot
take place at all.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents


Chapter 21: Accumulation and Reproduction on an Extended Scale - Part 2

III. Schematic Presentation of Accumulation

We shall now study reproduction according to the following scheme.

Scheme a)

I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)

= 6,000

II. 1,500_(c) + 376_(v) + 376_(s)

= 2,252

 

= 8,252 Total

We note in the first place that the sum total of the annual social
product, or 8,252, is smaller than that of the first scheme, where it
was 9,000. We might just as well assume a much larger sum, for instance
one ten times larger. We have chosen a smaller sum than in our scheme I
in order to make it conspicuously clear that reproduction on an enlarged
scale (which is here regarded merely as production carried on with a
larger investment of capital) has nothing to do with the absolute volume
of the product, that for a given quantity of commodities it implies
merely a different arrangement or a different definition of the
functions of the various elements of a given product, so that it is but
a simple reproduction so far as the value of the product is concerned.
It is not the quantity but the qualitative determination of the given
elements of simple reproduction which is changed, and this change is the
material premise of a subsequent reproduction on an extended scale.
^([1])

We might vary the scheme by changing the ratio between the variable and
constant capital. For instance as follows:

Scheme b)

I. 4,000_(c) + 875_(v) + 875_(s)

= 5,750

 

II. 1,750_(c) + 376_(v) + 376_(s)

= 2,502

 

= 8,252 Total

This scheme seems arranged for reproduction on a simple scale, the
surplus-value being entirely consumed as revenue and not accumulated. In
either case, both a) and b), we have an annual product of the same
magnitude of value, only under b) functionally its elements are grouped
in such a way that reproduction is resumed on the same scale, while
under a) the functional grouping forms the material basis of
reproduction on an extended scale. Under b) (875_(v) + 875_(s)) I, or
1,750 I_((v\ +\ s)), are exchanged without any surplus for 1,750 II_(c)
while under a) the exchange of (1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)) I, equal to 2,000
I_((v\ +\ s)), for 1,000 II_(c) leaves a surplus of 500 I_(s) for
accumulation in class I.

Now let us analyse scheme a) more closely. Let us suppose that both I
and II accumulate one half of their surplus-value, that is to say,
convert it into an element of additional capital, instead of spending it
as revenue. As one half of 1,000 I_(s), or 500, are to be accumulated in
one form or another, invested as additional money-capital, i.e.,
converted into additional productive capital, only (l,000_(v) + 500_(s))
I are spent as revenue. Hence only 1,500 figures here as the normal size
of II_(c). We need not further examine the exchange between 1,500
I_((v\ +\ s)) and 1,500 II_(c), because this has already been done under
the head of process of simple reproduction. Nor does 4,000 I_(c) require
any attention, since its re-arrangement for the newly commencing
reproduction (which this time will occur on an extended scale) was
likewise discussed as a process of simple reproduction.

The only thing that remains to be examined by us is 500 I_(s) and
(376_(v) + 376_(s)) II, inasmuch as it is a matter on the one hand of
the internal relations of both I and II and on the other of the movement
between them. Since we have assumed that in II likewise one half of the
surplus-value is to be accumulated, 188 are to be converted here into
capital, of which one-fifth, or 47, or, to round it off, 48, are to be
variable capital, so that 140 remain to be converted into constant
capital.

Here we come across a new problem, whose very existence must appear
strange to the current view that commodities of one kind are exchanged
for commodities of another kind, or commodities for money and the same
money again for commodities of another kind. The 140 II_(s) can be
converted into productive capital only by replacing them with
commodities of I_(s) of the same value. It is a matter of course that
that portion of I_(s) which must be exchanged for II_(s) must consist of
means of production, which may enter either into the production of both
I and II, or exclusively into that of II. This replacement can be made
feasible only by means of a one-sided purchase on the part of II, as the
entire surplus-product of 500 I_(s), which we still have to examine, is
to serve the purposes of accumulation within I, hence cannot be
exchanged for commodities II; in other words, it cannot be
simultaneously accumulated and consumed by I. Therefore II must buy 140
I_(s) for cash without recovering this money by a subsequent sale of its
commodities to I. And this is a process which is continually repeating
itself in every new annual production, so far as it is reproduction on
an extended scale. Where in II is the source of the money for this?

It would rather seem that II is a very unprofitable field for the
formation of new money-capital which accompanies actual accumulation and
necessitates it under capitalist production, and which at first actually
presents itself as simple hoarding.

We have first 376 II_(v). The money-capital of 376, advanced in
labour-power, continually returns through the purchase of commodities II
as variable capital in money-form to capitalist II. This constant
repetition of departure from and return to the starting-point, the
pocket of the capitalist, does not add in any way to the money roving
over this circuit. This, then, is not a source of the accumulation of
money. Nor can this money be withdrawn from circulation in order to form
hoarded, virtually new, money-capital.

But stop! Isn't there a chance here to make a little profit?

We must not forget that class II has this advantage over class I, that
its labourers have to buy back from it the commodities produced by
themselves. Class II is a buyer of labour-power and at the same time a
seller of the commodities to the owners of the labour-power employed by
it. Class II can therefore:

1) — and this it shares with the capitalists of class I — simply depress
wages below their normal average level. By this means a portion of the
money functioning as the money-form of variable capital is released, and
if this process is continually repeated, it might become a normal source
of hoarding, and thus of virtually additional money-capital in class II.
Of course we are not referring to a casual swindle profit here, since we
are treating of a normal formation of capital. But it must not be
forgotten that the normal wages actually paid (which _ceteris paribus_
determine the magnitude of the variable capital) are not paid by the
capitalists but of the goodness of their hearts, but must he paid under
given relations. This eliminates the above method of explanation. If we
assume that 376_(v) is the variable capital to be laid out by class II,
we have no right suddenly to sneak in the hypothesis that it may pay
only 350_(v) instead of 376_(v), merely to elucidate a problem that has
newly arisen.

2) On the other hand class II, taken as a whole, has the above-mentioned
advantage over I that it is at the same time a buyer of labour-power and
a seller of its commodities to its own labourers. Every industrial
country (for instance Britain and the U.S.A.) furnishes the most
tangible proofs of the way in which this advantage may be exploited — by
paying nominally the normal wages but grabbing, alias stealing, back
part of them without an equivalent in commodities; by accomplishing the
same thing either through the truck system or through a falsification of
the medium of circulation (perhaps in a way too elusive for the law).
(Take this opportunity to expatiate on this idea with some appropriate
examples.) This is the same operation as under 1), only disguised and
carried out by a detour. Therefore it must likewise be rejected, the
same as the other. We are dealing here with actually paid, not nominally
paid wages.

We see that in an objective analysis of the mechanism of capitalism
certain stains still sticking to it with extraordinary tenacity cannot
be used as a subterfuge to get over some theoretical difficulties. But
strange to say, the great majority of my bourgeois critics upbraid me as
though I have wronged the capitalists by assuming, for instance in Book
I of _Capital_, that the capitalist pays labour-power at its real value,
a thing which he mostly does not do! (Here, exercising some of the
magnanimity attributed to me, it would be appropriate to quote
Schäffle.)

So with the 376 II_(v) we cannot get any nearer the goal we have
mentioned.

But the 376 II_(v) seem to be in a still more precarious position. Here
only capitalists of the same class, mutually buying and selling the
articles of consumption they produced, confront one another. The money
required for these transactions functions only as a medium of
circulation and in the normal course of things must flow back to the
interested parties in the same portion in which they advanced it to the
circulation, in order to cover the same route over and over again.

There seem to be only two ways by which this money can be withdrawn from
circulation to form virtually additional money-capital. Either one part
of capitalists II cheats the other and thus robs them of their money. We
know that no preliminary expansion of the circulating medium is
necessary for the formation of new money-capital. All that is necessary
is that the money should be withdrawn from circulation by certain
parties and hoarded. It would not alter the case if this money were
stolen, so that the formation of additional money-capital by one part of
capitalists II would entail a positive loss of money by another part.
The cheated capitalists II would have to live a little less gaily, that
would be all.

Or a part of II represented by necessities of life is directly converted
into new variable capital within department II. How that is done we
shall examine at the close of this chapter (under No. IV).

1. First Illustration

  -------------------------------------- ---------------
  _A. Scheme of Simple Reproduction_      
  I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)   = 6,000
  II. 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s)      =3,000
                                         = 9,000 Total
  -------------------------------------- ---------------

_B. Initial Scheme for Reproduction on an Extended Scale_

I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)

= 6,000

II. 1,500_(c) + 750_(v) + 750_(s)

= 3,000

 

= 9,000 Total

Assuming that in scheme B one half of surplus-value I, i.e., 500, is
accumulated, we first receive (1,000_(v) + 500_(s)) I, or 1,500
I_((v\ +\ s)) to be replaced by 1,500 II_(c). There then remains in
I:4,000_(c) and 500_(s), the latter having to be accumulated. The
replacement of (1,000_(v) + 500_(s)) I by 1,500 II_(c) is a process of
simple reproduction, which has been examined previously.

Let us now assume that 400 of the 500 I_(s) are to be converted into
constant capital, and 100 into variable capital. The exchange within I
of the 400_(s), which are thus to be capitalised, has already been
discussed. They can therefore be annexed to I_(c), without more ado and
in that case we get for I:

4,400_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 100_(s) (the latter to be converted into
100_(v)).

II in turn buys from I for the purpose of accumulation the 100 I_(s)
(existing in means of production) which now form additional constant
capital II, while the 100 in money which it pays for them are converted
into the money-form of the additional variable capital of I. We then
have for I a capital of 4,400_(c) + 1,100_(v) (the latter in money),
equaling 5,500.

II has now 1,600_(c) for its constant capital. In order to put them to
work, it must advance a further 50_(v) in money for the purchase of new
labour-power, so that its variable capital grows from 750 to 800. This
expansion of the constant and variable capital of II by a total of 150
is supplied out of its surplus-value. Hence only 600_(s) of the 750
II_(s) remain as a consumption-fund for capitalists II, whose annual
product is now distributed as follows:

II. 1,600_(c) + 800_(v) + 600_(s) (consumption-fund), equal to 3,000.

The 150_(s) produced in articles of consumption, which have been
converted here into (100_(c) + 50_(v)) II, go entirely in their bodily
form for the consumption of the labourers, 100 being consumed by the
labourers of I (100 I_(v)), and 50 by the labourers of II (50 II_(v)),
as explained above. As a matter of fact in II, where its total product
is prepared in a form suitable for accumulation, a part greater by 100
of the surplus-value in the form of _necessary_ articles of consumption
must be reproduced. If reproduction really starts on an extended scale,
then the 100 of variable money-capital I flow back through the hands of
its working-class to II, while II transfers 100_(s) in commodity-supply
to I and at the same time 50 in commodity-supply to its own
working-class.

The arrangement changed for the purpose of accumulation is now as
follows:

  ------------------------------------------------- --------------------------
  I. 4,400_(c) + 1,100_(s) + 500 consumption-fund   = 6,000
  II. 1,600_(c) + 800_(v) + 600 consumption-fund    = 3,000
                                                    = 9,000 Total, as before
  ------------------------------------------------- --------------------------

Of these amounts, the following are capital:

  ---------------------------------- ---------
  I. 4,400_(c) + 1,100_(v) (money)   = 5,500
  II. 1,600_(c) + 800_(v) (money)    = 2,400
                                     = 7,900
  ---------------------------------- ---------

while production started out with

  -------------------------- ---------
  I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v)   = 5,000
  II. 1,500_(c) + 750_(v)    = 2,250
                             = 7,250
  -------------------------- ---------

Now, if actual accumulation takes place on this basis, that is to say,
if production really goes on with this augmented capital, we obtain at
the end of the following year:

  -------------------------------------- ---------
  I. 4,400_(c) + 1,100_(v) + 1,100_(s)   = 6,600
  II. 1,600_(c) + 800_(v) + 800_(v)      = 3,200
                                         = 9,800
  -------------------------------------- ---------

Then let accumulation in I continue in the same proportion, so that
550_(s) are spent as revenue and 550_(s) accumulated. In that case 1,100
I_(v) are first replaced by 1,100 II_(c), and 550 I_(s) must be realised
in an equal amount of commodities of II, making a total of 1,650
I_((v\ +\ s)). But the constant capital II, which is to be replaced, is
equal to only 1,600; hence the remaining 50 must be supplemented out of
800 II_(s). Leaving aside the money aspect for the present, we have as a
result of this transaction:

I. 4,400_(c) + 550_(s) (to be capitalised); furthermore, realised in
commodities II_(c), the consumption-fund of the capitalists and
labourers 1,650_((v\ +\ s)).

II. 1,650_(c) (50 added from II_(s) as indicated above) + 800_(v) +
750_(s) (consumption-fund of the capitalists).

But if the old ratio of v:s is maintained in II, then additional 25_(v)
must be laid out for 50_(c), and these are to be taken from the 750_(s).
Then we have

II. 1,650_(c) + 825_(v) + 725_(s).

In I, 550_(s) must be capitalised. If the former ratio is maintained,
440 of this amount form constant capital and 110 variable capital. These
110 might be taken out of the 725 II_(s), i.e., articles of consumption
to the value of 110 are consumed by labourers I instead of capitalists
II, so that the latter are compelled to capitalise these 110_(s) which
they cannot consume. This leaves 615 II_(s) of the 725 II_(s). But if II
thus converts these 110 into additional constant capital, it requires an
additional variable capital of 55. This again must be supplied by its
surplus-value. Subtracting this amount from 615 II_(s) leaves 560 for
the consumption of capitalists II, and we now obtain the following
capital-value after accomplishing all actual and potential transfers:

I. (4,400_(c) + 440_(c)) + (1,100_(v) + 110_(v)) = 4,840_(c) + 1,210_(v)
= 6,050
II. (1,600_(c) + 50_(c) + 110_(c)) + (800_(v) + 25_(v) + 55_(v))
= 1760_(c) + 880_(v) = 2,640/8,690

If things are to proceed normally, accumulation in II must take place
more rapidly than in I, because otherwise the portion I_((v\ +\ s))
which must be converted into commodities II will grow more rapidly than
II_(c), for which alone it can be exchanged.

If reproduction is continued on this basis and conditions otherwise
remain unchanged we obtain at the end of the succeeding year:

  -------------------------------------- ----------
  I. 4,840_(c) + 1,210_(v) + 1,210_(s)   = 7,260
  II. 1,760_(c) + 880_(v) + 880_(s)      = 3,520
                                         = 10,780
  -------------------------------------- ----------

If the rate of division of the surplus-value remains unchanged, there is
first to be expended as revenue by I: 1,210_(v) and one half of s, or
605, a total of 1,815. This consumption-fund is again larger than II_(c)
by 55. These 55 must be deducted from 880_(s), leaving 825. Furthermore,
the conversion of 55 II_(s) into II implies another deduction from
II_(s) for a corresponding variable capital of 27½, leaving for
consumption 797½ II_(s).

I has now to capitalise 605_(s). Of these 484 are constant and 121
variable. The last named are to be deducted from II_(s), which is still
equal to 797½, leaving 676½ II_(s). II, then, converts another 121 into
constant capital and requires another variable capital of 60½ for it,
which likewise comes out of 676½, leaving 616 for consumption.

Then we have the following capitals:

  ----- ----------- --------------------------
  I.    Constant:   4,840 + 484 = 5,324
        Variable:   1,210 + 121 = 1,331
  II.   Constant:   1,760 + 55 + 121 = 1,936
        Variable:   880 + 27½ + 60½ = 968
  ----- ----------- --------------------------

 

 

Totals:

I. 5,324_(c) + 1,331_(v)

= 6,655

 

II. 1,936_(s) + 968_(v)

= 2,904

 

= 9,559

And at the end of the year the product is

  -------------------------------------- ----------
  I. 5,324_(c) + 1,331_(v) + 1,331_(s)   = 7,986
  II. 1,936_(c) + 968_(v) + 968_(s)      = 3,872
                                         = 11,858
  -------------------------------------- ----------

Repeating the same calculation and rounding off the fractions, we get at
the end of the succeeding year the following product:

  --------------------------------------- ----------
  I. 5,856_(c) + 1,464_(v) + 1,464_(s)    = 8,784
  II. 2,129_(c) + 1,065_(v) + 1,065_(c)   = 4,259
                                          = 13,043
  --------------------------------------- ----------

And at the end of the next succeeding year:

  --------------------------------------- ----------
  I. 6, 442_(c) + 1,610_(v) + 1,610_(s)   = 9,662
  II. 2,342_(c) + 1,172_(v) + 1,172_(s)   = 4,686
                                          = 14,348
  --------------------------------------- ----------

In the course of five years of reproduction on an extended scale the
aggregate capital of I and II has risen from 5,500_(c) + 1,750_(v) =
7,250 to 8,784_(c) + 2,782_(v) = 11,566; in other words in the ratio of
100:160. The total surplus-value was originally 1,750; it is now 2,782.
The consumed surplus-value was originally 500 for I and 600 for II, a
total of 1,100. The previous year it was 732 for I and 745 for II, a
total of 1,477. It has therefore grown in the ratio of 100:134.

2. Second Illustration

Now take the annual product of 9,000, which is altogether a
commodity-capital in the hands of the class of industrial capitalists in
a form in which the general average ratio of the variable to the
constant capital is that of 1:5. This presupposes a considerable
development of capitalist production and accordingly of the productivity
of social labour, a considerable previous increase in the scale of
production, and finally a development of all the circumstances which
produce a relative surplus-population among the working-class. The
annual product will then be divided as follows, after rounding off the
various fractions:

  -------------------------------------- ---------
  I. 5,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s)   = 7,000
  II. 1,430_(c) + 285_(v) + 285_(s)      = 2,000
                                         = 9,000
  -------------------------------------- ---------

Now take it that capitalist class I consumes one half of its
surplus-value, or 500, and accumulates the other half. In that case
(1,000_(v) + 500_(s)) I, or 1,500, would have to be converted into 1,500
II_(c). Since II_(c) here amounts to only 1,430, it is necessary to add
70 from the surplus-value. Subtracting this sum from 285 II_(s) leaves
215 II_(s). Then we have:

I. 5,000_(c) + 500_(s) (to be capitalised) + l,500_((v\ +\ s))

in the consumption-fund of the capitalists and labourers.

II. 1,430_(c) + 70_(s) (to be capitalised) + 285_(v) + 215_(s).

As 70 II_(s) are directly annexed here to II_(c), a variable capital of
70/5, or 14, is required to set this additional constant capital in
motion. These 14 must also come out of the 215 II_(s), so that 201
II_(s) remain, and we have:

II. (1,430_(c) + 70_(c)) + (285_(v) + l4_(v)) + 201_(s).

The exchange of 1,500 I_((v\ +\ ½s)) for 1,500 II_(c) is a process of
simple reproduction, and nothing further need be said about it. However
a few peculiarities remain to be noted here, which arise from the fact
that in accumulating reproduction I_((v\ +\ ½s)) is not replaced solely
by II_(c), but by II_(c) plus a portion of II_(s).

It goes without saying that as soon as we assume accumulation,
I_((v\ +\ s)) is greater than II_(c), not equal to II_(c), as in simple
reproduction. For in the first place, I incorporates a portion of its
surplus-product in its own productive capital and converts five-sixths
of it into constant capital, therefore cannot replace these five-sixths
simultaneously by articles of consumption II. In the second place I has
to supply out of its surplus-product the material for the constant
capital required for accumulation within II, just as II has to supply I
with the material for the variable capital, which is to set in motion
the portion of I’s surplus-product employed by I itself as additional
constant capital. We know that the actual, and therefore also the
additional, variable capital consists of labour-power. It is not
capitalist I who buys from II a supply of necessities of life or
accumulates them for the additional labour-power to be employed by him,
as the slaveholder had to do. It is the labourers themselves who trade
with II. But this does not prevent the articles of consumption of his
additional labour-power from being viewed by the capitalist as only so
many means of production and maintenance of his eventual additional
labour-power, hence as the bodily form of his variable capital. His own
immediate operation, in the present case that of I, consists in merely
storing up the new money-capital required for the purchase of additional
labour-power. As soon as he has incorporated this in his capital, the
money becomes a means of purchase of commodities II for this
labour-power, which must find these articles of consumption at hand.

By the by. The capitalist, as well as his press, is often dissatisfied
with the way in which the labour-power spends its money and with the
commodities II in which it realises this money. On such occasions he
philosophises, babbles of culture, and dabbles in philanthropical talk,
for instance after the manner of Mr. Drummond, the Secretary of the
British Embassy in Washington. According to him, _The Nation_ (a
journal) carried last October 1879, an interesting article, which
contained among other things the following passages:

“The working-people have not kept up in culture with the growth of
invention, and they have had things showered on them which they do not
know how to use, and thus make no market for.” [Every capitalist
naturally wants the labourer to buy his commodities.] “There is no
reason why the working man should not desire as many comforts as the
minister, lawyer, and doctor, who is earning the same amount as
himself.” [This class of lawyers, ministers and doctors have indeed to
be satisfied with the mere desire of many comforts!] “He does not do so,
however. The problem remains, how to raise him as a consumer by rational
and healthful processes, not an easy one, as his ambition does not go
beyond a diminution of his hours of labour, the demagogues rather
inciting him to this than to raising his condition by the improvement of
his mental and moral powers.” (_Reports of H. M.’s Secretaries of
Embassy and Legation on the Manufactures, Commerce, etc., of the
Countries in which they reside_. London, 1879, p. 404.)

Long hours of labour seem to be the secret of the rational and healthful
processes, which are to raise the condition of the labourer by an
improvement of his mental and moral powers and to make a rational
consumer of him. In order to become a rational consumer of the
commodities of the capitalist, he should above all begin to let his own
capitalist consume his labour-power irrationally and unhealthfully — but
the demagogue prevents him! What the capitalist means by a rational
consumption is evident wherever he is condescending enough to engage
directly in the trade with his own labourers, in the truck system, which
includes also the supplying of homes to the labourers, so that the
capitalist is at the same time a landlord for them — a branch of
business among many others.

The same Drummond, whose beautiful soul is enamoured of the capitalist
attempts to uplift the working-class, tells in the same report among
other things of the cotton goods manufacture of the Lowell and Lawrence
Mills. The boarding and lodging houses for the factory girls belong to
the corporation or company owning the mills. The stewardesses of these
houses are in the employ of the same company which prescribes them rules
of conduct. No girl is permitted to stay out after 10 p.m. Then comes a
gem: a special police patrol the grounds for the purpose of guarding
against an infringement of those rules. After 10 p. m. no girl can leave
or enter. No girl may live anywhere but on the premises of the company,
and every house on it brings the company about 10 dollars per week in
rent. And now we see the rational consumer in his full glory:

“As the ever present piano is however to be found in many of the best
appointed working girls’ boarding houses, music, song, and dance come in
for a considerable share of the operatives’ attention at least among
those who, after 10 hours’ steady work at the looms, need more relief
from monotony than actual rest.” (p. 412.)

But the main secret of making a rational consumer out of the labourer is
yet to be told. Mr. Drummond visits the cutlery works of Turner’s Falls
(Connecticut River), and Mr. Oakman, the treasurer of the concern, after
telling him that especially American table cutlery beat the English in
quality, continues:

“The time is coming that we will beat England as to prices also, we are
ahead in quality now, that is acknowledged, but we must have lower
prices, and shall have it the moment we get our steel at lower prices
and have our labour down.” (p. 427.)

A reduction of wages and long hours of labour — that is the essence of
the rational and healthful processes which are to uplift the labourer to
the dignity of a rational consumer, so that “they make a market for
things showered upon them” by culture and growth of invention.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Consequently, just as I has to supply the additional constant capital of
II out of its surplus-product, so II likewise supplies the additional
variable capital for I. II accumulates for I and for itself, so far as
the variable capital is concerned, by reproducing a greater portion of
its total product, and hence especially of its surplus-product, in the
shape of necessary articles of consumption.

In production on the basis of increasing capital, I_((v\ +\ s)) must be
equal to II plus that portion of the surplus-product which is
re-incorporated as capital, plus the additional portion of constant
capital required for the expansion of the production in II; and the
minimum of this expansion is that without which real accumulation, i.e.,
a real expansion of production in I itself, is unfeasible.

Reverting now to the case which we examined last, we find in it the
peculiarity that II is smaller than I_((v\ +\ ½s)), than that portion of
product I which is spent as revenue for articles of consumption, so that
on exchanging the 1,500 I_((v\ +\ s)) a portion of surplus-product II,
equal to 70, is at once realised. As for II_(c), equal to 1,430, it
must, all other conditions remaining the same, be replaced by an equal
magnitude of value out of I_((v\ +\ s)), in order that simple
reproduction may take place in II, and to that extent we need not pay
any more attention to it here. It is different with the additional 70
II_(s). What for I is merely a replacement of revenue by articles of
consumption, merely commodity-exchange meant for consumption, is for II
not a mere reconversion of its constant capital from the form of
commodity-capital into its bodily form, as it is in simple reproduction,
but a direct process of accumulation, a transformation of a part of its
surplus-product from the form of articles of consumption into that of
constant capital. If with £70 in money (money-reserve for the conversion
of surplus-value) I buys the 70 II_(s), and if II does not buy in
exchange 70 I_(s), but accumulates the £70 as money-capital, then the
latter is indeed always an expression of additional product (precisely
of the surplus-product of II, of which it is an aliquot part), although
this is not a product which re-enters production; but in that case this
accumulation of money on the part of II would at the same time express
that 70 I_(s) in means of production are unsaleable. There would be a
relative overproduction in I, corresponding to the simultaneous
non-expansion of reproduction on the part of II.

But apart from this: Until the 70 in money, which came from I, return to
it, wholly or in part, through the purchase of 70 I_(s) by II, this 70
in money figures wholly or in part as additional virtual money-capital
in the hands of II. This is true of every exchange between I and II,
until the mutual replacement of their respective commodities has
effected the return of the money to its starting-point. But in the
normal course of things the money figures here only transiently in this
role. In the credit system, however, where all temporarily released
additional money is supposed to function at once actively as an
additional money-capital, such only temporarily released money-capital
may be enthralled, for instance, serve in new enterprises of I, while it
should have to realise surplus-products held there in other enterprises.
It must also be noted that the annexation of 70 I_(s) to constant
capital II requires at the same time an expansion of variable capital II
by 14. This implies — about the way it did in I, in the direct
incorporation of surplus-product I_(s) in capital I_(c) — that the
reproduction in II is already in process with a tendency toward further
capitalisation; in other words, it implies expansion of that portion of
the surplus-product which consists of necessary means of subsistence.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The product of 9,000 in the second illustration must, as we have seen,
be distributed in the following manner for the purpose of reproduction,
if 500 I_(s) is to be capitalised. In doing so we merely consider the
commodities and neglect the money-circulation.

I. 5,000_(c) + 500_(s) (to be capitalised) + 1,500_((v\ +\ s))
consumption-fund equals 7,000 in commodities.

II. 1,500_(c) + 299_(v) + 201_(s) equals 2,000 in commodities. Grand
total, 9,000 in commodities.

Capitalisation takes place in the following manner:

In I the 500_(s) which are being capitalised divide into five-sixths, or
417_(c) plus one-sixth, or 83_(v). The 83_(v) draw an equal amount out
of II_(s), which buys elements of constant capital and adds them to
II_(c). An increase of II_(c) by 83 implies an increase of II_(v) by
one-fifth of 83, or 17.

We have, then, after this exchange

I. (5,000_(c) + 417_(s))_(c) + (1,000_(v) + 83_(s))_(v) = 5,417_(c) +
1,083_(v) = 6,500
II. (1,500_(c) + 83_(s))_(c) + (299_(v) + 17_(s))_(v) = 1,583_(c) +
316_(v) = 1,899
Total... 8,399.

The capital in I has grown from 6,000 to 6,500, or by 1/12. That of II
has grown from 1,715 to 1,899, or by not quite 1/9.

The reproduction on this basis in the second year brings the capital at
the end of that year to

I. (5,417_(c) + 452_(s))_(c) + (1,083_(v) + 90_(s))v = 5,869_(c) +
1,173_(v) = 7,042
II. (1,583_(c) + 42_(s) + 90_(s))_(c) + (316_(v) + 8_(s) + 18_(s))_(v) =
1,715_(c) + 342_(v)
= 2,057.

And at the end of the third year, we have a product of

I. 5,869_(c) + 1,173_(v) + 1,173_(s)
II. 1,715_(c) + 342_(v) + 342_(s).

If I accumulates one half of its surplus-value, as before, we find that
I_((v\ +\ ½s)) yields 1,173_(v) + 587_((½s)), equal to 1,760, more than
the entire 1,715 II_(c), an excess of 45. This must again be balanced by
transferring an equal amount of means of production to II_(c), which
thus grows by 45, necessitating an addition of one-fifth, or 9, to
II_(v). Furthermore, the capitalised 587 I_(s) divide into five-sixths
and one-sixth, i.e., 489_(c) and 98_(v). The 98 imply in II a new
addition of 98 to the constant capital, and this again an increase of
variable capital II by one-fifth, or 20. Then we have:

I. (5,869_(c) + 489_(s))_(c) + (1,173_(v) + 98_(s))_(v) = 6,358_(s) +
1,271_(v) = 7,629
II. (1,715_(c) + 45_(s) + 98_(s))_(c) + (342_(v) + 9_(s) + 20_(s))_(v) =
1,858_(c) + 371_(v) = 2,229
Total capital = 9,858.

In three years of growing reproduction the total capital of I has
increased from 6,000 to 7,629 and that of II from 1,715 to 2,229, the
aggregate social capital from 7,715 to 9,858.

3. Replacement of II_(c) in Accumulation

In the exchange of I_((v\ +\ s)) for II_(c) we thus meet with various
cases. In simple reproduction both of them must be equal and replace one
another, since otherwise simple reproduction cannot proceed without
disturbance, as we have seen above.

In accumulation it is above all the rate of accumulation that must be
considered. In the preceding cases we assumed that the rate of
accumulation in I was equal to ½s I, and also that it remained constant
from year to year. We changed only the proportion in which this
accumulated capital was divided into variable and constant capital. We
then had three cases:

1) I_((v\ +\ ½s)) equals II_(c), which is therefore smaller than
I_((v\ +\ s)). This must always be so, otherwise I does not accumulate.

2) I_((v\ +\ ½s)) is greater than II_(c). In this case the replacement
is effected by adding a corresponding portion of II_(s) to II_(c), so
that this sum becomes equal to I_((v\ +\ ½s)). Here the replacement for
II is not a simple reproduction of its constant capital, but
accumulation, an augmentation of its constant capital by that portion of
its surplus-product which it exchanges for means of production of I.
This augmentation implies at the same time a corresponding addition to
variable capital II out of its own surplus-product.

3) I_((v\ +\ ½s)) is smaller than II_(c). In this case II does not fully
reproduce its constant capital by means of exchange and must make good
the deficit by purchase from I. But this does not entail any further
accumulation of variable capital II, since its constant capital is fully
reproduced only by this operation. On the other hand that part of
capitalists I who accumulate only additional money-capital, have already
accomplished a portion of this accumulation by this transaction.

The premise of simple reproduction, that I_((v\ +\ s)) is equal to
II_(c), is not only incompatible with capitalist production, although
this does not exclude the possibility that in an industrial cycle of
10-11 years some year may show a smaller total production than the
preceding year, so that not even simple reproduction takes place
compared to the preceding year. Besides that, considering the natural
annual increase in population simple reproduction could take place only
to the extent that a correspondingly larger number of unproductive
servants would partake of the 1,500 representing the aggregate
surplus-value. But accumulation of capital, real capitalist production,
would be impossible under such circumstances. The fact of capitalist
accumulation therefore excludes the possibility of II_(c) being equal to
I_((v\ +\ s)). Nevertheless it might occur even with capitalist
accumulation that in consequence of the course taken by the processes of
accumulation during a preceding series of periods of production II_(c)
might become not only equal but even bigger than I_((v\ +\ s)). This
would mean an over-production in II and could not be adjusted in any
other way than by a great crash, in consequence of which some capital of
II would get transferred to I.

Nor does it alter the relation of I_((v\ +\ s)) to II_(c) if a portion
of constant capital II reproduces itself, as happens for instance in the
use of home-grown seeds in agriculture. This portion of II_(c) is no
more to be taken into consideration in the exchange between I and II
than is I_(c). Nor does it change matters if a part of the products of
II is capable of entering into I as means of production. It is covered
by a part of the means of production supplied by I, and this portion
must be deducted on both sides at the outset, if we wish to examine in
pure and unobscured form the exchange between the two large classes of
social production, the producers of means of production and the
producers of articles of consumption.

Hence under capitalist production I_((v\ +\ s)) cannot be equal to
II_(c), in other words, the two cannot balance in mutual exchange. On
the other hand, if I_((s/x)) is taken as that portion of I_(s) which is
spent by capitalists I as revenue, I_((v\ +\ s/x)) may be equal to,
larger, or smaller than, II_(c). But I_((v\ +\ s/x)) must always be
smaller than II_((c\ +\ s)) by as much as that portion of II_(s) which
must be consumed under all circumstances by capitalist class II.

It must be noted that in this exposition of accumulation the value of
the constant capital is not presented accurately so far as that capital
is a part of the value of the commodity-capital it helped to produce.
The fixed portion of the newly accumulated constant capital enters into
the commodity-capital only gradually and periodically, according to the
different natures of these fixed elements. Therefore whenever raw
materials, semi-finished goods, etc., enter in huge quantities into the
production of commodities, the commodity-capital consists for the most
part of replacements of the circulating constant components and of the
variable capital. (On account of the specific turnover of the
circulating component parts this way of presenting the matter may
nevertheless be adopted. It is then assumed that the circulating portion
together with the portion of value of the fixed capital transferred to
it is turned over so often during the year that the aggregate sum of the
commodities supplied is equal in value to all the capital entering into
the annual production.) But wherever only auxiliary materials are used
for mechanical industry, and no raw material, there the labour element,
equal to v, must reappear in the commodity-capital as its larger
constituent. While in the calculation of the rate of profit the
surplus-value is figured on the total capital, regardless of whether the
fixed components periodically transfer much or little value to the
product, the fixed portion of constant capital is to be included in the
calculation of the value of any periodically created commodity-capital
only to the extent that on an average it yields value to the product on
account of wear and tear.

IV. Supplementary Remarks

The original source of the money for II is v + s of the gold industry I
exchanged for a part of II_(c). The v + s of the producer of gold does
not enter into II only to the extent that he accumulates surplus-value
or converts it into means of production I, i.e., to the extent that he
expands his production. On the other hand, since the accumulation of
money on the part of the gold producer himself leads ultimately to
reproduction on an extended scale, a portion of the surplus-value of
gold production not spent as revenue passes as additional variable
capital of the gold producer into II, promotes here the formation of new
hoards or supplies new means with which to buy from I without selling to
it direct. From the money derived from this I_((v\ +\ s)) of the
production of gold that portion of the gold must be deducted which
certain branches of production II need as raw material, etc., in short
as an element for the replacement of their constant capital. An element
for the preliminary formation of hoards — for the purpose of future
extended reproduction — exists in the exchange between I and II: for I
only if part of I_(s) is sold one-sidedly, without a balancing purchase,
to II and serves there as additional constant capital II; for II, when
the same is the case on the part of I for additional variable capital;
furthermore, if a part of the surplus-value spent by I as revenue is not
covered by II_(c), hence a part of II_(s) is bought with it and thus
converted into money. If I_((v\ +\ s/x)) is greater than II_(c), then
II_(c) need not for its simple reproduction replace in commodities from
I what I consumed out of II_(s). The question arises to what extent
hoarding can take place within the sphere of exchange of capitalists II
among themselves, an exchange which can consist only of a mutual
exchange of II_(s). We know that direct accumulation takes place within
II by the direct conversion of a portion of II s into variable capital
(just as in I a portion of I_(s) is directly converted into constant
capital). In the various age categories of accumulation within the
various lines of business of II, and for the individual capitalists in
each line of business, the matter is explained _mutatis mutandis_ in the
same way as in I. Some are still in the stage of hoarding, and sell
without buying; the others are on the point of actual expansion of
reproduction, and buy without selling. The additional variable
money-capital is, true enough, first invested in additional
labour-power, but this buys means of subsistence from the hoarding
owners of the additional articles of consumption entering into the
consumption of the labourers. From these owners, _pro rata_ to their
hoard formation, the money does not return to its point of departure.
They hoard it.

Notes

1. This puts an end, once and for all, to the feud over the accumulation
of capital between James Mill and S. Bailey, which we have discussed
from another point of view in Book I, Ch. XXIV, 5, Note, namely, the
feud concerning the possibility of extending the operation of industrial
capital without changing its magnitude. We shall revert to this later.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents

+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| [Marx at his Study]               |                                   |
|                                   |                                   |
|                                   | STUDY GUIDE FOR KARL MARX’S _“CAP |
|                                   | ITAL”_ VOLUME II                  |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+


Part I: The Metamorphoses of Capital and their Circuits

Terms: Circuit of Capital, Commodity, Capital, Money, Production and
Consumption, Metamorphosis of Capital. Labour-power, Price, Surplus
Value, Means of Production, Proletariat.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What does it mean to assume that commodities are sold “at their
value”? Is this not a circular assumption?
2. Why does Marx say that labour cannot have a value?
3. Under what conditions is the sale of labour part of the circuit of
capital, M —L?
4. Which specific features of M —L in capitalist production should be
attributed to _money_ and which to _capital_?
5. Why is it necessary for commodity production to be general for
wage-labour to be the dominant form of labour? And why is it impossible
for money to take the form of capital outside of the circulation of
commodities?
6. What is meant by money capital, productive capital and commodity
capital and what is their relation to one another, and what is
“industrial capital”?
7. What commodity is produced by the transportation industry? And how
would you reckon the transportation commodity as part of the cost of
getting a product to the market and realising its value as money? And
what about a worker's cost of getting to the workplace?

 Chapter 2: - The Circuit of Productive Capital

Terms: Proletariat.

Questions for discussion:
 1. Even though the bourgeoisie are as wealthy a class as any monarchy
or nobility, they usually do not make a show of their wealth, at least
in mature capitalist countries. Why is this?
2. Why is it not viable for the capitalists to consume the entirety of
the surplus realised in production?

 Chapter 3: - The Circuit of Commodity-Capital

Questions for discussion:
 1. Why does Marx say that commodity capital must contain surplus value
_at the start_ of the circuit?
2. Marx rejects the political economists' depiction of production as the
_purpose_ of the process of capitalist production. Why?
3. Marx says that the fact that the total social capital is the
algebraic sum of all the individual capitals does not preclude the fact
that the individual capitals may present _other_ phenomena than the same
movement as part of the aggregate capital?
4. “Increased productivity can increase only the _substance_ of capital,
but not its value.” Explain.

 Chapter 4: - The Three Formulas of the Circuit

Terms: Mediation, Abstract, Market, Functionalism, Commodification.

Questions for discussion:
 1. Why has Marx divided the circulation of capital into three forms and
what phenomena does he bring to light in this way?
2. Why does Marx refer to production as an _interruption_ of
circulation?
3. What does this chapter tell you about different sections of the
capitalist class and their interrelations?
4. What is the historical relation between the three circuits of
capital?
5. What does Marx mean by natural economy, money economy and credit
economy?

 Chapter 5: The Time of Circulation

Terms: Cycle of Reproduction, Variable and Constant Capital.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What factors can you list that lengthen/shorten the time of
circulation of capital?
2. Broadly speaking, how do you think the time of circulation has varied
over the past decades? And how do you see it moving at the moment, and
what effect do you see this as having?
3. What is the effect on the time of circulation on the rate of profit,
other things being equal?

 Chapter 6: The Costs of Circulation

Terms: Productive Labour, Realisation, Taylorism, Brand.

Questions for discussion:
 1. How do you understand Marx's metaphor with the Law of Conservation
of Energy?
2. What does Marx say about the productiveness and usefulness of the
retail worker? How does the cost of circulation affect the value of the
product, according to Marx?
3. What distinction (if any) does Marx make between the _COSTS OF
CIRCULATION_ and the _COSTS OF TRANSPORTATION_? Do you think that this
distinction is legitimate?
4. What does Marx say about the costs of accounting &c.? And again, do
you think it is legitimate to distinguish between the labour of the
bookkeeper, as a _cost_ of production and deduction from capital, and
the labour of the production line operator, which creates new value by
its use?
5. What is Marx's point about costs which increase the price of a
commodity without adding to its usefulness? How who you look at
advertising and “branding” in this context?
6. What is Marx's point, in terms of cost of circulation, about the mass
of commodities resting in the market awaiting purchase?
7. What is Marx's point about the costs of transportation (here
considered as part of the costs of circulation)? Do you think these
costs are rightly placed under costs of circulation, or could they
legitimately included under costs of production?
8. Discuss how the categories outlined by Marx in this chapter may or
may not express the nature of the capitalist production process in his
times, and whether the nature of capitalist production today warrants
any amendment to these ideas?


Part II - The Turnover of Capital

People: Adam Smith, Quesnay, David Ricardo.

Terms: The Working Day, Rate of Surplus Value.

Questions for discussion:
 1. How does the concept of velocity of turnover relate to the concepts
of the circuit of capital, discussed in Part I?
2. What differences does Marx identify between fixed and “circulating”
capital, and between constant an variable capital in terms of the
turnover time?
3. What is Marx's criticism of Adam Smith's analysis of fixed vs.
circulating capital?
4. What is Marx's criticism of the Physiocrats' analysis of fixed vs.
circulating capital?
5. What is Marx's criticism of David Ricardo's analysis of fixed vs.
circulating capital?
6. How does the length of the period of interruption of the circulation
of capital during the production process affect relations between
different capitals?
7. What imperative does the distnction between the time of production
and the working time impose on the productive capitalist?
8. What effect does the circulation time have on competition between
capitalists?
9. How would a change of prices affect a capitalist in relation to all
these varaibles?
10. What is the distinction between the rate of surplus value and the
_annual_ rate of surplus value? And how would you describe the
significance of the _annual_ rate of surplus value?
11. How do all these factors affect the _accumulation_ of capital?
12. How does the amount of money and credit in circulation affect all
these factors?
13. In general, how do you think velocity of turnover, the proportion of
fixed to circulating capital and the proportion of working time to
production time have varied over the past?


Part III - Reproduction and Circulation of the Aggregate Social Capital

Terms: Distribution and Exchange, Credit.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What does Marx see as the essential role of Money capital in the
aggregate process of capitalist production?
2. What is Marx criticism of Quesnay's conception of the aggregate
process of capitalist production?
3. What is Marx criticism of Adam Smith's conception of the aggregate
process of capitalist production?
4. What is Marx criticism of Ricardo's conception of the aggregate
process of capitalist production?

 Chapter 20: Simple Reproduction

Terms: Departments of Capital, Overproduction and Underconsumption,
Necessary and Surplus Labour Time.

Questions for discussion:
 1. In terms of the production in Departments I and II, what factors
constrain the proportion of the total social product which the
bourgeoisie must allocate for their own consumption and that of the
working class?
2. In the same terms, what would be the effect of a wage increase on the
economy as a whole?
3. What issues would arise for a developing country trying to build up a
capitalist economy? And what issues arise in respect to international
trade between countries in which living standards are very different?

 Chapter 21: Accumulation and Reproduction on an Expanded Scale (Ch
16-18)

Terms: Fordism, Great Depression, Free Trade and Protectionism, Bretton
Woods.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What kind of measures foster accumulation of capital on an expanded
scale?
2. What kinds of crises do you see arising from too rapid expansion of
accumulation?
3. In these considerations, do you see reasons for the decline of
agriculture?
4. Do you see in these consdierations any basis for the growth of the
service sector in recent deacdes?
5. Do you see in these consdierations any basis for the growth of the
finance sector in recent deacdes?

Andy Blunden, 2002

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents | More Study Guides
Marx Biography | Marx/Engels Works Index | Marxists Internet Archive
